UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☑ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the Fiscal Year Ended December 31, 2022
or
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from      to
Commission file number:
1-6523
Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter:
Bank of America Corporation
State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization:
Delaware
IRS Employer Identification No.:
56-0906609
Address of principal executive offices:
Bank of America Corporate Center
100 N. Tryon Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28255
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code:
(704) 386-5681
Securities registered pursuant to section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange on which
registered
Common Stock, par value $0.01 per share BAC New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrE New York Stock Exchange
 of Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series E
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrB New York Stock Exchange
 of 6.000% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series GG
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrK New York Stock Exchange
 of 5.875% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series HH
7.25% Non-Cumulative Perpetual Convertible Preferred Stock, Series L BAC PrL New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrG New York Stock Exchange
of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 1
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange on which
registered
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrH New York Stock Exchange
 of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 2
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrJ New York Stock Exchange
 of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 4
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share BML PrL New York Stock Exchange
 of Bank of America Corporation Floating Rate
Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 5
Floating Rate Preferred Hybrid Income Term Securities of BAC Capital BAC/PF New York Stock Exchange
 Trust XIII (and the guarantee related thereto)
5.63% Fixed to Floating Rate Preferred Hybrid Income Term Securities BAC/PG New York Stock Exchange
 of BAC Capital Trust XIV (and the guarantee related thereto)
Income Capital Obligation Notes initially due December 15, 2066 of MER PrK New York Stock Exchange
Bank of America Corporation
Senior Medium-Term Notes, Series A, Step Up Callable Notes, due BAC/31B New York Stock Exchange
 November 28, 2031 of BofA Finance LLC (and the guarantee
of the Registrant with respect thereto)
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrM New York Stock Exchange
 of 5.375% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series KK
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrN New York Stock Exchange
of 5.000% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series LL
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrO New York Stock Exchange
of 4.375% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series NN
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrP New York Stock Exchange
of 4.125% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series PP
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrQ New York Stock Exchange
of 4.250% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series QQ
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share BAC PrS New York Stock Exchange
of 4.750% Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series SS
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☑ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant: (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to
such filing requirements for the past 90 days.  Yes ☑ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405
of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit
such files).  Yes ☑ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company or
an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth
company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☑ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
                                            Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any
new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management's assessment of the effectiveness of its internal
control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that
prepared or issued its audit report.  ☑
If securities are registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act, indicate by check mark whether the financial statements of the registrant included in
the filing reflect the correction of an error to previously issued financial statements. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether any of those error corrections are restatements that required a recovery analysis of incentive-based compensation
received by any of the registrant’s executive officers during the relevant recovery period pursuant to §240.10D-1(b). ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes ☐ No ☑
As of June 30, 2022, the aggregate market value of the registrant’s common stock (“Common Stock”) held by non-affiliates was approximately
$250,136,457,342. At February 21, 2023, there were 8,003,839,222 shares of Common Stock outstanding.
Documents incorporated by reference: Portions of the definitive proxy statement relating to the registrant’s 2023 annual meeting of shareholders are
incorporated by reference in this Form 10-K in response to Items 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of Part III.
Table of Contents
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Part I  Page
Item 1. Business 2
Item 1A .Risk Factors 8
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 23
Item 2. Properties 23
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 23
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 23
Part II   
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities23
Item 6. [Reserved] 24
Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 25
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 86
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 86
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 169
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 169
Item 9B. Other Information 169
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 169
Part III   
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 169
Item 11. Executive Compensation 170
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 170
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 170
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 170
Part IV   
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules 171
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 174
1 Bank of America
Part I
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 1. Business
Bank of America Corpor ation is a Delaware corporation, a bank
holding company (BHC) and a financial holding company . When
used in this report, “Bank of America,” “the Corporation,” “we,”
“us” and “our” may refer to Bank of America Corporation
individually , Bank of America Corporation and its subsidiaries, or
certain of Bank of America Corporation’ s subsidiaries or
affiliates. As part of our efforts to streamline the Corporation’ s
organizational structure and reduce complexity and costs, the
Corporation has reduced and intends to continue to reduce the
number of its corporate subsidiaries, including through
intercompany mergers.
Bank of America is one of the world’ s largest financial
institutions, serving individual consumers, small- and middle-
market businesses, institutional investors, large corporations
and governments with a full range of banking, investing, asset
management and other financial and risk management products
and services. Our principal executive offices are located in the
Bank of America Corporate Center , 100 North Tryon Street,
Charlotte, North Carolina 28255.
Bank of America’ s website is www .bankofamerica.com, and
the Investor Relations portion of our website is
https://investor .bankofamerica.com. We use our website to
distribute company information, including as a means of
disclosing material, non-public information and for complying
with our disclosure obligations under Regulation FD. We
routinely post and make accessible financial and other
information, including environmental, social and governance
(ESG) information, regarding the Corporation on our website.
Investors should monitor our website, including the Investor
Relations portion of our website, in addition to our press
releases, U.S. Securitie s and Exchange Com mission (SEC)
filings, public conference calls and webcasts. Our Annual
Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q,
Current Reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those reports
filed or furnished pursu ant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (Exchange Act) are available
on the Investor Relatio ns portion of our website as soon as
reasonably practicable after we electronically file such reports
with, or furnish them to, the SEC and at the SEC’ s website,
www .sec.gov . Notwithstanding the foregoing, the information
contained on our webs ite as referenced in this paragraph, or
otherwise in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is not
incorporated by reference into this Annual Repor t on Form 10-K.
Also, we make available  on the Investor Relations portion of our
website: (i) our Code of Conduct; (ii) our Corporate Governance
Guidelines; and (iii) the charter of each active committee of our
Board of Directors (the Board). Our Code of Conduct constitutes
a “code of ethics” and a “code of business cond uct and ethics”
that applies to the requiredindividuals associated with the Corporation for purposes of the
respective rules of the SEC and the New York Stock Exchange.
We also intend to disclose any amendments to our Code of
Conduct and waivers of our Code of Conduct required to be
disclosed by the rules of the SEC and the New York Stock
Exchange on the Investor Relations portion of our website. All of
these corporate governance materials are also available free of
charge in print to share holders who request them in writing to:
Bank of America Corporation, Attention: Office of the Corporate
Secretary , Bank of America Corporate Center , 100 North Tryon
Street, NC1-007-56-06, Charlotte, North Carolina 28255.
Segments
Through our various bank and nonbank subsidia ries throughout
the U.S. and in internat ional markets, we provide a diversified
range of banking and nonbank financial services and products
through four business segments: Consumer Banking , Glob al
Wealth & Investment Management (GWIM) , Globa l Bank ing and
Global Markets , with the remaining operations recorded in All
Other . Additional information related to our business segments
and the products and services they provide is included in the
information set forth on pages 37 through 46 of Item 7.
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operati ons (MD&A) and Note 23 – Business
Segment Information  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Competition
We operate in a highly competitive environment. Our
competitors include banks, thrifts, credit unions, investment
banking firms, investment advisory firms, brokerage firms,
investment companies, insurance companies, mortgage banking
companies, credit card issuers, mutual fund companies, hedge
funds, private equity firms, and e-commerce and other internet-
based comp anies, including merchant banks and companies
providing nonbank financial services. We compete with some of
these competitors globally and with others on a regional or
product-specific basis. We are increasingly comp eting with firms
offering products solely over the internet and with non-financial
companies, including firms utilizing emerging technologies, such
as digital assets, rather than, or in addition to, traditional banking
products.
Competition is based on a number of factors including,
among others, custome r service and convenience, the pricing,
quality and range of products and services offered, lending
limits, the quality and delivery of our technology and our
reputation, experience and relationships in relevant markets.
Our ability to continue to compete effectively also depends in
large part on our ability to attract new employees and develop,
retain and motivate our existing employees, while managing
compensation and other costs.
Bank of America 2
Human Capital Resources
We strive to make Bank of America a great place to work for our
employees. We value our employees and seek to establish and
maintain human resource policies that are consistent with our
core values and help to realize the power of our people. Our
Board and its Compen sation and Human Capital Committee
provide oversight of our human capital manage ment strategies,
programs and practices. The Corporation’ s senior management
provides regular briefings on human capital matters to the Board
and its Committees to facilitate the Board’ s oversight.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation employed
approximately 217,000 and 208,000 employee s, of which 79
percent and 80 percent were located in the U.S. None of our
U.S. emplo yees are subject to a collec tive bargaining
agreement. Additionally , in 2022 and 2021, the Corporation’ s
compensation and benefits expense was $36.4 billion and $36.1
billion, or 59 percent and 61 percent, of total noninterest
expense.
Diversity and Inclusion
The Corporation’ s commitment to diversity and inclusion starts
at the top with overs ight from our Board and CEO. The
Corporation’ s senior management sets the diversity and
inclusion goals, and the Chief Human Resources Officer and
Chief Diversity & Inclus ion Officer partner with our CEO and
senior management to drive our diversity and inclusion strategy ,
programs, initiatives and policies. The Global Diversity and
Inclusion Council, which consists of senior executives from
every line of business and region, is chaired by our CEO and
has been in place for over 20 years. The Council sponsors and
supports business, operating unit and regional diversity and
inclusion councils to align with enterprise diversity strategies and
goals.
Our practices and policies have resulted  in strong
representation across the Corporation where our broad
employee population mirrors the clients and communities we
serve. We have a Board and senior management team that are
53 percent and 55 percent racially , ethnically and gender
diverse. The following table presents diversity metrics for our
global employees who self-identified as women and our U.S.-
based employees who self-identified as people of color ,
including those who self-identified as Asian, Black/African
American and Hispanic/Latino. These workforce diversity
metrics are reported regularly to the senior management team
and to the Board.Diversity Metrics as of December 31, 2022
Total
EmployeesTop Three
Management
LevelsManagers at
All Levels
Global employees
Women 50 % 42 % 42 %
U.S.-based employees
  People of color 50 26 42 
Asian 14 11 14 
    Black/African American 14 8 10 
Hispanic/Latino 19 6 16 
We invest in our talent by offering a range of development
programs and resources that allow employees to develop and
progress in their careers. We reinforce our commitment to
diversity and inclusion by investing internally in our employee
networks and by facilitating enterprise-wide  learning and
conversations about various diversity and inclusion topics and
issues. Further , we partner with various external organizations,
which focus on advancin g diverse talent. We also have practices
in place for attracting and retaining diverse talent, including
campus recruitment. For example, in 2022, 44 percent of our
global campus hires were women and, in the U.S., 59 percent
were people of color .
Employee Engagement and Talent Retention
As part of our ongoing efforts to make the Corporation a great
place to work, we have conducted a confidential annual
Employee Engagement Survey (Survey) for nearly two decades.
The Survey  results are reviewed by the Board and senior
management and used to assist in reviewing the Corporation’ s
human capital strategies, programs and practices. In 2022, 85
percent of the Corporation’ s employees participated in the
Survey , and our Employee Engagement Index, an overall
measure of employee satisfaction with the Corporation, was 85
percent. Our turnover among employees was 13 percent in 2022
and 12 percent in 2021.
Additionally , the Corporation provides a variety of resources
to help employees grow in their current roles and build new
skills, including resources to help employees find new
opportunities, re-skill and seek leadership positions. The
learning and develop ment strategy is grounded in the
development of horizontal skills delivered throughout the
organization. Senior leaders, managers and teammates are
onboarded and build horizontal skills, as well as role-specific
skills, to help drive high performance. This approach also helps
facilitate internal mobility and promotion of talent to build a
bench of qualified mana gers and leaders. In 2022, more than
30,000 employees found new roles within the Corporation, and
we delivered more than 11 million hours of training and
development to our teammates through Bank of America
Academy . Additionally , our Board oversees CEO and senior
management succession  planning, which is formally reviewed at
least annually .
3 Bank of America
Fair and Equitable Compensation
The Corporation is comm itted to racial and gender pay equity by
striving to compensate all of our employees fairly and equitably .
We maintain robust policies and practices that reinforce our
commitment, including reviews conducted by a third-party
consultant with oversight from our Board and senior
management. In 2022, our review covered our regional hubs
(U.S., U.K., France, Ireland, Hong Kong and Singapore) and
India and showed that compensation received by women, on
average, was greater than 99 percent of that received by men in
comparable positions. In the U.S., compensat ion received by
people of color was, on average, greater than 99 percent of that
received by teammates who are not peop le of color in
comparable positions.
We also strive to pay our employees fairly base d on market
rates for their roles, experience and how they perform. We
regularly benchmark against other companies both within and
outside our industry to help confirm our pay is competitive. In
2021, the Corporation announced it would increase its minimum
hourly wage for U.S. employees to $25 per hour by 2025. In
June 2022, as a next step, the Corporation increased its hourly
minimum wage for U.S. employees to $22 per hour. In addition,
in January 2023, for the sixth year since 2017, we announced
that we recognized our teammates with Sharing Success
compensation awards for their efforts during 2022.
Approximately 96 percent of employees globally will receive an
award in the first quarter of 2023.
Health and Wellness – 2022 Focus
The Corporation is also committed to suppor ting employees’
physical, emotional and financial wellness by offering flexible
and competitive benefits, including comprehensive health and
insurance benefits and wellness resources. During 2022, we
continued efforts to support our employees through the ongoing
health crisis resulting from Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-
19). We provided no-cost COVID-19 testing and teammates with
incentives for getting the vaccine and booster . We also held on-
site flu and COVID-19 vaccine and booster clinics.
We continued our efforts around providing affordable access
to healthcare, including offering no-cost, 24/7 access to virtual
general medical and behavioral health resources to help our
enrolled U.S. teammates stay healthy , both physically and
emotionally . We kept U.S. health insurance premiums
unchanged for teammates earning less than $50,000 for the
tenth year in a row, and had nominal premium  increases for
teammates earning from $50,000 up to $100,0 00 for the sixth
year in a row. We provided in-network generic prescription
medications at no cost for teammates enrolled in a U.S. bank
medical PPO or Consumer Direct plan, along with continuing
preventative care medications at no cost for all U.S. medical
plans.
We offer an extensive benefit package and support work-life
balance for our teammates, which includes in the U.S., 16
weeks of paid parental leave for both primary and secondarycaregivers and backup dependent care (50 days of child and
adult backup care per year). We doubled the number of no-cost
confidential counseling sessions from six to 12 for all employees
and family members and now of fer 12 globally .
For more information about our human capital management,
see the Corporation’ s website and 2022 Annual Report to
shareholders that will be available on the Investor Relations
portion of our website in March 2023 (the content of which is not
incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-
K).
Government Supervision and Regulation
The following discussion describes, among  other things,
elements of an extensive regulatory framewor k applicable to
BHCs, finan cial holding companies, banks and broker-dealers,
including specific information about Bank of America.
We are subject to an extensive regulatory  framework
applicable to BHCs, financial holding companies and banks and
other financial services entities. U.S. federal regulation of banks,
BHCs and financial holding companies is intended primarily for
the protection of depositors and the Deposit Insurance Fund
(DIF) rather than for the protection of shareholders and
creditors.
As a registered financial holding company and BHC, the
Corporation is subject to the supervision of, and regular
inspection by, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve
System (Federal Reser ve). Our U.S. bank subsidiaries (the
Banks), organized as national banking associati ons, are subject
to regulation, supervision and examination by the Office of the
Comptroller of the Currency (OCC), the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation (FDIC) and the Federal Reserve. In
addition, the Federal Reserve and the OCC have adopted
guidelines that establish minimum standards for the design,
implementation and board oversight of BHCs’  and national
banks’  risk governance frameworks. U.S. financial holding
companies, and the companies under their control, are
permitted to engage in activities considered “financial in nature”
as defined by the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and related Federal
Reserve interpretations. The Corporation's status as a financial
holding company is conditioned upon maintaining certain
eligibility requirements for both the Corporation and its U.S.
depository institution subsidiaries, including minimum capital
ratios, supervisory ratings and, in the case of the depository
institutions, at least satisfactory Community Reinvestment Act
ratings. Failure to be an eligible financial holding company could
result in the Federal Reserve limiting Bank of America's
activities, including potential acquisitions. Additionally , we are
subject to a significant number of laws, rules and regulations
that govern  our businesses in the U.S. and in the other
jurisdictions in which we operate, including permissible activities,
minimum levels of capital and liquidity , compliance risk
management, consume r products and sales practices, anti-
money laundering and anti-corruption, governm ent sanctions,
privacy , data protection  and executive compe nsation, among
others.
Bank of America 4
The scope of the laws and regulations and the intensity of
the supervision to which  we are subject have increased over the
past severa l years, beginning with the response to the 2008
financial crisis, as well as other factors such as technological
and market changes. In addition, the banking and financial
services sector is subjec t to substantial regulato ry enforcement
and fines. Many of these changes have occurred as a result of
the 2010 Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer
Protection Act (the Financial Reform Act). We cannot assess
whether there will be any additional major changes in the
regulatory environment and expect that our business will remain
subject to continuing and extensive regulation and supervision.
We are also subject to various other laws and regulations, as
well as supervision and examination by other regulatory
agencies, all of which directly or indirectly affect our entities,
management and ability to make distributions to shareholders.
For instance, our broker-dealer subsidiaries are subject to both
U.S. and international regulation, including supervision by the
SEC, Finan cial Industry Regulatory Authority and New York
Stock Exchange, among others; our futures commission
merchant subsidiaries supporting commodities and derivatives
businesses in the U.S. are subject to regulation by and
supervision of the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission
(CFTC), National Future s Association, the Chicago Mercantile
Exchange, and in the case of the Banks, certain banking
regulators; our insurance activities are subject to licensing and
regulation by state insurance regulatory agencies; and our
consumer financial products and services are regulated by the
Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB).
Our non-U.S. businesses are also subject to extensive
regulation by various non-U.S. regulators, including
governments, securities exchanges, prudential regulators,
central banks and other regulatory bodies, in the jurisdictions in
which those  businesse s operate. For example, our financial
services entities in the United Kingdom (U.K.), Ireland and
France are subject to regulation by the Prudential Regulatory
Authority and Financial Conduct Authority (FCA ), the European
Central Bank and Centr al Bank of Ireland, and the Autorité de
Contrôle Prudentiel et de Résolution and Autorité des Marchés
Financiers, respectively .
Source of Strength
Under the Financial Reform Act and Federal Reserve policy ,
BHCs are expected to act as a source of finan cial strength to
each subsidiary bank and to commit resources to support each
such subsidiary . Similarly , under the cross-guarantee provisions
of the Feder al Deposit Insurance Corporation Improvement Act
of 1991 (FDICIA), in the event of a loss suffered or anticipated
by the FDIC, either as a result of default of a bank subsidiary or
related to FDIC assistance provided to such a subsidiary in
danger of default, the affiliate banks of such a subsidiary may be
assessed for the FDIC’ s loss, subject to certain exceptions.
Transactions with Affiliates
Pursuant to Section 23A and 23B of the Federal Reserve Act, as
implemented by the Federal Reserve’ s Regulation W, the Banks
are subject to restrictions that limit certain types of transactions
between the Banks and their nonbank af filiates. In general, U.S.banks are subject to quantitative and qualitative limits on
extensions of credit, purchases of assets and certain other
transactions involving their nonbank affiliates. Additionally ,
transactions between U.S. banks and their nonbank affiliates are
required to be on arm’s length terms and must be consistent
with standards of safety and soundness.
Deposit Insurance
Deposits placed at U.S. domiciled banks are insured by the
FDIC, subje ct to limits and conditions of applica ble law and the
FDIC’ s regulations. Pursuant to the Financial Reform Act, FDIC
insurance coverage limits are $250,000 per depositor , per
insured bank for each account ownership category . All insured
depository institutions are required to pay assessments to the
FDIC in order to fund the DIF .
The FDIC is required to maintain a statutory minimum ratio of
the DIF to insured depo sits in the U.S. of at least 1.35 percent
and has established a long-term goal of a two percent DIF ratio.
As of the date of this report, the DIF is below the statutory
minimum ratio and the FDIC’ s long-term goal. In October 2022,
the FDIC adopted a restoration plan that includes an increase in
deposit insurance assessments across the industry of two basis
points (bps). The FDIC has indicated that it intends to maintain
such assessment rates for the foreseeable future. Deposit
insurance assessment rates are subject to chan ge by the FDIC
and will be impacted by the overall economy and the stability of
the banking industry as a whole. For more information regarding
deposit insurance, see Item 1A. Risk Factors – Regulatory ,
Compliance and Legal on page 17.
Capital, Liquidity and Operational Requirements
As a financi al holding company , we and our bank subsidiaries
are subject to the regulatory capital and liquidity rules issued by
the Federal Reserve and other U.S. bank ing regulators,
including the OCC and the FDIC. These rules are complex and
are evolving as U.S. and international regulatory authorities
propose and enact amendments to these rules. The Corporation
seeks to manage its capital position to maintain sufficient capital
to satisfy these regulatory rules and to suppo rt our business
activities. These continually evolving rules are likely to influence
our planning processes and may require addit ional regulatory
capital and liquidity , as well as impose additional  operational and
compliance costs on the Corporation.
For more information on regulatory capital rules, capital
composition and pending or proposed regulatory capital
changes, see Capital Management on page 49, and Note 16 –
Regulatory Requirements and Restrictions  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements, which are incorporated by reference in
this Item 1.
Distributions
We are subject to various regulatory policies and requirements
relating to capital actions, including payment of dividends and
common stock repurchases. For instance, Federal Reserve
regulations require major U.S. BHCs to submit a capital plan as
part of an annual Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review
(CCAR).
5 Bank of America
Our ability to pay dividends and make common stock
repurchases depends in part on our ability to maintain regulatory
capital levels above minimum requirements plus buffers and
non-capital standards established under the FDICIA. To the
extent that the Federal Reserve increases our stress capital
buffer (SCB), global systemically important bank (G-SIB)
surcharge or countercyclical capital buffer, our returns of capital
to shareho lders, including dividends and common stock
repurchases, could decrease. As part of its CCAR, the Federal
Reserve conducts stress testing on parts of our business using
hypothetical economic scenarios prepared by the Federal
Reserve. Those scenarios may affect our CCAR stress test
results, which may impact the level of our SCB. For example,
based on the results of our 2022 CCAR stress test, the
Corporation’ s SCB increased to 3.4 percent, and the
Corporation’ s G-SIB surcharge is expected to increase to 3.0
percent on January 1, 2024. Additionally , the Federal Reserve
could impose limitations or prohibitions on taking capital actions
such as paying or increasing dividends or repurchasing common
stock. For example, as a result of the economic uncertainty
resulting from the pandemic, in the second half of 2020, the
Federal Reserve introduced certain limitations to capital
distributions for all large banks, including the Corporation, which
were removed ef fective July 1, 2021.
If the Federal Reserve finds that any of our Banks are not
“well-capitalized” or “well-managed,” we would  be required to
enter into an agreemen t with the Federal Reserve to comply
with all appli cable capital and management requirements, which
may contain additional limitations or conditions relating to our
activities. Additionally , the applicable federal regulatory authority
is authorized  to determine, under certain circum stances relating
to the financial condition of a bank or BHC, that the payment of
dividends would be an unsafe or unsound practice and to
prohibit payment thereof.
For more information regarding the requirements relating to
the paymen t of dividends, including the minimum capital
requirements, see Note 13 – Shareholders’  Equity  and Note 16
– Regulatory  Requireme nts and Restrictions  to the Cons olidated
Financial Statements.
Many of our subsidiaries, including our bank and broker-
dealer subsidiaries, are subject to laws that restrict dividend
payments, or authorize regulatory bodies to block or reduce the
flow of funds from those subsidiaries to the parent company or
other subs idiaries. The rights of the Corporation, our
shareholders and our creditors to participate in any distribution
of the asset s or earnings of our subsidiaries are further subject
to the prior claims of creditors of the respective subsidiaries.
Resolution Planning
As a BHC with greater than $250 billion of assets, the
Corporation is required by the Federal Reserve and the FDIC to
periodically submit a plan for a rapid and orderly resolution in
the event of material financial distress or failure.
Such resolution plan is intended to be a detailed roadmap for
the orderly resolution of the BHC, including the continued
operations or solvent wind down of its material entities, pursuant
to the U.S. Bankruptcy Code under one or more hypothetical
scenarios assuming no extraordinary government assistance.
If both the Federal Reserve and the FDIC determine that the
BHC’ s plan is not credib le, the Federal Reserv e and the FDIC
may jointly impose more stringent capital, leverage or liquidity
requirements or restrictions on growth, activities or operations. A
summary of our plan is available on the Federal Reserve and
FDIC websites.The FDIC also requires the submission of a resolution plan
for Bank of America, National Association, which must describe
how the insured depository institution would be resolved under
the bank resolution provisions of the Federal Deposit Insurance
Act. A description of this plan is available on the FDIC’ s website.
We continue to make substantial progress to enhance our
resolvability , which includes continued improv ements to our
preparedness capabilities to implement our resolution plan, both
from a financial and operational standpoint.
Across international jurisdictions, resolution planning is the
responsibility of national resolution authorities  (RA). Among
those, the jurisdictions with the greatest impact to the
Corporation’ s subsidiari es are the U.K., Ireland and France,
where rules have been issued requiring the submission of
significant information about locally incorporated subsidiaries as
well as the Corporation’ s banking branches located in those
jurisdictions that are deemed to be material for resolution
planning purposes. As a result of the RA's review of the
submitted information, we could be required to take certain
actions over the next several years that could increase operating
costs and potentially result in the restructuring of certain
businesses and subsidiaries.
For more information regarding our resolution plan, see Item
1A. Risk Factors – Liquidity on page 9.
Insolvency and the Orderly Liquidation Authority
Under the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, the FDIC may be
appointed receiver of an insured depository institution if it is
insolvent or in certain other circumstances. In addition, under
the Financial Reform Act, when a systemically important
financial institution (SIFI) such as the Corporatio n is in default or
danger of default, the FDIC may be appointed receiver in order
to conduct an orderly liquidation of such instituti on. In the event
of such appointment, the FDIC could, among other things,
invoke the orderly liquidation authority , instead of the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code, if the Secretary of the Treasury makes certain
financial distress and systemic risk determinatio ns. The orderly
liquidation authority is modeled in part on the Federal Deposit
Insurance Act, but also adopts certain concepts from the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code.
The orderly liquidation authority contains certain differences
from the U.S. Bankruptcy Code. For example, in certain
circumstances, the FDIC could permit payment of obligations it
determines to be systemically significant (e.g., short-term
creditors or operating creditors) in lieu of paying other
obligations (e.g., long-term creditors) without the need to obtain
creditors’  consent or prior court review . The insolvency and
resolution process could also lead to a large reduction or total
elimination of the value of a BHC’ s outstanding equity , as well as
impairment or elimination of certain debt.
Under the FDIC’ s “single point of entry” strategy for resolving
SIFIs, the FDIC could replace a distressed BHC with a bridge
holding company , which could continue operations and result in
an orderly resolution of the underlying bank, but whose equity is
held solely for the benefit of creditors of the original BHC.
Furthermore, the Federal Reserve requires that BHCs
maintain minimum levels of long-term debt required to provide
adequate loss absorbing capacity in the event of a resolution.
For more information regarding our resolution, see Item 1A.
Risk Factors – Liquidity on page 9.
Bank of America 6
Limitations on Acquisitions
The Riegle-N eal Intersta te Banking and Branching Efficiency Act
of 1994 permits a BHC to acquire banks located in states other
than its home state witho ut regard to state law, subject to certain
conditions, including the condition that the BHC, after and as a
result of the acquisition, controls no more than 10 percent of the
total amount  of deposits of insured depository institutions in the
U.S. and no more than 30 percent or such lesser or greater
amount set by state law of such deposits in that state. At June
30, 2022, we held greater than 10 percent of the total amount of
deposits of insured depository institutions in the U.S.
In addition, the Financial Reform Act restricts acquisitions by
a finan cial institution if, as a result of the acquisition, the total
liabilities of the financial  institution would exceed 10 percent of
the total liabilities of all financial institutions in the U.S. At June
30, 2022, our liabilities did not exceed 10 percent of the total
liabilities of all financial institutions in the U.S.
The Volcker Rule
The Volcker  Rule prohibits insured depository institutions and
companies affiliated with insured depository institutions
(collectively , banking entities) from engaging  in short-term
proprietary trading of certain securities, derivatives, commodity
futures and options for their own account. The Volcker Rule also
imposes limits on banking entities’  investments in, and other
relationships with, hedge funds and private equity funds. The
Volcker Rule provides exemptions for certain activities, including
market making, underw riting, hedging, trading in government
obligations, insurance company activities and organizing and
offering hedge funds and private equity funds. The Volcker Rule
also clarifies that certain activities are not prohibited, including
acting as agent, broke r or custodian. A banking entity with
significant trading operations, such as the Corporation, is
required to maintain a detailed compliance program to comply
with the restrictions of the V olcker Rule.
Derivatives
Our derivatives operations are subject to extensive regulation
globally . These operations are subject to regulation under the
Financial Reform Act, the European Union (EU) Markets in
Financial Instruments Directive and Regulation, the European
Market Infrastructure Regulation, analogous U.K. regulatory
regimes and similar regulatory regimes in other jurisdictions that
regulate or will regulate the derivatives markets in which we
operate by, among other things: requiring clearing and exchange
trading of certain derivatives; enforcing existing or imposing new
capital, margin, reporting, registration and business conduct
requirements for certain market participants; imposing position
limits on certain derivat ives; and imposing derivatives trading
transparency requireme nts. These regulations are already in
effect in many markets in which we operate.
In addition, many G-20 jurisdictions, including the U.S., U.K.,
and Japan, have adopted resolution stay regulations to address
concerns that the close-out of derivatives and other financial
contracts in resolution could impede orderly resolution of G-
SIBs, and additional jurisdictions are expected to follow suit. In
addition, the EU has implemented EU-wide resolution stay
requirements. Generally , these resolution stay regulations
require amendment of certain financial contracts to provide for
contractual recognition of stays of termination rights undervarious statutory resolution regimes and a stay on the exercise
of cross-default rights based on an affiliate’ s entry into
insolvency proceedings. Resolution regulations may also require
contractual recognition by the counterparty that amounts owed
may be written down or converted into equity as part of a bail in.
As resolutio n stay regulations of a particular jurisdiction
applicable to us go into effect, we amend impacted financial
contracts in compliance with such regulations either as a
regulated entity or as a counterparty facing a regulated entity in
such jurisdiction.
Consumer Regulations
Our consumer businesses are subject to extensive regulation
and oversight by federal and state regulators. Certain federal
consumer finance laws to which we are subject, including the
Equal Credit Opportunity Act, Home Mortgage Disclosure Act,
Electronic Fund Transfer Act, Fair Credit Reporting Act, Real
Estate Settlement Procedures Act, unfair , deceptive, or abusive
acts or practices (UDAA P), Truth in Lending Act and Truth in
Savings Act, are enforced by the CFPB. Other federal consumer
finance laws, such as the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, are
enforced by the OCC.
Privacy and Information Security
We are subject to many U.S. federal, state and international
laws and regulations governing requirements for maintaining
policies and procedures regarding the disclosure, use and
protection of the non-public confidential information of our
customers and employees. The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act
requires us to periodically disclose Bank of America’ s privacy
policies and practices relating to sharing such information and
enables retail customers to opt out of our ability to share
information with unaffiliated third parties, under certain
circumstances. The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and other laws
also require us to implement a comprehensive information
security program that includes administrative , technical and
physical safeguards to provide the security and confidentiality of
customer records and information. Security and privacy policies
and procedures for the protection of personal and confidential
information are in effect across all businesses and geographic
locations.
Other laws and regulations, at the international, federal and
state level, impact our ability to share certain information with
affiliates and non-af filiates for marketing and/o r non-marketing
purposes, or contact customers with marketing offers and
establish certain rights of consumers in connection with their
personal information. For example, Californ ia’s Consumer
Privacy Act (CCP A), as modified by the California Privacy Rights
Act (CPRA) , provides consumers with the right to know what
personal data is being collected, know whether their personal
data is sold or disclosed  and to whom and opt out of the sale of
their person al data, among other rights. In addition, in the EU,
the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) replaced the
Data Protection Directive and related implementing national
laws in its member states. The CCPA's, CPRA 's and GDPR’ s
impact on the Corporation was assessed and addressed
through comprehensive compliance implementation programs.
These existi ng and evolving legal requirements in the U.S. and
abroad, as well as court proceedings and changing guidance
from regula tory bodies with respect to the validity of cross-
border data transfer mechanisms from the EU, continue to lend
uncertainty to privacy compliance globally .
7 Bank of America
Item 1A. Risk Factors
The discussion below addresses our material risk factors of
which we are aware. Any risk factor , either by itself or together
with other risk factors, could materially and adversely affect our
businesses, results of operations, cash flows and/or financial
condition. References to third parties may include their upstream
and downstream service providers who may also contribute to
our risks. Other factors  not currently known to us or that we
currently deem immaterial could also adversely affect our
businesses, results of operations, cash flows and/or financial
condition. Therefore, the risk factors below should not be
considered all of the potential risks that we may face. For more
information on how we manage risks, see Managing Risk in the
MD&A  on page 46. For more information about the risks
contained in the Risk Factors section, see Item 1. Business on
page 2, MD&A  on page 26 and Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements on page 94.
Market
We may be adversely affected by the financial markets,
fiscal, monetary , and regulatory policies, and economic
conditions.
General economic, political, social and health conditions in
the U.S. and abroad affect financial markets and our business.
In particular , global markets may be affected by the level and
volatility of interest rates, availability and market conditions of
financing, changes in gross domestic product (GDP), economic
growth or its sustainab ility, inflation, supply chain disruptions,
consumer spending, employment levels, labor shortages,
challenging labor market conditions, wage stagnation, federal
government shutdowns, energy prices, home prices, commercial
property values, bankruptcies, a default by a significant market
participant or class of counterparties, including  companies in
emerging markets, fluctuations or other significant changes in
both debt and equity capital markets and currencies, liquidity ,
the continue d transition from InterBank Offered  Rates (IBORs)
and other benchmark rates to alternative reference rates
(ARRs), the impact of volatility of digital assets  on the broader
market, the growth of global trade and commerce, trade policies,
the availabi lity and cost of capital and credit, disruption of
communication, transportation or energy infrastructure,
recessionary fears and investor sentiment. Global markets,
including energy and commodity markets, may be adversely
affected by the current or anticipated impact of climate change,
acute and/or chronic extreme weather events or natural
disasters, the emergence or continuation of widespread health
emergencies or pandemics, cyberattacks, military conflict,
terrorism, or other geop olitical events. Market fluctuations may
impact our margin requirements and affect our liquidity . Any
sudden or prolonged market downturn, as a result of the above
factors or otherwise, could result in a decline in net interest
income and noninterest income and adversely affect our results
of operations and financial condition, including capital and
liquidity levels. High inflation, elevated intere st rate levels,
supply chain disruptions, and the Russia/Ukraine conflict,
including the related energy impact in Europe, have adversely
impacted and may continue to adversely impact financial
markets and macroeconomic conditions and could result in
additional market volatility and disruptions.
Global unce rtainties regarding fiscal and mone tary policies
present economic challenges. Actions taken by the Federal
Reserve or other central banks, including changes in target
rates, balance sheet management and lending facilities, are
beyond our control and difficult to predict, particularly in a high
inflation environment. This can affect interest rates and the
value of financial instruments and other assets, such as debtsecurities, and impact our borrowers and potentially increase
delinquency rates and may also raise government debt levels,
adversely affect businesses and household  incomes and
increase uncertainty surrounding monetary policy . Monetary
policy in response to high inflation has led to a significant
increase in market interest rates and a flattening and/or
inversion of the yield curve. This has resulted in and may
continue to result in volatility of equity and other markets, further
volatility of the U.S. dollar , a widening in credit spreads and
higher interest rates and recessionary conce rns, and could
result in elevated unemployment, which could impact investor
risk appetite and our borrowers, potentially increasing
delinquency rates. It is also possible that high inflation may limit
the scope of monetary support, including cuts to the federal
funds rate, in the event of an economic downturn, resulting in a
more protracted period of a flat and/or inverted yield curve.
Any future change in monetary policy by the Federal
Reserve, in an effort to stimulate the economy or otherwise,
resulting in lower interest rates would likely result in lower
revenue through lower net interest income , which could
adversely affect our results of operations. Additionally , changes
to existing U.S. laws and regulatory policies and evolving
priorities, including those related to financial regulation, taxation,
international trade, fiscal policy , climate change (including efforts
to transition to a low-carbon economy) and healthcare, may
adversely impact U.S. or global economic activity and our
customers', our counterparties' and our earnings and operations.
Globally , many central banks are simultaneously reducing
monetary accommodation through interest rate or balance sheet
policy , which  has contributed and may continue to contribute to
elevated financial and capital market volatility  and significant
changes to asset values. While higher interest rates have
positively impacted our net interest income, higher interest rates
have negatively impacted and could continue to negatively
impact depo sits, loan demand and funding costs. If the U.S.
government’ s debt ceiling limit is not raised, the ramifications
could result in market volatility , ratings downgrades and limit
fiscal policy responses to recessionary conditions. This could
have a negative and potentially severe impact on the U.S. and
world economy and financial and capital markets, including
higher interest rates, higher volatility , lower asset values, lower
liquidity , downgrades to U.S. debt, and a weakened U.S. dollar .
Changes to international trade and investment policies by the
U.S. could negatively impact financial markets . Escalation of
tensions between the U.S. and the People’ s Republic of China
(China) could lead to further U.S. measures that adversely affect
financial markets, disrupt world trade and commerce and lead to
trade retaliation, including through the use of tariffs, foreign
exchange measures or the large-scale sale of U.S. Treasury
bonds. Any restrictions on the activities of businesses, could
also negatively af fect financial markets.
These developments could adversely affect our businesses,
customers, securities and derivatives portfolios, including the
risk of lower re-investme nt rates within those portfolios, our level
of charge-of fs and provision for credit losses, the carrying value
of our deferred tax assets, our capital levels, our liquidity and
our results of operations.
Increased market volat ility and adverse changes in financial
or capital market conditions may increase our market risk.
Our liquidity , competitive position, business,  results of
operations and financial condition are affected by market risks
such as changes in interest and currency exchange rates,
fluctuations in equity , commodity and futures  prices, trading
volumes and prices of securitized products, the implied volatility
of interest rates and credit spreads and other economic and
Bank of America 8
business factors. These market risks may adversely affect,
among other things, the value of our securities, including our on-
and off-balance sheet securities, trading assets and other
financial instruments, the cost of debt capital and our access to
credit markets, the value of assets under management (AUM),
fee income relating to AUM, customer allocation of capital
among investment alternatives, the volume of client activity in
our trading operations, investment banking, underwriting and
other capital market fees, which have already been negatively
impacted, the general profitability and risk level of the
transactions in which we engage and our competitiveness with
respect to deposit pricing. The value of certain of our assets is
sensitive to changes in market interest rates. If the Federal
Reserve or a non-U.S . central bank changes or signals a
change in monetary policy , market interest rates or credit
spreads could be affected, which could adversely impact the
value of such assets. Changes to fiscal policy , including
expansion of U.S. federal deficit spending and resultant debt
issuance, could also affect market interest rates. If interest rates
decrease, our results of operations could be negatively
impacted, including future revenue and earnings growth. The
continued flattening and/or inversion of the yield curve could
also negativ ely impact our results of operations, including
revenue and earnings.
Our models and strategi es to assess and control our market
risk exposur es are subject to inherent limitations. In times of
market stress or other unforeseen circumstances, previously
uncorrelated indicators may become correlated and vice versa.
Such changes to the relationship between market parameters
may limit the effectiveness of our hedging strate gies and cause
us to incur significant losses. Changes in correlation can be
exacerbated where market participants use risk or trading
models with assumptions or algorithms similar to ours. In these
and other cases, it may be difficult to reduce our risk positions
due to activity of other market participants or widespread market
dislocations, including circumstances where asset values are
declining significantly or no market exists. Where we own
securities that do not have an established liquid trading market
or are otherwise subjec t to restrictions on sale or hedging, or
where the degree of accessible liquidity declines significantly ,
we may not be able to reduce our positions and risks associated
with such holdings, so we may suffer larger than expected
losses when  adverse price movements take place. This risk can
be exacerba ted where we hold a position that is large relative to
the available liquidity .
If asset values decline , we may incur losses and negative
impacts to capital and liquidity requirements.
We have a large portfolio of financial instruments, including
loans and loan commitments, securities financing agreements,
asset-backed secured financings, derivative  assets and
liabilities, debt securities, marketable equity securities and
certain other  assets and liabilities that we meas ure at fair value
and are subject to valuation and impairment assessments. We
determine these values based on applicable accounting
guidance, which, for financial instruments measured at fair
value, requir es an entity to base fair value on exit price and to
maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of
unobservable inputs in fair value measurements. The fair values
of these financial instruments include adjustm ents for market
liquidity , credit quality , funding impact on certain derivatives and
other transaction-specific factors, where appropriate.
Gains or losses on these instruments can have a direct
impact on our results of operations, unless we have effectively
hedged our exposures. Increases in interest rates may result in
further decreases in residential mortgage loan originations and
could impact the origination of corporate debt. In addition,increases in interest rates or changes in spread s may continue
to adversely impact the fair value of debt securities and,
accordingly , for debt securities classified as available for sale,
may continue to adversely affect accumulated other
comprehensive income and, thus, capital levels . These market
moves could also adversely impact our regulatory liquidity
requirements. Any decreases in interest rates  may increase
prepayment speeds of certain assets, and, therefore, could
adversely affect net interest income. Changes in interest rates
also may impact the value of mortgage service rights retained.
Fair values may be impacted by declining values of the
underlying assets or the prices at which observable market
transactions occur and the continued availability of these
transactions or indices. The financial strength of counterparties,
with whom we have economically hedged some of our exposure
to these assets, also will affect the fair value of these assets.
Sudden declines and volatility in the prices of assets may curtail
or eliminate trading activities in these assets, which may make it
difficult to sell, hedge or value these assets. The inability to sell
or effectively hedge assets reduces our ability to limit losses in
such positions, and the difficulty in valuing assets may increase
our risk-weighted assets (RWA), which requires us to maintain
additional capital and increases our funding costs. Values of
AUM also impact revenues in our wealth management and
related advisory busines ses for asset-based management and
performance fees. Declines in values of AUM can result in lower
fees earned for managing such assets.
Liquidity
If we are unable to access the capital markets, have
prolonged net deposits outflows, or our borrowing costs
increase, our liquidity and competitive position will be
negatively affected.
Liquidity is essential to our businesses. We fund our assets
primarily with globally sourced deposits in our bank entities, as
well as secured and unsecured liabilities transacted in the
capital markets. We rely on certain secured funding sources,
such as repo markets, which are typically short- term and credit-
sensitive. We also enga ge in asset securitizati on transactions,
including with the government-sponsored enterp rises (GSEs), to
fund consu mer lending activities. Our liquidity could be
adversely affected by any inability to access the capital markets,
illiquidity or volatility in the capital markets, the decrease in value
of eligible collateral or increased collateral requirements
(including as a result of credit concerns for short-term
borrowing), changes to our relationships with our funding
providers based on real or perceived changes in our risk profile,
prolonged federal government shutdowns, or changes in
regulations, guidance or GSE status that impact our funding.
Additionally , our liquidity or cost of funds may be negatively
impacted by the unwillingness or inability of the Federal Reserve
to act as lender of last resort, unexpected simu ltaneous draws
on lines of credit, slower customer payment rates, restricted
access to the assets of prime brokerage clients, the withdrawal
of or failure to attract customer deposits or invested funds
(which could result from attrition driven by customers seeking
higher yielding deposits or securities products, customer desire
to utilize an alternative financial institution perceived to be safer ,
changes in customer spending behavior due to inflation, decline
in the economy or other  drivers resulting in an increased need
for cash), increased regulatory liquidity , capital and margin
requirements for our U.S. or international banks and their
nonbank subsidiaries, which could result in the inability to
transfer liquidity internally and inefficient fundi ng, changes in
patterns of intraday liquidity usage resulting from a counterparty
or technology failure or other idiosyncratic event or failure or
9 Bank of America
default by a significant market participant or third party (including
clearing agents, custodians, central banks or central
counterparty clearinghou ses (CCPs)). These factors also have
the potential to increase our borrowing costs and negatively
impact our liquidity .
Several of these factors may arise due to circumstances
beyond our control, such as general market volatility , disruption,
shock or stress, the emergence or continuation of widespread
health emergencies or pandemics, Federal Reserve policy
decisions (including fluctuations in interest rates or Federal
Reserve balance sheet composition), negative views or loss of
confidence about us or the financial services industry generally
or due to a specific news event, changes in the regulatory
environment or governmental fiscal or monetary policies, actions
by credit rating agencies or an operational problem that affects
third parties or us. The impact of these potentially sudden
events, whether within our control or not, could include an
inability to sell assets or redeem investmen ts, unforeseen
outflows of cash, the need to draw on liquidity facilities, the
reduction of financing balances and the loss of equity secured
funding, debt repurchases to support the secondary market or
meet client requests, the need for additional funding for
commitments and contingencies and unexpected  collateral calls,
among other things, the result of which could be increased
costs, a liquidity shortfal l and/or impact on our liquidity coverage
ratio.
Our liquidity and cost of obtaining funding may be directly
related to investor behavior , debt market disruption, firm specific
concerns or prevailing market conditions, including changes in
interest and currency exchange rates, significan t fluctuations in
equity and futures price s, lower trading volumes and prices of
securitized products and our credit spreads . Increases in
interest rates and our credit spreads can increas e the cost of our
funding and result in mark-to-market or credit valuation
adjustment exposures. Changes in our credit spreads are
market driven and may be influenced by market perceptions of
our creditworthiness, including changes in our credit ratings or
changes in broader financial market and macroeconomic
conditions. Changes to interest rates and our credit spreads
occur continuously and may be unpredictable and highly volatile.
We may also experience net interest margin compression as a
result of offering higher than expected deposit rates in order to
attract and maintain deposits. Concentrations within our funding
profile, such  as maturities, currencies or counterparties, can
reduce our funding ef ficiency .
Reduction in our cred it ratings could limit our access to
funding or the capital markets, increase borrowing costs or
trigger additional collateral or funding requirements.
Our borrowi ng costs and ability to raise funds are directly
impacted by our credit  ratings. Credit ratings may also be
important to investors, customers or counterparties when we
compete in certain markets and seek to engage in certain
transactions, including over-the-counter (OTC) derivatives. Our
credit ratings are subject to ongoing review by rating agencies,
which consider a number of financial and non-financial factors,
including our franchise, financial strength, performance and
prospects, management, governance, risk management
practices, capital adequacy , asset quality and operations,
among other criteria, as well as factors not under our control,
such as regulatory developments, the macroeconomic and
geopolitical environmen t and changes to the methodologies
used to determine our ratings, or ratings generally .
Rating agencies could make adjustments to our credit ratings
at any time and there can be no assurance as to whether or
when any downgrades could occur . A reduction in ourcredit ratings  could result in a wider credit spread and negatively
affect our liquidity , acce ss to credit markets, the related cost of
funds, our businesses and certain trading reven ues, particularly
in those businesses where counterparty creditworthiness is
critical. If the short-term credit ratings of our parent company , or
bank or broker-dealer subsidiaries, were downgraded by one or
more levels, we may experience loss of acces s to short-term
funding sources such as repo financing, and/or incur increased
cost of funds and increased collateral requirements. Under the
terms of certain OTC derivative contracts and other trading
agreements, if our or our subsidiaries’  credit ratings are
downgraded, the counterparties may require additional collateral
or terminate these contracts or agreements.
While certa in potentia l impacts are contractual and
quantifiable, the full consequences of a credit rating downgrade
are inherent ly uncertain  and depend upon numerous dynamic,
complex and inter-related factors and assumptions, including the
relationship between long-term and short-term credit ratings and
the behaviors of customers, investors and counterparties.
Bank of America Corporation is a holding company , is
dependent on its subsidiaries for liquidity and may be
restricted from transferring funds from subsidiaries.
Bank of America Corporation, as the parent company , is a
separate and distinct legal entity from our bank and nonbank
subsidiaries. We evaluate and manage liquidity on a legal entity
basis. Legal entity liquidi ty is an important consideration as there
are legal, regulatory , contractual and other limitations on our
ability to utilize liquidity  from one legal entity to satisfy the
liquidity requirements of another , including the parent company ,
which could result in adverse liquidity events. The parent
company depends on dividends, distributions, loans and other
payments from our bank and nonbank subsidiaries to fund
dividend payments on our preferred stock and common stock
and to fund all payments on our other obligations, including debt
obligations. Any inability of our subsidiaries to transfer funds,
pay dividend s or make payments to us may adversely affect our
cash flow and financial condition.
Many of our subsidiaries, including our bank and broker-
dealer subsidiaries, are subject to laws that restrict dividend
payments, or authorize regulatory bodies to block or reduce the
flow of funds from those subsidiaries to the parent company or
other subsidiaries. Our bank and broker-dealer subsidiaries are
subject to restrictions on their ability to lend or transact with
affiliates, minimum regulatory capital and liquidity requirements
and restrictio ns on their ability to use funds deposited with them
in bank or brokerage accounts to fund their businesses.
Intercompany arrangements we entered into in connection with
our resolution planning submissions could restrict the amount of
funding available to the parent company from our subsidiaries
under certain adverse conditions.
Additional restrictions on related party transactions,
increased capital and liquidity requirements and additional
limitations on the use of funds on deposit in bank or brokerage
accounts, as well as lower earnings, can reduc e the amount of
funds available to meet  the obligations of the parent company
and even require the parent company to provide additional
funding to such subsidiaries. Also, regulatory action that requires
additional liquidity at each of our subsidiaries could impede
access to funds we need to pay our obligations or pay
dividends. In addition, our right to participate in a distribution of
assets upon a subsidiary’ s liquidation or reorganization is
subject to prior claims of the subsidiary’ s creditors.
Bank of America 10
Bank of America Corporation’ s liquidity and financial
condition, and the ability to pay dividends and obligations,
could be adversely affected in the event of a resolution.
Bank of America Corporation, our parent holding company , is
required to periodically submit a plan to the FDIC and Federal
Reserve describing its resolution strategy under the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code in the event of material finan cial distress or
failure. Bank of America Corporation’ s preferred resolution
strategy is a “single point of entry” strategy , whereby only the
parent holding company would file for bankruptcy under the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code. Certain key operating subsid iaries would be
provided with sufficient capital and liquidity to operate through
severe stress and to enable such subsidiaries to continue
operating or be wound down in a solvent manner following a
bankruptcy of the parent holding company . Bank of America
Corporation has entered into intercompany arrangements
resulting in the contribution of most of its capita l and liquidity to
key subsidiaries. Pursuant to these arrangements, if Bank of
America Corporation’ s liquidity resources deteriorate so severely
that resoluti on becomes imminent, it will no longer be able to
draw liquidity from its key subsidiaries and will be required to
contribute its remaining financial assets to a wholly-owned
holding company subsi diary . This could adversely affect our
liquidity and financial condition, including the ability to meet our
payment obligations and the ability to return capital to
shareholders, including through the payment of dividends and
repurchase of the Corporation’ s common stock.
If the FDIC and Federal Reserve jointly determine that Bank
of America Corporation’ s resolution plan is not credible, they
could impose more stringent capital, leverage or liquidity
requirements or restrictions on our growth , activities or
operations. We could also be required to take certain actions
that could impose opera ting costs and result in the divestiture of
assets or restructuring of businesses and subsidiaries.
When a G-SIB such as Bank of America Corporation is in
default or danger of default, the FDIC may be appointed receiver
to conduct an orderly liquidation, and could, among other things,
invoke the orderly liquidation authority , instead of the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code, if the Secretary of the Treasur y makes certain
financial distress and systemic risk determinations. Additionally ,
the FDIC could replace  Bank of America Corporation with a
bridge holdi ng company , which could continue operations and
result in an orderly resolution of the underlying bank, but whose
equity would  be held solely for the benefit of our creditors. The
FDIC’ s “single point of entry” strategy may result in our security
holders suffering greater losses than would have been the case
under a bankruptcy proceeding or a dif ferent resolution strategy .
If the Corporation is resolved under the U.S. Bankruptcy
Code or the FDIC’ s orderly liquidation authority , third-party
creditors of the Corporation’ s subsidiaries  may receive
significant or full recoveries on their claims while security
holders of Bank of Amer ica Corporation could face significant or
complete losses.
Credit
Economic or market disruptions and insufficient credit loss
reserves may result in a higher provision for credit losses.
A number of our produc ts expose us to credit risk, including
loans, letter s of credit, derivatives, debt securities, trading
account assets and assets held-for-sale. Dete rioration in the
financial condition of our consumer and comme rcial borrowers,
counterparties or underlying collateral could adversely affect our
financial condition and results of operations.
Our credit portfolios may be impacted by U.S. and global
macroeconomic and market conditions, events and disruptions,including declines in GDP, consumer spendi ng or property
values, asset price corrections, increasing consumer and
corporate leverage, increases in corporate bond spreads,
government shutdowns , tax changes, rising or elevated
unemployment levels, inflation, fluctuations in foreign exchange
or interest rates, as well as the emergence or continuation of
widespread health emergencies or pandemics, extreme weather
events and the impacts of climate change, including acute
and/or chronic extreme weather events and efforts to transition
to a low-carbon econ omy. Significant economic or market
stresses and disruptions  typically have a negative impact on the
business environment and financial markets, which could impact
the underlying credit quality of our borrowers, counterparties and
assets. Property value declines or asset price corrections could
increase the risk of borrowers or counterparties defaulting or
becoming delinquent in their obligations to us, and could
decrease the value of the collateral we hold, which could
increase credit losses. Credit risk could also be magnified by
lending to leveraged borrowers or declining  asset prices,
including property or collateral values, unrelated to
macroeconomic stress. Simultaneous drawdowns on lines of
credit and/or an incre ase in a borrower ’s leverage in a
weakening economic environment, or otherwise , could result in
deterioration in our credit portfolio, should borrowers be unable
to fulfill competing financial obligations. Increased delinquency
and default rates could adversely affect our credit portfolios,
including consumer credit card, home equity and residential
mortgage portfolios through increased charge-of fs and
provisions for credit losses.
A recessionary environment and/or a rise in unemployment
could adversely impact the ability of our consumer and/or
commercial borrowers or counterparties to meet their financial
obligations and negatively impact our credit portfolio.
Consumers have been and may continue to be negatively
impacted by inflation, resulting in drawdowns of savings or
increases in household debt. Higher interest rates, which have
increased debt servicing costs for some businesses and
households, may adversely impact credit quality , particularly in a
recessionary environme nt. Certain sectors also remain at risk
(e.g., commercial real estate office exposure, consumer
discretionary industries) as a result of shifts in demand from the
pandemic. Globally , conditions of slow growth or recession could
further contribute to weaker credit cond itions. If the
macroeconomic environ ment worsens, our credit portfolio and
allowance for credit losses could be adversely impacted.
We establish an allowance for credit losses, which includes
the allowance for loan and lease losses and the reserve for
unfunded lending comm itments, based on management's best
estimate of lifetime expe cted credit losses (ECL) inherent in our
relevant financial assets. The process to determine the
allowance for credit losses uses models and assumptions that
require us to make difficult and complex judgments that are
often interrelated, including forecasting how borrowers or
counterparties may perform in changing economic conditions.
The ability of our borrowers or counterparties to repay their
obligations may be impacted by changes in future economic
conditions, which in turn could impact the accuracy of our loss
forecasts and allowance estimates. There is also the possibility
that we have failed or will fail to accurately identify the
appropriate economic indicators or accurately estimate their
impacts to our borrowers or counterparties, which could impact
the accuracy of our loss forecasts and allowance estimates.
If the models, estimates and assumptions we use to
establish reserves or the judgments we make in extending credit
to our borrowers or counterparties, which are more sensitive
11 Bank of America
due to the current uncertain macroeconomic and geopolitical
environment, prove inaccurate in predicting future events, we
may suffer losses in excess of our ECL. In addition, changes to
external factors can negatively impact our recognition of credit
losses in our portfolios and allowance for credit losses.
The allowance for credit  losses is our best estimate of ECL;
however , there is no guarantee that it will be sufficient to
address credit losses, particularly if the economic outlook
deteriorates significantly and quickly , or unexpectedly . As
circumstances change, we may increase our allowance, which
would reduce our earnings. If economic conditions worsen,
impacting our consumer and commerc ial borrowers,
counterparties or underlying collateral, and credit losses are
worse than expected, we may increase our provision for credit
losses, which could adversely affect our results of operations
and financial condition.
Our concentrations of credit risk could adversely affect our
credit losses, results of operations and financial condition.
We may be subject to concentrations of credit risk because
of a common characteristic or common sensitivity to economic,
financial, public health or business developments.
Concentrations of credit risk may reside in a particular industry ,
geography , product, asset class, counterparty or within any pool
of exposures with a common risk characteristic. A deterioration
in the financ ial condition or prospects of a particular industry ,
geographic location, product or asset class, or a failure or
downgrade of, or defau lt by, any particular entity or group of
entities could  negatively  affect our businesses, and it is possible
our limits and credit monitoring exposure controls will not
function as anticipated.
We execute a high volume of transactions and have
significant credit concentrations with respect to the financial
services industry , predominantly comprised of broker-dealers,
commercial banks, investment banks, insurance companies,
mutual funds, hedge funds, CCPs and other institutional clients.
Financial services institutions and other counterparties are inter-
related because of trading, funding, clearing or other
relationships. Defaults by one or more counterparties, or market
uncertainty about the financial stability of one or more financial
services institutions, or the financial services industry generally ,
could lead to market-wide liquidity disruptions, losses, defaults
and related disputes and litigation.
Our credit risk may also be heightened by market risk when
the collatera l held by us cannot be liquidated or is liquidated at
prices not sufficient to recover the full amount of the loan or
derivatives exposure due to us, which may occu r as a result of
events that impact the value of the collateral, such as an asset
price correction or fraud. Disputes with obligors as to the
valuation of collateral could increase in times of significant
market stress, volatility or illiquidity , and we could suffer losses
during such periods if we are unable to realize the fair value of
the collateral or manage declines in the value of collateral.
We have concentration s of credit risk with respect to our
consumer real estate and consumer credit card, and our
commercial real estate and asset managers and funds
portfolios, which represent a significant percentage of our overall
credit portfolio. Declining home price valuations and demand
where we have large concentrations could result in increased
servicing advances and expenses, defaults, delinquencies or
credit losses. The impacts of earthquakes, as well as climate
change, such as rising average global temperatures and sea
levels, and the increasing frequency and severity of extreme
weather events and natural disasters, including droughts, floods,
wildfires and hurricanes , could negatively impact collateral, the
valuations of home orcommercial real estate or our customers’  ability and/or
willingness to pay fees, outstanding loans or afford new
products. This could also cause insurability risk and/or increased
insurance costs to customers.
Economic weaknesses, sustained elevated inflation, adverse
business conditions, market disruptions, adverse economic or
market events, rising interest or capitalization rates, declining
asset prices, greater volatility in areas where we have
concentrated credit risk or deterioration in real estate values or
household incomes may cause us to experienc e a decrease in
cash flow and higher credit losses in our portfolios or cause us
to write down the value of certain assets. We could also
experience continued and long-term negative impacts to our
commercial credit exposure and an increase in credit losses
within those  industries that may be permanently impacted by a
change in consumer preferences resulting from COVID-19 (e.g.,
commercial real estate exposure) or other industry disruptions.
We also enter into transactions with sovereign nations, U.S.
states and municipalities. Unfavorable economic or political
conditions (such as those arising from the Russia/Ukraine
conflict), disruptions to capital markets, currency fluctuations,
changes in oil prices, social instability and changes in
government or monetary policies could adver sely impact the
operating budgets or credit ratings of these government entities
and expose us to credit and liquidity risk.
Liquidity disruptions in the financial markets may result in our
inability to sell, syndicate or realize the value of our positions,
increasing concentrations, which could increase RWA and the
credit and market risk associated with our positions.
We may be adversely affected by weaknesses in the U.S.
housing market.
U.S. home prices declined and housing demand slowed in
the second half of 2022 , including in certain markets where we
have large concentrations of loans, driven in part by higher
mortgage rates, includi ng 30-year fixed-rate mortgages that
more than doubled from 2021. This has negatively impacted the
demand in some cases and underlying collateral for many of our
products. Additionally , our mortgage loan production volume is
generally influenced by the rate of growth in residential
mortgage debt outstanding and the size of the residential
mortgage market, both of which have slowed due to rising
interest rates  and reduced affordability . A deeper downturn in the
condition of the U.S. housing market could result in both
significant write-downs of asset values in several asset classes,
notably mortgage-backed securities (MBS). If the U.S. housing
market were to further weaken, the value of real estate could
decline, which could result in increased credit losses and
delinquent servicing expenses, negativel y affect our
representations and warranties exposures, and adversely affect
our financial condition and results of operations.
Our derivatives businesses may expose us to unexpected
risks and potential losses.
We are party to a large number of derivatives transactions
that may expose us to unexpected market, credit and
operational risks that could cause us to suffer unexpected
losses. Severe declines in asset values or an unanticipated
credit event, including unforeseen circumsta nces that may
cause previously uncorrelated factors to become correlated and
vice versa, may create losses resulting from risks not
appropriately taken into account or antic ipated in the
development, structuring  or pricing of a derivative instrument.
Certain OTC derivative contracts and other trading agreements
provide that upon the occurrence of certain specified events,
such as a change to our or our affiliates’  credit ratings, we may
be required to provide additional collateral or take other
Bank of America 12
remedial actions, and we could experience increased difficulty
obtaining funding or hedging risks. In some cases our
counterparties may have the right to terminate or otherwise
diminish our rights under these contracts or agreements.
We are also a member  of various CCPs, which potentially
increases our credit risk exposures to those CCPs. In the event
that one or more members of a CCP  default on their obligations,
we may be required to pay a portion of any losses incurred by
the CCP  as a result of that default. A CCP  may also, at its
discretion, modify the margin we are required to post, which
could mean unexpected and increased funding costs and
exposure to that CCP. As a clearing member , we are exposed to
the risk of non-performance by our clients for which we clear
transactions, which may not be covered by available collateral.
Additionally , default by a significant market participant may
result in further risk and potential losses.
Geopolitical
We are subject to numerous political, economic, market,
reputational, operation al, compliance, legal, regulatory and
other risks in the jurisdictions in which we operate.
We do business throughout the world, including in emerging
markets. Economic or geopolitical stress in one or more
countries could have a negative impact regionally or globally ,
resulting in, among other things, market volatility , reduced
market value  and economic output. Our liquidity and credit risk
could be adversely impacted by, and our businesses and
revenues derived from non-U.S. jurisdictions are subject to, risk
of loss from financial, social or judicial instability , economic
sanctions, changes in government leadership,  including as a
result of electoral outcomes or otherwise , changes in
governmental policies or policies of central banks, expropriation,
nationalization and/or confiscation of assets, price controls, high
inflation, natural disasters, the emergence or continuation of
widespread health emergencies or pandemics, capital controls,
currency re-denomination risk from a country exiting the EU or
otherwise, currency fluctuations, foreign exchange controls or
movements (caused by devaluation or de-pegging), unfavorable
political and diplomatic developments, oil price fluctuations and
changes in legislation. These risks are especially elevated in
emerging markets.
Continued tensions between the U.S. and important trading
partners, particularly China, may result in sanctions, further tariff
increases or other restrictive actions on cross-border trade,
investment, and transfer of information technology that weigh on
trade volumes, raise costs for producers, and adversely affect
our busines ses and revenues, as well as our customers and
counterparties, including their credit quality .
Slowing growth, recessionary conditions, market volatility
and/or political or civil unrest, global supply chain disruptions,
labor shortages, wage pressures and elevated inflation in many
countries pose additional challenges, including in the form of
volatility in financial markets. Foreign exchang e rates against
the U.S. dollar remain an area of uncertainty and potential
volatility as the Federal Reserve and other central banks raise
interest rates, and depreciation could increase our financial risks
with clients that deal in non-U.S. currencies but have U.S. dollar-
denominated debt.
We invest or trade in the securities of corporations and
governments located in non-U.S. jurisdictions, including
emerging markets. Revenues from the tradin g of non-U.S.
securities may be subject to negative fluctuations as a result of
the above factors. Furthermore, the impact of these fluctuations
could be magnified because non-U.S. trading markets,
particularly in emerging markets, are generally smaller , lessliquid and more volatile than U.S. trading markets. Risks in one
nation can limit our opportunities for portfolio growth and
negatively affect our operations in other nations, including our
U.S. operations. Market and economic disruptions may affect
consumer confidence levels and spending, corpo rate investment
and job creation, bankruptcy rates, levels of incurrence and
default on consumer and corporate debt, economic growth rates
and asset values, among other factors.
Elevated government debt levels raise the risk of volatility ,
significant valuation changes, political tensio ns among EU
members regarding fiscal policy or defaults on or devaluation of
sovereign debt, which could expose us to substantial losses.
Financial markets have been and may continue  to be sensitive
to government plans to lower taxes or increase spending.
Our non-U.S. businesses are also subject to extensive
regulation by governments, securities exchanges and
regulators, central banks and other regulatory bodies. In many
countries, the laws and regulations applicable to the financial
services and securities industries are less predictable, prone to
change and uncertainty and evolving, and it may be difficult to
determine the requirem ents of local laws in every market or
manage our relationships with multiple regula tors in various
jurisdictions. Significant resources are spent on understanding
and monitoring foreign laws, rules and regulations. Our inability
to remain in complian ce with local laws and manage our
relationships with regulators could result in incre ased expenses,
changes to our organizational structure and adversely affect our
businesses, reputation and results of operations in that market.
We are also subject to complex and extensive U.S. and non-
U.S. laws, rules and regulations, which subject us to costs and
risks relating to bribery and corruption, anti-money laundering,
embargo programs and economic sanctions, which can vary by
jurisdiction and require implementation of complex operational
capabilities and compliance programs. Non-com pliance and/or
violations could result in an increase in operational and
compliance costs, and enforcement actions and civil and
criminal penalties again st us and individual employees. The
increasing speed and novel ways in which funds  circulate could
make it more challenging to track the movement of funds and
heighten financial crimes risk. Compliance with these evolving
regulatory regimes and legal requirements depends on our
ability to improve our processes, controls, surveillance, detection
and reporting and analytic capabilities.
In connectio n with the U.K.’s exit from the EU, we are now
subject to different laws and regulations, which are expected to
diverge further over time, and are subject to the oversight of
additional regulatory authorities. As political and regulatory
environments evolve, further changes to the legal and regulatory
framework under which our subsidiaries provide products and
services in the U.K. and in the EU may result in additional
compliance costs and have negative tax consequences or an
adverse impact on our results of operations.
In the U.S., the government’ s debt ceiling and budget deficit
concerns have increased the possibility of U.S. government
defaults on its debt and/or downgrades to its credit ratings, and
prolonged government shutdowns, which could weaken the U.S.
dollar , cause market volatility , negatively impact the global
economy and banking system and adversely affect our financial
condition, including our liquidity . Additionally , changes in fiscal,
monetary or regulatory  policy , including as a result of labor
shortages, wage pressures, supply chain disruptions and higher
inflation, could increase our compliance costs and adversely
affect our business operations, organizationa l structure and
results of operations. Monetary policy has contributed to a
significant depreciation of many foreign currencies over the past
13 Bank of America
year. Emerg ing markets  are particularly vulnerable to tighter
U.S. monetary policy , and many have responded by tightening
monetary policy and intervening in foreign exchange markets.
Further monetary tightening by the Federal Reserve risks
creating additional currency volatility and recessionary
conditions in a number of non-U.S. markets.
We are also subject to geopolitical risks, including economic
sanctions, acts or threats of international or domestic terrorism,
including responses by the U.S. or other governments thereto,
increased risk of state-sponsored cyberattacks  or campaigns,
civil unrest and/or military conflicts, including the escalation of
tensions between China and Taiwan, which could adversely
affect business, market trade and general economic conditions
abroad and in the U.S. The Russia/Ukraine conflict has
magnified such risks and resulted in regional instability and
adversely impacted commodity and other financial markets, as
well as econ omic conditi ons, especially in Europ e where there is
significant risk of recession in some countries. The disruption of
energy supplies and other goods and sanctions have
contributed to inflationary pressures in Europe and other
regions, which has resulted in greater monetary tightening by
policymakers, and could adversely impact the profitability of
businesses and our credit risk. Military escalation resulting in the
involvement of neighboring countries and/or  North Atlantic
Treaty Organization member countries or new sanctions could
result in additional economic disruptions, financial market
volatility , and changes to asset valuations, which could disrupt
our operations and adversely af fect our results of operations.
Business Operations
A failure in or breach of our operational or security systems
or infrastructure, or those of third parties or the financial
services industry , could cause disruptions, adversely
impact our results of operations and finan cial condition,
and cause legal or reputational harm.
Operational risk exposure exists throughout our organization
and as a result of our interactions with, and reliance on, third
parties and the financial services industry infrastructure. Our
operational and security systems infrastructure , including our
computer systems, emerging technologies, data management
and internal  processes and controls, as well as those of third
parties, are integral to our performance.
Our financial, accounting, data processing and transmission,
storage, backup and other operating or security systems and
infrastructure, or those of third parties, may be ineffective or fail
to operate properly or become disabled or dama ged as a result
of a number of factors , including events that are wholly or
partially beyond our or such third party’ s contr ol, which could
adversely affect our ability to process transactions or provide
services. Prolonged disruptions to our critical business
operations and customer services are possible due to computer ,
telecommunications, network, utility , electronic or physical
infrastructure outages, including from abuse or failure of our
electronic trading and algorithmic platforms, significant
unplanned increases in customer transactions, newly identified
vulnerabilities in key hardware and software, failure of aging
infrastructure or manual processes, retired  or redundant
software and/or hardware, technology project implementation
challenges and supply chain disruptions. Operational disruptions
and prolonged operational outages could also result from events
arising from natural disasters, including acute and chronic
weather events, such as wildfires, tornadoes, hurricanes and
floods, some  of which are happening with more frequency and
severity , and earthquakes, as well as local or larger scalepolitical or social matters , including civil unrest, terrorist acts and
military conflict.
We continue  to have greater reliance on remote access tools
and technology and employees’  personal systems (and our third
parties’  employees’  personal systems) and increased data
utilization and are increa singly dependent upon our information
technology infrastructure to operate our businesses remotely
due to the increased number of employees who work from home
and evolving customer preferences, including increased reliance
on digital banking and other digital services provided by our
businesses. Effective management of our business continuity
increasingly depends on the security , reliability and adequacy of
such systems.
We also rely on our employees, representatives and third
parties in our day-to-da y operations, who may, due to illness,
unavailability , human error, misconduct (inclu ding errors in
judgment, malice, fraudulent or illegal activity), malfeasance or a
failure or breach of systems or infrastructure cause disruptions
to our organization and expose us to operational losses,
regulatory risk and reputational harm. Our and our third parties’
inability to properly introduce, deploy and manage changes to
internal finan cial and governance processes, existing products,
services and technology , and new product innovations and
technology could also result in additional operational and
regulatory risk.
Regardless of the measures we have taken to implement
training, procedures, backup systems and other safeguards to
support our operations and bolster our operational resilience,
our ability to conduct business may be adversely affected by
significant disruptions to us or to third parties  with whom we
interact or upon whom we rely, including systemic cyber events
that result in system outages and unavailability of part or all of
the internet, cloud services and/or the financial services industry
infrastructure (including electronic trading platforms and critical
banking activities). Our ability to implement backup systems and
other safeguards with respect to third-party systems and the
financial services industry infrastructure is more limited than with
our own systems.
Any backup systems may not process data as quickly as our
primary systems and some data might not have been backed
up. We regularly update the systems we rely on to support our
operations and growth and to remain compliant with all
applicable laws, rules and regulations globally . This updating
entails significant costs and creates risks associated with
implementing new systems and integrating them with existing
ones, including business interruptions.
A failure or breach of our operational or security  systems or
infrastructure resulting in disruption to our critical business
operations and customer services and/or failure to identify ,
effectively respond to operational risks in a timely manner , and
continue to deliver our services through an operational
disruption could expose us to a number of risks, including
market abuse, regulatory , market, privacy and liquidity risk, and
adversely impact our results of operations and financial
condition, and cause legal or reputational harm.
A cyberatt ack, information or security breach, or a
technology failure of ours or of a third party could
adversely affect our ability to conduct our business, result
in the misuse or disclosure of information, result in
additional costs, damage to our reputation , increase our
regulatory and legal risks and cause financial losses.
Our business is highly dependent on the security , controls
and efficacy of our infrastructure, compu ter and data
management systems, and those of our custom ers, suppliers,
counterparties and other third parties, the financial services
Bank of America 14
industry and financial data aggregators, with whom we interact,
on whom we rely or who have access to our customers'
personal or account information. We rely on effective access
management and the secure collection , processing,
transmission, storage and retrieval of confidential, proprietary ,
personally identifiable and other information in our and our third
parties’  computer and data management systems and networks.
Our cybersecurity risk and exposure remains heightened
because of, among other things, our prominent  size and scale,
high-profile brand, geographic footprint and international
presence and role in the financial services industry and the
broader economy . The proliferation of third-party financial data
aggregators and emerging technologies, includ ing our use of
automation, artificial intelligence (AI) and robotic s, increase our
cybersecurity risks and exposure.
We, our employees, customers, regulators and third parties
are regularly  the target of an increasing number of cyber threats
and attacks. Cyber threats and techniques used in cyberattacks
are pervasiv e, sophistic ated and difficult to prevent, including
computer viruses, malicious or destructive code (such as
ransomware), social engineering (including phishing, vishing
and smishing), denial of service or information or other security
breach tactics that could result in disruptions to our businesses
and operatio ns, the loss of our funds and/or our clients’  and the
unauthorized disclosure,  release, gathering, monitoring, misuse,
loss or destruction or theft of confidential, propr ietary and other
information, including intellectual property , of ours, our
employees, our customers or of third parties. Cyberattacks may
be carried out on a worldwide scale and by a growing number of
cyber actors, including organized crime groups, hackers,
terrorist organizations, extremist parties, hostile foreign
governments, state-sponsored actors, activists, disgruntled
employees and other third parties, including those involved in
corporate espionage.
Cyber threats and the techniques used in cyberattacks
change, develop and evolve rapidly , including from emerging
technologies, such as advanced forms of AI and quantum
computing. Despite substantial efforts to protect the integrity and
resilience of our system s and implement controls, processes,
policies, employee training and other protective measures, we
may not be able to anticipate or detect cyberattacks or
information or security breaches and/or develop or implement
effective preventive or defensive measures to address or
mitigate such attacks or breaches. Internal access management
failures could result in the compromise or unauthorized
exposure of confidential data. Additionally , the failure of our
employees to exercise sound judgment and vigilance when
targeted with social engineering cyberattacks may increase our
vulnerability .
Our risk and exposure to cyberattacks and security breaches
continue to increase due to the acceptance and use of digital
banking products and services, including mobile banking
products, and reliance on remote access tools and technology ,
which have increased our reliance on virtual/digital interactions
and a larger number of access points to our networks that must
be secured. This increased risk of unauthorized access to our
networks results in greater amounts of information being
available for access. Employees working remotely away from
the office (whether on personal or our devices)  also represent
inherently greater risk than employees working in our offices.
Greater demand on our information technology infrastructure
and security tools and processes will likely continue.
We also face indirect technology , cybersecurity and
operational risks relating to the customers, clients and otherthird parties with whom we do business and the financial
services industry , upon whom we rely to facilitate or enable our
business activities or upon whom our customers rely. Other
indirect risks relate to providers of products and/or services,
financial counterparties , financial data aggregators, financial
intermediaries, such as clearing agents, exchang es and clearing
houses, regulators, providers of critical infrastructure, such as
internet access and electrical power , and retailers for whom we
process transactions. We are also at additional risk resulting
from critical  third-party information security and open-source
software vulnerabilities.
We have exposure to cyber threats due to our continuous
transmission of sensitive information to, and storage of such
information by, third parties, including providers of products
and/or servic es, and regulators, the outsourcing of some of our
business operations, and system and customer account updates
and conversions. Further , any such event may not be disclosed
to us in a timely manner . Any failure, cyber attack or other
information or security breach that significantly degrades,
deletes or compromises our systems or data could adversely
impact third parties, counterparties and the critical infrastructure
of the financial services industry .
Due to increasing consolidation, interdepen dence and
complexity of financial entities and technology systems, a
technology failure, cyberattack or other information or security
vulnerability , failure or breach that significantly exposes,
degrades, deletes or compromises the systems or data of one or
more financial entities or third parties could adversely impact us
and increase the risk of operational failure, as disparate systems
need to be integrated, often on an accelerated basis.
Cyberattacks or security breaches could persist for an
extended period of time before being detected and take
additional time to determine the scope, extent, amount, and type
of information compromised, following which the impact and
measures to recover and restore to a business-as-usual state
may be difficult to asse ss. We continue to expend significant
additional money and resources to modify or enhance our
protective measures, investigate and remediate any information
security , software or network vulnerabilities or incidents whether
specific to us, a third party , the industry or businesses in
general, and develop our capabilities to respond and recover .
While we have experienced cyberattacks and security
breaches, and expect to continue to, we have not experienced
any material losses or other material consequences relating to
technology failure, cybe rattacks or other information or security
breaches, whether directed at us or third partie s. There can be
no assurance that our controls and procedures in place to
monitor and mitigate the risks of cyber threats, including the
remediation of critical information security and software
vulnerabilities, will be sufficient and/or timely and that we will not
suffer material losses or consequences in the future. Successful
penetration or circumvention of system security could result in
negative consequences, including loss of customers and
business opportunities, the withdrawal of customer deposits,
misappropriation or destruction of our intellectual property ,
proprietary information or confidential informa tion and/or the
confidential, proprietary or personally identifiable information of
certain parties, such as our employees, customers, providers of
products and services, counterparties and other third parties, or
damage to their computers or systems. Any future technology
failure, cybe rattack or breach could adversely affect our ability to
conduct day-to-day business activities, effect transactions,
service our clients, manage our exposure to risk or expand our
15 Bank of America
businesses, result in fraudulent or unauthorized transactions or
cause prolonged computer and network outag es resulting in
material disruptions to our or our customers ’ or other third
parties’  network access or critical business operations and
customer services, in the U.S. and/or globally .
Any cyberat tack or breach, whether directed at us or third
parties, may result in significant lost revenue, give rise to losses
and claims brought by third parties, litigation exposure,
regulatory sanctions, enforcement actions, government fines,
penalties or intervention  and other negative consequences. The
actual or perceived success of a cyberattack on our systems
may damage our reputation with customers and third parties
with whom we do business and/or result in the loss of
confidence in our security measures. Additionally , our failure to
disclose or communicate cyber incidents appropriately to
relevant parties could result in regulatory , privacy, operational
and reputational risk. Although we maintain cyber insurance,
there can be no assurance that liabilities or losses we may incur
will be covered under such policies or that the amount of
insurance will be adequate. Cyberattacks or other information or
security breaches could also result in a violation of applicable
privacy and other laws, reimbursement or other compensatory
costs, additional compliance costs, and our internal controls or
disclosure controls being rendered ineffective. The occurrence
of any of these events could adversely impact our businesses,
results of operations, liquidity and financial condition.
Failure to satisfy our obligations as servicer for residential
mortgage securitizations, loans owned by other entities and
other related losses could adversely impact our reputation,
servicing costs or results of operations.
We and our legacy companies service mortgage loans on
behalf of third-party securitization vehicles and other investors. If
we commit a material breach of our obligations  as servicer or
master servicer , we may be subject to termination if the breach
is not cured within a specified period of time following notice,
which could  cause us to lose servicing income . We may also
have liability for any failure by us, as a servicer or master
servicer , for any act or omission on our part that involves willful
misfeasance, bad faith, gross negligence or reckless disregard
of our duties. If any such breach was found to have occurred, it
may harm our reputation , increase our servicing costs or losses
due to potential indemnification obligations, result in litigation or
regulatory action or adversely impact our results of operations.
Additionally , foreclosures may result in costs, litigation or losses
due to irregularities in the underlying documentation, or if the
validity of a foreclosure action is challenged by a borrower or
overturned by a court because of errors or deficiencies in the
foreclosure process. We may also incur costs or losses relating
to delays or alleged deficiencies in processing documents
necessary to comply with state law governing foreclosure.
Changes in the structure of and relationship among the
GSEs could adversely impact our business.
We rely on the GSEs to guarantee or purchase mortgage
loans that meet their conforming loan requirements. During
2022, we sold approxim ately $4.1 billion of loans to GSEs,
primarily Freddie Mac (FHLMC). FHLMC and Fannie Mae
(FNMA) are currently in conservatorship, with the Federal
Housing Finance Agency (FHF A) acting as conservator . In 2019,
the Treasury  Departme nt published a proposal to recapitalize
FHLMC and FNMA  and remove them from conservatorship and
reduce their role in the marketplace. In January 2021, the
Treasury Department further amended the agreement thatgoverns the conservatorship of FHLMC and FNMA  and
delineated the continued objective to remove the GSEs from
conservatorship. However , we cannot predict the future
prospects of the GSEs, timing of the recapitalization or release
from conservatorship, or content of legislative or rulemaking
proposals regarding the future status of the GSE s in the housing
market. If the GSEs take a reduced role in the marketplace,
including by limiting the mortgage products they offer, we could
be required to seek alternative funding sources, retain additional
loans on our balance sheet, secure funding through the Federal
Home Loan Bank system , or securitize the loans through Private
Label Securitization, which could increase our cost of funds
related to the origination of new mortgage loans, increase credit
risk and/or impact our capacity to originate new mortgage loans.
Uncertainty regarding their future and the MBS they guarantee
continues to exist for the foreseeable future. These
developments could adversely affect our securities portfolios,
capital levels, liquidity and results of operations.
Our risk management framework may not be effective in
mitigating risk and reducing the potential for losses.
Our risk management framework is designed to minimize risk
and loss to us. We seek  to effectively and consistently identify ,
measure, monitor , report and control the key types of risk to
which we are subject, including strategic, credit, market, liquidity ,
compliance, operational and reputational risks. Additionally , risks
may span across multip le key risk types, including climate risk
and legal risk. While we employ a broad and diversified set of
controls and risk mitigat ion techniques, including modeling and
forecasting, hedging strategies and technique s that seek to
balance our ability to profit from trading positions with our
exposure to potential losses, our ability to control and mitigate
risks that result in losses is inherently limited by our ability to
identify and measure all risks, including emerging and unknown
risks, anticip ate the timing and impact of risks, apply effective
hedging strategies, make correct assumptions, manage and
aggregate data correctly and efficiently , identify changes in
markets or client behavio rs not yet inherent in historical data and
develop risk management models and forecasts to assess and
control risk.
Our ability to manage risk is dependent on our ability to
consistently execute all elements of our risk management
program and develop and maintain a culture of managing risk
well throughout the Corporation and manage risks associated
with third parties, including providers of products and/or
services, enable effective risk management and help confirm
that risks are appropriately considered, evaluated and
responded to in a timely manner . Uncertain economic and
geopolitical conditions, heightened legislative and regulatory
scrutiny of and change within the financial services industry , the
pace of technological  changes, accounting and market
developments, the failure of employees, representatives and
third parties to comply with our policies and Risk Framework and
the overall complexity  of our operations, among other
developments, have in the past and may in the future result in a
heightened level of risk. For example, we have experienced
increased operational, reputational and compliance risk as a
result of the prior need to rapidly deploy and implement multiple
and varying pandemic relief programs, including the processing
of unemployment benefits for California and certain other states,
which have resulted in and will continue to result in losses. Our
failure to manage evolving risks or properly anticipate, manage,
control or mitigate risks could result in additional losses.
Bank of America 16
Regulatory , Compliance and Legal
We are subject to evolving government legislation and
regulations and certain settlements, orders and agreements
with government authorities from time to time.
We are subject to evolving and comprehensive regulation
under federa l and state laws in the U.S. and the laws of the
various jurisdictions in which we operate, including increasing
and complex regulatory sanctions regimes. These laws and
regulations significantly affect and have the potential to restrict
the scope of our existing businesses, limit our ability to pursue
certain business opportunities, including the products and
services we offer, reduce certain fees and rates or make our
products and services more expensive for our clients. We are
also required to file various financial and non-financial regulatory
reports to comply with laws, rules and regulations in the
jurisdictions in which we operate.
We continue to adjust our business and operations, legal
entity structu re, disclosu re and policies, proces ses, procedures
and controls, including with regard to capital and liquidity
management, risk management and data management, to
comply with laws, rules and regulations, as well as guidance and
interpretation by regulatory authorities, including  the Department
of Treasury (including the Internal Revenue Service (IRS)),
Federal Reserve, OCC, CFPB, Financial Stability Oversight
Council, FDIC, Department of Labor , SEC and CFTC in the
U.S., foreign regulators, other government authorities and self-
regulatory organizations. Further , we could become subject to
future laws, rules and regulations beyond those currently
proposed, adopted or contemplated in the U.S. or abroad,
including policies and rulemaking related to emerging
technologies, cybersec urity and data, and climate risk
management and ESG governance and reporting, including
emissions and sustainability disclosure. The cumulative effect of
all of the current and possible future legislation and regulations
on our litigation and regulatory exposure, businesses,
operations and profitabi lity remains uncertain and necessitates
that we make certain assumptions with respect to the scope and
requirements of prospective and proposed laws, rules and
regulations in our business planning. If these assumptions prove
incorrect, we could be subject to increased regulatory , legal and
compliance risks and costs as well as potential reputational
harm. Also, U.S. and regulatory initiatives abroad may overlap,
and non-U.S. regulation and initiatives may be inconsistent or
may conflict with current or proposed U.S. regulations, which
could lead to compliance risks and increased costs.
Our regulato rs’ prudent ial and supervisory authority gives
them broad power and discretion to direct our actions, and they
have assumed an active oversight, inspection and investigatory
role across the financial services industry . Regulatory focus is
not limited to laws, rules and regulations applicable to the
financial services industry , but includes other significant laws,
rules and regulations  that apply across industries and
jurisdictions, including those related to anti-money laundering,
anti-bribery , anti-corruption and regulatory sanctions.
We are also subject to laws, rules and regulations in the U.S.
and abroad,  including the GDPR and CCPA as modified by the
CPRA, and a number of additional jurisdictions enacting or
considering similar laws, regarding privacy and the disclosure,
collection, use, sharing and safeguarding of personally
identifiable information, including our employe es, customers,
suppliers, counterparties and other third parties, the violation of
which could result in litigation, regulatory fines, enforcement
actions and operational loss. The complexity and risk ofcompliance has been magnified by the collection of employee
health and/or other information in response to the pandemic.
Additionally , we will likely be subject to new and evolving data
privacy laws in the U.S. and abroad, which could result in
additional costs of compliance, litigation, regul atory fines and
enforcement actions. There remains complexity and uncertainty ,
including potential susp ension or prohibition, regarding data
transfer because of concerns over compliance with laws, rules
and regulations for cross-border flows and transfers of personal
data from the European  Economic Area (EEA) to the U.S. and
other jurisdictions outside of the EEA, resulting from judicial and
regulatory guidance. To the extent that a new EU-U.S. Data
Privacy Framework leads to a relaxation of applicable legislation
and regulations, regardless of transfer mechanism, challenges
are expect ed from consumer advocacy groups. Other
jurisdictions, including China, Russia and India, have
commenced consultatio n efforts or enacted new legislation or
regulations to establish standards for personal data transfers. If
cross-border personal data transfers are suspen ded or restricted
or we are required to implement distinct processes for each
jurisdiction’ s standards , this could result in operational
disruptions to our businesses, additional costs, increased
enforcement activity , new contract negotiations with third parties,
and/or modification of such data management.
As part of their enforcement authority , our regulators and
other government authorities have the authority to, among other
things, cond uct investigations and assess significant civil or
criminal monetary fines, penalties or restitution, issue cease and
desist orders, initiate injunctive action, apply regulatory
sanctions or enter into consent orders. The amounts paid by us
and other financial institutions to settle proceedings or
investigations have, in some instances, been substantial and
may increase. In some cases, governmental authorities have
required criminal pleas or other extraordinary terms as part of
such resolutions, which could have significant consequences,
including reputational harm, loss of customers, restrictions on
the ability to access capital markets, and the inability to operate
certain businesses or offer certain products. Our response to
regulators and other government authorities may be time-
consuming, be expensive and divert managemen t attention from
our business. The outco me of any matter , which may last years,
may be dif ficult to predict or estimate.
Additionally , the terms of settlements, orders and
agreements that we have entered into with government entities
and regulatory authorities have imposed, or could impose,
significant operational and compliance costs on us with respect
to enhancements to our procedures and controls, losses with
respect to fraudulent transactions perpetrate d against our
customers, expansion of our risk and control functions within our
lines of business, inves tment in technology and the hiring of
significant numbers of additional risk, control and compliance
personnel. If we fail to meet the requirements of the regulatory
settlements, orders or agreements to which we are subject, or,
more generally , fail to maintain risk and control procedures and
processes that meet the heightened standards established by
our regulators and other government authorities, we could be
required to enter into further settlements, orders or agreements
and pay additional fines, penalties or judgments, or accept
material regulatory restrictions on our businesses.
Improper actions, behaviors or practices by us, our
employees or representatives that are illegal, unethical or
contrary to our core values could harm us, our shareholders or
customers or damage the integrity of the financial markets, and
are subject  to regulatory scrutiny across jurisdictions. The
complexity of the regulatory and enforcement regimes in the
17 Bank of America
U.S., coupled with the global scope of our operations and the
regulatory environment worldwide, also mean s that a single
event or practice or a series of related events or practices may
give rise to a significant number of overlapping investigations
and regulatory proceedings, either by multiple federal and state
agencies in the U.S. or by multiple regulators and other
governmental entities in different jurisdictions. Actions by other
members of the financial services industry related to business
activities in which we participate may result in investigations by
regulators or other government authorities.
While we believe that we have adopted appropriate risk
management and compliance programs, comp liance risks will
continue to exist, particu larly as we anticipate and adapt to new
and evolving  laws, rules and regulations. We also rely upon third
parties who may expose  us to compliance and legal risk. Future
legislative or regulatory actions, and any required changes to
our business  or operations, or those of third parties upon whom
we rely, resulting from such developments and actions could
result in a significant loss of revenue, impose additional
compliance and other costs or otherwise reduce our profitability ,
limit the products and services that we offer or our ability to
pursue certain business opportunities, require us to dispose of
certain businesses or assets, require us to curtail certain
businesses, affect the value of assets that we hold, require us to
increase our prices and therefore reduce demand for our
products, or otherwise adversely af fect our businesses.
We are subject to risks from potential liability arising from
lawsuits and regulatory and government action.
We face significant legal risks in our business, with a high
volume of claims agains t us and other financial institutions. The
amount of damages, penalties and fines that litigants and
regulators seek from us and other financial institutions continues
to be significant. This includes disputes with consumers,
customers and other counterparties.
Financial institutions, including us, continue to be the subject
of claims alleging anti-competitive conduct with respect to
various products and markets, including U.S. antitrust class
actions claim ing joint and several liability for treble damages. As
disclosed in Note 12 – Commitments and Contingencies  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, we also face contractual
indemnification and loan-repurchase claims arising from alleged
breaches of representations and warranties in the sale of
residential mortgages by legacy companies, which may result in
a requirement that we repurchase the mortgage loans, or make
whole or provide other remedies to counterparties.
U.S. regulat ors and government agencies regularly pursue
enforcement claims against financial institution s including the
Corporation for alleged violations of law and customer harm
under the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery , and
Enforcement Act, the federal securities laws, the False Claims
Act, fair lending laws and regulations (including the Equal Credit
Opportunity Act and the Fair Housing Act), antitrust laws, and
consumer protection laws and regulations related to products
and services such as overdraft and sales practices, including
prohibitions on unfair , deceptive, and/or abusive acts and
practices under the Consumer Financial Protection Act and the
Federal Trade Commission Act. Such claims may carry
significant penalties, restitution and, in certai n cases, treble
damages, and the ultim ate resolution of regulatory inquiries,
investigations and other proceedings to which we are subject
from time-to-time is dif ficult to predict.
There is also an increased focus on compliance  with U.S.
and global laws, rules and regulations related to the collection,
use, sharin g and safeguarding of personally identifiable
information and corporate data, as well as the implementation,use and management of emerging technologi es, including AI
and machine learning. Additionally , misconduct by our
employees and representatives, including unethical, fraudulent,
improper or illegal conduct, unfair , deceptive, abusive or
discriminatory business practices, or violations of policies,
procedures, laws, rules or regulations, including conduct that
affects compliance with books and records requirements, can
result in litigation and/or government investigations and
enforcement actions, and cause significant reputational harm.
We are also subject to litigation and regulatory and government
actions regarding fraud perpetrated against our customers in
connection with the use of our products and services and
increased scrutiny of sustainability-related policies, goals,
targets and disclosure, which could result in litigation, regulatory
investigations and actions and reputational harm.
The global environment of extensive investigations,
regulation, regulatory compliance burdens, litigation and
regulatory enforcement, combined with uncertainty related to the
continually evolving regulatory environment, have affected and
will likely continue to affect operational and compliance costs
and risks, including the limitation or cessation of our ability or
feasibility to continue providing certain products and services.
Lawsuits and regulatory actions have resulted in and will likely
continue to result in judgments, orders, settlements, penalties
and fines adverse to us. Further , we entered into orders with
government authorities regarding our participation in
implementing governm ent relief measures related to the
pandemic and other federal and state government assistance
programs, including the processing of unemployment benefits
for California and certain other states, and continue to be
involved in related litigation which may result in judgments
and/or settle ments. Litigation and investigati on costs, substantial
legal liability or significant regulatory or government action
against us could have material adverse effects on our business,
financial condition, including liquidity , and result s of operations,
and/or cause significant reputational harm.
U.S. federal banking agencies may require us to increase
our regulatory capital, total loss-absorbing capacity (TLAC),
long-term debt or liquidity requirements.
We are subject to U.S. regulatory capital and liquidity rules.
These rules, among other things, establish minimum
requirements to qualify as a well-capitalized institution. If any of
our subsidiary insured depository institutions fail to maintain
their status as well capitalized under the applicable regulatory
capital rules , the Federal Reserve will require us to agree to
bring the insured depos itory institution back to well-capitalized
status. For the duration of such an agreeme nt, the Federal
Reserve may impose restrictions on our activities. If we were to
fail to enter into or comp ly with such an agreement, the Federal
Reserve may impose more severe restrictions on our activities,
including requiring us to cease and desist activities permitted
under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956.
Capital and liquidity requirements are frequently introduced
and amended. It is possible that regulators may increase
regulatory capital requirements including TLAC and long-term
debt requirements, change how regulatory capital or RWA is
calculated or increase liquidity requirements. Our ability to return
capital to our sharehold ers depends in part on our ability to
maintain regulatory capital levels above minimum requirements
plus buffers. To the extent that increases occur  in our SCB, G-
SIB surcharge or countercyclical capital buffer, our returns of
capital to shareholders, including common stock dividends and
common stock repurcha ses, could decrease. For example, our
G-SIB surch arge is expected to increase by 50 bps to 3.0
percent on January 1, 2024. The Federal Reserve could
Bank of America 18
also limit or prohibit capital actions, such as paying or increasing
dividends or repurchasing common stock, as a result of
economic disruptions or events.
As part of its CCAR, the Federal Reserve conducts stress
testing on parts of our business using hypothetical economic
scenarios prepared by the Federal Reserve. Those scenarios
may affect our CCAR stress test results, which may impact the
level of our SCB, requiring us to hold additional capital. For
example, based on CCAR 2022 stress test results, our SCB
increased 90 bps to 3.4 percent on October 1, 2022.
A significant component of regulatory capital ratios is
calculating our RWA and our leverage exposure, which may
increase. The Basel Committee on Banking Supervision has
also revised several key methodologies for measuring RWA that
have not yet been implemented in the U.S., including a
standardized approach for operational risk, revised market risk
requirements and constraints on the use of internal models, as
well as a capital floor based on the revised standardized
approaches. It is expected in 2023 that U.S. banking regulators
will propose updates to the U.S. capital framework to
incorporate the Basel Committee revisio ns. Economic
disruptions or events may also cause an increase in our balance
sheet, RWA or leverage exposures, increasing required
regulatory capital and liquidity amounts.
Changes to and compliance with the regulatory capital and
liquidity requirements may impact our operations by requiring us
to liquidate assets, incre ase borrowings, issue additional equity
or other securities, reduce the amount of common stock
repurchases or dividends, cease or alter certain operations and
business activities or hold highly liquid assets, which may
adversely af fect our results of operations.
Changes in accounting standards or assumptions in
applying accounting policies could adversely affect us.
Accounting policies and methods are fundamental to how we
record and report our financial condition and results of
operations. Some of these policies require use of estimates and
assumptions that may affect the reported value of our assets or
liabilities and results of operations and are critical because they
require management to make difficult, subjective and complex
judgments about matters that are inherently uncertain. If
assumptions, estimates or judgments were erroneously applied,
we could be required to correct and restate prior-period financial
statements. Accounting standard-setters and those who interpret
the accounting standards, including the SEC, banking regulators
and our independent registered public accounting firm may also
amend or even reverse their previous interpretations or positions
on how various standards should be applied. These changes
may be difficult to predict and could impact the preparation and
reporting of our financial statements, including the application of
new or revised standards retrospectively , resulting in revisions to
prior-period financial statements.
We may be adversely affected by changes in U.S. and non-
U.S. tax laws and regulations.
It is possible that govern mental authorities in the U.S. and/or
other countries could further change tax laws in a way that
would materially adversely affect us, including changes to the
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 and Inflation Reduction Act of
2022. New guidelines issued by the Organization for Economic
Cooperation and Development could adversely impact how the
global profits of multinational enterprises are taxed. Any change
in tax laws and regulatio ns or interpretations of current or future
tax laws and regulations could materially adversely affect our
effective tax rate, tax liabilities and results of operations. U.S.
and foreign tax laws are complex and our judgments,interpretations or applications of such tax laws could differ from
that of the relevant governmental authority . This could result in
additional tax liabilities and interest, penalties, the reduction of
certain tax benefits and/or the requirement to make adjustments
to amounts recorded, which could be material.
Additionally , we have U.K. net deferred tax assets (DTA)
which consis t primarily of net operating losses that are expected
to be realized by certain subsidiaries over an extended number
of years. Adverse devel opments with respect to tax laws or to
other material factors, such as prolonged worsening of Europe’ s
capital markets or changes in the ability of our U.K. subsidiaries
to conduct business in the EU, could lead our management to
reassess and/or change its current conclusion that no valuation
allowance is necessary with respect to our U.K. net DT A.
Reputation
Damage to our reputation could harm our businesses,
including our competitive position and business prospects.
Our ability to attract and retain customers, clients, investors
and employees is impa cted by our reputation. Harm to our
reputation can arise from various sources, including actual or
perceived activities of our officers, directors, employees,
contractors, third parties, clients, counterpar ties and other
representatives, such as fraud, misconduct and unethical
behavior (such as employees’  sales practices), adequacy of our
responsiveness to fraud claims perpetrated against our
customers, effectiveness of our internal controls, litigation or
regulatory matters and their outcomes, compensation practices,
lending practices, suitability or reasonablenes s of particular
trading or investment strategies, including the reliability of our
research and models, and prohibiting clients from engaging in
certain transactions.
Our reputation may also be harmed by actual or perceived
failure to deliver the products and standards of service and
quality expected by our customers, clients and the community ,
including the overstatement or mislabeling of the environmental
benefits of our products, services or transactions, failure to
recognize and address customer complain ts, compliance
failures, inability to implement or manage emerging
technologies, including quantum computing, AI, machine
learning and technology change, failure to maintain effective
data mana gement, security breaches, cyber incidents,
prolonged or repeated system outages, unintended disclosure of
personal, proprietary or confidential information, breach of
fiduciary obligations and handling of the emergence or
continuation of health emergencies or pandemics. For example,
we entered into orders with certain government agencies
regarding our proces sing of unemployment benefits for
California and certain other states, and continue to be involved
in related litigation, which may result in judgments and/or
settlements. Our reputation may also be negatively impacted by
our ESG practices and disclosures, and those of our customers
and third parties.
Actions by the financial services industry generally or by
certain members or individuals in the industry also can
adversely affect our reputation. Also, adver se publicity or
negative information posted on social media by employees, the
media or otherwise, whether or not factually correct, may
adversely impact our business prospects or financial results.
We are subject to complex and evolving laws and regulations
regarding fair lending activity , UDAAP , electronic  funds transfers,
know-your-customer requirements, data protection and privacy ,
including the GDPR, CCPA as modified by the CPRA, cross-
border data movement, cybersecurity and other matters, as well
as evolving and expansive interpretations of these laws and
19 Bank of America
regulations. Principles concerning the approp riate scope of
consumer and commercial privacy vary considerably in different
jurisdictions, and regulatory and public expectations regarding
the definition and scope of consumer and commercial privacy
may remain fluid. These  laws may be interpreted and applied by
various jurisdictions in a manner inconsistent with our current or
future practices, or with one another . If personal, confidential or
proprietary information of customers in our poss ession, or in the
possession of third parties or financial data aggregators, is
mishandled, misused or mismanaged, or if we do not timely or
adequately address such information, we may face regulatory ,
legal and operational risks, which could adversely affect our
reputation, financial condition and results of operations.
We could suffer reputa tional harm if we fail to properly
identify and manage potential conflicts of interest. Management
of potential conflicts of interest has become increasingly
complex as we expand our business activities through more
numerous transactions, obligations and interests with and
among our clients. The actual or perceived failure to adequately
address conflicts of interest could affect the willin gness of clients
to use our products and services, or result in litigation or
enforcement actions, which could adversely af fect our business.
Our actual or perceived  failure to address these and other
issues, such as operational risks, gives rise to reputational risk
that could harm us and our business prospects. Failure to
appropriately address any of these issues could also give rise to
additional regulatory restrictions, legal risks and reputational
harm, which  could, among other consequence s, increase the
size and number of litigation claims and dama ges asserted or
subject us to enforcement actions, fines and penalties, and
cause us to incur related costs and expenses.
Other
The impacts of the pandemic have adversely affected and
may in the future adversely affect us.
The COVID-19 pandemic has directly and indirectly
negatively impacted the global economy , disrupted global supply
chains, adversely affected equity market valuations, created
significant volatility and disruption in financ ial and capital
markets, resulted in challenging labor market conditions, and
adversely impacted our financial results to varying degrees and
in various respects. The future direct and indirect effects of the
pandemic on global health and economic conditions and activity
remain uncertain, continue to evolve by region, country and
state and depend on future developments that cannot be
predicted, including impacts from the expiration of the federal
COVID-19 Public Health Emergency , surges of COVID-19 cases
and the spread of more  dangerous variants of COVID-19, the
availability , usage and acceptance of effective medical
treatments and vaccines, changing client preferences and
behavior and future public response and government actions,
including travel bans and restrictions, and limitations on
business. Such evolving impacts of the pandemic could disrupt
the U.S. and global econ omy, including changes in financial and
capital markets, and adversely affect our businesses and
operations, liquidity , results of operations and financial condition,
including from increased allowance for credit losses and
noninterest expenses, which are dependent on the pandemic’ s
duration and severity .
Reforms to and replacement of IBORs and certain other
rates or indices may adversely affect our reputation,
business, financial condition and results of operations.
Though significant progress has been made in the global
financial markets to replace products and contracts referencing
London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR) or other IBORs (IBOR
Products), the aggregate notional amount of these IBORProducts remains material to our busines s. Risks and
challenges associated with the transition from IBORs remain
and may result in consequences that cannot be fully anticipated,
which expose us to various financial, operational, supervisory ,
conduct and legal risk.
While there has been significant progress in market and
client adoption of ARRs , usage of ARRs may vary across or
within categories of contracts, products and services, potentially
resulting in market fragmentation, decreased trading volumes
and liquidity , increased complexity and modeling  and operational
risks. ARRs  have compositions and character istics that differ
from the benchmarks they replace, in some cases they have
limited liquidity , and may demonstrate less predictable
performance over time than the benchmarks they replace. For
example, certain ARRs are calculated on a compounded or
weighted-average basis and, unlike IBORs, do not reflect bank
credit risk and therefore typically require a spread adjustment.
There are important differences between the fallbacks, triggers
and calculation methodologies being implemen ted in cash and
derivatives markets. Any mismatch between the adoption of
ARRs in loans, securities and derivatives markets may impact
hedging or other financi al arrangements we have implemented,
and we may experience unanticipated market exposures.
Changes resulting from transition to successor or alternative
rates may adversely affect the yield on loans or securities held
by us, amounts paid on securities we have issued, amounts
received and paid on derivatives we have entere d into, the value
of such loans, securities or derivative instruments, the trading
market for such products and contracts, and our ability to
effectively use hedging instruments to manage risk. There can
be no assur ance that existing assets and liabilities based on or
linked to IBORs that have not already transitioned to ARRs will
transition without delay or potential disputes.
Although a significant majority of the aggreg ate notional
amount of our remaining IBOR Products maturing after 2022
include or have been amended to include fallbacks to ARRs, the
transitioning of certain IBOR Products that do not include
fallback provisions or adequate fallback mechanisms require
additional efforts to modify their terms. Some outstanding IBOR
Products are particularly challenging to modify due to the
requirement that all impacted parties consent to such
modification. To address outstanding IBOR Products that are
difficult to modify , legisla tion has been adopted in the U.S. and
in other jurisdictions. Litigation, disputes or other action may
occur as a result of the interpretation or application of legislation
or regulations, including if there is an overlap between laws or
regulations in different jurisdictions or from interactions with any
FCA-compelled “synthetic” LIBOR settings.
Some of our IBOR Products may contain language giving the
calculation agent (which may be us) discretion to determine the
successor rate (including the applicable spread adjustment) to
the existing benchmark. We may face a risk of litigation,
disputes or other actions from clients, counterparties,
customers, investors or others based on various claims, for
example, that we incorrectly interpreted or enforced IBOR-based
contract provisions, failed to appropriately communicate the
effect that the transition to ARRs will have on existing and future
products, treated affecte d parties unfairly or made inappropriate
product recommendations to or investments on behalf of its
clients, or engaged in anti-competitive behavio r or unlawfully
manipulated markets or benchmarks.
ARR-based products that we develop, launch and/or support,
including products using credit sensitive rates , may perform
differently to IBOR Products during times of economic stress,
Bank of America 20
adverse or volatile market conditions and acros s the credit and
economic cycle, which may impact the value,  return on and
profitability of our ARR-based assets. New financial products
linked to ARRs may have additional legal, financial, tax,
operational, market, compliance, reputational, competitive or
other risks to us, our clients and other market participants.
Banking regulators in the U.S. and globally have maintained
heightened regulatory scrutiny and intensified supervisory focus
on financial institution LIBOR transition plans, preparations and
readiness, including our use of credit-sensitive rates like the
Bloomberg Short-T erm Bank Yield Index and ARR-based term
rates, which could result in regulatory action, litigation and/or the
need to change the products offered by our businesses. Failure
to meet industry-wide IBOR transition milestones and to cease
issuance of IBOR Products by relevant cessation dates may,
subject to certain regulatory exceptions, resul t in supervisory
enforcement by applicable regulators, increase our cost of, and
access to, capital or lead to other consequences.
The ongoing market transition has altered, and additional
developments may further alter, some aspects of our risk profile
and risk management strategies, including derivatives and
hedging strategies, modeling and analytics, valuation tools,
product design and systems, controls, procedures and
operational infrastructure . Further changes may increase costs
and expose us to potential risks related to regulatory
compliance, requirements or inquiries. Among other risks,
various IBOR Products transition to ARRs at different times or in
different manners, with the result that we may face unexpected
interest rate, pricing or other exposures across business or
product lines, and we may face operational risks related to
planned processes at certain CCPs to convert outstanding USD
LIBOR-cleared derivatives to ARR positions. Continuing reforms
to market transition and other factors may adversely affect our
business, including the ability to serve customers and maintain
market share, financial condition or results of operations and
could result in reputational harm to us.
We face significant and increasing competition in the
financial services industry .
We operate in a highly competitive environment and
experience intense competition from local and global financial
institutions and new entrants in domestic and foreign markets.
We compete on the basis of a number of factors, including
customer service and convenience, the pricing, quality and
range of products and services we offer, lending limits, the
quality and delivery of our technology and our reputation,
experience and relationships in relevant markets. There is
increasing pressure to provide products and services on more
attractive terms, including lower fees and higher interest rates
on deposits, and lower cost investment strategies, which may
impact our ability to effectively compete. The changing
regulatory environmen t may also create competitive
disadvantages, including from dif ferent regulatory requirements.
Emerging technologies and the growth of e-com merce have
lowered geographic and monetary barriers of other financial
institutions, made it easier for non-depository institutions to offer
traditional banking products and services and allowed non-
traditional financial servi ce providers and techno logy companies
to compete with traditional financial service companies in
providing electronic and internet-based financial solutions and
services, including electronic securities trading with low or no
fees and commissions, marketplace lending,  financial data
aggregation and payment processing services, including real-
time payment platforms. Further , clients may choose to conduct
business with other market participants who engage in business
or offer products in areas we deem speculative or risky as analternative to traditional banking products. Increased competition
may reduce our net interest margin and revenue s from our fee-
based products and services and negatively affect our earnings,
including by pressuring us to lower pricing or credit standards,
requiring additional investment to improve the quality and
delivery of our technology , reducing our market share and/or
affecting the willingness of our clients to do business with us.
Our inability to adapt our business strategies, products and
services could harm our business.
We rely on a diversifie d mix of businesses that deliver a
broad range of financial products and services through multiple
distribution channels. Our success depends on our and our
third-party providers’  of products and services abilities to adapt
our busines s strategies, products and services and their
respective features in a timely manner , including available
payment processing services and technology to rapidly evolving
industry standards and consumer preferences.
The widespread adoption and rapid evolution of emerging
technologies, including analytic capabilities, self-service digital
trading platforms and automated trading markets, internet
services, and digital assets, such as central bank digital
currencies, cryptocurrencies (including stablecoins), tokens and
other cryptoassets that utilize distributed ledger technology
(DLT), as well as DLT in payment, clearing and settlement
processes creates additional risks, could negatively impact our
ability to compete and require substantial expenditures to the
extent we were to modify or adapt our existing products and
services. As such new technologies evolve and mature, our
businesses and results of operations could be adversely
impacted, including as a result of the introd uction of new
competitors to the payment ecosystem and increased volatility in
deposits and/or significa nt long-term reduction in deposits (i.e.,
financial disintermediation). Also, we may not be as timely or
successful in developing or introducing new products and
services, integrating new products or services into our existing
offerings, responding, managing or adapting to changes in
consumer behavior , preferences, spending, investing and/or
saving habits, achieving market acceptance of our products and
services, reducing costs in response to pressures to deliver
products and services at lower prices or sufficiently developing
and maintaining loyal customers. The Corporation’ s, or its third-
party providers’, inability or resistance to timely innovate or
adapt its operations, products and services to evolving industry
standards and consum er preferences could result in service
disruptions and harm our business and adversely affect our
results of operations and reputation.
We could suffer operational, reputational and financial harm
if our models fail to properly anticipate and manage risk.
We use models extensively to forecast losses, project
revenue and expenses, assess and control our operations and
financial condition, assist in capital planning and measure,
forecast and assess capital and liquidity requirements for credit,
market, operational and strategic risks. Under our Enterprise
Model Risk Policy , Model Risk Management is required to
perform model oversight, including independent validation
before initial use, ongoin g monitoring reviews through outcomes
analysis and benchmarking, and periodic revalidation. However ,
models are subject to inherent limitations from simplifying
assumptions, uncertainty regarding economic and financial
outcomes, and emerging risks from applications that rely on AI.
Our models may not be sufficiently predictive of future results
due to limited historical patterns, extreme or unanticipated
market movements or customer behavior and liquidity ,
especially during severe market downturns or stress events
(e.g., geopolitical or pandemic events), which could limit
21 Bank of America
their effectiveness and require timely recalibration. The models
that we use to assess and control our market  risk exposures
also reflect assumptions about the degree of correlation among
prices of various asset classes or other market indicators, which
may not be representa tive of the next downturn and would
magnify the limitations inherent in using historical data to
manage risk. Market conditions in recent years have involved
unprecedented dislocations and highlight the limitations inherent
in using historical data to manage risk. Our models may also be
adversely impacted by human error and may not be effective if
we fail to properly oversee and review them at regular intervals
and detect their flaws during our review and monitoring
processes, they contain erroneous data, assumptions,
valuations, formulas or algorithms or our applications running
the models do not perform as expected. Regardless of the steps
we take to help confirm effective control s, governance,
monitoring and testing, and implement new technology and
automated processes, we could suffer operation al, reputational
and financial harm, including funding or liquidity shortfalls, if
models fail to properly anticipate and manage risks.
Failure to properly manage data may result in our inability
to manage risk and business needs, errors in our
operations, critical reporting and strategic decision-making,
inaccurate reporting and non-compliance with laws, rules
and regulations.
We rely on our ability to manage and process data in an
accurate, timely and complete manner , including capturing,
transporting, aggregating, using, transmitting data externally ,
and retainin g and protecting data appropriately . While we
continually update our policies, programs, processes and
practices and implement emerging technolo gies, such as
automation, AI and robotics, our data managem ent processes
may not be effective and are subject to weaknesses and
failures, including human  error, data limitations, process delays,
system failure or failed controls. Failure to properly manage data
effectively in an accurate, timely and complete manner may
adversely impact its quality and reliability and our ability to
manage current and emerging risk, produce accurate financial
and non-financial, regulatory and operational reporting, detect or
surveil potential misconduct or non-compliance with laws, rules
and regulations, as well as to manage changing business
needs, strategic decision-making, resolution  strategy and
operations. The failure to establish and maintain effective,
efficient and controlled data management could adversely
impact our ability to develop our products and relationships with
our customers, increase regulatory risk and operational losses,
and damage our reputation.
Our operations, businesses and customers could be
adversely affected by the impacts related to climate change.
Climate change and related environmental sustainability
matters present short-term and long-term risks to us. The
physical risks include an increase in the frequency and severity
of extreme weather events and natural disasters, including
floods, wildfires, hurricanes and tornados, as well as chronic
longer-term shifts such as rising average global temperatures
and sea levels. Such disasters could impact our facilities and
employees and disrupt our operations or the operations of
customers or third parties, and result in market volatility or
negatively impact our customers’  ability to repay outstanding
loans, result  in rapid deposit outflows or draw downs of credit
facilities, cause supply chain and/or distribution network
disruptions, damage collateral or result in the deterioration of the
value of collateral or insurance shortfalls.
There is also increasing risk related to the transition to a low-
carbon econ omy. Chan ges in consumer prefe rences, market
pressures, advancements in technology and additionallegislation, regulatory and legal requirements could alter the
scope of our existing businesses, limit our ability to pursue
certain business activities and offer certain products and
services, amplify credit and market risks, negatively impact
asset values  and increase expenses, including as a result of
legal, compliance and public disclosure costs in the U.S. and
globally with potential jurisdictional divergence, strategic
planning, required capital expenditures and changes in
technology and markets , including supply chain and insurance
availability and cost. We have devoted and expect to continue to
devote additional resources as a result of our response to
climate change. Our climate change strategies, policies, and
disclosures, our ability to achieve our climat e-related goals,
targets and commitments, and/or the environm ental or climate
impacts attributable to our products, transactions or services will
likely result in heightened legal and compliance risk and could
result in reputational harm as a result of negative public
sentiment, regulatory scrutiny , litigation and reduced investor
and stakeholder confidence. Our ability to meet our climate-
related goals, targets and commitments, including our goal to
achieve certain greenhouse gas (GHG) emiss ions targets by
2030 and net zero GHG  emissions in our financing activities,
operations and supply chain before 2050, is subject to risks and
uncertainties, many of which are outside of our control, such as
technology advances, clearly defined roadma ps for industry
sectors, public policies and better emissions data reporting, and
ongoing engagement with customers, suppliers, investors,
government of ficials and other stakeholders.
There are and will continue to be challenges related to
capturing, verifying, analyzing and disclosing  climate-related
data, which includes nonfinancial data and other information that
is subject to measurement uncertainties, may not be
independently verified, and may result in legal or reputational
harm.
Our ability to attract, develop and retain qualified
employees is critical to our success, busin ess prospects
and competitive position.
Our perform ance and competitive position is heavily
dependent on the talents, development and efforts of highly
skilled indivi duals. Comp etition for qualified personnel within the
financial services indus try and from businesses outside the
financial services industry is intense.
Our compet itors include  global institutions and institutions
subject to different compensation and hiring regulations than
those imposed on U.S. institutions and finan cial institutions.
Also, our ability to attract, develop and retain employees could
be impacted by changing workforce concerns, expectations,
practices and prefere nces (including remote work), and
increasing labor shortages and competition for labor , which
could increase labor costs.
In order to attract and retain qualified personnel, we must
provide market-level compensation. As a large financial and
banking institution, we are and may become subject to
additional limitations on compensation practices by the Federal
Reserve, the OCC, the FDIC and other regulators around the
world, which may or may not affect our competitors.
Furthermore, because a substantial portion of our annual
incentive compensation paid to many of our employees is long-
term equity-based awards based on the value of our common
stock, declines in our profitability or outlook could adversely
affect the ability to attract and retain employ ees. If we are
unable to continue to attract, develop and retain qualified
individuals, our business prospects and competitive position
could be adversely af fected.
Bank of America 22
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None
Item 2. Properties
As of December 31, 2022, certain principal of fices and other materially important properties consisted of the following:
Facility Name LocationGeneral Character of the Physical
Property Primary Business SegmentProperty
StatusProperty
Square Feet 
Bank of America Corporate
CenterCharlotte, NC 60 Story Building Principal Executive Offices Owned 1,212,177
Bank of America Tower at
One Bryant ParkNew York, NY 55 Story BuildingGWIM, Global Banking and
 Global MarketsLeased 1,836,575
 Bank of America Financial
CentreLondon, UK 4 Building Campus Global Banking and Global Markets Leased 502,344
Cheung Kong Center Hong Kong 62 Story Building Global Banking and Global Markets Leased 149,790
For leased properties, property square feet represents the square footage occupied by the Corporation.
The Corporation has a 49.9 percent joint venture interest in this property .
We own or lease appro ximately 69.5 million square feet in
over 20,000 facilities and ATM locations globally, including
approximately 63.9 million square feet in the U.S. (all 50 states
and the District of Columbia, the U.S. Virgin Islands, Puerto Rico
and Guam) and approximately 5.6 million square feet in more
than 35 countries.
We believe our owned and leased properties are adequate
for our business needs and are well maintained.  We continue to
evaluate our owned and leased real estate and may determine
from time to time that certain of our premises and facilities, or
ownership structures, are no longer necessary for ouroperations. In connection therewith, we regula rly evaluate the
sale or sale/leaseback of certain properties, and we may incur
costs in connection with any such transactions.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
See Litigation and Regulatory Matters in Note 12 –
Commitments and Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, which is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
None
Part II
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities
The principa l market on which our common stock is traded is the
New York Stock Excha nge under the symbol “BAC.” As of
February 21, 2023, there  were 143,301 register ed shareholders
of common stock.
The table below presents common share repurchase activity
for the three months ended December 31, 2022. The primary
source of funds for cash distributions by the Corporation to itsshareholders is dividends received from its bank subsidiaries.
Each of the bank subsi diaries is subject to various regulatory
policies and requirements relating to the payment of dividends,
including requirements to maintain capital above regulatory
minimums. All of the Corporation’ s preferred stock outstanding
has prefere nce over the Corporation’ s common stock with
respect to payment of dividends.
(Dollars in millions, except per share information; shares in thousands)Total Common
Shares
Purchased Weighted-
Average Per
Share PriceTotal Shares
Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced
Programs Remaining
Buyback
Authority
Amounts 
October 1 - 31, 2022 2,018 $ 34.68 2,018 $ 16,332 
November 1 - 30, 2022 17,085 37.14 16,961 15,949 
December 1 - 31, 2022 9,133 32.67 9,117 15,783 
Three months ended December 31, 2022 28,236 35.52 28,096 
Includes 140 thousand shares of the Corporation's common stock acquired by the Corporation in connection with satisfaction of tax withholding obligations on vested restricted stock or restricted
stock units and certain forfeitures and terminations of employment-related awards and for potential re-issuance to certain employees under equity incentive plans.
In October 2021, the Corporation’ s Board of Directors (Board) authorized the repurchase of up to $25 billion of common stock over time (October 2021 Authorization). Additionally , the Board
authorized repurchases to offset shares awarded under equity-based compensation plans. During the three months ended December 31, 2022, pursuant to the Board’ s authorizations, the
Corporation repurc hased approxima tely 28 million shares, or $998 million, of its common stock, including repurchases to offset shares awarded under equity-based compensation plans. For more
information, see Capital Management - CCAR and Capital Planning in the MD&A  on page 49 and Note 13 – Shareholders’  Equity  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Remaining Buyback Authority Amounts represents the remaining buyb ack authority of the October 2021 Authorization. Excludes repurchases to offset shares awarded under equity-based
compensation plans.
Depositary Share Repurchases
On December 13, 2022, following the expiration of its cash tender offers, BofA  Securities, Inc. (BofAS), a wholly owned indirect
subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation (Parent), acquired depositary shares representing fractional interests in shares of the
Parent’ s preferred stock registered under Sectio n 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, in the amounts and for
the per share total price set forth in the following table. Also on December 13, 2022, the Parent acquired from BofAS such depositary
shares that were previously purchased by BofAS for the same per share price.(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
(1,2) (2) (3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
23 Bank of America
Per Depositary Share 
Depositary Shares Representing Fractional Interests in
Series of Bank of America Preferred StockTotal Number of
Depositary
Shares
PurchasedPurchase
 PriceAccrued
DividendsTotal
 Price Paid 
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of Floating Rate
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series E 373,745 $ 19.22 $ 0.0963694 $19.3163694 
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of 5.875%
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series HH 110,762 24.08 0.1999132 24.2799132
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of 5.375%
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series KK 627,514 22.12 n/a 22.1200000
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of 5.000%
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series LL 355,040 20.44 n/a 20.4400000
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of 4.375%
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series NN 1,006,802 18.20 0.1215278 18.3215278
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of 4.125%
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series PP 99,685 17.27 0.1174479 17.3874479
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of 4.250%
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series QQ 121,078 17.30 0.0767361 17.3767361
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of 4.750%
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series SS 537,327 19.90 0.0857639 19.9857639
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share of Floating Rate
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 1 106,361 18.92 0.0571489 18.9771489
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share of Floating Rate
   Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series 5 870,231 19.17 0.0790691 19.2490691
The liquidation preference attributable to each depositary share is $25.00.
The total price paid per depositary shares equals the applicable Purchase Price for such depositary shares, plus, if applicable, the Accrued Dividends for such depositary shares.
n/a = not applicable
The Corporation did not have any unregistered sales of equity securities during the three months ended December 31, 2022.
Item 6. [Reserved]1
2
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 24
Item 7. Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
Table of Contents
Page
Executive Summary 26
Recent Developments 27
Financial Highlights 28
Balance Sheet Overview 30
Supplemental Financial Data 32
Business Segment Operations 37
Consumer Banking 38
Global W ealth & Investment Management 40
Global Banking 42
Global Markets 44
All Other 45
Managing Risk 46
Strategic Risk Management 49
Capital Management 49
Liquidity Risk 54
Credit Risk Management 59
Consumer Portfolio Credit Risk Management 59
Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management 64
Non-U.S. Portfolio 70
Loan and Lease Contractual Maturities 71
Allowance for Credit Losses 73
Market Risk Management 75
Trading Risk Management 76
Interest Rate Risk Management for the Banking Book 79
Mortgage Banking Risk Management 80
Compliance and Operational Risk Management 80
Reputational Risk Management 81
Climate Risk Management 81
Complex Accounting Estimates 82
Non-GAAP  Reconciliations 85
25 Bank of America
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations
Bank of America Corporation (the Corporation) and its
management may make certain statements that constitute
“forward-looking stateme nts” within the meanin g of the Private
Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements can
be identified  by the fact that they do not relate strictly to
historical or current facts. Forward-looking state ments often use
words such as “anticipates,” “targets,” “expects,” “hopes,”
“estimates,” “intends,” “plans,” “goals,” “believes,” “continue” and
other similar expressions or future or conditional verbs such as
“will,” “may ,” “might,” “should,” “would” and “could.” Forward-
looking statements represent the Corporation’ s current
expectations, plans or forecasts of its future results, revenues,
provision for credit losses, expenses, efficiency ratio, capital
measures, strategy and future business and economic
conditions more generally , and other future matters. These
statements are not guarantees of future results or performance
and involve certain known and unknown risks, uncertainties and
assumptions that are difficult to predict and are often beyond the
Corporation’ s control. Actual outcomes and results may differ
materially from those expressed in, or implied by, any of these
forward-looking statements.
You should not place undue reliance on any forward-looking
statement and should consider the following uncertainties and
risks, as well as the risks and uncertainties more fully discussed
under Item 1A. Risk Factors of this Annual Report on Form 10-
K: and in any of the Corporation’ s subsequent Securities and
Exchange Commission filings: the Corporation’ s potential
judgments, orders, settlements, penalties, fines and reputational
damage resulting from pending or future litigation and regulatory
investigations, proceedin gs and enforcement actions, including
as a result of our participation in and execution of government
programs related to the Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19)
pandemic, such as the processing of unemployment benefits for
California and certain other states; the possibility that the
Corporation’ s future liabilities may be in excess  of its recorded
liability and estimated range of possible loss for litigation, and
regulatory and government actions; the possibility that the
Corporation could face increased claims from one or more
parties involved in mortgage securitizations; the Corporation’ s
ability to resolve represe ntations and warranties repurchase and
related claims; the risks related to the discon tinuation of the
London Interbank Offered Rate and other reference rates,
including increased expenses and litigation and the
effectiveness of hedging strategies; uncertainties about the
financial stability and growth rates of non-U.S. jurisdictions, the
risk that those jurisdictions may face difficulties servicing their
sovereign debt, and related stresses on financial markets,
currencies and trade, and the Corporation’ s exposures to such
risks, including direct, indirect and operational; the impact of
U.S. and global interest rates, inflation, currency exchange
rates, economic conditions, trade policies and tensions,
including tariffs, and potential geopolitical instab ility; the impact
of the interest rate, inflationary and macroeconomic environment
on the Corporation’ s business, financial condition and results of
operations; the possibilit y that future credit losses may be higher
than currently expected due to changes  in economic
assumptions, customer behavior , adverse developments with
respect to U.S. or global economic conditions and other
uncertainties, including the impact of supply chain disruptions,
inflationary pressures and labor shortages on economic
conditions and our business; potential losses related to the
Corporation's concentra tion of credit risk; the Corporation’ s
ability to achieve its expense targets and expectations regarding
revenue, net interest income, provision for credit losses, netcharge-offs, effective tax rate, loan growth or other projections;
adverse changes to the Corporation’ s credit ratings from the
major credit rating agencies; an inability to access capital
markets or maintain deposits or borrowing costs; estimates of
the fair value and other accounting values, subject to impairment
assessments, of certain of the Corporation ’s assets and
liabilities; the estimated or actual impact of changes in
accounting standards or assumptions in applying those
standards; uncertainty regarding the content, timing and impact
of regulatory capital and liquidity requirements; the impact of
adverse changes to total loss-absorbing capacity requirements,
stress capital buffer requirements and/or global systemically
important bank surcharges; the potential impact of actions of the
Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System on the
Corporation’ s capital plans; the effect of changes in or
interpretations of income tax laws and regulation s; the impact of
implementation and compliance with U.S. and international laws,
regulations and regulatory interpretations, including, but not
limited to, recovery and resolution planning requirements,
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation assessments, the
Volcker Rule, fiduciary standards, derivatives regulations and
the Coronav irus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act and any
similar or related rules and regulations; a failure or disruption in
or breach of the Corporation’ s operational or security systems or
infrastructure, or those of third parties, including as a result of
cyber -attacks or campaigns; the risks related to the transition
and physica l impacts of climate change; our ability to achieve
environmental, social and governance goals and commitments
or the impact of any changes in the Corporation’ s sustainability
strategy or commitments generally; the impact of any future
federal gove rnment shutdown and uncertainty regarding the
federal gove rnment’ s debt limit or changes in fiscal, monetary or
regulatory policy; the emergence or continuation  of widespread
health emer gencies or pandemics, including the magnitude and
duration of the COVID -19 pandemic and its impact on U.S.
and/or global financial market conditions and our business,
results of operations, financial condition and prospects; the
impact of natural disasters, extreme weather events, military
conflict (including the Russia/Ukraine conflict, the possible
expansion of such conflict and potential geopolitical
consequences), terrorism  or other geopolitical events; and other
matters.
Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they
are made, and the Corporation undertakes no obligation to
update any forward-looking statement to reflect the impact of
circumstances or events that arise after the date the forward-
looking statement was made.
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements referred to in
the Management’ s Discussion and Analysi s of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations (MD&A) are incorporated
by reference into the MD&A. Certain prior-year amounts have
been reclassified to conform to current-year presentation.
Throughout the MD&A, the Corporation uses certain acronyms
and abbreviations which are defined in the Glossary .
Executive Summary
Business Overview
The Corporation is a Delaware corporation, a bank holding
company (BHC) and a financial holding company . When used in
this report, “Bank of America,” “the Corporation,” “we,” “us” and
“our” may refer to Bank of America Corporation individually ,
Bank of America Corporation and its subsidiaries, or certain of
Bank of America Corporation’ s subsidiaries or af filiates. Our
Bank of America 26
principal executive offices are located in Charlotte, North
Carolina. Through our various bank and nonba nk subsidiaries
throughout the U.S. and in international markets, we provide a
diversified range of banking and nonbank financial services and
products through four business segments: Consumer Banking ,
Global Wealth & Investment Management (GWIM) , Global
Banking  and Global Markets , with the remaining operations
recorded in All Other . We operate our banking  activities primarily
under the Bank of America, National Association (Bank of
America, N.A. or BANA) charter . At December 31, 2022, the
Corporation had $3.1 trillion in assets and a headcount of
approximately 217,000 employees.
As of December 31, 2022, we served clients through
operations across the U.S., its territories and more than 35
countries. Our retail banking footprint covers all major markets in
the U.S., and we serve approximately 67 million  consumer and
small business clients with approximately 3,900  retail financial
centers, approximately 16,000 ATMs, and leading digital banking
platforms (www .bankofamerica.com) with approximately 44
million active users, including approximately 35 million active
mobile users. We offer industry-leading support to approximately
three million small business households. Our GWIM  busin esses,
with client balances of $3.4 trillion, provide tailored solutions to
meet client needs through a full set of investment management,
brokerage, banking, trust and retirement products. We are a
global leader in corporate and investment banking and trading
across a broad range of asset classes serving corporations,
governments, institutions and individuals around the world.
Recent Developments
Capital Management
On February  1, 2023, the Corporation’ s Board of Directors (the
Board) declared a quarterly common stock dividend of $0.22 per
share, payab le on March 31, 2023 to sharehold ers of record as
of March 3, 2023.
For more information on our capital resources, see Capital
Management on page 49.
Changes in U.S. Tax Law
On August 16, 2022, the U.S. enacted the Inflation Reduction
Act of 2022,  which contained a number of tax-related provisions.
The tax changes included the extension and expansion of
renewable energy tax credit programs, the establishment of a
new 15 percent alternative minimum tax (AMT) on adjusted
financial statement income for large corporations and a one
percent excise tax on stock repurchases. For more information,
see Financial Highlights – Income Tax Expense on page 29.
Russia/Ukraine Conflict
Due to the Russia/Ukraine conflict, there has been significant
volatility in financial and commodities markets, and multiple
jurisdictions have implemented various econom ic sanctions. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, our direct net country exposure
to Russia was $443 million and $733 million, primarily consisting
of outstanding loans and leases totaling $391 million and $686
million, and our net country exposure to Ukraine was not
significant. While the Corporation’ s direct exposure to Russia is
limited, the potential duration, course and impact of the
Russia/Ukraine conflict remain uncertain and could adversely
affect macroeconomic and geopolitical conditions, which could
negatively impact the Corporation's busines ses, results of
operations and financial position. For moreinformation on the risks related to the Russia/Ukraine conflict,
see the Market, Credit and Geopolitical sections in Item 1A. Risk
Factors on page 8.
LIBOR and Other Benchmark Rates
After Decem ber 31, 2021, ICE Benchmark Administration (IBA)
ceased publishing British Pound Sterling (GBP ), Euro, Swiss
Franc, and Japanese Yen (JPY) London Interbank Offered Rate
(LIBOR) settings and one-week and two-mo nth U.S. dollar
(USD) LIBOR settings, subject to the continued publication of
certain non-representative LIBOR settings based on a modified
calculation (i.e., on a “synthetic” basis). The remaining USD
LIBOR settings (i.e., overnight, one month, three month, six
month and 12 month) will cease or become non-representative
immediately after June 30, 2023, although the Financial Conduct
Authority (FCA) has issued a consultation seeking views on
whether to compel publication of the one-month, three-month
and six-mon th USD LIBOR settings on a “synth etic” basis for a
short time after June 30, 2023 (i.e., through September 30,
2024). Separately , the Federal Reserve, the Office of the
Comptroller of the Currency and the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation (FDIC) issued supervisory guidance encouraging
banks to cease entering into new contracts that use USD LIBOR
as a reference rate by December 31, 2021, subject to certain
regulatory-approved exceptions (USD LIBOR Guidance).
As a result, a major transition has been and continues to be
in progress in the global financial markets with respect to the
replacement of Interbank Offered Rates (IBORs). This has been
and continues to be a complex process impacting a variety of
our businesses and operations. IBORs have historically been
used in many of the Corporation’ s products and contracts,
including derivatives, consumer and commercial loans,
mortgages, floating-rate notes and other adjustable-rate
products and financial instruments. In response,  the Corporation
established an enterprise-wide IBOR transition program, with
active involvement of senior management and regular reports to
the Management Risk Committee (MRC) and Enterprise Risk
Committee (ERC). The program continues to drive the
Corporation's industry and regulatory engagem ent, client and
financial contract changes, internal and external
communications, technology and operations modifications,
including updates to its operational models , systems and
processes, introduction of new products, migration of existing
clients, and program strategy and governance.
As of December 31, 2021, the Corporation transitioned or
otherwise addressed IBOR-based products and contracts
referencing the rates that ceased or became non-representative
after December 31, 2021, including LIBOR-linked commercial
loans, LIBOR-based adjustable-rate consumer mortgages,
LIBOR-linked derivatives  and interdealer trading  of certain USD
LIBOR and other interest rate swaps, and related hedging
arrangements. Additionally , in accordance with the USD LIBOR
Guidance, the Corporation has ceased entering into new
contracts that use USD  LIBOR as a reference rate, subject to
limited exceptions, including those consistent with supervisory
guidance.
The Corporation launched capabilities and services to
support the issuance of and trading in products indexed to
various alternative reference rates (ARRs) and developed
employee training programs as well as other internal and
external sources of information on the various challenges and
opportunities that the replacement of IBORs has presented and
continues to present. The Corporation continues to monitor a
variety of market scen arios as part of its transition efforts,
including risks associated with insuf ficient preparation by
27 Bank of America
individual market partici pants or the overall market ecosystem,
ability of market participants to meet regulatory and industry-
wide recommended milestones, and access and demand by
clients and market participants to liquidity in certain products,
including LIBOR products.
With respect to the transition of LIBOR products referencing
USD LIBOR settings ceasing or becoming non-re presentative as
of June 30, 2023, a significant majority of the Corporation’ s
notional contractual exposure to such LIBOR settings, of which
the significant majority is derivatives contracts, have been
remediated (i.e., updated to include fallback provisions to ARRs
based on market-driven protocols, regulatory guidance and
industry-recommended fallback provisions and related
mechanisms), and the Corporation is continuing to remediate
the remaining USD LIBOR exposure. For example, during the
first half of 2023, certain central counterparties (CCPs) expect to
complete processes to convert outstanding USD LIBOR-cleared
derivatives to ARR positions. The remaining exposure, a
majority of which is made up of derivatives and commercial
loans and which represe nts a small minority of outstanding USD
LIBOR notional contractual exposure of the Corporation,
requires active dialogue with clients to modify the contracts. For
any residual  exposures after June 2023 that continue to have no
fallback provisions, the Corporation continues to assess and
plans to leverage relevant contractual and statutory solutions,
including the Adjustable Interest Rate (LIBOR) Act in the U.S.
(as implemented by the Federal Reserve) and “synthetic” USD
LIBOR (if the FCA compels such publication), to transition such
exposure.
While there remain risks to the Corporation associated with
the transition from IBOR s (as discussed under Item 1A. Risk
Factors – Other on page 20), such risks have been monitored
and, where applicable, managed through the Corporation’ s
efforts and dedicated operational resources to date. In the
Corporation’ s view, the potential likelihood and/or impact of
transition-related risks has lessened over time, and the
Corporation anticipates it has devoted appropria te resources to
remaining transition efforts and will be able to continue to
appropriately monitor and manage such risks as the transition
process continues. The Corporation expects transition-related
risks to further diminish as certain market developments occur
prior to June 30, 2023.
The Corporation has implemented regulator y, tax and
accounting changes and continues to monit or current and
potential impacts of the transition, including Internal Revenue
Service tax regulations and guidance and Finan cial Accounting
Standards Board guidance. In addition, the Corporation has
engaged impacted clients in connection with the transition by
providing education on ARRs and the timing of transition events.
The Corporation is also working actively with global regulators,
industry working groups and trade associations.
For more information on the expected replacement of LIBOR
and other benchmark rates, see Item 1A. Risk Factors – Other
on page 20.Financial Highlights
Table 1Summary Income Statement and Selected
Financial Data
(Dollars in millions, except per share information) 2022 2021
Income statement
Net interest income $ 52,462 $ 42,934 
Noninterest income 42,488 46,179 
Total revenue, net of interest expense 94,950 89,113 
Provision for credit losses 2,543 (4,594)
Noninterest expense 61,438 59,731 
Income before income taxes 30,969 33,976 
Income tax expense 3,441 1,998 
Net income 27,528 31,978 
Preferred stock dividends and other 1,513 1,421 
Net income applicable to common
shareholders $ 26,015 $ 30,557 
Per common share information   
Earnings $ 3.21 $ 3.60 
Diluted earnings 3.19 3.57 
Dividends paid 0.86 0.78 
Performance ratios
Return on average assets 0.88 % 1.05 %
Return on average common
shareholders’ equity 10.75 12.23 
Return on average tangible common
shareholders’ equity 15.15 17.02 
Efficiency ratio 64.71 67.03 
Balance sheet at year end   
Total loans and leases $ 1,045,747 $ 979,124 
Total assets 3,051,375 3,169,495 
Total deposits 1,930,341 2,064,446 
Total liabilities 2,778,178 2,899,429 
Total common shareholders’ equity 244,800 245,358 
Total shareholders’ equity 273,197 270,066 
For definitions, see Key Metrics on page 167.
Return on average tangible common shareholders’  equity is a non-GAA P financial measure.
For more information and a corresponding reconciliation to the most closely related financial
measures defined by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America (GAAP), see Non-GAAP  Reconciliations on page 85.
Net income was $27.5 billion, or $3.19 per diluted share in 2022
compared to $32.0 billion, or $3.57 per diluted  share in 2021.
The decrease in net income was primarily due to an increase in
provision for credit losses, lower noninterest income and higher
noninterest expense, partially offset by higher net interest
income.
For discussion and analysis of our consolidated and
business segment results of operations for 2021 compared to
2020, see Financial Highlights and Business Segment
Operations sections in the MD&A  of the Corporation’ s 2021
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Net Interest Income
Net interest income increased $9.5 billion to $52.5 billion in 2022
compared to 2021. Net interest yield on a fully taxable-
equivalent (FTE) basis increased 30 basis points (bps) to 1.96
percent for 2022. The increase was primarily driven by benefits
from higher interest rates, including lower premium amortization
expense, and loan growth, partially offset by a lower amount of
accelerated net capitalized loan fees due to Paycheck
Protection Program (PPP) loan forgiveness, which primarily
occurred in 2021. For more information on net interest yield and
the FTE basis, see Supplemental Financial Data on page 32,
and for(1)
(1)
(2)
 (1)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 28
more information on interest rate risk management, see Interest
Rate Risk Management for the Banking Book on page 79.
Noninterest Income
Table 2Noninterest Income
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Fees and commissions:
Card income $ 6,083 $ 6,218 
Service charges 6,405 7,504 
Investment and brokerage services 15,901 16,690 
Investment banking fees 4,823 8,887 
Total fees and commissions 33,212 39,299 
Market making and similar activities 12,075 8,691 
Other income (2,799) (1,811)
Total noninterest income $ 42,488 $ 46,179 
Noninterest income decreased $3.7 billion to $42.5 billion for
2022 compared to 2021. The following highlights the significant
changes.
●    Service charges decreased $1.1 billion primarily driven by the
impact of non-suf ficient funds and overdraft policy changes
as well as lower treasury service charges.
●    Investment and brokerage services decreased $789 million
primarily driven by lower market valuations and declines in
assets unde r managem ent (AUM) pricing, partially offset by
positive AUM flows.
●    Investm ent banking  fees decreased $4.1 billion primarily
driven by a decline in demand resulting in lower equity and
debt issuance fees and lower advisory fees.
●    Market making and similar activities increased $3.4 billion
primarily driven by improved performance across macro
products in fixed income , currencies and commo dities (FICC)
and by the impact of higher interest rates on client financing
activities in Equities.
●    Other income decreased $988 million primarily due to certain
valuation adjustments.
Provision for Credit Losses
The provision for credit losses increased $7.1 billion to $2.5
billion for 2022 compa red to 2021. The provision for credit
losses for 2022 was primarily driven by loan growth and a
dampened macroeconomic outlook, partially offset by a reserve
release for reduced COVID-19 pandemic (the pandemic)
uncertainties. For the same period in the prior year, the benefit
in the provision for credit losses was due to an improved
macroeconomic outlook . For more information on the provision
for credit losses, see Allowance for Credit Losses on page 73.
Noninterest Expense
Table 3Noninterest Expense
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Compensation and benefits $ 36,447 $ 36,140 
Occupancy and equipment 7,071 7,138 
Information processing and communications 6,279 5,769 
Product delivery and transaction related 3,653 3,881 
Marketing 1,825 1,939 
Professional fees 2,142 1,775 
Other general operating 4,021 3,089 
Total noninterest expense $ 61,438 $ 59,731 Noninterest expense increased $1.7 billion to $61.4 billion in
2022 compared to 2021. The increase was primarily due to
higher investments in people and techno logy, expense
associated with the settlement of the legacy monoline insurance
litigation and expense related to certain regulatory matters,
partially of fset by lower net COVID-19 related costs.
Income Tax Expense
Table 4Income Tax Expense
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Income before income taxes $ 30,969 $ 33,976 
Income tax expense 3,441 1,998 
Effective tax rate 11.1 % 5.9 %
Income tax expense was $3.4 billion for 2022 compared to $2.0
billion in 2021 resulting in an effective tax rate of 11.1 percent
compared to 5.9 percent.
The effectiv e tax rates for 2022 and 2021 were primarily
driven by our recurring preference benefits. Also included in the
effective tax rate for 2021 was the impact of the 2021 U.K. tax
law change further discussed in this section. For more
information on our recurring tax preference benefits, see Note
19 – Income Taxes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Absent envir onmental, social and governance (ESG) tax credits
and discrete  tax benefits, the effective tax rates would have
been approximately 25 percent.
On August 16, 2022, the U.S. enacted the Inflation Reduction
Act of 2022,  which contained a number of tax-related provisions,
including the extension and expansion of renewable energy tax
credit programs. In particular , partnerships are no longer solely
limited to an Investmen t Tax Credit, but can now also elect a
Production Tax Credit for solar energy production facilities
placed in service after December 31, 2021.
Other notabl e tax law changes include the establishment of a
new 15 percent AMT  on adjusted financial statement income for
large corporations and a one percent excise tax on net stock
repurchases, both of which were effective for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2023. The tax law changes for
the new AMT  permit business credits, including those from ESG
investments in renewable energy and affordable housing, to
offset potential AMT  liability . The Corporation has assessed the
potential impacts of these two U.S. tax law changes and does
not expect the changes to have a significant effect on its future
effective tax rate.
On June 10, 2021, the U.K. enacted the 2021 Finance Act,
which increased the U.K. corporation income tax rate to 25
percent from 19 percent. This change is effective April 1, 2023
and unfavorably affects income tax expense on future U.K.
earnings. As a result, during the three months ended June 30,
2021, the Corporation  recorded a positive income tax
adjustment of approximately $2.0 billion with a corresponding
write-up of U.K. net deferred tax assets, which reflected a
reversal of previously recorded write-downs of net deferred tax
assets for prior changes in the U.K. corporation income tax rate.
29 Bank of America
Balance Sheet Overview
Table 5Selected Balance Sheet Data
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 $ Change % Change
Assets   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 230,203 $ 348,221 $ (118,018) (34)%
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell 267,574 250,720 16,854 7 
Trading account assets 296,108 247,080 49,028 20 
Debt securities 862,819 982,627 (119,808) (12)
Loans and leases 1,045,747 979,124 66,623 7 
Allowance for loan and lease losses (12,682) (12,387) (295) 2 
All other assets 361,606 374,110 (12,504) (3)
Total assets $ 3,051,375 $ 3,169,495 $ (118,120) (4)
Liabilities
Deposits $ 1,930,341 $ 2,064,446 $ (134,105) (6)
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase 195,635 192,329 3,306 2 
Trading account liabilities 80,399 100,690 (20,291) (20)
Short-term borrowings 26,932 23,753 3,179 13 
Long-term debt 275,982 280,117 (4,135) (1)
All other liabilities 268,889 238,094 30,795 13 
Total liabilities 2,778,178 2,899,429 (121,251) (4)
Shareholders’ equity 273,197 270,066 3,131 1 
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity $ 3,051,375 $ 3,169,495 $ (118,120) (4)
Assets
At December 31, 2022, total assets were approximately $3.1
trillion, down $118.1 billion from December 31, 2021. The
decrease in assets was primarily due to lower debt securities
and cash and cash equivalents, partially offset by an increase in
loans and leases, trading account assets and federal funds sold
and securiti es borrowe d or purchased under agreements to
resell.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivalents decreased $118.0 billion primarily
driven by lower deposits and continued loan growth .
Federal Funds Sold and Securities Borrowed or
Purchased Under Agreements to Resell
Federal funds transactio ns involve lending reserve balances on
a short-term basis. Securities borrowed or purchased under
agreements to resell are collateralized lending transactions
utilized to accommodat e customer transactions, earn interest
rate spreads and obtain securities for settlement and for
collateral. Federal funds sold and securities borrowed orpurchased under agreements to resell increased $16.9 billion
primarily due to client activity within Global Markets .
Trading Account Assets
Trading account assets consist primarily of long positions in
equity and fixed-income securities including U.S. government
and agency securities, corporate securities and non-U.S.
sovereign debt. Trading account assets increased $49.0 billion
primarily due to client activity within Global Markets .
Debt Securities
Debt securities primarily include U.S. Treasury and agency
securities, mortgage-backed securities (MBS), principally
agency MBS, non-U.S. bonds, corporate bonds and municipal
debt. We use the debt securities portfolio primarily to manage
interest rate and liquidity risk and to leverage market conditions
that create economically attractive returns on these investments.
Debt securities decreased $119.8 billion primarily driven by
lower deposits and continued loan growth. For more information
on debt securities, see Note 4 – Securities  to the Cons olidated
Financial Statements.
Bank of America 30
Loans and Leases
Loans and leases increased $66.6 billion primarily driven by
growth in commercial loans, higher credit card spending and
higher resid ential mortgages due to lower paydowns and
continued originations. For more information  on the loan
portfolio, see Credit Risk Management on page 59.
Allowance for Loan and Lease Losses
The allowance for loan and lease losses increas ed $295 million
primarily driven by loan growth and a dampened
macroeconomic outlo ok, partially offset by a reserve release for
reduced pandemic uncertainties.  For more information, see
Allowance for Credit Losses on page 73.
All Other Assets
All other assets decrea sed $12.5 billion primarily driven by a
decline in margin loans and loans held-for-sale (LHFS).
Liabilities
At December 31, 2022, total liabilities were approximately $2.8
trillion, down $121.3 billion from December 31, 2021, primarily
due to lower deposits.
Deposits
Deposits decreased $134.1 billion primarily due to an increase
in customer spending and a shift to higher yielding accounts.
Federal Funds Purchased and Securities Loaned or
Sold Under Agreements to Repurchase
Federal funds transactions involve borrowing reserve balances
on a short-term basis. Securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase are collateralized borrowing
transactions utilized to accommodate customer transactions,
earn interes t rate spreads and finance assets on the balance
sheet. Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold
under agreements to repurchase increased $3.3 billion primarily
driven by an increase in repurchase agreements to support
liquidity .
Trading Account Liabilities
Trading account liabilities consist primarily of short positions in
equity and fixed-income securities including U.S. Treasury and
agency securities, non-U.S. sovereign debt and corporate
securities. Trading acco unt liabilities decreased $20.3 billion
primarily due to lower levels of short positions within Global
Markets .Short-term Borrowings
Short-term borrowings provide an additional funding source and
primarily consist of Federal Home Loan Bank (FHLB) short-term
borrowings, notes payable and various other borrowings that
generally have maturities of one year or less. Short-term
borrowings increased $3.2 billion primarily due to an increase in
FHLB adva nces and commercial paper to manage liquidity
needs. For more information on short-term borrowings, see Note
10 – Securi ties Financin g Agreements, Short-term Borrowings,
Collateral and Restricted Cash  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Long-term Debt
Long-term debt decreased $4.1 billion primarily due to
maturities, redemptions  and valuation adjustments, partially
offset by issuances. For more information on long-term debt,
see Note 11 – Long-term Debt  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
All Other Liabilities
All other liabilities increased $30.8 billion primarily driven by
Global Markets client activity .
Shareholders’ Equity
Shareholders’  equity increased $3.1 billion primarily due to net
income and the issuance of preferred stock, partially offset by
market value decreases on derivatives and debt securities, and
returns of capital to shareholders through common and
preferred stock dividends and common stock repurchases.
Cash Flows Overview
The Corpora tion’s operating assets and liabilities support our
global marke ts and lending activities. We believe  that cash flows
from operations, available cash balances and our ability to
generate cash through short- and long-term debt are sufficient to
fund our operating liquidity needs. Our investing activities
primarily include the debt securities portfolio and loans and
leases. Our financing activities reflect cash flows primarily
related to customer deposits, securities financing agreements,
long-term debt and common and preferred stock. For more
information on liquidity , see Liquidity Risk on page 54.
31 Bank of America
Supplemental Financial Data
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
In this Form 10-K, we present certain non-GAAP  financial
measures. Non-GAAP  financial measures exclude certain items
or otherwise include components that differ from the most
directly comparable measures calculated in accordance with
GAAP . Non-GAAP  financial measures are provided as additional
useful information to assess our financial condition, results of
operations (including period-to-period operating performance) or
compliance with prospective regulatory requir ements. These
non-GAAP  financial measures are not intended as a substitute
for GAAP  financial measures and may not be defined or
calculated the same way as non-GAAP  financial measures used
by other companies.
We view net interest income and related ratios and analyses
on an FTE basis, which when presented on a consolidated basis
are non-GAAP  financial measures. To derive the FTE basis, net
interest income is adjusted to reflect tax-exempt income on an
equivalent before-tax basis with a correspond ing increase in
income tax expense. For purposes of this calculation, we use
the federal statutory tax rate of 21 percent and a representative
state tax rate. Net interest yield, which meas ures the basis
points we earn over the cost of funds, utilizes net interest
income on an FTE basis. We believe that presentation of these
items on an FTE basis allows for comparison of amounts from
both taxable and tax-exempt sources and is consistent with
industry practices.
We may present certain key performance indicators and
ratios excluding certain items (e.g., debit valuation adjustment
(DVA) gains (losses)), which result in non-GAAP  financial
measures. We believe that the presentation of measures that
exclude these items is useful because such measures provide
additional information to assess the underlying operational
performance and trends of our businesses and to allow better
comparison of period-to-period operating performance.
We also evaluate our business based on certa in ratios that
utilize tangible equity , a non-GAAP  financial measure. Tangible
equity repres ents shareh olders’  equity or commo n shareholders’
equity reduc ed by goodwill and intangible assets (excluding
mortgage servicing rights (MSRs)), net of related deferred tax
liabilities (“adjusted” shareholders’  equity or common
shareholders’  equity). These measures are used to evaluate our
use of equity . In addition, profitability , relationship and
investment models use both return on average tangiblecommon shareholders’  equity and return on average tangible
shareholders’  equity as key measures to support our overall
growth objectives. These ratios are:
●    Return on average tangible common shareholders’  equity
measures our net income applicable to common
shareholders as a perce ntage of adjusted avera ge common
shareholders’  equity . The tangible common equity ratio
represents adjusted ending common shareholders’  equity
divided by total tangible assets.
●    Return on average tangible shareholders’  equity measures
our net income as a percentage of adjusted average total
shareholders’  equity . The tangible equity ratio represents
adjusted ending shareho lders’  equity divided by total tangible
assets.
●    Tangible book value per common share repre sents adjusted
ending common shareholders’  equity divided by ending
common shares outstanding.
We believe ratios utilizing tangible equity provid e additional
useful information because they present measures of those
assets that can generate income. Tangible book value per
common share provides additional useful inform ation about the
level of tangible assets in relation to outstanding shares of
common stock.
The aforementioned supplemental data and performance
measures are presented in Tables 6 and 7.
For more information on the reconciliation of these non-
GAAP  financial measures to the corresponding GAAP  financial
measures, see Non-GAAP  Reconciliations on page 85.
Key Performance Indicators
We present certain key financial and nonfinanc ial performance
indicators (key performance indicators) that management uses
when assessing our consolidated and/or segment results. We
believe they are useful to investors because they provide
additional information about our underlying operational
performance and trends. These key performance indicators
(KPIs) may not be defined or calculated in the same way as
similar KPIs used by other companies. For information on how
these metrics are defined, see Key Metrics on page 167.
Our consolidated key performance indicators, which include
various equity and credit metrics, are presented in Table 1 on
page 28, Table 6 on page 33 and Table 7 on page 34.
For information on key segment performance metrics, see
Business Segment Operations on page 37.
Bank of America 32
Table 6Selected Annual Financial Data
(In millions, except per share information) 2022 2021 2020
Income statement  
Net interest income $ 52,462 $ 42,934 $ 43,360 
Noninterest income 42,488 46,179 42,168 
Total revenue, net of interest expense 94,950 89,113 85,528 
Provision for credit losses 2,543 (4,594) 11,320 
Noninterest expense 61,438 59,731 55,213 
Income before income taxes 30,969 33,976 18,995 
Income tax expense 3,441 1,998 1,101 
Net income 27,528 31,978 17,894 
Net income applicable to common shareholders 26,015 30,557 16,473 
Average common shares issued and outstanding 8,113.7 8,493.3 8,753.2 
Average diluted common shares issued and outstanding 8,167.5 8,558.4 8,796.9 
Performance ratios    
Return on average assets 0.88 % 1.05 % 0.67 %
Return on average common shareholders’ equity 10.75 12.23 6.76 
Return on average tangible common shareholders’ equity 15.15 17.02 9.48 
Return on average shareholders’ equity 10.18 11.68 6.69 
Return on average tangible shareholders’ equity 13.76 15.71 9.07 
Total ending equity to total ending assets 8.95 8.52 9.68 
Common equity ratio 8.02 7.74 8.81 
Total average equity to total average assets 8.62 9.02 9.96 
Dividend payout 26.77 21.51 38.18 
Per common share data    
Earnings $ 3.21 $ 3.60 $ 1.88 
Diluted earnings 3.19 3.57 1.87 
Dividends paid 0.86 0.78 0.72 
Book value 30.61 30.37 28.72 
Tangible book value 21.83 21.68 20.60 
Market capitalization $ 264,853 $ 359,383 $ 262,206 
Average balance sheet    
Total loans and leases $ 1,016,782 $ 920,401 $ 982,467 
Total assets 3,135,894 3,034,623 2,683,122 
Total deposits 1,986,158 1,914,286 1,632,998 
Long-term debt 246,479 237,703 220,440 
Common shareholders’ equity 241,981 249,787 243,685 
Total shareholders’ equity 270,299 273,757 267,309 
Asset quality    
Allowance for credit losses $ 14,222 $ 13,843 $ 20,680 
Nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties 3,978 4,697 5,116 
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total loans and leases outstanding 1.22 % 1.28 % 2.04 %
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming loans and leases 333 271 380 
Net charge-offs $ 2,172 $ 2,243 $ 4,121 
Net charge-offs as a percentage of average loans and leases outstanding 0.21 % 0.25 % 0.42 %
Capital ratios at year end    
Common equity tier 1 capital 11.2 % 10.6 % 11.9 %
Tier 1 capital 13.0 12.1 13.5 
Total capital 14.9 14.1 16.1 
Tier 1 leverage 7.0 6.4 7.4 
Supplementary leverage ratio 5.9 5.5 7.2 
Tangible equity 6.8 6.4 7.4 
Tangible common equity 5.9 5.7 6.5 
For definition, see Key Metrics on page 167.
Tangible equity ratios and tangible book value per share of common stock are non-GAAP  financial measures. For more information on these ratios and corresponding reconciliations to GAAP
financial measures, see Supplemental Financial Data on page 32 and Non-GAAP  Reconciliations on page 85.
Includes the allowance for loan and leases losses and the reserve for unfunded lending commitments.
Balances and ratios do not include loans accounted for under the fair value option. For additional exclusions from nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties, see Consumer Portfolio
Credit Risk Manag ement – Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity on page 63 and corresponding Table 27 and Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management
– Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity on page 68 and corresponding Table 34.
For more information, including which approach is used to assess capital adequacy , see Capital Management on page 49.(1)
(1)
(1, 2)
(1)
(1, 2)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(4)
(5)
(2)
(2)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
33 Bank of America
Table 7Selected Quarterly Financial Data
2022 Quarters 2021 Quarters
(In millions, except per share information) Fourth Third Second First Fourth Third Second First
Income statement    
Net interest income $ 14,681  $ 13,765 $ 12,444 $ 11,572 $ 11,410 $ 11,094 $ 10,233 $ 10,197 
Noninterest income 9,851  10,737 10,244 11,656 10,650 11,672 11,233 12,624 
Total revenue, net of interest expense 24,532  24,502 22,688 23,228 22,060 22,766 21,466 22,821 
Provision for credit losses 1,092  898 523 30 (489) (624) (1,621) (1,860)
Noninterest expense 15,543  15,303 15,273 15,319 14,731 14,440 15,045 15,515 
Income before income taxes 7,897  8,301 6,892 7,879 7,818 8,950 8,042 9,166 
Income tax expense 765 1,219 645 812 805 1,259 (1,182) 1,116 
Net income 7,132  7,082 6,247 7,067 7,013 7,691 9,224 8,050 
Net income applicable to common shareholders 6,904  6,579 5,932 6,600 6,773 7,260 8,964 7,560 
Average common shares issued and outstanding 8,088.3  8,107.7 8,121.6 8,136.8 8,226.5 8,430.7 8,620.8 8,700.1 
Average diluted common shares issued and
outstanding 8,155.7  8,160.8 8,163.1 8,202.1 8,304.7 8,492.8 8,735.5 8,755.6 
Performance ratios       
Return on average assets 0.92 % 0.90 % 0.79 % 0.89 % 0.88 % 0.99 % 1.23 % 1.13 %
Four-quarter trailing return on average assets 0.88 0.87 0.89 0.99 1.05 1.04 0.97 0.79 
Return on average common shareholders’  equity
11.24  10.79 9.93 11.02 10.90 11.43 14.33 12.28 
Return on average tangible common
shareholders’  equity 15.79  15.21 14.05 15.51 15.25 15.85 19.90 17.08 
Return on average shareholders’  equity 10.38  10.37 9.34 10.64 10.27 11.08 13.47 11.91 
Return on average tangible shareholders’  equity 13.98  13.99 12.66 14.40 13.87 14.87 18.11 16.01 
Total ending equity to total ending assets 8.95 8.77 8.65 8.23 8.52 8.83 9.15 9.23 
Common equity ratio 8.02 7.82 7.71 7.40 7.74 8.07 8.37 8.41 
Total average equity to total average assets 8.87 8.73 8.49 8.40 8.56 8.95 9.11 9.52 
Dividend payout 25.71  27.06 28.68 25.86 25.33 24.10 17.25 20.68 
Per common share data       
Earnings $ 0.85 $ 0.81 $ 0.73 $ 0.81 $ 0.82 $ 0.86 $ 1.04 $ 0.87 
Diluted earnings 0.85 0.81 0.73 0.80 0.82 0.85 1.03 0.86 
Dividends paid 0.22 0.22 0.21 0.21 0.21 0.21 0.18 0.18 
Book value 30.61  29.96 29.87 29.70 30.37 30.22 29.89 29.07 
Tangible book value 21.83  21.21 21.13 20.99 21.68 21.69 21.61 20.90 
Market capitalization $ 264,853  $ 242,338 $ 250,136 $332,320 $359,383 $349,841 $349,925 $332,337 
Average balance sheet       
Total loans and leases $1,039,247  $1,034,334 $1,014,886 $977,793 $945,062 $920,509 $907,900 $907,723 
Total assets 3,074,289  3,105,546 3,157,885 3,207,702 3,164,118 3,076,452 3,015,113 2,879,221 
Total deposits 1,925,544  1,962,775 2,012,079 2,045,811 2,017,223 1,942,705 1,888,834 1,805,747 
Long-term debt 243,871  250,204 245,781 246,042 248,525 248,988 232,034 220,836 
Common shareholders’  equity 243,647  241,882 239,523 242,865 246,519 252,043 250,948 249,648 
Total shareholders’  equity 272,629  271,017 268,197 269,309 270,883 275,484 274,632 274,047 
Asset quality      
Allowance for credit losses $ 14,222  $ 13,817 $ 13,434 $ 13,483 $ 13,843 $ 14,693 $ 15,782 $ 17,997 
Nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed
properties 3,978  4,156 4,326 4,778 4,697 4,831 5,031 5,299 
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a
percentage of total loans and leases
outstanding 1.22 % 1.20 % 1.17 % 1.23 % 1.28 % 1.43 % 1.55 % 1.80 %
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a
percentage of total nonperforming loans and
leases 333 309 288 262 271 279 287 313 
Net charge-of fs $ 689 $ 520 $ 571 $ 392 $ 362 $ 463 $ 595 $ 823 
Annualized net charge-of fs as a percentage of
average loans and leases outstanding 0.26 % 0.20 % 0.23 % 0.16 % 0.15 % 0.20 % 0.27 % 0.37 %
Capital ratios at period end      
Common equity tier 1 capital 11.2 % 11.0 % 10.5 % 10.4 % 10.6 % 11.1 % 11.5 % 11.8 %
Tier 1 capital 13.0 12.8 12.3 12.0 12.1 12.6 13.0 13.3 
Total capital 14.9 14.7 14.2 14.0 14.1 14.7 15.1 15.6 
Tier 1 leverage 7.0 6.8 6.5 6.3 6.4 6.6 6.9 7.2 
Supplementary leverage ratio 5.9 5.8 5.5 5.4 5.5 5.6 5.9 7.0 
Tangible equity 6.8 6.6 6.5 6.2 6.4 6.7 7.0 7.0 
Tangible common equity 5.9 5.7 5.6 5.3 5.7 5.9 6.2 6.2 
Total loss-absorbing capacity and long-term
debt metrics
Total loss-absorbing capacity to risk-weighted
assets 29.0 % 28.9 % 27.8 % 27.2 % 26.9 % 27.7 % 27.7 % 26.8 %
Total loss-absorbing capacity to supplementary
leverage exposure 13.2 13.0 12.6 12.2 12.1 12.4 12.5 14.1 
Eligible long-term debt to risk-weighted assets 15.2 15.2 14.7 14.4 14.1 14.4 14.1 13.0 
Eligible long-term debt to supplementary leverage
exposure 6.9 6.8 6.6 6.5 6.3 6.4 6.3 6.8 
For definitions, see Key Metrics on page 167.
Calculated as total net income for four consecutive quarters divided by annualized average assets for four consecutive quarters.
Tangible equity ratios and tangible book value per share of common stock are non-GAAP  financial measures. For more information on these ratios and corresponding reconciliations to GAAP
financial measures, see Supplemental Financial Data on page 32 and Non-GAAP  Reconciliations on page 85.(1)
 (2)
(1)
 (3)
(1)
 (3)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(6)
 (3)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
Includes the allowance for loan and lease losses and the reserve for unfunded lending commitments.
Balances and ratios do not include loans accounted for under the fair value option. For additional exclusions from nonperforming loans, leases and foreclosed properties, see Consumer Portfolio
Credit Risk Manag ement – Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity on page 64 and corresponding Table 27 and Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management
– Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity on page 68 and corresponding Table 34.
For more information, including which approach is used to assess capital adequacy , see Capital Management on page 49.(4)
(5)
(6)
Bank of America 34
Table 8Average Balances and Interest Rates - FTE Basis
Average
BalanceInterest
Income/
Expense Yield/
RateAverage
BalanceInterest
Income/
ExpenseYield/
RateAverage
BalanceInterest
Income/
ExpenseYield/
Rate
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Earning assets          
Interest-bearing deposits with the Federal Reserve,
non-
   U.S. central banks and other banks $ 195,564  $ 2,591  1.32 % $ 255,595 $ 172 0.07 % $ 253,227 $ 359 0.14 %
Time deposits placed and other short-term
investments 9,209  132 1.44 7,603 15 0.19 8,840 29 0.33 
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or
purchased
   under agreements to resell 292,799  4,560  1.56 267,257 (90) (0.03) 309,945 903 0.29 
Trading account assets 158,102  5,586  3.53 147,891 3,823 2.58 148,076 4,185 2.83 
Debt securities 922,730  17,207  1.86 905,169 12,433 1.38 532,266 9,868 1.87 
Loans and leases          
Residential mortgage 227,604  6,375  2.80 216,983 5,995 2.76 236,719 7,338 3.10 
Home equity 27,364  959 3.50 31,014 1,066 3.44 38,251 1,290 3.37 
Credit card 83,539  8,408  10.06  75,385 7,772 10.31 85,017 8,759 10.30 
Direct/Indirect and other consumer 107,050  3,317  3.10 96,472 2,276 2.36 89,974 2,545 2.83 
Total consumer 445,557  19,059  4.28 419,854 17,109 4.08 449,961 19,932 4.43 
U.S. commercial 366,748  12,251  3.34 324,795 8,606 2.65 344,095 9,712 2.82 
Non-U.S. commercial 125,222  3,702  2.96 99,584 1,752 1.76 106,487 2,208 2.07 
Commercial real estate 65,421  2,595  3.97 60,303 1,496 2.48 63,428 1,790 2.82 
Commercial lease financing 13,834  473 3.42 15,865 462 2.91 18,496 559 3.02 
Total commercial 571,225  19,021  3.33 500,547 12,316 2.46 532,506 14,269 2.68 
Total loans and leases 1,016,782  38,080  3.75 920,401 29,425 3.20 982,467 34,201 3.48 
Other earning assets 105,674  4,847  4.59 112,512 2,321 2.06 83,078 2,539 3.06 
Total earning assets 2,700,860  73,003  2.70 2,616,428 48,099 1.84 2,317,899 52,084 2.25 
Cash and due from banks 28,029   31,214  31,885  
Other assets, less allowance for loan and lease
losses 407,005    386,981   333,338   
Total assets $3,135,894    $3,034,623   $2,683,122   
Interest-bearing liabilities          
U.S. interest-bearing deposits          
Demand and money market deposits $ 987,247  $ 3,145  0.32 % $ 925,970 $ 314 0.03 % $ 829,719 $ 977 0.12 %
Time and savings deposits 166,490  818 0.49 161,512 170 0.11 170,750 734 0.43 
Total U.S. interest-bearing deposits 1,153,737  3,963  0.34 1,087,482 484 0.04 1,000,469 1,711 0.17 
Non-U.S. interest-bearing deposits 80,951  755 0.93 82,769 53 0.06 77,046 232 0.30 
Total interest-bearing deposits 1,234,688  4,718  0.38 1,170,251 537 0.05 1,077,515 1,943 0.18 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or
sold
   under agreements to repurchase 214,369  4,117  1.92 210,848 461 0.22 188,511 1,229 0.65 
Short-term borrowings and other interest-bearing
   liabilities 137,277  2,861  2.08 106,975 (819) (0.77) 104,955 (242) (0.23)
Trading account liabilities 51,208  1,538  3.00 54,107 1,128 2.08 41,386 974 2.35 
Long-term debt 246,479  6,869  2.79 237,703 3,431 1.44 220,440 4,321 1.96 
Total interest-bearing liabilities 1,884,021  20,103  1.07 1,779,884 4,738 0.27 1,632,807 8,225 0.50 
Noninterest-bearing sources          
Noninterest-bearing deposits 751,470    744,035   555,483   
Other liabilities 230,104    236,947   227,523   
Shareholders’  equity 270,299    273,757   267,309   
Total liabilities and shareholders’  equity $3,135,894    $3,034,623   $2,683,122   
Net interest spread   1.63 %   1.57 %   1.75 %
Impact of noninterest-bearing sources   0.33   0.09   0.15 
Net interest income/yield on earning assets  $52,900  1.96 %  $43,361 1.66 %  $43,859 1.90 %
Includes the impact of interest rate risk management contracts. For more information, see Interest Rate Risk Management for the Banking Book on page 79.
For more information on negative interest, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Nonperforming loans are included in the respective average loan balances. Income on these nonperforming loans is generally recognized on a cost recovery basis.
Includes U.S. commercial real estate  loans of $61.1 billion, $56.5 billion and $59.8 billion, and non-U.S. commercial real estate loans of $4.3 billion, $3.8 billion and $3.6 billion for 2022, 2021 and
2020, respectively .
Includes $30.7 billion, $30.4 billion and $34.3 billion of structured notes and liabilities for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Net interest income includes FTE adjustments of $438 million, $427 million and $499 million for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .(1)  (1)  (1)
 (2)
(3)
(4)
(2)
(5)
(6)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
35 Bank of America
Table 9Analysis of Changes in Net Interest Income - FTE Basis
Due to Change in 
Net ChangeDue to Change in 
Net Change Volume Rate Volume Rate
(Dollars in millions) From 2021 to 2022 From 2020 to 2021
Increase (decrease) in interest income
Interest-bearing deposits with the Federal Reserve, non-U.S. central banks and
other
   banks $ (35)$ 2,454 $ 2,419 $ (1)$ (186)$ (187)
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments 2 115 117 (4) (10) (14)
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell 2 4,648 4,650 (128) (865) (993)
Trading account assets 256 1,507 1,763 — (362) (362)
Debt securities 301 4,473 4,774 7,059 (4,494) 2,565 
Loans and leases
Residential mortgage 287 93 380 (612) (731) (1,343)
Home equity (125) 18 (107) (245) 21 (224)
Credit card 841 (205) 636 (994) 7 (987)
Direct/Indirect and other consumer 250 791 1,041 185 (454) (269)
Total consumer 1,950 (2,823)
U.S. commercial 1,113 2,532 3,645 (553) (553) (1,106)
Non-U.S. commercial 452 1,498 1,950 (147) (309) (456)
Commercial real estate 126 973 1,099 (89) (205) (294)
Commercial lease financing (59) 70 11 (80) (17) (97)
Total commercial 6,705 (1,953)
Total loans and leases 8,655 (4,776)
Other earning assets (144) 2,670 2,526 904 (1,122) (218)
Net increase (decrease) in interest income $ 24,904 $ (3,985)
Increase (decrease) in interest expense
U.S. interest-bearing deposits
Demand and money market deposits $ (18)$ 2,849 $ 2,831 $ 134 $ (797)$ (663)
Time and savings deposits 13 635 648 (39) (525) (564)
Total U.S. interest-bearing deposits 3,479 (1,227)
Non-U.S. interest-bearing deposits (4) 706 702 16 (195) (179)
Total interest-bearing deposits 4,181 (1,406)
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to
   repurchase 11 3,645 3,656 142 (910) (768)
Short-term borrowings and other interest-bearing liabilities (238) 3,918 3,680 (4) (573) (577)
Trading account liabilities (63) 473 410 298 (144) 154 
Long-term debt 118 3,320 3,438 338 (1,228) (890)
Net increase (decrease) in interest expense 15,365 (3,487)
Net increase (decrease) in net interest income $ 9,539 $ (498)
The changes for each category of interest income and expense are divided between the portion of change attributable to the variance in volume and the portion of change attributable to the
variance in rate for that category . The unallocated change in rate or volume variance is allocated between the rate and volume variances.
Includes an increase (decrease) in FTE basis adjustments of $11 million from 2021 to 2022 and $(72) million from 2020 to 2021.(1) (1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 36
Business Segment Operations
Segment Description and Basis of Presentation
We report our results of operations through the following four business segments: Consumer Banking, GWIM, Global Banking and
Global Markets , with the remaining operations recorded in All Other. We manag e our segments and report their results on an FTE
basis. The primary activities, products and businesses of the business segments and All Other  are shown below .
We periodically review capital allocated to our businesses
and allocate capital annually during the strategic and capital
planning processes. We utilize a methodology that considers the
effect of regulatory capital requirements in addition to internal
risk-based capital models. Our internal risk-based capital
models use a risk-adjusted methodology incorporating each
segment’ s credit, market , interest rate, business and operational
risk components. For more information on the nature of these
risks, see Managing Risk on page 46. The capital allocated to
the business segments is referred to as allocated capital.
Allocated equity in the reporting units is comprised of allocated
capital plus capital for the portion of goodwill and intangibles
specifically assigned to the reporting unit. For more information,
including the definition of a reporting unit, see Note 7 – Goodwill
and Intangible Assets  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.For more information on our presentation of financial
information on an FTE basis, see Supplemental Financial Data
on page 32, and for reconciliations to consolidated total
revenue, net income and year-end total assets, see Note 23 –
Business Segment Information  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Key Performance Indicators
We present certain key financial and nonfinancial performance
indicators that manage ment uses when evalu ating segment
results. We believe they are useful to investors because they
provide additional inform ation about our segme nts’ operational
performance, customer trends and business growth.
37 Bank of America
Consumer Banking
Deposits Consumer Lending Total Consumer Banking
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 % Change
Net interest income $ 19,254 $ 14,358 $ 10,791 $ 10,571 $ 30,045 $ 24,929 21 %
Noninterest income:
Card income (36) (28) 5,205 5,200 5,169 5,172 — 
Service charges 2,703 3,535 3 3 2,706 3,538 (24)
All other income 478 223 237 143 715 366 95 
Total noninterest income 3,145 3,730 5,445 5,346 8,590 9,076 (5)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 22,399 18,088 16,236 15,917 38,635 34,005 14 
Provision for credit losses 564 240 1,416 (1,275) 1,980 (1,035) n/m
Noninterest expense 12,393 11,650 7,684 7,640 20,077 19,290 4 
Income before income taxes 9,442 6,198 7,136 9,552 16,578 15,750 5 
Income tax expense 2,314 1,519 1,748 2,340 4,062 3,859 5 
Net income $ 7,128 $ 4,679 $ 5,388 $ 7,212 $ 12,516 $ 11,891 5 
Effective tax rate 24.5 % 24.5 %
Net interest yield 1.82 % 1.48 % 3.72 % 3.77 % 2.73 % 2.45 %
Return on average allocated capital 55 39 20 27 31 31 
Efficiency ratio 55.33 64.41 47.32 48.00 51.96 56.73 
Balance
Sheet
Average
Total loans and leases $ 4,161 $ 4,431 $ 288,205 $ 279,630 $ 292,366 $ 284,061 3 %
Total earning assets 1,057,531 973,018 289,719 280,080 1,099,410 1,016,751 8 
Total assets 1,090,692 1,009,387 296,499 285,532 1,139,351 1,058,572 8 
Total deposits 1,056,783 976,093 5,778 6,934 1,062,561 983,027 8 
Allocated capital 13,000 12,000 27,000 26,500 40,000 38,500 4 
Year End
Total loans and leases $ 4,148 $ 4,206 $ 300,613 $ 282,305 $ 304,761 $ 286,511 6 %
Total earning assets 1,043,049 1,048,009 300,787 282,850 1,085,079 1,090,331 — 
Total assets 1,077,203 1,082,449 308,007 289,220 1,126,453 1,131,142 — 
Total deposits 1,043,194 1,049,085 5,605 5,910 1,048,799 1,054,995 (1)
Estimated at the segment level only .
In segme nts and businesses where the total of liabilities and equity exceeds assets, we allocate assets from All Other  to match the segm ents’ and businesses’  liabilities and allocated shareho lders’
equity . As a result, total earning assets and total assets of the businesses may not equal total Consumer Banking .
n/m = not meaningful
Consumer Banking,  comp rised of Deposi ts and Consumer
Lending, offers a diversified range of credit, banking and
investment products and services to consum ers and small
businesses. Deposits and Consumer Lending include the net
impact of migrating customers and their related deposit,
brokerage asset and loan balances between Deposits,
Consumer Lending and GWIM , as well as other client-managed
businesses. Our customers and clients have access to a coast-
to-coast netw ork includin g financial centers in 38 states and the
District of Columbia. As of December 31, 2022, our network
includes approximately 3,900 financial centers, approximately
16,000 ATMs, nationwide call centers and leading digital
banking platforms with more than 44 million active users,
including approximately 35 million active mobile users.
Consumer Banking Results
Net income for Consumer Banking  increased $625 million to
$12.5 billion due to higher revenue, partially offset by an
increase in provision for credit losses and higher noninterest
expense. Net interest income increased $5.1 billion to $30.0
billion prima rily driven by higher interest rates and the benefits of
higher depo sit and loan balances, partially offset by a lower
amount of accelerated net capitalized loan fees due to PPP loan
forgiveness, which primarily occurred in 2021. Noninterest
income decreased $486 million to $8.6 billion primarily driven by
the impact of non-suf ficient funds and overdraft policy changes,
partially offset by a gain on the sale of an affinity card loan
portfolio in the fourth quarter of 2022.
The provision for credit losses increased $3.0 billion to $2.0
billion primarily driven by loan growth and a dampenedmacroeconomic outlook in 2022, compared to a benefit in 2021
due to an improved macroeconomic outloo k. Noninterest
expense increased $787 million to $20.1 billion primarily driven
by continued investments for business growth, including
marketing, technology and people, as well as increased client
activity , partially offset by an impairment charge for real estate
rationalization and the contribution to the Bank of America
Foundation in the prior year .
The return on average allocated capital was 31 percent,
unchanged from 2021. For more information on capital allocated
to the business segments, see Business Segment Operations
on page 37.
Deposits
Deposits includes the results of consumer deposit activities that
consist of a comprehensive range of products provided to
consumers and small businesses. Our deposit products include
noninterest- and interest-bearing checking accounts, money
market savings accounts, traditional savings accounts, CDs and
IRAs, as well as investm ent accounts and products. Net interest
income is allocated to deposit products using our funds transfer
pricing process that matches assets and liabilities with similar
interest rate sensitivity and maturity characteristics. Deposits
generates fees such as account service fees and ATM fees, as
well as investment and brokerage fees from Consumer
Investment accounts. Consumer Investments serves investment
client relationships through the Merrill Edge integrated investing
and banking  service platform, providing investm ent advice and
guidance, client brokerage asset services, self-directed online
investing and key banking capabilities including access to the(1)
 (2)
(2)
(2)
 (2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 38
Corporation’ s network of financial centers and ATMs.
Net income for Deposits increased $2.4 billion to $7.1 billion
due to higher revenue, partially offset by higher noninterest
expense and an increa se in provision for credit losses. Net
interest income increased $4.9 billion to $19.3 billion primarily
due to higher interest rates and the benefit of higher deposit
balances. Noninterest income decreased $585 million to $3.1
billion primarily driven by the impact of non-suf ficient funds and
overdraft policy changes, partially offset by higher other service
charges due to increased client activity .
The provision for credit losses increased $324 million to
$564 million primarily driven by increased overdraft losses due
to higher payment activity related to checking accounts. The
benefit in the prior year was due to an improved macroeconomic
outlook. Noninterest expense increased $743 million to $12.4
billion primarily driven by continued investmen ts for business
growth and increased client activity , partially offset by an
impairment charge for real estate rationalization in the prior year .
Average deposits increased $80.7 billion to $1.1 trillion
primarily due to net inflows of $46.8 billion in checking and $34.9
billion in money market savings largely driven by strong organic
growth.
The table below provid es key performance indicators for
Deposits. Management uses these metrics, and we believe they
are useful to investors because they provide additional
information to evaluate our deposit profitability and digital/mobile
trends.
Key Statistics – Deposits
2022 2021
Total deposit spreads (excludes noninterest costs)1.86% 1.69%
Year End
Consumer investment assets (in millions) $319,648 $368,831
Active digital banking users (in thousands) 44,054 41,365
Active mobile banking users (in thousands) 35,452 32,980
Financial centers 3,913 4,173
ATMs 15,528 16,209
Includes deposits held in Consumer Lending.
Includes client brokerage assets, deposit sweep balances and AUM in Consumer Banking .
Represents mobile and/or online active users over the past 90 days.
Represents mobile active users over the past 90 days.
Consumer investment assets decreased $49.2 billion to
$319.6 billion driven by market performance, partially offset by
client flows. Active mobile banking users increased
approximately two million, reflecting continuing changes in our
clients’  bank ing prefere nces. We had a net decrease of 260
financial centers and 681 ATMs as we continue  to optimize our
consumer banking network.
Consumer Lending
Consumer Lending offers products to consum ers and small
businesses across the U.S. The products offered include debit
and credit cards, residential mortgages and home equity loans,
and direct and indirect loans such as automotive, recreational
vehicle and consumer personal loans. In addition to earning net
interest spread revenu e on its lending activities, Consumer
Lending generates interchange revenue from debit and credit
card transactions, late fees, cash advance fees, annual credit
card fees, mortgage banking fee income and other
miscellaneous fees. Consumer Lending produc ts are available
to our customers through our retail network, direct telephone,
and online and mobile channels. Consumer Lending results also
include the impact of servicing residential mortgages and homeequity loans, including loans held on the balance sheet of
Consumer Lending and loans serviced for others.
Net income for Consumer Lending decreased $1.8 billion to
$5.4 billion primarily due to an increase in provision for credit
losses. Net interest income increased $220 million to $10.8
billion primarily due to higher interest rates and loan balances,
largely offset by a lower amount of accelerated net capitalized
loan fees due to PPP loan forgiveness, which primarily occurred
in 2021. Noninterest income increased $99 million to $5.4 billion
primarily driven by a gain on the sale of an affinity card loan
portfolio in the fourth quarter of 2022.
The provision for credit losses increased $2.7 billion to $1.4
billion primarily driven by loan growth and a dampened
macroeconomic environment in 2022 compared to a benefit in
2021 due to an improved macroeconomic outlook. Noninterest
expense increased $44 million to $7.7 billion largely driven by
continued investments for business growth and increased client
activity , partially offset by the contribution to the Bank of America
Foundation in the prior year .
Average loans increased $8.6 billion to $288.2 billion
primarily driven by an increase in credit card loans and first
mortgage loans, partially of fset by a decline in PPP  loans.
The table below provides key performance indicators for
Consumer Lending. Management uses these metrics, and we
believe they are useful to investors because they provide
additional information about loan growth and profitability .
Key Statistics – Consumer Lending
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Total credit card 
Gross interest yield 10.42 % 10.17 %
Risk-adjusted margin 10.06 10.17 
New accounts (in thousands) 4,397 3,594 
Purchase volumes $356,588 $311,571 
Debit card purchase volumes $503,583 $473,770 
Includes GWIM's  credit card portfolio.
Calculated as the ef fective annual percentage rate divided by average loans.
Calculated as the difference between total revenue, net of interest expense, and net credit
losses divided by average loans.
During 2022, the total risk-adjusted margin decreased 11 bps
primarily driven by lower net interest margin and lower fee
income, partially offset by lower net credit losses. Total credit
card purchase volumes increased $45.0 billion to $356.6 billion
and debit card purchase volumes increased $29.8 billion to
$503.6 billion, reflecting higher levels of consumer spending.
Key Statistics – Loan Production 
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Consumer Banking:
First mortgage $ 20,981 $ 45,976 
Home equity 7,988 3,996 
Total :
First mortgage $ 44,765 $ 79,692 
Home equity 9,591 4,895 
The loan productio n amounts represent the unpaid principal balance of loans and, in the case
of home equity , the principal amount of the total line of credit.
In additio n to loan production in Consumer Bankin g, there is also first mortgage and home
equity loan production in GWIM.
First mortga ge loan originations for Consumer Banking  and
the total Corporation decreased $25.0 billion and $34.9 billion
during 2022 primarily driven by changes in demand.
Home equity production in Consumer Banking and the total
Corporation increased $4.0 billion and $4.7 billion during 2022
primarily driven by higher demand.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
39 Bank of America
Global W ealth & Investment Management
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 % Change
Net interest income $ 7,466 $ 5,664 32 %
Noninterest income:
Investment and brokerage services 13,561 14,312 (5)
All other income 721 772 (7)
Total noninterest income 14,282 15,084 (5)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 21,748 20,748 5 
Provision for credit losses 66 (241) (127)
Noninterest expense 15,490 15,258 2 
Income before income taxes 6,192 5,731 8 
Income tax expense 1,517 1,404 8 
Net income $ 4,675 $ 4,327 8 
Effective tax rate 24.5 % 24.5 %
Net interest yield 1.95 1.51 
Return on average allocated capital 27 26 
Efficiency ratio 71.23 73.54 
Balance Sheet
Average
Total loans and leases $ 219,810 $ 196,899 12 %
Total earning assets 383,352 374,273 2 
Total assets 396,167 386,918 2 
Total deposits 351,329 340,124 3 
Allocated capital 17,500 16,500 6 
Year end
Total loans and leases $ 223,910 $ 208,971 7 
Total earning assets 355,461 425,112 (16)
Total assets 368,893 438,275 (16)
Total deposits 323,899 390,143 (17)
GWIM  consists of two primary businesses: Merri ll Wealth
Management and  Bank of America Private Bank.
Merrill Wealth Managem ent’s advisory business provides a
high-touch client experience through a network of financial
advisors focused on clients with over $250,000 in total
investable assets. Merri ll Wealth Management provides tailored
solutions to meet clients ’ needs through a full set of investment
management, brokerage, banking and retirement products.
Bank of America Private Bank, together with Merrill Wealth
Management’ s Private Wealth Management business, provides
comprehensive wealth management solutions targeted to high
net worth and ultra high net worth clients, as well as customized
solutions to meet clients’  wealth structuring, investment
management, trust and banking needs, including specialty asset
management services.
Net income for GWIM  increa sed $348 million to $4.7 billion
driven by higher revenue, partially offset by higher provision for
credit losses and noninterest expense. The operating margin
remained unchanged at 28 percent compared to a year ago.
Net interest income increased $1.8 billion to $7.5 billion due
to the impacts of higher interest rates, as well as the benefits of
higher loan and deposit balances.
Noninterest income, which primarily includes investment and
brokerage services income, decreased $802 million to $14.3
billion prima rily due to the impacts of lower market valuations
and declines in AUM pricing, partially offset by the impact of
positive AUM flows.The provisi on for credit losses increased $307 million
primarily due to a dampened macroeconomic outlook and loan
growth in the current-ye ar period, compared to a benefit in the
prior-year period  due to an improved macroeconomic outlook.
Noninterest expense increased $232 million to $15.5 billion
primarily due to continued investments in the business, partially
offset by lower revenue-related incentives.
The return on average allocated capital was 27 percent, up
from 26 percent, due to higher net income, partially offset by an
increase in allocated capital. For more information on capital
allocated to the business segments, see Business Segment
Operations on page 37.
Average loans increased $22.9 billion to $219.8 billion
primarily due to residential mortgage, securities-based lending
and custom lending. Average deposits increased $11.2 billion to
$351.3 billion primarily driven by inflows from new and existing
accounts.
Merrill Wealth Management revenue of $18.1 billion
increased four percent primarily driven by the benefits of higher
interest rates, as well as higher deposit and loan balances,
partially offset by the impact of lower market valuations and
declines in AUM pricing.
Bank of America Private Bank revenue of $3.6 billion
increased nine percent primarily driven by the benefits of higher
interest rates, as well as higher deposit and loan balances,
partially of fset by the impact of lower market valuations.
Bank of America 40
Key Indicators and Metrics
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Revenue by Business
Merrill Wealth Management $ 18,135 $ 17,448 
Bank of America Private Bank 3,613 3,300 
Total revenue, net of interest expense $ 21,748 $ 20,748 
Client Balances by Business, at year end
Merrill Wealth Management $ 2,822,910 $ 3,214,881 
Bank of America Private Bank 563,931 625,453 
Total client balances $ 3,386,841 $ 3,840,334 
Client Balances by Type, at year end
Assets under management $ 1,401,474 $ 1,638,782 
Brokerage and other assets 1,482,025 1,655,021 
Deposits 323,899 390,143 
Loans and leases 226,973 212,251 
Less: Managed deposits in assets under management (47,530) (55,863)
Total client balances $ 3,386,841 $ 3,840,334 
Assets Under Management Rollforward
Assets under management, beginning of year $ 1,638,782 $ 1,408,465 
Net client flows 20,785 66,250 
Market valuation/other (258,093) 164,067 
Total assets under management, end of year $ 1,401,474 $ 1,638,782 
Total wealth advisors, at year end 19,273 18,846 
Includes margin receivables which are classified in customer and other receivables on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Includes advisors across all wealth management businesses in GWIM  and Consumer Banking.
Client Balances
Client balances managed under advisory and/or discretion of
GWIM are AUM and are typically held in diversified portfolios.
Fees earned on AUM are calculated as a percentage of clients’
AUM balances. The asset management fees charged to clients
per year depend on various factors but are commonly driven by
the breadth of the client’ s relationship. The net client AUM flows
represent the net change in clients’  AUM balances over aspecified period of time, excluding market
appreciation/depreciation and other adjustments.
Client balances decreased $453.5 billion, or 12 percent, to
$3.4 trillion at Decembe r 31, 2022 compared to December 31,
2021. The decrease in client balances was primarily due to the
impact of lower market valuations, partially offset by positive
client flows.(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
41 Bank of America
Global Banking
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 % Change
Net interest income $ 12,184 $ 8,511 43 %
Noninterest income:
Service charges 3,293 3,523 (7)
Investment banking fees 3,004 5,107 (41)
All other income 3,748 3,734 —
Total noninterest income 10,045 12,364 (19)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 22,229 20,875 6 
Provision for credit losses 641 (3,201) (120)
Noninterest expense 10,966 10,632 3 
Income before income taxes 10,622 13,444 (21)
Income tax expense 2,815 3,630 (22)
Net income $ 7,807 $ 9,814 (20)
Effective tax rate 26.5 % 27.0 %
Net interest yield 2.26 1.55 
Return on average allocated capital 18 23 
Efficiency ratio 49.34 50.93 
Balance Sheet
Average
Total loans and leases $ 375,271 $ 329,655 14 %
Total earning assets 539,032 549,749 (2)
Total assets 603,273 611,304 (1)
Total deposits 511,804 522,790 (2)
Allocated capital 44,500 42,500 5 
Year end
Total loans and leases $ 379,107 $ 352,933 7 %
Total earning assets 522,539 574,583 (9)
Total assets 588,466 638,131 (8)
Total deposits 498,661 551,752 (10)
Global Banking , which includes Global Corporate Banking,
Global Commercial Banking, Business Banking and Global
Investment Banking, provides a wide range of lending-related
products and services, integrated working capital management
and treasury  solutions, and underwriting and advisory services
through our network of offices and client relation ship teams. Our
lending products and services include commerci al loans, leases,
commitment facilities, trade finance, commercial real estate
lending and asset-based lending. Our treasury solutions
business includes treasury management, foreign exchange,
short-term investing options and merchant services. We also
provide investment banking services to our clients such as debt
and equity underwriting and distribution, and merger-related and
other advisory services. Underwriting debt and equity issuances,
fixed-income and equity research, and certain market-based
activities are executed through our global broker-dealer
affiliates, which are our primary dealers in several countries.
Within Global Banking , Global Corporate Banking clients
generally include large global corporations, financial institutions
and leasing  clients. Global Commercial Banking clients
generally include middle-market companies, commercial real
estate firms  and not-for-profit companies. Business Banking
clients include mid-sized U.S.-based busine sses requiring
customized and integrated financial advice and solutions.
Net income for Global Bank ing decreased $2.0 billion to $7.8
billion driven by higher provision for credit losses and
noninterest expense, partially of fset by higher revenue.
Net interest income increased $3.7 billion to $12.2 billion
primarily due to the benefits of higher interest rates and loan
balances.Noninterest income decreased $2.3 billion to $10.0 billion
driven by lower investment banking fees and valuation
adjustments on leveraged loans, as well as lower treasury
service charges.
The provision for credit losses increased $3.8 billion to $641
million primarily driven by a dampened macroec onomic outlook
and loan growth, compa red to a benefit in the prior year due to
an improved macroeconomic outlook.
Noninterest expense increased $334 million to $11.0 billion,
primarily due to continued investments in the business, including
strategic hiring and technology .
The return on average allocated capital was 18 percent,
down from 23 percent,  due to lower net income and higher
allocated capital. For more information on capital allocated to
the business segments, see Business Segment Operations on
page 37.
Global Corporate, Global Commercial and
Business Banking
Global Corporate, Global Commercial and Business Banking
each include Business Lending and Global Transaction Services
activities. Business Lending includes various lending-related
products and services, and related hedging activities, including
commercial loans, leases, commitment facilities , trade finance,
real estate lending and asset-based lending. Global Transaction
Services includes depos its, treasury management, credit card,
foreign exchange and short-term investment products.
The following table and discussion present a summary of the
results, which exclude certain investment banking and PPP
activities in Global Banking .
Bank of America 42
Global Corporate, Global Commercial and Business
Banking
Global Corporate BankingGlobal Commercial
Banking Business Banking Total
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Revenue
Business Lending $ 4,325 $ 3,723 $ 4,316 $ 3,675 $ 251 $ 224 $ 8,892 $ 7,622 
Global Transaction Services 5,002 3,235 4,166 3,341 1,213 941 10,381 7,517 
Total revenue, net of interest
expense $ 9,327 $ 6,958 $ 8,482 $ 7,016 $ 1,464 $ 1,165 $ 19,273 $ 15,139 
Balance Sheet
Average
Total loans and leases $ 174,052 $ 150,159 $ 187,597 $ 161,012 $ 12,743 $ 12,763 $ 374,392 $ 323,934 
Total deposits 250,648 252,403 204,893 213,999 56,263 56,354 511,804 522,756 
Year end
Total loans and leases $ 174,905 $ 163,027 $ 191,051 $ 175,228 $ 12,683 $ 12,822 $ 378,639 $ 351,077 
Total deposits 262,033 260,826 186,112 233,007 50,516 57,886 498,661 551,719 
Prior periods have been revised to conform to current-period presentation.
Business Lending revenue increased $1.3 billion in 2022
compared to 2021 prima rily due to the benefits of higher interest
rates and loan balances.
Global Transaction Services revenue increased $2.9 billion in
2022 compared to 2021 driven by higher interes t rates, partially
offset by lower treasury service charges.
Average loans and leases increased 16 percent in 2022
compared to 2021 due to higher client demand. Average
deposits decreased two percent due to declines in domestic
balances.
Global Investment Banking
Client teams and product specialists underwrit e and distribute
debt, equity and loan products, and provide advisory services
and tailored risk management solutions. The economics of
certain investment banking and underwriting  activities are
shared primarily between Global Banking and Global Mark ets
under an internal revenue-sharing arrangement.  Global Banking
originates certain deal-r elated transactions with our corporate
and commercial clients that are executed and distributed by
Global Markets . To provide a complete discussion of ourconsolidated investment  banking fees, the table below presents
total Corporation investment banking fees and the portion
attributable to Global Banking.
Investment Banking
Fees
Global Banking Total Corporation
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Products
Advisory $ 1,643 $ 2,139 $ 1,783 $ 2,311 
Debt issuance 1,099 1,736 2,523 4,015 
Equity issuance 262 1,232 709 2,784 
Gross investment
banking fees 3,004 5,107 5,015 9,110 
Self-led deals (78) (93) (192) (223)
Total investment
banking fees $ 2,926 $ 5,014 $ 4,823 $ 8,887 
Total Corpo ration inves tment banking fees, which exclude
self-led deals and are primarily included within Global Banking
and Global Markets, decreased 46 percent to $4.8 billion
primarily due to lower equity issuance, debt issuance and
advisory fees.(1)
 (1)
(1)
(1)
43 Bank of America
Global Markets
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 % Change
Net interest income $ 3,088 $ 4,011 (23)%
Noninterest income:
Investment and brokerage services 2,002 1,979 1 
Investment banking fees 1,820 3,616 (50)
Market making and similar activities 11,406 8,760 30 
All other income (178) 889 (120)
Total noninterest income 15,050 15,244 (1)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 18,138 19,255 (6)
Provision for credit losses 28 65 (57)
Noninterest expense 12,420 13,032 (5)
Income before income taxes 5,690 6,158 (8)
Income tax expense 1,508 1,601 (6)
Net income $ 4,182 $ 4,557 (8)
Effective tax rate 26.5 % 26.0 %
Return on average allocated capital 10 12 
Efficiency ratio 68.48 67.68 
Balance Sheet
Average
Trading-related assets:
Trading account securities $ 303,587 $ 291,505 4 %
Reverse repurchases 126,324 113,989 11 
Securities borrowed 116,764 100,292 16 
Derivative assets 54,128 43,582 24 
Total trading-related assets 600,803 549,368 9 
Total loans and leases 116,652 91,339 28 
Total earning assets 602,889 541,391 11 
Total assets 857,637 785,998 9 
Total deposits 40,382 51,833 (22)
Allocated capital 42,500 38,000 12 
Year end
Total trading-related assets $ 564,769 $ 491,160 15 %
Total loans and leases 127,735 114,846 11 
Total earning assets 587,772 561,135 5 
Total assets 812,489 747,794 9 
Total deposits 39,077 46,374 (16)
Global Markets  offers sales and trading services and research
services to institutional clients across fixed-income, credit,
currency , commodity and equity businesses. Global Markets
product coverage includes securities and deriva tive products in
both the primary and secondary markets. Global Markets
provides market-making, financing, securities clearing,
settlement and custody services globally to our institutional
investor clients in support of their investing and trading activities.
We also work with our commercial and corporate clients to
provide risk management products using interest rate, equity ,
credit, curre ncy and commodity derivatives, foreign exchange,
fixed-income and mortgage-related products. As a result of our
market-making activities in these products, we may be required
to manage risk in a broad range of financial products including
government securities, equity and equity-linked securities, high-
grade and high-yield corporate debt securities, syndicated loans,
MBS, comm odities and asset-backed securities.  The economics
of certain investment banking and underwritin g activities are
shared primarily between Global Markets  and Global Bank ing
under an internal revenue-sharing arrangement.  Global Bank ing
originates certain deal-r elated transactions with our corporate
and commercial clients that are executed and distributed by
Global Markets . For information on investment banking fees on
a consolidated basis, see page 43.
The following explanations for year-over-year changes forGlobal Markets , including those disclo sed under Sales and
Trading Revenue, are the same for amounts including and
excluding net DVA. Amounts excluding net DVA are a non-
GAAP  financial measure. For more information on net DVA, see
Supplemental Financial Data on page 32.
Net income for Global Markets decreased $375 million to
$4.2 billion. Net DVA gains were $20 million compared to losses
of $54 million in 2021. Excluding net DVA, net income
decreased $431 million to $4.2 billion. These decreases were
primarily driven by lower revenue, partially offset by lower
noninterest expense.
Revenue decreased $1.1 billion to $18.1 billion primarily due
to lower investment banking fees, partially offset by higher sales
and trading revenue. Sales and trading revenue increased $1.3
billion, and excluding net DVA, sales and trading revenue
increased $1.2 billion. These increases were driven by higher
revenue in both FICC and Equities.
Noninterest expense decreased $612 million to $12.4 billion
primarily driven by the realignment of a liquidating business
activity from Global Markets  to All Other  in the fourth quarter of
2021 and an acceleration of expenses from incentive
compensation award changes in the prior year .
Average total assets increased $71.6 billion to $857.6 billion
driven by loan growth and commodities activity in FICC. Period-
end total assets increased $64.7 billion to $812.5 billion
Bank of America 44
driven by loan growth, an increase in commodit ies activity , and
higher derivative balances due to higher interest rates.
The return on average allocated capital was 10 percent,
down from 12 percent, reflecting lower net income and an
increase in allocated capital. For more information on capital
allocated to the business segments, see Business Segment
Operations on page 37.
Sales and Trading Revenue
Sales and trading revenue includes unrealize d and realized
gains and losses on trading and other assets which are included
in market making and similar activities, net interest income, and
fees primarily from commissions on equity securities. Sales and
trading revenue is segregated into fixed-income (government
debt obligations, investment and non-inve stment grade
corporate debt obligations, commercial MBS, residential
mortgage-backed securities, collateralized loan obligations,
interest rate and credit derivative contracts), currencies (interest
rate and foreign exchange contracts), commodities (primarily
futures, forwards, swaps and options) and equitie s (equity-linked
derivatives and cash equity activity). The following table and
related discussion present sales and trading revenue,
substantially all of which is in Global Mark ets, with the remainder
in Global Bank ing. In addition, the follow ing table and related
discussion also present  sales and trading revenue, excluding
net DVA, which is a non-GAAP  financial measure. For more
information on net DVA, see Supplemental Financial Data on
page 32.Sales and Trading Revenue 
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Sales and trading revenue
Fixed income, currencies and commodities $ 9,917 $ 8,761 
Equities 6,572 6,428 
Total sales and trading revenue $ 16,489 $ 15,189 
Sales and trading revenue, excluding net DVA 
Fixed income, currencies and commodities $ 9,898 $ 8,810 
Equities 6,571 6,433 
Total sales and trading revenue, excluding
net DVA $ 16,469 $ 15,243 
For more information on sales and trading revenue, see Note 3 – Derivat ives to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
Includes FTE adjustments of $354 million and $421 million for 2022 and 2021.
Includes Global Banking  sales and trading  revenue of $1.0 billion and $510 million for 2022
and 2021.
FICC and Equities sales and trading  revenue, excluding net DVA, is a non-GAAP  financial
measure. FICC net DVA gains (losse s) were $19 million and $(49) million for 2022 and 2021.
Equities net DV A gains (losses) were $1 million and $(5) million for 2022 and 2021.
Including and excluding net DVA, FICC revenue increased
$1.2 billion and $1.1 billion driven by improved trading
performance across interest rate and currency products, partially
offset by a weaker trading environment for credit products in the
current-year period and a gain in commodities from a weather-
related even t in the prior year. Including and excluding  net DVA,
Equities revenue increased $144 million and $138 million driven
by strong performance s in derivatives and client financing
activities, partially of fset by a weaker performance in cash.
All Other
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 % Change
Net interest income $ 117 $ 246 (52)%
Noninterest income (loss) (5,479) (5,589) (2)
Total revenue, net of interest expense (5,362) (5,343) — 
Provision for credit losses (172) (182) (5)
Noninterest expense 2,485 1,519 64 
Loss before income taxes (7,675) (6,680) 15 
Income tax benefit (6,023) (8,069) (25)
Net income (loss) $ (1,652)$ 1,389 n/m
Balance Sheet
Year Ended December 31
Average 2022 2021 % Change
Total loans and leases $ 12,683 $ 18,447 (31)%
Total assets 139,466 191,831 (27)
Total deposits 20,082 16,512 22 
Year endDecember 31
2022December 31
2021 % Change
Total loans and leases $ 10,234 $ 15,863 (35)%
Total assets 155,074 214,153 (28)
Total deposits 19,905 21,182 (6)
In segments where the total of liabilities and equity exceeds assets, which are generally deposit-taking segments, we allocate assets from All Other to those  segments to match liabilities (i.e.,
deposits) and allocated shareholders ’ equity . Average allocated assets were $1.1 trillion for both 2022 and 2021, and year-end allocated assets were $1.0 trillion and $1.2 trillion at December 31,
2022 and 2021.
n/m = not meaningful
All Other  primarily consists of asset and liability management
(ALM) activities, liquidating businesses and certain expenses
not otherwise allocated to a business segment. ALM activities
encompass interest rate and foreign currency risk management
activities for which subst antially all of the results are allocated to
our business segments. For more information on our ALM
activities, see Note 23 – Business Segment Information  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.Net income decreased $3.0 billion to a loss of $1.7 billion
primarily due to a lower income tax benefit and higher
noninterest expense.
Noninterest expense increased $966 million primarily driven
by the realignment of a liquidating business activity from Global
Markets  to All Other in the fourth quarter of 2021, expense
associated with the settlement of the legacy monoline insurance
litigation and expense related to certain regulatory matters,
partially of fset by decreases in other expenses.(1, 2, 3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)    
(4)    
(1)
(1)
(1)
45 Bank of America
The income tax benefit was $6.0 billion in 2022 compared to
a bene fit of $8.1 billion in 2021. The decrease in the tax benefit
was primarily driven by the impact of the U.K. tax law change in
2021. For more information, see Financial Highlights - Income
Tax Expens e on page 29. Both periods included income tax
benefit adjustments to eliminate the FTE treatment of certain tax
credits recorded in Global Banking and Global Markets .
Managing Risk
Risk is inherent in all our business activitie s. Sound risk
management enables us to serve our customers and deliver for
our shareho lders. If not managed well, risk can result in financial
loss, regulatory sanctions and penalties, and damage to our
reputation, each of which may adversely impact our ability to
execute our business strategies. We take a comprehensive
approach to risk management with a defined Risk Framework
and an articulated Risk Appetite Statement, which are approved
annually by the ERC and the Board.
The seven key types of risk faced by the Corporation are
strategic, credit, market , liquidity , compliance, operational and
reputational.
●    Strategic risk is the risk to current or projected financial
condition arising from incorrect assumptions about external
or internal factors, inappropriate business plans, ineffective
business strategy execu tion or failure to respond in a timely
manner to changes in the regulatory , macroe conomic or
competitive environmen ts in the geographic locations in
which we operate.
●    Credit risk is the risk of loss arising from the inability or
failure of a borrower or counterparty to meet its obligations.
●    Market risk is the risk that changes in market conditions
adversely impact the value of assets or liabilities or otherwise
negatively impact earnings. Market risk is composed of price
risk and interest rate risk.
●    Liquidity risk is the inability to meet expected or unexpected
cash flow and collateral needs while continuing to support
our businesses and customers under a range of economic
conditions.
●    Compliance risk is the risk of legal or regula tory sanctions,
material financial loss or damage to the reputation of the
Corporation arising from the failure of the Corporation to
comply with the requirements of applicable laws, rules and
regulations and our internal policies and procedures.
●    Operational risk is the risk of loss resulting from inadequate
or failed internal processes or systems, people or external
events.
●    Reputational risk is the risk that negative perception of the
Corporation may adversely impact profitability or operations.
The following sections address in more detail the specific
procedures, measures and analyses of the major categories of
risk. This discussion of managing risk focuses on the current
Risk Framework that, as part of its annual review process, was
approved by the ERC and the Board.
As set forth in our Risk Framework, a culture of managing
risk well is fundamental to our values and our purpose, and how
we drive Responsible Growth. It requires us to focus on risk in
all activities and enco urages the necessary mindset and
behavior to enable effective risk management and promote
sound risk-ta king within our risk appetite. Sustai ning a culture of
managing risk well throughout the organization is critical to the
success of the Corpora tion and is a clear expectation of our
executive management team and the Board.Our Risk Framework serves as the foundation for the
consistent and effective management of risks facing the
Corporation. The Risk Framework sets forth roles and
responsibilities for the management of risk and provides a
blueprint for how the Board, through delegation of authority to
committees and executive officers, establishes risk appetite and
associated limits for our activities.
Executive management assesses, with Board oversight, the
risk-adjusted returns of each business. Management reviews
and approves the strateg ic and financial operating plans, as well
as the capital plan and Risk Appetite Statement, and
recommends them annually to the Board for approval. Our
strategic plan takes into consideration return objectives and
financial resources, which must align with risk capacity and risk
appetite. Management sets financial object ives for each
business by allocating capital and setting a target for return on
capital for each busine ss. Capital allocations and operating
limits are regularly evalu ated as part of our overall governance
processes as the businesses and the economic environment in
which we operate continue to evolve. For more information
regarding capital allocati ons, see Business Segm ent Operations
on page 37.
The Corporation’ s risk appetite indicates the amount of
capital, earnings or liquidity we are willing to put at risk to
achieve our strategic objectives and business plans, consistent
with applicable regulatory requirements. Our risk appetite
provides a common framework that includes a set of measures
to assist senior manage ment and the Board in assessing the
Corporation’ s risk profile against our risk appetite and risk
capacity . Our risk appetite is formally articulated in the Risk
Appetite Statement, which includes both qualitative statements
and quantitative limits.
Our overall capacity to take risk is limited; therefore, we
prioritize the risks we take in order to maintain a strong and
flexible financial position so we can withsta nd challenging
economic conditions and take advantage of organic growth
opportunities. Therefore , we set objectives and targets for
capital and liquidity that are intended to permit us to continue to
operate in a safe and sound manner at all times, including
during periods of stress.
Our lines of business operate with risk limits that align with
the Corporation’ s risk appetite. Senior management is
responsible for tracking and reporting performance
measurements as well as any exceptions to risk appetite limits.
The Board, and its committees when appropriate, oversee
financial performance, execution of the strategic and financial
operating plans, adherence to risk appetite limits and the
adequacy of internal controls.
For a more detailed discussion of our risk management
activities, see the discussion below and pages 49 through 82.
Risk Management Governance
The Risk Framework describes delegations of authority whereby
the Board and its committees may delegate authority to
management-level committees or executive officers. Such
delegations may authorize certain decision-maki ng and approval
functions, which may be evidenced in documents such as
committee charters, job descriptions, meetin g minutes and
resolutions.
The chart below illustrates the interrelationship among the
Board, Board committees and management committees that
have the majority of risk oversight responsibilities for the
Corporation.
Bank of America 46
Board of Directors and Board Committees
The Board is composed  of 15 directors, all but one of whom are
independent. The Board authorizes manageme nt to maintain
an effective Risk Framework and oversees compliance with safe
and sound banking practices. In addition, the Board or its
committees conduct inquiries of, and receive reports from senior
management on, risk-related matters to assess scope or
resource limitations that could impede the ability of Global Risk
Management (GRM) and/or Corporate Audit to execute its
responsibilities. The Board committees discussed below have
the principa l responsibil ity for enterprise-wide oversight of our
risk management activities. Through these activities, the Board
and applicable committees are provided with information on our
risk profile and oversee senior management addressing key
risks we face. Other Board committees, as described below ,
provide additional oversight of specific risks.
Each of the committees shown on the above chart regularly
reports to the Board on risk-related matters within the
committee’ s responsibil ities, which is intended  to collectively
provide the Board with integrated insight about our management
of enterprise-wide risks.
Audit Committee
The Audit Committee oversees the qualifications, performance
and independence of the Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm, the performance of our corporate audit
function, the integrity of our consolidated finan cial statements,
our compliance with legal and regulatory requirements, and
makes inquiries of senior management or the Chief Audit
Executive (CAE) to determine whether there are scope or
resource limitations that impede the ability of Corporate Audit to
execute its responsibilities. The Audit Com mittee is also
responsible for overseeing compliance risks pursuant to the
New York Stock Exchange listing standards.
Enterprise Risk Committee
The ERC oversees the Corporation’ s Risk Framework, risk
appetite and senior management’ s respons ibilities for the
identification, measurement, monitoring and control of key risks
facing the Corporation. The ERC may consult with other Board
committees on risk-related matters.
Other Board Committees
Our Corporate Governance, ESG, and Sustainability Committee
oversees our Board’ s governance processes , identifies and
reviews the qualifications of potential Board members, leadsBoard and committee succession planning and their formal self-
evaluation, and reviews our ESG activities, shareholder input
and shareholder engagement process.
Our Compensation and Human Capital Committee oversees
establishing, maintaining and administering our compensation
programs and employee benefit plans, including approving and
recommending our Chief Executive Officer’s (CEO)
compensation to our Board for further approval by all
independent directors; reviewing and approvin g our executive
officers’  compensation, as well as compens ation for non-
management directors; and reviewing certain other human
capital management topics, including pay equity and diversity
and inclusion.
Management Committees
Management committee s receive their authority from the Board,
a Board committee, or another management committee. Our
primary management risk committee is the MRC. Subject to
Board oversight, the MRC is responsible for management
oversight of key risks facing the Corporation, including an
integrated evaluation of risk, earnings, capital and liquidity .
Lines of Defense
We have clear ownership and accountability for managing risk
across three lines of defense: Front Line Units (FLUs), GRM and
Corporate Audit. We also have control functions outside of FLUs
and GRM (e.g., Legal and Global Human Resources). The three
lines of defense are integrated into our management-level
governance structure. Each of these functional roles is further
described in this section.
Executive Officers
Executive officers lead various functions representing the
functional roles. Authority for functional roles may be delegated
to executive officers from the Board, Board committees or
management-level comm ittees. Executive officers, in turn, may
further delegate responsibilities, as appropriate, to
management-level committees, management routines or
individuals. Executive officers review our activities for
consistency with our Risk Framework, risk appetite, and
applicable strategic, capital and financial operating plans, as
well as applicable policies and standards. Executive officers and
other emplo yees make decisions individually on a day-to-day
basis, consistent with the authority they have been delegated.
Executive officers and other employees may also serve on
committees and participate in committee decisions.
47 Bank of America
Front Line Units
FLUs, which include the lines of business as well as Global
Technology and Global Operations, are responsible for
appropriately assessing and effectively managing all of the risks
associated with their activities.
Three organ izational units that include FLU activities and
control function activities, but are not part of GRM are first, the
Chief Financ ial Officer Group; second, the Chief Administrative
Officer Group; and third, Global Strategy and Enterprise
Platforms.
Global Risk Management
GRM is part of our control functions and operates as our
independent risk management function. GRM, led by the Chief
Risk Officer (CRO), is responsible for independently assessing
and overseeing risks within FLUs and other control functions.
GRM estab lishes writte n enterprise policies and procedures
outlining how aggregate risks are identified, measured,
monitored and controlled.
The CRO has the stature, authority and independence
needed to develop and implement a meaningful risk
management framework  and practices to guide the Corporation
in managing  risk. The CRO has unrestricted acce ss to the Board
and reports directly to both the ERC and the CEO. GRM is
organized into horizonta l risk teams that cover a specific risk
area and vertical CRO teams that cover a particular FLU or
control function. These teams work collaboratively in executing
their respective duties.
Corporate Audit
Corporate Audit and the CAE maintain their independence from
the FLUs, GRM and other control functions by reporting directly
to the Audit Committee. The CAE administrative ly reports to the
CEO. Corporate Audit provides independent assessment and
validation through testing of key processes and controls across
the Corporation. Corporate Audit includes Credi t Review , which
provides an independent assessment of credit lending decisions
and the effectiveness of credit processes across the
Corporation’ s credit platform through examinations and
monitoring.
Risk Management Processes
The Risk Framework requires that strong risk management
practices are integrated in key strategic, capital and financial
planning processes and in day-to-day business processes
across the Corporation, thereby ensuring risks are appropriately
considered, evaluated and responded to in a timely manner . We
employ an effective risk management process, referred to as
Identify , Measure, Monitor and Control, as part of our daily
activities.
Identify  – To be effectively managed, risks must be proactively
identified and well understood. Proper risk identification
focuses on recognizing and understanding key risks inherent
in our business activitie s or key risks that may arise from
external factors. Each employee is expected to identify and
escalate risks promptly . Risk identification is an ongoing
process that incorporates input from FLUs and control
functions. It is designed  to be forward-looking and to capture
relevant risk factors across all of our lines of business.
Measure  – Once a risk is identifi ed, it must be prioritized and
accurately measured through a systematic process including
qualitative statements and quantitative limits. Risk is
measured at various levels, including, but not limited to, risk
type, FLU and legal entity , and also on an aggregate basis.
This risk measurement process helps to capture changes in
our risk profile due to changes in strategic direction,concentrations, portfolio  quality and the overall economic
environment. Senior management consider s how risk
exposures might evolve under a variety of stress scenarios.
Monitor – We monito r risk levels regularly to track adherence to
risk appetite, policies and standards. We also regularly update
risk assessments and review risk exposures. Through our
monitoring, we know our level of risk relative to limits and can
take action in a timely manner . We also know when risk limits
are breached and have processes to appropriately report and
escalate exceptions. This includes timely requests for
approval to managers and alerts to executive management,
management-level committees or the Board (directly or
through an appropriate committee).
Control  – We establish and communicate risk limits and
controls through policies, standards, procedures and
processes. The limits and controls can be adjusted by senior
management or the Board when conditions or risk tolerances
warrant. These limits may be absolute (e.g., loan amount,
trading volume, operational loss) or relative (e.g., percentage
of loan book in higher- risk categories). Our FLUs are held
accountable for performing within the established limits.
The formal processes used to manage risk represent a part
of our overall risk management process. We instill a strong and
comprehensive culture  of managing risk well through
communications, training, policies, procedures and
organizational roles and responsibilities. Establishing a culture
reflective of our purpose to help make our customers’  financial
lives better and deliverin g on Responsible Growth is also critical
to effective risk manage ment. We are committe d to the highest
principles of ethical and professional conduct. Conduct risk is
the risk of improper actions, behaviors or practices by the
Corporation, its employees or representatives that are illegal,
unethical and/or contrary to our core values that could result in
harm to the Corporation, our shareholders or our customers,
damage the integrity of the financial markets, or negatively
impact our reputation. We have established  protocols and
structures so that condu ct risk is governed and reported across
the Corporation appropriately . All employees are held
accountable for adhering to the Code of Conduct, operating
within our risk appetite and managing risk in their daily business
activities. In addition, our performance management and
compensation practices encourage responsible risk-taking that
is consistent with our Risk Framework and risk appetite.
Corporation-wide Stress Testing
Integral to our Capital Planning, Financial Planning and
Strategic Planning processes, we conduct capital scenario
management and stress forecasting on a periodi c basis to better
understand balance sheet, earnings and capita l sensitivities to
certain econ omic and business scenarios, including economic
and market conditions that are more severe than anticipated.
These stress forecasts provide an understanding of the potential
impacts from our risk profile on the balance sheet, earnings and
capital, and serve as a key component of our capital and risk
management practices. The intent of stress testing is to develop
a comprehensive understanding of potential impacts of on- and
off-balance sheet risks at the Corporatio n and certain
subsidiaries and how they impact financial resiliency , which
provides confidence to management, regulators and our
investors.
Contingency Planning
We have developed and maintain contingency plans that are
designed to prepare us in advance to respond in the event of
Bank of America 48
potential adverse econo mic, financial or market stress. These
contingency plans include our Capital Contingency Plan and
Financial Contingency and Recovery Plan, which provide
monitoring, escalation, actions and routines designed to enable
us to increase capital, access funding sources and reduce risk
through consideration of potential options that include asset
sales, business sales, capital or debt issuances, and other de-
risking strate gies. We also maintain a Resoluti on Plan to limit
adverse systemic impacts that could be associated with a
potential resolution of Bank of America.
Strategic Risk Management
Strategic risk is embedded in every business and is one of the
major risk categories along with credit, market, liquidity ,
compliance, operational  and reputational risks. This risk results
from incorrect assumptions about external or internal factors,
inappropriate business plans, ineffective business strategy
execution, or failure to respond in a timely manner to changes in
the regulatory , macroeconomic or competitive environments in
the geographic locations in which we operate, such as
competitor actions, changing customer prefer ences, product
obsolescence and technology developments.
An aspect of strategic risk is the risk that the Corporation’ s
capital levels are not adequate to meet minimum regulatory
requirements and support execution of business activities or
absorb losses from risks during normal or adverse economic
and market conditions. As such, capital risk is managed in
parallel to strategic risk.
We manage strategic risk through the Strategic Risk
Enterprise Policy and integration into the strategic planning
process, among other activities. Our strategic plan is consistent
with our risk appetite, capital plan and liquidity requirements,
and specifically addresses strategic risks impacting each
business.
On an annual basis, the Board reviews and approves the
strategic plan, capital plan, financial operating plan and Risk
Appetite Statement. With oversight by the Board, senior
management directs the lines of business to execute our
strategic plan consistent with our core operating principles and
risk appetite. The executive management team monitors
business performance throughout the year and provides the
Board with regular progress reports on whether strategic
objectives and timelines are being met, including reports on
strategic risks and if additional or alternative actions need to be
considered or implemented. The regular executive reviews focus
on assessing forecasted earnings and returns on capital, the
current risk profile, current capital and liquidit y requirements,
staffing levels and changes required to support the strategic
plan, stress testing results, and other qualitative factors such as
market growth rates and peer analysis.
Significant strategic actio ns, such as capital actions, material
acquisitions or divestitures, and resolution plans are reviewed
and approved by the Board. At the business level, processes are
in place to discuss the strategic risk implic ations of new,
expanded or modified businesses, products or services and
other strategic initiatives, and to provide formal review and
approval where required. With oversight by the Board and the
ERC, executive management performs similar analyses
throughout the year, and evaluates changes to the financial
forecast or the risk, capital or liquidity positions as deemed
appropriate to balance and optimize achieving the targeted risk
appetite, shareholder returns and maintainin g the targeted
financial strength. Proprietary models are used to measure the
capital requirements for credit, country , market, operational and
strategic risks. The allocated capital assigned to each businessis based on its unique risk profile. With oversight by the Board,
executive management assesses the risk-adjusted returns of
each business in approving strategic and financial operating
plans. The businesses use allocated capital to define business
strategies, and price products and transactions.
Capital Management
The Corporation manages its capital position so that its capital is
more than adequate to support its business activities and aligns
with risk, risk appetite and strategic planning. Additionally , we
seek to maintain safety and soundness at all times, even under
adverse scenarios, take advantage of organic growth
opportunities, meet obligations to creditors and counterparties,
maintain ready access to financial markets, continue to serve as
a credit intermediary , remain a source of strength for our
subsidiaries, and satisfy current and future regulatory capital
requirements. Capital management is integrated into our risk
and governance processes, as capital is a key consideration in
the develop ment of our strategic plan, risk appetite and risk
limits.
We conduct an Internal Capital Adequacy Assessment
Process (ICAAP) on a periodic basis. The ICAAP  is a forward-
looking assessment of our projected capital needs and
resources, incorporatin g earnings, balance sheet and risk
forecasts under baselin e and adverse economic and market
conditions. We utilize periodic stress tests to assess the
potential impacts to our balance sheet, earnings, regulatory
capital and liquidity under a variety of stress scenarios. We
perform qualitative risk assessments to identify and assess
material risks not fully captured in our forecasts or stress tests.
We assess the potential  capital impacts of proposed changes to
regulatory capital requirements. Management assesses ICAAP
results and provides documented quarterly assessments of the
adequacy of our capital guidelines and capital position to the
Board or its committees.
We periodically review capital allocated to our businesses
and allocate capital annually during the strategic and capital
planning processes. For more information, see Business
Segment Operations on page 37.
CCAR and Capital Planning
The Federa l Reserve requires BHCs to submi t a capital plan
and planned capital actions on an annual basis, consistent with
the rules governing the Comprehensive Capit al Analysis and
Review (CCAR) capital plan. Based on the results of our 2022
CCAR stress test, our stress capital buffer (SCB) increased to
3.4 percent from 2.5 percent, effective October 1, 2022 through
September 30, 2023.
In October 2021, the Board authorized the Corporation’ s $25
billion common stock repurchase program. Additionally , the
Board authorized common stock repurchases to offset shares
awarded under the Corporation’ s equity-based compensation
plans. Pursuant to the Board’ s authorizations, during 2022, we
repurchased $5.1 billion of common stock, including
repurchases to offset shares awarded under equity-based
compensation plans.
The timing and amount of common stock repurchases are
subject to various facto rs, including the Corp oration’ s capital
position, liquidity , financial performance and alternative uses of
capital, stock  trading price, regulatory requireme nts and general
market conditions, and may be suspended at any time. Such
repurchases may be effected through open market purchases or
privately negotiated transactions, including repurchase plans
that satisfy the conditions of Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (Exchange Act).
49 Bank of America
Regulatory Capital
As a financial services  holding company , we are subject to
regulatory capital rules, including Basel 3, issued by U.S.
banking regulators. Basel 3 established minimum capital ratios
and buffer requirements and outlined two methods of calculating
risk-weighted assets (RWA), the Standardized approach and the
Advanced approaches. The Standardized approach relies
primarily on supervisory risk weights based on exposure type,
and the Advanced approaches determine risk weights based on
internal models.
The Corporation's depository institution subsidiaries are also
subject to the Prompt Corrective Action (PCA) framework. The
Corporation and its primary affiliated banking entity , BANA, are
Advanced approaches institutions under Basel 3 and are
required to report regulatory risk-based capital ratios and RWA
under both the Standar dized and Advanced approaches. The
lower of the capital ratios under Standardized or Advanced
approaches compared to their respective regulatory capital ratio
requirements are used to assess capital adeq uacy, including
under the PCA framework. As of December  31, 2022, the
common equity tier 1 (CET1), Tier 1 capital and Total capital
ratios under the Standardized approach were the binding ratios.
Minimum Capital Requirements
In order to avoid restrictions on capital distributions and
discretionary bonus payments, the Corporation must meet risk-
based capital ratio requirements that include a capital
conservation buffer of 2.5 percent (under the Advanced
approaches only), an SCB (under the Standardized approach
only), plus any applicable countercyclical capital buffer and a
global systemically important bank (G-SIB) surcharge. The
buffers and surcharge must be comprised solely of CET1
capital. For the period from October 1, 2021 through September
30, 2022, the Corpor ation's minimum CET1 capital ratio
requirement was 9.5 percent under both the Standardized and
Advanced approaches. Based on the results of our 2022 CCAR
stress test, the Corporation’ s SCB increased to 3.4 percent,
resulting in a minimum CET1 capital ratio requirement of 10.4
percent under the Standardized approach for the period from
October 1, 2022 through September 30, 2023. Our minimum
CET1 capital ratio requirement under the Advanced approachesremains unchanged at 9.5 percent.
The Corporation is required to calculate its G-SIB surcharge
on an annual basis under two methods and is subject to the
higher of the resulting two surcharges. Method 1 is consistent
with the approach prescribed by the Basel Committee’ s
assessment methodolo gy and is calculated using specified
indicators of systemic importance. Method 2 modifies the
Method 1 approach by, among other factors, including a
measure of the Corporation’ s reliance on short -term wholesale
funding. The Corporation’ s G-SIB surcharge, which is higher
under Metho d 2, is expected to increase to 3.0 percent from 2.5
percent on January 1, 2024, which will increas e our minimum
CET1 capital ratio requirement. At December 31, 2022, the
Corporation’ s CET1 capital ratio of 11.2 percent under the
Standardized approach exceeded its current CET1 capital ratio
requirement as well as the minimum requirement expected to be
in place as of January 1, 2024 due to an anticipated increase in
our G-SIB surcharge.
The Corporation is also required to maintain a minimum
supplementary leverage ratio (SLR) of 3.0 percent plus a
leverage buffer of 2.0 percent in order to avoid certain
restrictions on capital distributions and discretionary bonus
payments. Our insured  depository institution subsidiaries are
required to maintain a minimum 6.0 percent SLR to be
considered well capitalized under the PCA framework. The
numerator of the SLR is quarter-end Basel 3 Tier 1 capital. The
denominator is total leverage exposure based on the daily
average of the sum of on-balance sheet exposures less
permitted deductions, and applicable temporary exclusions, as
well as the simple average of certain off-balance sheet
exposures, as of the end of each month in a quarter .
Capital Composition and Ratios
Table 10 presents Bank of America Corporation’ s capital ratios
and related information in accordance with Basel 3 Standardized
and Advanced approaches as measured at December 31, 2022
and 2021. For the periods presented herein, the Corporation
met the definition of well capitalized under current regulatory
requirements.
Bank of America 50
Table 10Bank of America Corporation Regulatory Capital under Basel 3
Standardized
Approach Advanced
Approaches Regulatory
Minimum 
(Dollars in millions, except as noted) December 31, 2022
Risk-based capital metrics:
Common equity tier 1 capital $ 180,060 $ 180,060 
Tier 1 capital 208,446 208,446 
Total capital 238,773 230,916 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,605 1,411 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 11.2 % 12.8 % 10.4 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 13.0 14.8 11.9 
Total capital ratio 14.9 16.4 13.9 
Leverage-based metrics:
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) $ 2,997 $ 2,997 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.0 % 7.0 % 4.0 
Supplementary leverage exposure (in billions) $ 3,523 
Supplementary leverage ratio 5.9 % 5.0 
December 31, 2021
Risk-based capital metrics:
Common equity tier 1 capital $ 171,759 $ 171,759 
Tier 1 capital 196,465 196,465 
Total capital 227,592 220,616 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,618 1,399 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 10.6 % 12.3 % 9.5 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 12.1 14.0 11.0 
Total capital ratio 14.1 15.8 13.0 
Leverage-based metrics:
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) $ 3,087 $ 3,087 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 6.4 % 6.4 % 4.0 
Supplementary leverage exposure (in billions) $ 3,604 
Supplementary leverage ratio 5.5 % 5.0 
Capital ratios as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 are calculated using the regulatory capital rule that allows a five-year transition period related to the adoption of the current expected credit losses
(CECL) accounting standard on January 1, 2020.
The capital conservation buffer and G-SIB surcharge were 2.5 percent at both December 31, 2022 and 2021. The Corporation's SCB applied in place of the capital conservation buffer under the
Standardized approach was 3.4 percent at December 31, 2022 and 2.5 percent at December 31, 2021. The countercyclical capital buffer for both periods was zero. The CET1 capital regulatory
minimum is the sum of the CET1 capital ratio minimum of 4.5 percent,  our G-SIB surcharge of 2.5 percent and our capital conservation buffer of 2.5 percent or the SCB, as applicable, of 3.4
percent at December 31, 2022 and 2.5 percent at December 31, 2021. The SLR regulatory minimum includes a leverage buf fer of 2.0 percent.
Total capital under the Advanced approaches dif fers from the Standardized approach due to dif ferences in the amount permitted in Tier 2 capital related to the qualifying allowance for credit losses.
Reflects total average assets adjusted for certain Tier 1 capital deductions.
At December 31, 2022, CET1 capital was $180.1 billion, an
increase of $8.3 billion from December 31, 2021, due to
earnings, partially offset by dividends, common stock
repurchases and higher net unrealized losses on available-for-
sale debt securities  included in accu mulated other
comprehensive income (OCI). Tier 1 capital increased $12.0
billion primarily driven by the same factors as CET1 capital as
well as non-cumulative perpetual preferred stock issuances.
Total capital  under the Standardized approach increased $11.2
billion primarily due to the same factors driving the increase inTier 1 capital and an increase in the adjusted allowance for
credit losse s included in Tier 2 capital, partia lly offset by a
decrease in subordinate d debt. RWA under the Standardized
approach, which yielded the lower CET1 capital ratio at
December 31, 2022, decreased $13.0 billion during 2022 to
$1,605 billion primarily due to lower counterparty exposures in
Global Mark ets and a decrease in debt securities in the Treasury
portfolio, partially offset by loan growth. Supplementary leverage
exposure at December 31, 2022 decrease d $80.3 billion
primarily due to lower debt securities, driven by lower deposits,
partially of fset by loan growth.(1) (1) (2)
(3)
(4)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
51 Bank of America
Table 11 shows the capital composition at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 11Capital Composition under Basel 3
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Total common shareholders’ equity $ 244,800 $ 245,358 
CECL transitional amount 1,881 2,508 
Goodwill, net of related deferred tax liabilities (68,644) (68,641)
Deferred tax assets arising from net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards (7,776) (7,743)
Intangibles, other than mortgage servicing rights, net of related deferred tax liabilities (1,554) (1,605)
Defined benefit pension plan net assets (867) (1,261)
Cumulative unrealized net (gain) loss related to changes in fair value of financial liabilities attributable to own creditworthiness,
 net-of-tax 496 1,400 
Accumulated net (gain) loss on certain cash flow hedges 11,925 1,870 
Other (201) (127)
Common equity tier 1 capital 180,060 171,759 
Qualifying preferred stock, net of issuance cost 28,396 24,707 
Other (10) (1)
Tier 1 capital 208,446 196,465 
Tier 2 capital instruments 18,751 20,750 
Qualifying allowance for credit losses 11,739 10,534 
Other (163) (157)
Total capital under the Standardized approach 238,773 227,592 
Adjustment in qualifying allowance for credit losses under the Advanced approaches (7,857) (6,976)
Total capital under the Advanced approaches $ 230,916 $ 220,616 
Includes the impact of the Corporation's adoption of the CECL  accounting standard on January 1, 2020 and 25 percent of the increase in reserves since the initial adoption.
Includes amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income related to the hedging of items that are not recognized at fair value on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Includes the impact of transition provisions related to the CECL  accounting standard.
Table 12 shows the components of R WA as measured under Basel 3 at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 12Risk-weighted Assets under Basel 3
Standardized
ApproachAdvanced
ApproachesStandardized
ApproachAdvanced
Approaches
December 31
(Dollars in billions) 2022 2021
Credit risk $ 1,538 $ 939 $ 1,549 $ 913 
Market risk 67 67 69 69 
Operational risk n/a 364 n/a 378 
Risks related to credit valuation adjustments n/a 41 n/a 39 
Total risk-weighted assets $ 1,605 $ 1,411 $ 1,618 $ 1,399 
December 31, 2022 includes the ef fects of an update made to our operational risk R WA model during the fourth quarter of 2022.
n/a = not applicable(1)
(2)
(3)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(1)
Bank of America 52
Bank of America, N.A. Regulatory Capital
Table 13 presents regulatory capital information for BANA  in accordance with Basel 3 Standardized and Advanced approaches as
measured at December 31, 2022 and 2021. BANA  met the definition of well capitalized under the PCA  framework for both periods.
Table 13Bank of America, N.A. Regulatory Capital under Basel 3
Standardized
Approach Advanced
Approaches Regulatory
Minimum 
(Dollars in millions, except as noted) December 31, 2022
Risk-based capital metrics:
Common equity tier 1 capital $ 181,089 $ 181,089 
Tier 1 capital 181,089 181,089 
Total capital 194,254 186,648 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,386 1,087 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 13.1 % 16.7 % 7.0 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 13.1 16.7 8.5 
Total capital ratio 14.0 17.2 10.5 
Leverage-based metrics:
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) $ 2,358 $ 2,358 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.7 % 7.7 % 5.0 
Supplementary leverage exposure (in billions) $ 2,785 
Supplementary leverage ratio 6.5 % 6.0 
December 31, 2021
Risk-based capital metrics:
Common equity tier 1 capital $ 182,526 $ 182,526 
Tier 1 capital 182,526 182,526 
Total capital 194,773 188,091 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,352 1,048 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 13.5 % 17.4 % 7.0 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 13.5 17.4 8.5 
Total capital ratio 14.4 17.9 10.5 
Leverage-based metrics:
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) $ 2,414 $ 2,414 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.6 % 7.6 % 5.0 
Supplementary leverage exposure (in billions) $ 2,824 
Supplementary leverage ratio 6.5 % 6.0 
Capital ratios as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 are calculated using the regulatory capital rule that allows a five-year transition period related to the adoption of the CECL  accounting standard on
January 1,2020 .
Risk-based capital regulatory minimums at both December 31, 2022 and 2021 are the minimum ratios under Basel 3 including a capital conservation buffer of 2.5 percent. The regulatory
minimums for the leverage ratios as of both period ends are the percent required to be considered well capitalized under the PCA  framework.
Total capital under the Advanced approaches dif fers from the Standardized approach due to dif ferences in the amount permitted in Tier 2 capital related to the qualifying allowance for credit losses.
Reflects total average assets adjusted for certain Tier 1 capital deductions.
Total Loss-Absorbing Capacity Requirements
Total loss-absorbing capacity (TLAC) consists of the
Corporation’ s Tier 1 capital and eligible long-term debt issued
directly by the Corporation. Eligible long-term debt for TLAC
ratios is comprised of unsecured debt that has a remaining
maturity of at least one year and satisfies additional
requirements as prescribed in the TLAC final rule. As with therisk-based capital ratios and SLR, the Corporation is required to
maintain TLAC ratios in excess of minimum requirements plus
applicable buffers to avoid restrictions on capital distributions
and discret ionary bonus payments. Table 14 presents the
Corporation's TLAC and long-term debt ratios and related
information as of December 31, 2022 and 2021.(1) (1) (2)
(3)
(4)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
53 Bank of America
Table 14Bank of America Corporation Total Loss-Absorbing Capacity and Long-Term Debt
TLAC Regulatory
Minimum Long-term
DebtRegulatory
Minimum 
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Total eligible balance $ 465,451 $ 243,833 
Percentage of risk-weighted assets 29.0 % 22.0 % 15.2 % 8.5 %
Percentage of supplementary leverage exposure 13.2 9.5 6.9 4.5 
December 31, 2021
Total eligible balance $ 435,904 $ 227,714 
Percentage of risk-weighted assets 26.9 % 22.0 % 14.1 % 8.5 %
Percentage of supplementary leverage exposure 12.1 9.5 6.3 4.5 
As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, TLAC ratios are calculated using the regulatory capital rule that allows a five-year transition period related to the adoption of CECL.
The TLAC  RWA regulatory minimum  consists of 18.0 percent plus a TLAC RWA buffer comprised of 2.5 percent plus the Method 1 G-SIB surcharge of 1.5 percent. The countercyclical buffer is
zero for both periods. The TLAC supplementary leverage exposure regul atory minimum consists of 7.5 percent plus a 2.0 percent TLAC leverage  buffer. The TLAC RWA and leverage buffers must
be comprised solely of CET1 capital and Tier 1 capital, respectively .
The long- term debt RWA regulatory minimum is comprised of 6.0 percent plus an additional 2.5 percent requirement based on the Corporation’ s Method 2 G-SIB surcharge. The long-term debt
leverage exposure regulatory minimum is 4.5 percent.
The approach that yields the higher R WA is used to calculate TLAC and long-term debt ratios, which was the Standardized approach as of December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Regulatory Capital and Securities Regulation
The Corporation’ s principal U.S. broker-dealer subsidiaries are
BofA  Securities, Inc. (BofAS), Merrill Lynch Professional
Clearing Corp. (MLPCC) and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner &
Smith Incor porated (MLPF&S). The Corporation's principal
European broker-deale r subsidiaries are Merrill Lynch
International (MLI) and BofA  Securities Europe SA  (BofASE).
The U.S. broker-dealer subsidiaries are subject to the net
capital requirements of Rule 15c3-1 under the Exchange Act.
BofAS computes its minimum capital requirements as an
alternative net capital broker-dealer under Rule 15c3-1e, and
MLPCC and MLPF&S compute their minimum capital
requirements in accordance with the alternative  standard under
Rule 15c3-1. BofAS and MLPCC are also registered as futures
commission merchants and are subject to Commodity Futures
Trading Com mission (CFTC) Regulation 1.17. The U.S. broker-
dealer subsidiaries are also registered with the Financial
Industry Regulatory Authority , Inc. (FINRA). Pursuant to FINRA
Rule 4110, FINRA  may impose higher net capital requirements
than Rule 15c3-1 under  the Exchange Act with respect to each
of the broker-dealers.
BofAS provid es institutional services, and in accordance with
the alternative net capital requirements, is required to maintain
tentative net capital in excess of $5.0 billion and net capital in
excess of the greater of $1.0 billion or a certain percentage of its
reserve requirement in addition to a certain percentage of
securities-based swap risk margin. BofAS must also notify the
SEC in the event its tentative net capital is less than $6.0 billion.
BofAS is also required to hold a certain percentage of its
customers' and affiliates' risk-based margin in order to meet its
CFTC minimum net capital requirement. At December 31, 2022,
BofAS had tentative net capital of $20.9 billion. BofAS also had
regulatory net capital of $17.5 billion, which exceeded the
minimum requirement of $4.1 billion.
MLPCC is a fully-gua ranteed subsidiary of BofAS and
provides clearing and settlement services as well as prime
brokerage and arranged financing services for institutional
clients. At December 31, 2022, MLPCC’ s regulatory net capital
of $7.5 billion exceeded the minimum requirement of $1.4 billion.
MLPF&S provides retail services. At December 31, 2022,
MLPF&S' regulatory net capital was $6.0 billion, which
exceeded the minimum requirement of $137 million.
Our Europe an broker-d ealers are subject to requirements
from U.S. and non-U.S. regulators. MLI, a U.K. investment firm,
is regulated by the Prudential Regulation Authority and theFinancial Conduct Authority and is subject to certain regulatory
capital requirements. At December 31, 2022 , MLI’s capital
resources were $33.4 billion, which exceeded the minimum
Pillar 1 requirement of $11.6 billion.
BofASE is an authorized credit institution with its head office
located in France. Previously , BofASE had been authorized as
an investment firm, but following the European Union’ s adoption
of the harmonized Investment Firm Directive and Investment
Firm Regulation prudential regime, it was requi red to apply for
reauthorization as a credit institution. The application was
approved in November 2022 and became  effective on
December 8, 2022. BofASE is authorized and regulated by the
Autorité de Contrôle Prudentiel et de Résolution and the Autorité
des Marchés Financiers, and supervised under the Single
Supervisory Mechanism  by the European Central Bank. At
December 31, 2022, BofASE's capital resour ces were $9.0
billion, which  exceeded the minimum Pillar 1 requirement of $3.0
billion.
In addition, MLI and BofASE became conditionally registered
with the SEC as secu rity-based swap dealers in the fourth
quarter of 2021, and maintained net liquid assets at
December 31, 2022 that exceeded the applicable minimum
requirements under the Exchange Act.
Liquidity Risk
Funding and Liquidity Risk Management
Our primary liquidity risk management objective is to meet
expected or unexpected cash flow and collatera l requirements,
including payments under long-term debt agreements,
commitments to extend credit and customer deposit
withdrawals, while continuing to support our businesses and
customers under a range of economic conditions. To achieve
that objectiv e, we analyze and monitor our liquidity risk under
expected and stressed conditions, maintain liquidity and access
to diverse funding sources, including our stable deposit base,
and seek to align liquidity-related incentives and risks. These
liquidity risk management practices have allowed us to
effectively manage the market fluctuation from the rising interest
rate environment, inflationary pressures and macroeconomic
environment.
We define liquidity as readily available assets, limited to cash
and high-qu ality, liquid, unencumbered securiti es that we can
use to meet our contractual and contingent financial obligations
as they arise . We manage our liquidity position  through line-of-
business and ALM activities, as well as through our legal entity
funding strategy , on both a forward and current(1) (2) (3)
(4)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 54
(including intraday) basis under both expected and stressed
conditions. We believe that a centralized approach to funding
and liquidity  management enhances our ability to monitor
liquidity requirements, maximizes access to funding sources,
minimizes borrowing costs and facilitates timely responses to
liquidity events.
The Board approves our liquidity risk policy and the Financial
Contingency and Recovery Plan. The ERC establishes our
liquidity risk tolerance levels. The MRC is responsible for
overseeing liquidity risks and directing management to maintain
exposures within the established tolerance levels. The MRC
reviews and monitors our liquidity position and stress testing
results, approves certain liquidity risk limits and reviews the
impact of strategic decisions on our liquidity . For more
information, see Managing Risk on page 46. Under this
governance framework,  we developed certai n funding and
liquidity risk management practices which include: maintaining
liquidity at Bank of America Corporation (Parent) and selected
subsidiaries, including our bank subsidiaries and other regulated
entities; determining what amounts of liquidity are appropriate
for these entities based on analysis of debt maturities and other
potential cash outflows, including those that we may experience
during stress ed market conditions; diversifying funding sources,
considering our asset profile and legal entity structure; and
performing contingency planning.
NB Holdings Corporation
The Parent, which is a separate and distinct legal entity from our
bank and nonbank subsidiaries, has an intercompany
arrangement with our wholly-owned holding company
subsidiary , NB Holdings  Corporation (NB Holdings). We have
transferred, and agreed to transfer , additional Parent assets not
required to satisfy anticipated near-term expe nditures to NB
Holdings. The Parent is expected to continue to have access to
the same flow of dividends, interest and other amounts of cash
necessary to service its debt, pay dividends and perform other
obligations as it would  have had it not entered into these
arrangements and transferred any assets. These arrangements
support our preferred single point of entry resolution strategy ,
under which only the Parent would be resolved under the U.S.
Bankruptcy Code.
In consideration for the transfer of assets, NB Holdings
issued a subordinated note to the Parent in a principal amount
equal to the value of the transferred assets. The aggregate
principal amount of the note will increase by the amount of any
future asset transfers. NB Holdings also provided the Parent
with a committed line of credit that allows the Parent to draw
funds necessary to service near-term cash needs. These
arrangements support our preferred single point of entry
resolution strategy , under which only the Parent would be
resolved under the U.S. Bankruptcy Code. These arrangements
include provisions to terminate the line of credit, forgive the
subordinated note and require the Parent to transfer its
remaining financial assets to NB Holdings if our projected
liquidity resources deteriorate so severely that resolution of the
Parent becomes imminent.
Global Liquidity Sources and Other Unencumbered
Assets
We maintain liquidity available to the Corporation, including the
Parent and selected subsidiaries, in the form of cash and high-
quality , liquid, unencumbered securities. Our liquidity buffer,
referred to as Global Liquidity Sources (GLS), is comprised ofassets that are readily available to the Parent and selected
subsidiaries, including holding company , bank and broker-dealer
subsidiaries, even during  stressed market conditions. Our cash
is primarily on deposit with the Federal Reserve Bank and, to a
lesser exten t, central banks outside of the U.S. We limit the
composition of high-quality , liquid, unencumber ed securities to
U.S. government securities, U.S. agency securities, U.S. agency
MBS and other investment-grade securities, and a select group
of non-U.S. government securities. We can obtain cash for
these secu rities, even in stressed cond itions, through
repurchase agreements  or outright sales. We hold our GLS in
legal entities  that allow us to meet the liquidity requirements of
our global businesses, and we consider the impact of potential
regulatory , tax, legal and other restrictions that could limit the
transferability of funds among entities.
Table 15 presents avera ge GLS for the three months ended
December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 15Average Global Liquidity Sources
Three Months Ended
December 31
(Dollars in billions) 2022 2021
Bank entities $ 694 $ 1,006 
Nonbank and other entities 174 152 
Total Average Global Liquidity Sources $ 868 $ 1,158 
Nonbank includes Parent, NB Holdings and other regulated entities.
Our bank subsidiaries’  liquidity is primarily driven by deposit
and lending activity , as well as securities valuati on and net debt
activity . Bank subsidiaries can also generate incremental
liquidity by pledging a range of unencumbered loans and
securities to certain FHLBs and the Federal Reserve Discount
Window . The cash we could have obtained by borrowing against
this pool of specifically-identified eligible assets was $348 billion
and $322 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021. We have
established operational procedures to enable us to borrow
against these assets, including regularly monitoring our total
pool of eligible loans and securities collateral. Eligibility is
defined in guidelines from the FHLBs and the Federal Reserve
and is subject to chang e at their discretion. Due to regulatory
restrictions, liquidity generated by the bank subsidiaries can
generally be used only to fund obligations within the bank
subsidiaries, and transfers to the Parent or nonbank subsidiaries
may be subject to prior regulatory approval.
Liquidity is also held in nonbank entities, including the
Parent, NB Holdings and other regulated entities. The Parent
and NB Holdings liquidity is typically in the form of cash
deposited at BANA, which is excluded from the liquidity at bank
subsidiaries, and high-quality , liquid, unencumbered securities.
Liquidity held in other regulated entities, comprised primarily of
broker-dealer subsidiaries, is primarily available to meet the
obligations of that entity , and transfers to the Parent or to any
other subsidiary may be subject to prior regulatory approval due
to regulatory restrictions and minimum requirements. Our other
regulated entities also hold unencumbered investment-grade
securities and equities that we believe could be used to
generate additional liquidity .
Table 16 presents the composition of average GLS for the
three months ended December 31, 2022 and December 31,
2021.(1)
(1) 
55 Bank of America
Table 16Average Global Liquidity Sources
Composition
Three Months Ended
December 31
(Dollars in billions) 2022 2021
Cash on deposit $ 174 $ 259 
U.S. Treasury securities 252 278 
U.S. agency securities, mortgage-backed
   securities, and other investment-grade
securities 427 606 
Non-U.S. government securities 15 15 
Total Average Global Liquidity Sources $ 868 $ 1,158 
Our GLS are substantially the same in compos ition to what
qualifies as High Qualit y Liquid Assets (HQLA) under the final
U.S. Liquidity Coverage Ratio (LCR) rules. However , HQLA  for
purposes of calculating LCR is not reported at market value, but
at a lower value that incorporates regulatory deductions and the
exclusion of excess liquidity held at certain subsidiaries. The
LCR is calculated as the amount of a financial institution’ s
unencumbered HQLA  relative to the estimated net cash outflows
the institution could encounter over a 30-day period of significant
liquidity stress, expressed as a percentage . Our average
consolidated HQLA, on a net basis, was $605 billion and $617
billion for the three months ended December 31, 2022 and
2021. For the same periods, the average consolidated LCR was
120 percent and 115 percent. Our LCR fluctuates due to normal
business flows from customer activity .
Liquidity Stress Analysis
We utilize liquidity stress  analysis to assist us in determining the
appropriate amounts of liquidity to maintain at the Parent and
our subsidiaries to meet contractual and contingent cash
outflows under a range of scenarios. The scenar ios we consider
and utilize incorporate market-wide and Corporation-specific
events, including potential credit rating downgrades for the
Parent and our subsidiaries, and more severe events including
potential resolution scenarios. The scenarios are based on our
historical experience, experience of distress ed and failed
financial institutions, regulatory guidance, and both expected
and unexpected future events.
The types of potential contractual and contingent cash
outflows we consider in our scenarios may include, but are not
limited to, upcoming contractual maturities of unsecured debt
and reductions in new debt issuances; diminished access to
secured financing markets; potential deposit withdrawals;
increased draws on loan commitments, liquidity facilities and
letters of credit; additional collateral that counterparties could
call if our credit ratings were downgraded; collat eral and margin
requirements arising from market value changes; and potential
liquidity required to maintain businesses and finance customer
activities. Changes in certain market factors, including, but not
limited to, credit rating downgrades, could negatively impact
potential contractual and contingent outflows and the related
financial instruments, and in some cases these impacts could be
material to our financial results.
We consider all sources of funds that we could access during
each stress scenario and focus particularly on matching
available sources with corresponding liquidity requirements by
legal entity . We also use the stress modeling results to manage
our asset and liability profile and establish limits  and guidelines
on certain funding sources and businesses.
Net Stable Funding Ratio
The Net Stable Funding  Ratio (NSFR) is a liquid ity requirement
for large banks to main tain a minimum level of stable funding
over a one-year period. The requirement is intended to supportthe ability of banks to lend to households and businesses in both
normal and adverse economic conditions and is complementary
to the LCR, which focus es on short-term liquidity  risks. The U.S.
NSFR applie s to the Corporation on a consolida ted basis and to
our insured depository institutions. At December 31, 2022, the
Corporation and its insured depository institutions were in
compliance with this requirement.
Diversified Funding Sources
We fund our assets primarily with a mix of deposits, and secured
and unsecured liabilities through a centralized, globally
coordinated funding approach diversified across products,
programs, markets, currencies and investor groups.
The primary  benefits of our centralized fundin g approach
include greater control,  reduced funding costs, wider name
recognition by investors and greater flexibility to meet the
variable funding requirements of subsidiaries. Where
regulations, time zone differences or other business
considerations make Parent funding impractical, certain other
subsidiaries may issue their own debt.
We fund a substantial portion of our lending activities through
our deposits, which were $1.93 trillion and $2.1 trillion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. Deposits are primarily generated
by our Consumer Banking, GWIM and Global Banking
segments. These deposits are diversified by clients, product
type and geography , and the majority of our U.S. deposits are
insured by the FDIC. We consider a substantial portion of our
deposits to be a stabl e, low-cost and consis tent source of
funding. We believe this deposit funding is generally less
sensitive to interest rate changes, market volatili ty or changes in
our credit ratings than wholesale funding sources. Our lending
activities may also be financed through secured borrowings,
including credit card securitizations and securitizations with
government-sponsored enterprises (GSE), the Federal Housing
Administration (FHA) and private-label investors, as well as
FHLB loans.
Our trading activities in other regulated entities are primarily
funded on a secured basis through securities lending and
repurchase agreements, and these amounts will vary based on
customer activity and market conditions. We believe funding
these activit ies in the secured financing markets is more cost-
efficient and less sensitive to changes in our credit ratings than
unsecured financing. Repurchase agreements are generally
short-term and often overnight. Disruptions in secured financing
markets for financial institutions have occurred in prior market
cycles which  resulted in adverse changes in terms or significant
reductions in the availability of such financing. We manage the
liquidity risks arising from secured funding by sourcing funding
globally from a diverse group of counterparties, providing a
range of securities collateral and pursuing longer durations,
when appropriate. For more information on secured financing
agreements, see Note 10 – Securities Financing Agreements,
Short-term Borrowings, Collateral and Restricted Cash  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
Total long-term debt decreased $4.1 billion to $276.0 billion
during 2022 primarily due to debt maturities, redemptions and
valuation adjustments, partially offset by debt issuances. We
may, from time to time, purchase outstanding debt instruments
in various transactions, depending on market conditions, liquidity
and other factors. Our other regulated entities may also make
markets in our debt instruments to provide liquidity for investors.
During 2022, we issued $66.0 billion of long-term debt
consisting of $44.2 billion of notes issued by Bank of America
Corporation, substantially all of which were TLAC compliant,
Bank of America 56
$10.0 billion  of notes issued by Bank of America, N.A. and $11.8
billion of other debt. During 2021, we issued $76.7 billion of
long-term debt consisting of $56.2 billion of notes issued by
Bank of America Corporation, substantially all of which were
TLAC compliant, $8 billion of notes issued by Bank of America,
N.A. and $12.5 billion of other debt.
During 2022, we had total long-term debt maturities and
redemptions in the aggre gate of $33.3 billion consisting of $19.8
billion for Bank of Amer ica Corporation, $9.9 billion for Bank of
America, N.A. and $3.6 billion of other debt. During 2021, we
had total long-term debt maturities and redemptions in the
aggregate of $46.4 billion consisting of $24.4 billion for Bank of
America Corporation, $10.4 billion for Bank of America, N.A. and
$11.6 billion of other debt.
At December 31, 2022, Bank of America Corporation's senior
notes of $205.9 billion included $179.1 billion of outstanding
notes that are both TLAC eligible and callable at least one year
before their stated maturities. Of these senior notes, $16.6
billion will be callable and become TLAC ineligib le during 2023,
and $21.4 billion, $21.3 billion, $16.0 billion and $24.4 billion will
do so during  each of 2024 through 2027, respectively , and $79.4
billion thereafter .
We issue long-term unse cured debt in a variety of maturities
and currencies to achieve cost-ef ficient funding and to maintain
an appropria te maturity profile. While the cost and availability of
unsecured funding may be negatively impacted by general
market cond itions or by matters specific to the financial services
industry or the Corporation, we seek to mitigate  refinancing risk
by actively managing the amount of our borrowings that we
anticipate will mature within any month or quarter . We may issue
unsecured debt in the form of structured notes for client
purposes, certain of which qualify as TLAC-eligible debt. During
2022, we issued $12.5 billion of structured notes, which are debt
obligations that pay investors returns linked to other debt or
equity securities, indices, currencies or commodities. We
typically hedge the returns we are obligated to pay on these
liabilities with derivatives and/or investments in the underlying
instruments, so that from a funding perspecti ve, the cost is
similar to our other unsecured long-term debt. We could be
required to settle certain  structured note obligations for cash or
other securities prior to maturity under certain  circumstances,
which we consider for liquidity planning purposes. We believe,
however , that a portion of such borrowings will remain
outstanding beyond the earliest put or redemption date.
Substantially all of our senior and subordinated debt
obligations contain no provisions that could trigger a
requirement for an early repayment, require additional collateral
support, result in changes to terms, accelerate maturity or create
additional financial obligations upon an adverse change in our
credit ratings, financial ratios, earnings, cash flows or stock
price. For more information on long-term debt funding, including
issuances and maturities and redemptions, see Note 11 – Long-
term Debt  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
We use derivative transactions to manage the duration,
interest rate and currency risks of our borrowings, considering
the characte ristics of the assets they are funding. For more
information on our ALM activities, see Interest Rate Risk
Management for the Banking Book on page 79.
Uninsured Deposits
The FDIC insures the Corporation’ s U.S. deposits up to
$250,000 per depositor , per insured bank for each account
ownership category , and various country-specific funds insure
non-U.S. deposits up to specified limits. Deposits that exceedinsurance limits are uninsured. At December 31, 2022, the
Corporation’ s deposits totaled $1.9 trillion, of which total
estimated uninsured U.S. and non-U.S. depos its were $617.6
billion and $102.8 billion. At December 31, 2021, the
Corporation’ s deposits totaled $2.1 trillion, of which total
estimated uninsured U.S. and non-U.S. depos its were $701.4
billion and $111.9 billion.
Table 17 presents information about the Corpo ration’ s total
estimated uninsured time deposits. For more information on our
liquidity sources, see Global Liquidity Sourc es and Other
Unencumbered Assets, and for more information on deposits,
see Diversified Funding Sources in this section. For more
information on contractu al time deposit maturitie s, see Note 9 –
Deposits  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Table 17Uninsured Time Deposits 
  December 31, 2022
(Dollars in millions) U.S. Non-U.S. Total
Uninsured time deposits with a
maturity of:
3 months or less $ 3,721 $ 7,023 $ 10,744 
Over 3 months through 6 months 2,230 275 2,505 
Over 6 months through 12 months 2,712 86 2,798 
Over 12 months 686 1,566 2,252 
Total $ 9,349 $ 8,950 $ 18,299 
Amounts are estimated based on the regulatory methodologies defined by each local
jurisdiction.
Contingency Planning
We maintain contingency funding plans that outline our potential
responses to liquidity stress events at various levels of severity .
These policies and plans are based on stress scenarios and
include potential fundin g strategies and communication and
notification procedures that we would implement in the event we
experienced stressed liquidity conditions. We periodically review
and test the contingency funding plans to validate efficacy and
assess readiness.
Our U.S. bank subsidiar ies can access continge ncy funding
through the Federal Reserve Discount Window . Certain non-
U.S. subsidi aries have access to central bank facilities in the
jurisdictions in which they operate. While we do not rely on
these sources in our liquidity modeling, we main tain the policies,
procedures and governance processes that would enable us to
access these sources if necessary .
Credit Ratings
Our borrowing costs and ability to raise funds are impacted
by our credit ratings. In addition, credit ratings may be important
to customers or counterparties when we compete in certain
markets and when we seek to engage in certain transactions,
including over-the-counter (OTC) derivatives. Thus, it is our
objective to maintain  high-quality credit ratings, and
management maintains an active dialogue with the major rating
agencies.
Credit ratings and outlooks are opinions expressed by rating
agencies on our creditworthiness and that of our obligations or
securities, including long-term debt, short-te rm borrowings,
preferred stock and other securities, including asset
securitizations. Our credit ratings are subject to ongoing review
by the rating agencies, and they consider a number of factors,
including our own financial strength, performance, prospects
and operatio ns as well as factors not under our control. The
rating agencies could make adjustments to our ratings at any(1)
(1)
57 Bank of America
time, and they provide no assurances that they will maintain our
ratings at current levels .
Other facto rs that influence our credit ratings include
changes to the rating agencies’  methodologies for our industry
or certain security types; the rating agencies’  assessment of the
general operating enviro nment for financial services companies;
our relative positions in the markets in which we compete; our
various risk exposures and risk management policies and
activities; pending litigat ion and other contingencies or potential
tail risks; our reputation; our liquidity position, diversity of funding
sources and funding costs; the current and expected level and
volatility of our earnings; our capital position and capital
management practices ; our corporate governance; the
sovereign credit ratings of the U.S. government; current or future
regulatory and legislative initiatives; and the agencies’  views on
whether the U.S. govern ment would provide meaningful support
to the Corporation or its subsidiaries in a crisis.
On September 19, 2022, Fitch Ratings (Fitch) affirmed the
long-term and short-term senior debt ratings of the Corporation.
Fitch also affirmed and withdrew the long-term and short-term
ratings on certain subsidiaries, as they are no longer considered
relevant to the agency’ s coverage.On January 23, 2023, Moody’ s Investors Service (Moody’ s)
placed the long-term rating of the Corporation as well as the
long-term rating of its rated subsidiaries, including BANA, on
review for upgrade. The agency cited the Corporation’ s
strengthened capital ratios, improved earnin gs profile and
continued commitment to maintaining a restrained risk appetite
as drivers of the review . A review for upgrade indicates that
those ratings are under consideration for a change in the near
term and typically concludes within 90 days. Moody’ s
concurrently affirmed all Prime-1 short-term ratings of the
Corporation and rated subsidiaries.
The current ratings and outlooks for the Corpor ation and its
subsidiaries from Standard & Poor ’s Global Ratings (S&P) were
not the subject of any rating actions during 2022 or through
February 22, 2023.
Table 18 presents the Corporation’ s current long-term/short-
term senior debt ratings and outlooks expressed by the rating
agencies.
Table 18Senior Debt Ratings
Moody’s Investors Service Standard & Poor’s Global Ratings Fitch Ratings
Long-term Short-term Outlook Long-term Short-term Outlook Long-term Short-term Outlook
Bank of America Corporation A2 P-1Review for
Upgrade A- A-2 Positive AA- F1+ Stable
Bank of America, N.A. Aa2 P-1Review for
Upgrade A+ A-1 Positive AA F1+ Stable
Bank of America Europe Designated
Activity Company NR NR NR A+ A-1 Positive AA F1+ Stable
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner &
Smith Incorporated NR NR NR A+ A-1 Positive AA F1+ Stable
BofA Securities, Inc. NR NR NR A+ A-1 Positive AA F1+ Stable
Merrill Lynch International NR NR NR A+ A-1 Positive AA F1+ Stable
BofA Securities Europe SA NR NR NR A+ A-1 Positive AA F1+ Stable
NR = not rated
A reduction in certain of our credit ratings or the ratings of
certain asset-backed securitizations may have a material
adverse effect on our liquidity , potential loss of access to credit
markets, the related cost of funds, our businesses and on
certain revenues, particularly in those businesses where
counterparty creditworth iness is critical. In addition, under the
terms of certain OTC derivative contracts and other trading
agreements, in the event of downgrades of our or our rated
subsidiaries’  credit ratings, the counterpar ties to those
agreements may require us to provide additional collateral, or to
terminate these contracts or agreements, which could cause us
to sustain losses and/or adversely impact our liquidity . If the
short-term credit ratings of our Parent, bank or broker-dealer
subsidiaries were downgraded by one or more levels, the
potential loss of access to short-term funding sources such as
repo financin g and the effect on our increment al cost of funds
could be material.
While certain potential impacts are contractual and
quantifiable, the full scop e of the consequences of a credit rating
downgrade to a financia l institution is inherently uncertain, as it
depends upon numerous dynamic, complex and inter-related
factors and assumptions, including whether any downgrade of a
company’ s long-term credit ratings precipitates downgrades to
its short-term credit ratings, and assumptions about the potential
behaviors of various customers, investors and counterparties.
For more information on potential impacts of credit rating
downgrades, see Liquidity Risk – Liquidity StressAnalysis on page 56.
For more information on additional collateral and termination
payments that could be required in connection with certain over-
the-counter derivative contracts and other tradin g agreements in
the event of a credit rating downgrade, see Note 3 – Derivatives
to the Consolidated Financial Statements herein and Item 1A.
Risk Factors.
Common Stock Dividends
For a summary of our declared quarterly cash dividends on
common stock during 2022 and through February 22, 2023, see
Note 13 – Shareholders’  Equity  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Finance Subsidiary Issuers and Parent
Guarantor
BofA  Finance LLC, a Delaware limited liability company (BofA
Finance), is a consolidated finance subsidiary of the Corporation
that has issued and sold, and is expected to continue to issue
and sell, its senior unsecured debt securities (Guaranteed
Notes) that are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by the
Corporation. The Corporation guarantees the due and punctual
payment, on demand, of amounts payable on the Guaranteed
Notes if not paid by BofA Finance. In addition, each of BAC
Capital Trust XIII, BAC Capital Trust XIV and BAC Capital Trust
XV, Delaware statutory trusts (collectively , the Trusts), is a 100
percent owned finance subsidiary of the Corporation that has
issued and sold trust preferred securities (the Trust Preferred
Bank of America 58
Securities) or capital securities (the Capital Securities and,
together with the Guaranteed Notes and the Trust Preferred
Securities, the Guaranteed Securities), as applicable, that
remained outstanding at December 31, 2022. The Corporation
guarantees the payment of amounts and distributions with
respect to the Trust Preferred Securities and Capital Securities if
not paid by the Trusts, to the extent of funds held by the Trusts,
and this guarantee, together with the Corp oration’ s other
obligations with respect to the Trust Preferred Securities and
Capital Secu rities, effectively constitutes a full and unconditional
guarantee of the Trusts’  payment obligations on the Trust
Preferred Securities or Capital Securities, as applicable. No
other subsid iary of the Corporation guarantees the Guaranteed
Securities.
BofA  Finance and each of the Trusts are finance
subsidiaries, have no independent assets, revenues or
operations and are dependent upon the Corporation and/or the
Corporation’ s other subsidiaries to meet their respective
obligations under the Guaranteed Securities in the ordinary
course. If holders of the Guaranteed Securities make claims on
their Guaranteed Securities in a bankruptcy , resolution or similar
proceeding, any recoveries on those claims will be limited to
those available under  the applicable guarantee by the
Corporation, as described above.
The Corporation is a holding company and depe nds upon its
subsidiaries for liquidity . Applicable laws and regulations and
intercompany arrangeme nts entered into in connection with the
Corporation’ s resolution  plan could restrict the availability of
funds from subsidiaries to the Corporation, which could
adversely affect the Corporation’ s ability to make payments
under its guarantees. In addition, the obligations of the
Corporation under the guarantees of the Guaranteed Securities
will be structurally subordinated to all existing and future
liabilities of its subsidiaries, and claimants should look only to
assets of the Corporation for payments. If the Corporation, as
guarantor of the Guaranteed Notes, transfers all or substantially
all of its assets to one or more direct or indirect majority-owned
subsidiaries, under the indenture governing the Guaranteed
Notes, the subsidiary or subsidiaries will not be required to
assume the Corporation’ s obligations under its guarantee of the
Guaranteed Notes.
For more information on factors that may affect payments to
holders of the Guaranteed Securities, see Liquidity Risk – NB
Holdings Corporation in this section, Item 1. Business –
Insolvency and the Orderly Liquidation Authority  on page 6 and
Part I. Item 1A. Risk Factors – Liquidity on page 9.
Representations and Warranties Obligations
For information on repre sentations and warranties obligations in
connection with the sale of mortgage loans, see Note 12 –
Commitments and Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Credit Risk Management
Credit risk is the risk of loss arising from the inability or failure of
a borrower or counterp arty to meet its obligations. Credit risk
can also arise from operational failures that result in an
erroneous advance, commitment or investment of funds. We
define the credit exposu re to a borrower or counterparty as the
loss potential arising from all product classific ations including
loans and leases, deposit overdrafts, derivative s, assets held-
for-sale and unfunded lending commitments, which include loan
commitments, letters of credit and financial guarantees.
Derivative positions are recorded at fair value, and assets held-
for-sale are recorded at either fair value or the lower of cost orfair value. Certain loans and unfunded commitments are
accounted for under the fair value option. Credit risk for
categories of assets carried at fair value is not accounted for as
part of the allowance for credit losses but as part of the fair
value adjust ments recorded in earnings. For derivative positions,
our credit risk is measured as the net cost in the event the
counterparties with contracts in which we are in a gain position
fail to perfor m under the terms of those contracts. We use the
current fair value to represent credit exposure without giving
consideration to future mark-to-market changes. The credit risk
amounts take into consideration the effects of legally
enforceable master netting agreements and cash collateral. Our
consumer and commercial credit extensio n and review
procedures encompass funded and unfunded credit exposures.
For more information on derivatives and credit extension
commitments, see Note 3 – Derivatives  and Note 12 –
Commitments and Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
We manage credit risk based on the risk profile of the
borrower or counterpar ty, repayment sources, the nature of
underlying collateral and other support given current events,
conditions and expectations. We classify our portfolios as either
consumer or commerci al and monitor credit risk in each as
discussed below .
We refine our underwriting and credit risk management
practices as well as credit standards to meet the changing
economic environment . To mitigate losses and enhance
customer support in our consumer businesses, we have in place
collection programs and loan modification and customer
assistance infrastructures. We utilize a number of actions to
mitigate losses in the commercial businesses including
increasing the frequency and intensity of portfolio monitoring,
hedging activity and our practice of transferring management of
deteriorating commercial exposures to independent special
asset of ficers as credits enter criticized categories.
During 2022, asset quality generally improved compared to
2021. Our 2022 net charge-of f ratio remained near historic lows,
and nonperf orming loans and commercial reservable criticized
utilized exposure decre ased compared to 2021, which was
partially offset by an increase in reservable criticized exposure
associated with our direct exposure to Russia as a result of the
Russia/Ukraine conflict. While uncertainty around the pandemic
has diminished, uncertainty remains regarding broader
economic impacts as a result of inflationary pressures, rising
rates and the current geopolitical situation and could lead to
adverse impacts to credit quality metrics in future periods.
For information on our credit risk management activities, see
Consumer Portfolio Credit Risk Management below , Commercial
Portfolio Credit Risk Management on page 64, Non-U.S.
Portfolio on page 70, Allowance for Credit Losses on page 73,
and Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and Leases and Allowance for
Credit Losses  to the Consolidated Financial Statements. For
more inform ation on the factors that may expo se us to credit
risk, see Part I. Item 1A. Risk Factors of this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
Consumer Portfolio Credit Risk Management
Credit risk management for the consumer portfolio begins with
initial underwriting and continues throughout a borrower ’s credit
cycle. Statistical techniques in conjunction with experiential
judgment are used in all aspects of portfolio management
including underwriting, product pricing, risk appetite, setting
credit limits, and establi shing operating processes and metrics
to quantify and balance risks and returns. Statistical models are
built using detailed behavioral information from external
59 Bank of America
sources, such as credit bureaus, and/or internal historical
experience and are a component of our consu mer credit risk
management process. These models are used in part to assist
in making both new and ongoing credit decis ions as well as
portfolio management strategies, including authorizations and
line management, collection practices and strategies, and
determination of the allowance for loan and lease losses and
allocated capital for credit risk.
Consumer Credit Portfolio
During 2022, the U.S. unemployment rate continued to decline
and home prices increased compared to 2021, although they
began to decline in the second half of 2022 as inflationary
pressures continued to persist. During 2022, net charge-of fs
were $1.9 billion, relatively unchanged comp ared to 2021.
During 2022, nonperforming loans declined primarily due todecreases from consumer real estate loan sales, partially offset
by increases from loans whose prior-period deferrals expired
and were modified in troubled debt restructurings (TDRs) during
the first quarter of 2022.
The consumer allowance for loan and lease losses increased
$204 million during 2022 to $7.2 billion. For more information,
see Allowance for Credit Losses on page 73.
For more information on our accounting policies regarding
delinquencies, nonperforming status, charge-of fs and TDRs for
the consum er portfolio, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant
Accounting Principles  and Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and
Leases and Allowance for Credit Losses  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements.
Table 19 presents our outstanding consume r loans and
leases, cons umer nonpe rforming loans and accruing consumer
loans past due 90 days or more.
Table 19Consumer Credit Quality
 Outstandings NonperformingAccruing Past Due
90 Days or More
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Residential mortgage $ 229,670 $ 221,963 $ 2,167 $ 2,284 $ 368 $ 634 
Home equity 26,563 27,935 510 630 — — 
Credit card 93,421 81,438 n/a n/a 717 487 
Direct/Indirect consumer 106,236 103,560 77 75 2 11 
Other consumer 156 190 — — — — 
Consumer loans excluding loans accounted for
under the fair value option $ 456,046 $ 435,086 $ 2,754 $ 2,989 $ 1,087 $ 1,132 
Loans accounted for under the fair value option 339 618 
Total consumer loans and leases $ 456,385 $ 435,704 
Percentage of outstanding consumer loans and leases n/a n/a 0.60 % 0.69 % 0.24 % 0.26 %
Percentage of outstanding consumer loans and leases,
excluding fully-insured loan portfolios n/a n/a 0.62 0.71 0.16 0.12 
Residential mortga ge loans accruing past due 90 days or more are fully-insured loans. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, residential mortgage included $260 million and $444 million of loans on
which interest had been curtailed by the FHA, and therefore were no longer accruing interest, although principal was still insured, and $108 million and $190 million of loans on which interest was
still accruing.
Outstandings primarily includes auto and specialty lending loans and leases of $51.8 billion and $48.5 billion, U.S. securities-based lending loans of $50.4 billion and $51.1 billion at December 31,
2022 and 2021, and non-U.S. consumer loans of $3.0 billion as of both period ends.
For more information on the fair value option, see Note 21 – Fair V alue Option  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Excludes consumer loans accounted for under the fair value option. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, $7 million and $21 million of loans account ed for under the fair value option were past due 90
days or more and not accruing interest.
n/a = not applicable
Table 20 presents net charge-of fs and related ratios for consumer loans and leases.
Table 20Consumer Net Charge-offs and Related Ratios
Net Charge-offs Net Charge-off Ratios 
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Residential mortgage $ 72 $ (28) 0.03 % (0.01)%
Home equity (90) (119) (0.33) (0.39)
Credit card 1,334 1,723 1.60 2.29 
Direct/Indirect consumer 18 1 0.02 — 
Other consumer 521 270 n/m n/m
Total $ 1,855 $ 1,847 0.42 0.44 
Net charge-of f ratios are calculated as net charge-of fs divided by average outstanding loans and leases, excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option.
n/m = not meaningful
We believe that the presentation of information adjusted to
exclude the impact of the fully-insured loan portfolio and loans
accounted for under the fair value option is more representative
of the ongoi ng operation s and credit quality of the business. As
a result, in the following tables and discussions of the residential
mortgage and home equity portfolios, we exclude loans
accounted for under the fair value option and provide
information that excludes the impact of the fully-insured loan
portfolio in certain credit quality statistics.Residential Mortgage
The residential mortgage portfolio made up the largest
percentage of our consumer loan portfolio at 50 percent of
consumer loans and leases in 2022. Approximately 51 percent
of the residential mortgage portfolio was in Consumer Banking
and 45 percent was in GWIM. The remaini ng portion was in All
Other .
Outstanding balances in the residential mortgage portfolio
increased $7.7 billion in 2022 as originations were partially offset
by paydowns and loan sales. (1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(1)
Bank of America 60
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the residential mortgage
portfolio included $11.7 billion and $12.7 billion of outstanding
fully-insured loans, of which both had $2.2 billion of FHA
insurance, with the remainder protected by Fannie Mae long-
term standby agreements.Table 21 presents certain residential mortgage key credit
statistics on both a reported basis and excluding the fully-
insured loan portfolio. The following discussion presents the
residential mortgage portfolio excluding the fully-insured loan
portfolio.
Table 21Residential Mortgage – Key Credit
Statistics
Reported Basis Excluding Fully-insured Loans
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Outstandings $ 229,670 $ 221,963 $ 217,976 $ 209,259 
Accruing past due 30 days or more 1,471 1,753 844 866 
Accruing past due 90 days or more 368 634 — — 
Nonperforming loans 2,167 2,284 2,167 2,284 
Percent of portfolio     
Refreshed LTV greater than 90 but less than or equal to 100 1 % 1 % 1 % 1 %
Refreshed LTV greater than 100 — — — — 
Refreshed FICO below 620 1 2 1 1 
Outstandings, accruing past due, nonperforming loans and percentages of portfolio exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Includes loans that are contractually current which primarily consist of collateral-dependent TDRs, including those that have been discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy and loans that have not yet
demonstrated a sustained period of payment performance following a TDR.
Nonperforming outstan ding balances in the residential
mortgage portfolio decreased $117 million in 2022 primarily due
to decreases from consumer real estate loan sales in the
second quarter of 2022, partially offset by increases from loans
whose prior-period deferrals expired and were modified in TDRs
during the first quarter of 2022. Of the nonperforming residential
mortgage loans at December 31, 2022, $1.4 billion, or 63
percent, were current on contractual payments. Loans accruing
past due 30 days or more decreased $22 million.
Net charge-of fs of $72 million for 2022 increased $100
million compared to 2021 primarily due to loan sales that
occurred in the second quarter of 2022.
Of the $218.0 billion in total residential mortgage loans
outstanding at December 31, 2022, 28 percent were originated
as interest-only loans. The outstanding balance  of interest-only
residential mortgage loans that had entered the amortization
period was $3.4 billion, or six percent, at Dece mber 31, 2022.
Residential mortgage loans that have entered the amortization
period generally experience a higher rate of early stage
delinquencies and nonperforming status compared to the
residential mortgage portfolio as a whole. At December 31,
2022, $64 million, or two percent, of outstanding interest-onlyresidential mortgages that had entered the amortization period
were accrui ng past due 30 days or more compared to $844
million, or less than one percent, for the entire residential
mortgage portfolio. In addition, at December 31, 2022, $204
million, or six percent, of outstanding interest-only residential
mortgage loans that had entered the amortization period were
nonperforming, of which $79 million were contractually current.
Loans that have yet to enter the amortization  period in our
interest-only residential mortgage portfolio are primarily well-
collateralized loans to our wealth management clients and have
an interest-only period of three to ten years. Approximately 96
percent of these loans that have yet to enter the amortization
period will not be required to make a fully-amortizing payment
until 2025 or later .
Table 22 presents outstandings, nonperformin g loans and
net charge-of fs by certain state concentrations for the residential
mortgage portfolio. The Los Angeles-Long Beach-Santa Ana
Metropolitan Statistical Area (MSA) within California represented
14 percent and 15 percent of outstandings at December 31,
2022 and 2021. In the New York area, the New York-Northern
New Jersey-Long Island MSA  made up 15 percent of
outstandings at both December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 22Residential Mortgage State Concentrations
Outstandings Nonperforming 
December 31 Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions)December 31
2022December 31
2021December 31
2022December 31
2021 2022 2021
California $ 80,878 $ 77,819 $ 656 $ 693 $ 37 $ (14)
New York 26,228 24,975 328 358 7 3 
Florida 15,225 13,883 145 158 (2) (8)
Texas 9,399 9,002 88 86 — — 
New Jersey 8,810 8,723 96 117 3 — 
Other 77,436 74,857 854 872 27 (9)
Residential mortgage loans $ 217,976 $ 209,259 $ 2,167 $ 2,284 $ 72 $ (28)
Fully-insured loan portfolio 11,694 12,704   
Total residential mortgage loan portfolio $ 229,670 $ 221,963   
Outstandings and nonperforming loans exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Home Equity
At Decembe r 31, 2022, the home equity portfo lio made up six
percent of the consume r portfolio and was comprised of home
equity lines of credit (HELOCs), home equity loans and reverse
mortgages. HELOCs generally have an initial draw period of 10years, and after the initial draw period ends, the loans generally
convert to 15- or 20-year amortizing loans. We no longer
originate home equity loans or reverse mortgages.
At December 31, 2022 , 82 percent of the home equity
portfolio was in Consumer Banking , nine percent was in All
Other  and the remainder of the portfolio was primarily in GWIM .(1)  (1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
 (1) (1)
(1)
61 Bank of America
Outstanding balances in the home equity portfolio decreased
$1.4 billion in 2022 primarily due to paydowns outpacing draws
on existing lines and new originations. Of the total home equity
portfolio at December 31, 2022 and 2021, $11.1 billion and
$12.2 billion, or 42 percent and 44 percent, were in first-lien
positions. At December 31, 2022, outstanding balances in the
home equity portfolio that were in a second-lien or more junior-lien position and where  we also held the first-lien loan totaled
$4.5 billion, or 17 percent of our total home equity portfolio.
Unused HELOCs totaled $42.4 billion and $40.5 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. The HELOC utilization rate was
38 percent and 39 percent at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 23 presents certain home equity portfolio key credit
statistics.
Table 23Home Equity – Key Credit Statistics 
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Outstandings $ 26,563 $ 27,935 
Accruing past due 30 days or more 96 157 
Nonperforming loans 510 630 
Percent of portfolio
Refreshed CLTV greater than 90 but less than or equal to 100 — % — %
Refreshed CLTV greater than 100 — 1 
Refreshed FICO below 620 2 3 
Outstandings, accruing past due, nonperforming loans and percentages of the portfolio exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Includes loans that are contractually  current which primarily consist of collateral-dependent TDRs, including those that have been discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy , junior-lien loans where the
underlying first lien is 90 days or more past due, as well as loans that have not yet demonstrated a sustained period of payment performance following a TDR.
Nonperforming outstand ing balances in the home equity
portfolio decreased $120 million to $510 million at December 31,
2022, primar ily driven by loan sales. Of the nonp erforming home
equity loans at Decembe r 31, 2022, $275 million, or 54 percent,
were current on contractual payments. In addition, $167 million,
or 33 percent, of nonperforming home equity loans were 180
days or more past due and had been writte n down to the
estimated fair value of the collateral, less costs to sell. Accruing
loans that were 30 days or more past due decreased $61 million
in 2022.
Net recoveries decreased $29 million to $90 million in 2022
compared to 2021.
Of the $26.6  billion in total home equity portfolio  outstandings
at December 31, 2022, as shown in Table 23, 13 percent require
interest-only payments. The outstanding balance of HELOCs
that had reached the end of their draw period and entered the
amortization period was $5.2 billion at Decembe r 31, 2022. The
HELOCs that have entered the amortizatio n period have
experienced a higher percentage of early stage delinquencies
and nonperforming status when compared to the HELOC
portfolio as a whole. At December 31, 2022, $53 million, or one
percent, of outstanding HELOCs thathad entered the amortization period were accruing past due 30
days or more. In additio n, at December 31, 2022, $354 million,
or seven percent, were nonperforming.
For our interest-only HELOC portfolio, we do not actively
track how many of our home equity custome rs pay only the
minimum amount due on their home equity loans and lines;
however , we can infer some of this information through a review
of our HELOC portfolio that we service and is still in its revolving
period. During 2022, 10 percent of these customers with an
outstanding balance did not pay any principal on their HELOCs.
Table 24 presents outstandings, nonperforming balances and
net recoveries by certain state concentrations for the home
equity portfolio. In the New York area, the New York-Northern
New Jersey-Long Island MSA  made up 12 percent and 13
percent of the outstanding home equity portfolio at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. The Los Angeles-Long Beach-
Santa Ana MSA  within California made up 11 percent and 10
percent of the outstanding home equity portfolio at
December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 24Home Equity State Concentrations
Outstandings Nonperforming 
December 31 Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
California $ 7,406 $ 7,600 $ 119 $ 140 $ (20)$ (40)
Florida 2,743 2,977 63 78 (21) (21)
New Jersey 2,047 2,259 53 69 (3) (4)
New York 1,806 2,072 80 96 (4) (1)
Massachusetts 1,347 1,422 23 32 (2) (3)
Other 11,214 11,605 172 215 (40) (50)
Total home equity loan portfolio $ 26,563 $ 27,935 $ 510 $ 630 $ (90)$ (119)
Outstandings and nonperforming loans exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Credit Card
At December 31, 2022,  97 percent of the credit card portfolio
was managed in Consumer Banking  with the remainder in
GWIM . Outstandings in the credit card portfolio increased $12.0
billion during  2022 to $93.4 billion primarily driven by increased
purchase volumes, partially offset by the sale of a $1.6 billion
affinity card loan portfolio. Net charge-of fs decreased $389million to $1.3 billion in 2022 compared to 2021, as loss rates
remained near historic lows. In addition, the prior year included
charge-of fs associated with deferrals that expired in 2020. Credit
card loans 30 days or more past due and still accruing interest
increased $508 million, and 90 days or more past due and still
accruing interest increased $230 million. Unused lines of credit
for credit card increased to $370.1 billion(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
(1) (1)
(1)
Bank of America 62
at December 31, 2022  from $361.2 billion at December 31,
2021.Table 25 presents certain state concentrations for the credit
card portfolio.
Table 25Credit Card State Concentrations
OutstandingsAccruing Past Due
90 Days or More
December 31 Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
California $ 15,363 $ 13,076 $ 126 $ 82 $ 232 $ 322 
Florida 9,512 8,046 100 71 183 245 
Texas 8,125 6,894 72 47 123 158 
New York 5,381 4,725 56 35 99 135 
Washington 4,844 4,080 21 13 36 39 
Other 50,196 44,617 342 239 661 824 
Total credit card portfolio $ 93,421 $ 81,438 $ 717 $ 487 $ 1,334 $ 1,723 
Direct/Indirect Consumer
At December 31, 2022, 49 percent of the direct/indirect portfolio
was included in Consumer Banking  (consumer auto and
recreational vehicle lending) and 51 percent was included in
GWIM (principally securities-based lending loans). Outstandingsin the direct/indirect portfolio increased $2.7 billion in 2022 to
$106.2 billion driven by growth in our auto portfolio.
Table 26 presents certain state concentratio ns for the
direct/indirect consumer loan portfolio.
Table 26Direct/Indirect State Concentrations
OutstandingsAccruing Past Due
90 Days or More
December 31 Net Charge-offs
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
California $ 15,516 $ 15,061 $ 1 $ 2 $ 6 $ 3 
Florida 13,783 13,352 — 1 4 1 
Texas 9,837 9,505 — 2 3 2 
New York 7,891 7,802 — 1 2 3 
New Jersey 4,456 4,228 — — 1 (3)
Other 54,753 53,612 1 5 2 (5)
Total direct/indirect loan portfolio $ 106,236 $ 103,560 $ 2 $ 11 $ 18 $ 1 
Other Consumer
Other consu mer primarily consists of deposit overdraft balances.
Net charge-of fs increased $251 million in 2022 to $521 million,
primarily driven by overdraft losses due to higher payment
activity related to checking accounts.
Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and
Foreclosed Properties Activity
Table 27 presents nonperforming consumer loans, leases and
foreclosed properties activity during 2022 and 2021. During
2022, nonpe rforming consumer loans decreased $235 million to
$2.8 billion primarily due to decreases from loan sales, partially
offset by increases from loans whose prior-p eriod deferrals
expired and were modified in TDRs during the first quarter of
2022.At December 31, 2022 , $605 million, or 22 percent, of
nonperforming loans were 180 days or more past due and had
been written  down to their estimated property value less costs to
sell. In addition, at December 31, 2022, $1.7 billion, or 61
percent, of nonperforming consumer loans were modified and
are now current after successful trial periods, or are current
loans classified as nonperforming loans in accordance with
applicable policies.
Foreclosed properties increased $20 million in 2022 to $121
million. Nonperforming loans also include certain loans that have
been modified in TDRs where economic concessions have been
granted to borrowers experiencing financial dif ficulties.
63 Bank of America
Table 27Nonperforming Consumer Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Nonperforming loans and leases, January 1 $ 2,989 $ 2,725 
Additions 1,453 2,006 
Reductions:
Paydowns and payoffs (535) (625)
Sales (402) (4)
Returns to performing status (661) (1,037)
Charge-offs (56) (64)
Transfers to foreclosed properties (34) (12)
Total net additions/(reductions) to nonperforming loans and leases (235) 264 
Total nonperforming loans and leases, December 31 2,754 2,989 
Foreclosed properties, December 31 121 101 
Nonperforming consumer loans, leases and foreclosed properties, December 31 $ 2,875 $ 3,090 
Nonperforming consumer loans and leases as a percentage of outstanding consumer loans and leases 0.60 % 0.69 %
Nonperforming consumer loans, leases and foreclosed properties as a percentage of outstanding consumer loans, leases and
foreclosed properties 0.63 0.71 
Consumer loans may be returned to performing status when all principal and interest is current and full repayment of the remaining contractual principal and interest is expected, or when the loan
otherwise becomes well-secured and is in the process of collection.
Foreclosed property balances do not include properties insured by certain government-guaranteed loans, principally FHA-insured, of $60 million and $52 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Outstanding consumer loans and leases exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Table 28 presents TDRs  for the consumer real estate portfolio. Performing TDR balances are excluded from nonperforming loans
and leases in Table 27.
Table 28Consumer Real Estate Troubled Debt Restructurings
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(Dollars in millions) Nonperforming Performing Total Nonperforming Performing Total
Residential mortgage $ 1,726 $ 1,548 $ 3,274 $ 1,498 $ 2,278 $ 3,776 
Home equity 324 544 868 254 652 906 
Total consumer real estate troubled debt
restructurings $ 2,050 $ 2,092 $ 4,142 $ 1,752 $ 2,930 $ 4,682 
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, residential mortgage TDRs deemed collateral dependent totaled $1.8 billion and $1.6 billion, and included $1.6 billion and $1.4 billion of loans classified as
nonperforming and $183 million and $279 million of loans classified as performing.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, residential mortgage performing TDRs included $1.1 billion and $1.2 billion of loans that were fully-insured.
At Decem ber 31, 2022 and 2021, home equity TDRs deemed collate ral dependent totaled $411 million and $370 million, and included $293 million and $222 million of loans classified as
nonperforming and $118 million and $148 million of loans classified as performing.
In addition to modifying consumer real estate loans, we work
with customers who are experiencing financ ial difficulty by
modifying credit card and other consumer loans.  Credit card and
other consum er loan modifications generally involve a reduction
in the custo mer’s intere st rate on the account and placing the
customer on a fixed payment plan not exceeding 60 months.
Modifications of credit card and other consumer loans are
made through programs utilizing direct custom er contact, but
may also utilize externa l programs. At December 31, 2022 and
2021, our credit card and other consumer TDR portfolio was
$624 million and $672 million, of which $540 million and $599
million were current or less than 30 days past due under the
modified terms.
Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk
Management
Credit risk management for the commercial portfolio begins with
an assessment of the credit risk profile of the borrower or
counterparty based on an analysis of its financ ial position. As
part of the overall credit risk assessment, our commercial credit
exposures are assigned a risk rating and are subject to approval
based on defined credit approval standards. Subsequent to loan
origination, risk ratings are monitored on an ongoing basis, and
if necessary , adjusted to reflect changes in the financial
condition, cash flow, risk profile or outlook of a borrower or
counterparty . In making credit decisions, we consider risk rating,
collateral, country , indus try and single-name concentration limits
while also balancing these considerations with the total borrower
or counterparty relationship. We use a variety of tools to
continuously monitor the ability of a borrower or counterparty to
perform under its obligations. W e use risk rating aggregationsto measure and evaluate concentrations within portfolios. In
addition, risk ratings are a factor in determini ng the level of
allocated capital and the allowance for credit losses.
As part of our ongoing risk mitigation initiatives, we attempt
to work with clients experiencing financial difficulty to modify
their loans to terms that better align with their current ability to
pay. In situations where an economic concession has been
granted to a borrower experiencing financial difficulty , we identify
these loans as TDRs. For more information on our accounting
policies regarding delinq uencies, nonperforming  status and net
charge-of fs for the commercial portfolio, see Note 1 – Summary
of Significant Accounting Principles to the Consolidated
Financial Statements.
Management of Commercial Credit Risk
Concentrations
Commercial credit risk is evaluated and managed with the goal
that concentrations of credit exposure continue to be aligned
with our risk appetite. We review , measure and manage
concentrations of credit exposure by industry , product,
geography , customer relationship and loan size. We also review ,
measure and manage commercial real estate loans by
geographic location and property type. In addition, within our
non-U.S. portfolio, we evaluate exposures by region and by
country . Tables 33, 36 and 39 summarize our concentrations.
We also utilize syndications of exposure to third parties, loan
sales, hedging and other risk mitigation techniques to manage
the size and risk profile of the commercial credit portfolio. For
more information on our industry concentrations, see Table 36(1)
(2)
(3)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1, 2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
Bank of America 64
and Commercial Portfolio Credit Risk Management – Industry
Concentrations on page 68.
We account for certain large corporate loans and loan
commitments, including  issued but unfunded letters of credit
which are considered utilized for credit risk management
purposes, that exceed our single-name credit risk concentration
guidelines under the fair value option. Lending  commitments,
both funde d and unfunded, are actively managed and
monitored, and as appropriate, credit risk for these lending
relationships may be mitigated through the use of credit
derivatives, with our credit view and market perspectives
determining the size and timing of the hedging activity . In
addition, we purchase credit protection to cover the funded
portion as well as the unfunded portion of certain other credit
exposures. To lessen the cost of obtaining our desired credit
protection levels, credit exposure may be added within an
industry , borrower or counterparty group by selling protection.
These credit derivatives do not meet the requirements for
treatment as accounting hedges. They are carried at fair value
with changes in fair value recorded in other income.
In addition, we are a member of various securities and
derivative exchanges and clearinghouses, both in the U.S. and
other countries. As a member , we may be required to pay a pro-
rata share of the losses incurred by some of these organizations
as a result of another member default and under other loss
scenarios. For more information, see Note 12 – Commitments
and Contingencies to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Commercial Credit Portfolio
During 2022, commercial credit quality improved as charge-of fs,
nonperforming commer cial loans and reservable criticized
utilized exposure declined. Due to the ongoing  Russia/Ukraine
conflict, all direct exposure to Russian counterparties was
downgraded and reported as reservable criticized exposure, and
expected credit losses (ECL) have been incorporated into our
estimate of the allowance for credit losses. Outstandingcommercial loans and leases increased $45.9 billion during
2022 due to growth in commercial and indust rial, primarily in
Global Banking . This increase was partially offset by lower U.S.
small business commercial loans due to repayments of PPP
loans by the Small Business Administration (SBA) under the
terms of the program.
Credit quality of commercial real estate borrowers generally
improved from 2021 as pandemic-impacte d sectors are
recovering. However , many commercial real estate markets,
while improving, are still experiencing disruptio ns in demand,
supply chain challenges, tenant difficulties and challenging
capital markets. Demand for office space continues to be
uncertain as companies evaluate space needs with employment
models that utilize a mix of remote and conventional of fice use.
The commercial allowance for loan and lease losses
remained relatively unchanged at $5.4 billion at December 31,
2022, as loan growth and a dampened macroeconomic outlook
were offset by asset quality improvement and a reserve release
for reduced pandemic uncertainties. For more information, see
Allowance for Credit Losses on page 73.
Total commercial utilized credit exposure increased $51.3
billion during  2022 to $704.9 billion primarily driven by higher
loans and leases and derivative assets. The utilization rate for
loans and leases, standb y letters of credit (SBLCs) and financial
guarantees, and commercial letters of credit, in the aggregate,
was 56 percent at both December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 29 presents commercial credit exposure by type for
utilized, unfunded and total binding committed credit exposure.
Commercial utilized credit exposure include s SBLCs and
financial guarantees and commercial letters of credit that have
been issued  and for which we are legally bound to advance
funds under prescribed conditions during a specified time
period, and excludes exposure related to trading account
assets. Although funds have not yet been advanced, these
exposure types are considered utilized for credit risk
management purposes.
Table 29Commercial Credit Exposure by Type
 Commercial Utilized Commercial Unfunded Total Commercial Committed
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Loans and leases $ 589,362 $ 543,420 $ 487,772 $ 454,256 $ 1,077,134 $ 997,676 
Derivative assets 48,642 35,344 — — 48,642 35,344 
Standby letters of credit and financial guarantees 33,376 34,389 1,266 639 34,642 35,028 
Debt securities and other investments 20,195 19,427 2,551 4,638 22,746 24,065 
Loans held-for-sale 6,112 13,185 3,729 16,581 9,841 29,766 
Operating leases 5,509 5,935 — — 5,509 5,935 
Commercial letters of credit 973 1,176 28 247 1,001 1,423 
Other 698 652 — — 698 652 
Total $ 704,867 $ 653,528 $ 495,346 $ 476,361 $ 1,200,213 $ 1,129,889 
Commercial utilized exposure includes loans of $5.4 billion and $7.2 billion accounted for under the fair value option at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Commercial unfunded exposure includes commitments accounted for under the fair value option with a notional amount of $3.0 billion and $4.8 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Excludes unused business card lines, which are not legally binding.
Includes the notional amount of unfunded legally binding lending comm itments, net of amounts distributed (i.e., syndicated or participated) to other financial institutions. The distributed amounts
were $10.4 billion and $10.7 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Derivative assets are carried at fair value, reflect the effects of legally enforceable master netting agreements and have been reduced by cash collateral of $33.8 billion and $30.8 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. Not reflected in utilized and committed exposure is additional non-cash derivative collateral held of $51.6 billion and $44.8 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021,
which consists primarily of other marketable securities.(1) (2, 3, 4)
(5)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
65 Bank of America
Nonperforming commercial loans decreased $524 million across all product types. Table 30 presents our commercial loans and
leases portfolio and related credit quality information at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 30Commercial Credit Quality
Outstandings NonperformingAccruing Past Due
90 Days or More
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Commercial and industrial:
U.S. commercial $ 358,481 $ 325,936 $ 553 $ 825 $ 190 $ 171 
Non-U.S. commercial 124,479 113,266 212 268 25 19 
Total commercial and industrial 482,960 439,202 765 1,093 215 190 
Commercial real estate 69,766 63,009 271 382 46 40 
Commercial lease financing 13,644 14,825 4 80 8 8 
566,370 517,036 1,040 1,555 269 238 
U.S. small business commercial 17,560 19,183 14 23 355 87 
Commercial loans excluding loans accounted for under the fair
value option $ 583,930 $ 536,219 $ 1,054 $ 1,578 $ 624 $ 325 
Loans accounted for under the fair value option 5,432 7,201 
Total commercial loans and leases $ 589,362 $ 543,420 
Includes card-related products.
Commercial loans accounted for under the fair value option includes U.S. commercial of $2.9 billion and $4.6 billion and non-U.S. commercial of $2.5 billion and $2.6 billion at December 31, 2022
and 2021. For more information on the fair value option, see Note 21 – Fair V alue Option  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Table 31 presents net charge-of fs and related ratios for our commercial loans and leases for 2022 and 2021.
Table 31Commercial Net Charge-offs and Related Ratios
Net Charge-offs Net Charge-off Ratios
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Commercial and industrial:
U.S. commercial $ 71 $ (23) 0.02 % (0.01 %)
Non-U.S. commercial 21 35 0.02 0.04 
Total commercial and industrial 92 12 0.02 — 
Commercial real estate 66 34 0.10 0.06 
Commercial lease financing 5 (1) 0.03 — 
163 45 0.03 0.01 
U.S. small business commercial 154 351 0.86 1.19 
Total commercial $ 317 $ 396 0.06 0.08 
Net charge-of f ratios are calculated as net charge-of fs divided by average outstanding loans and leases, excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Table 32 presents commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure by loan type. Criticized exposure corresponds to the Special
Mention, Substandard and Doubtful asset categories as defined by regulatory authorities. Total commercial reservable criticized
utilized exposure decreased $3.1 billion during 2022, which was broad-based across industries. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, 88
percent and 87 percent of commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure was secured.
Table 32Commercial Reservable Criticized Utilized Exposure 
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Commercial and industrial:
U.S. commercial $ 10,724 2.78 %$ 11,327 3.20 %
Non-U.S. commercial 2,665 2.04 2,582 2.17 
Total commercial and industrial 13,389 2.59 13,909 2.94 
Commercial real estate 5,201 7.30 7,572 11.72 
Commercial lease financing 240 1.76 387 2.61 
18,830 3.13 21,868 3.96 
U.S. small business commercial 444 2.53 513 2.67 
Total commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure $ 19,274 3.12 $ 22,381 3.91 
Total commercial reservable criticize d utilized exposure includes loans and leases of $18.5 billion and $21.2 billion and commercial letters of credit of $817 million and $1.2 billion at December 31,
2022 and 2021.
Percentages are calculated as commercial reservable criticized utilized exposure divided by total commercial reservable utilized exposure for each exposure category .
Commercial and Industrial
Commercial and industrial loans include U.S. commercial and
non-U.S. commercial portfolios.
U.S. Commercial
At December 31, 2022, 63 percent of the U.S. commercial loanportfolio, excluding small business, was managed in Global
Banking,  21 percent in Global Mark ets, 15 percent in GWIM
(loans that provide financing for asset purch ases, business
investments and other liquidity needs for high net worth clients)
and the remainder primarily in Consumer Banking . U.S.
commercial loans increased $32.5 billion, or 10 percent, during(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
 (1)
(1)
(1, 2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 66
2022 primarily driven by Global Banking . Reservable criticized
utilized exposure decreased $603 million, or five percent, driven
by decreases across a broad range of industries.
Non-U.S. Commercial
At Decembe r 31, 2022, 64 percent of the non-U.S. commercial
loan portfolio was managed in Global Banking, 35 percent in
Global Markets and the remainder in GWIM. Non-U.S.
commercial loans increased $11.2 billion, or 10 percent, during
2022 due to loan growth  in Global Mark ets. Reservable  criticized
utilized exposure increased $83 million, or three percent, due to
downgrades for direct exposure to Russian counterparties. For
information on the non-U.S. commercial portfolio , see Non-U.S.
Portfolio on page 70. For more information on the
Russia/Ukraine conflict, see Recent Developments on page 27.
Commercial Real Estate
Commercial real estate primarily includes commercial loans
secured by non-owner-occupied real estate and is dependent on
the sale or lease of the real estate as the primary source of
repayment. Outstanding  loans increased $6.8 billion, or 11
percent, during 2022 to $69.8 billion due to new originations
outpacing paydowns and increased utilizations under existingcredit facilities. Reservable criticized utilized exposure
decreased $2.4 billion, or 31 percent, primarily driven by Hotels
due to improving vacancy rates and reduced travel restrictions.
The portfoli o remains diversified across property types and
geographic regions. California represented the largest state
concentration at 19 percent and 21 percent of the commercial
real estate portfolio at December 31, 2022 and 2021. The
commercial real estate portfolio is predominantly managed in
Global Bank ing and consists of loans made primarily to public
and private developers, and commercial real estate firms.
During 2022, we contin ued to see low default rates and
varying degrees of improvement in certain geographic regions
and property types of the portfolio. We use a number of
proactive risk mitigation initiatives to reduce adversely rated
exposure in the comm ercial real estate portfolio, including
transfers of deteriorating exposures for management by
independent special asset officers and the pursuit of loan
restructurings or asset sales to achieve the best results for our
customers and the Corporation.
Table 33 presents outstanding commercial real estate loans
by geographic region, based on the geographic location of the
collateral, and by property type.
Table 33Outstanding Commercial Real Estate Loans
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
By Geographic Region   
Northeast $ 15,601 $ 14,318 
California 13,360 13,145 
Southwest 8,723 7,510 
Southeast 7,713 6,758 
Florida 5,374 4,367 
Midwest 3,419 3,221 
Illinois 3,327 2,878 
Midsouth 2,716 2,289 
Northwest 1,959 1,709 
Non-U.S. 5,518 4,760 
Other 2,056 2,054 
Total outstanding commercial real estate loans $ 69,766 $ 63,009 
By Property Type   
Non-residential
Office $ 18,230 $ 18,309 
Industrial / Warehouse 13,775 10,749 
Multi-family rental 10,412 8,173 
Shopping centers /Retail 5,830 6,502 
Hotel / Motels 5,696 5,932 
Unsecured 3,195 3,178 
Multi-use 2,403 1,835 
Other 9,046 7,238 
Total non-residential 68,587 61,916 
Residential 1,179 1,093 
Total outstanding commercial real estate loans $ 69,766 $ 63,009 
U.S. Small Business Commercial
The U.S. small business commercial loan portfolio is comprised
of small business card loans and small business loans primarily
managed in Consumer Banking,  and included $1.0 billion and
$4.7 billion of PPP loans outstanding at December 31, 2022 and
2021. The decline of $3.7 billion in PPP loans during 2022 was
primarily due to repayment of the loans by the SBA  underthe terms of the program. Excluding PPP, credit card-related
products were 53 percent and 50 percent of the U.S. small
business commercial portfolio at December 31, 2022 and 2021
and represe nted all of the net charge-of fs in 2022 compared to
95 percent in 2021. The increase of $268 million in accruing
past due 90 days or more in 2022 was driven  by PPP loans,
which are fully guaranteed by the SBA.
67 Bank of America
Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and
Foreclosed Properties Activity
Table 34 presents the nonperforming commerci al loans, leases
and foreclosed properties activity during 2022 and 2021.
Nonperforming loans do not include loans accounted for under
the fair value option. During 2022, nonperforming commercial
loans and leases decreased $524 million to $1.1 billion. AtDecember 31, 2022, 97 percent of commercial nonperforming
loans, leases and foreclosed properties were secured, and 65
percent were contractually current. Commercia l nonperforming
loans were carried at 85 percent of their unpaid principal
balance, as the carrying  value of these loans has been reduced
to the estimated collateral value less costs to sell.
Table 34Nonperforming Commercial Loans, Leases and Foreclosed Properties Activity 
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Nonperforming loans and leases, January 1 $ 1,578 $ 2,227 
Additions 952 1,622 
Reductions:  
Paydowns (825) (1,163)
Sales (57) (199)
Returns to performing status (334) (264)
Charge-offs (221) (254)
Transfers to loans held-for-sale (39) (391)
Total net reductions to nonperforming loans and leases (524) (649)
Total nonperforming loans and leases, December 31 1,054 1,578 
Foreclosed properties, December 31 49 29 
Nonperforming commercial loans, leases and foreclosed properties, December 31 $ 1,103 $ 1,607 
Nonperforming commercial loans and leases as a percentage of outstanding commercial loans and leases 0.18 % 0.29 %
Nonperforming commercial loans, leases and foreclosed properties as a percentage of outstanding commercial loans, leases
and foreclosed properties 0.19 0.30 
Balances do not include nonperforming loans held-for-sale of $219 million and $264 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Includes U.S. small business commercial activity . Small business card loans are excluded as they are not classified as nonperforming.
Commercial loans  and leases may be returned to performing status when all principal and interest is current and full repayment of the remainin g contractual principal and interest is expected, or
when the loan otherwise becomes well-secured and is in the process of collection. TDRs are generally classified as performing after a sustained period of demonstrated payment performance.
Outstanding commercial loans exclude loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Table 35 presents our commercial TDRs by product type and
performing status. U.S. small business comme rcial TDRs are
comprised of renegotiated small business card loans and small
business loans. The renegotiated small business card loans are
not classified as nonperforming as they are charged of f no laterthan the end of the month in which the loan becomes 180 days
past due. Commercial TDRs increased $957 million, or 50
percent, during 2022 primarily due to commercial real estate
loans that were modifie d as TDRs during the first half of the
year.
Table 35Commercial Troubled Debt Restructurings
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(Dollars in millions) Nonperforming Performing Total Nonperforming Performing Total
Commercial and industrial:
U.S. commercial $ 305 $ 985 $ 1,290 $ 359 $ 685 $ 1,044 
Non-U.S. commercial 69 238 307 72 8 80 
Total commercial and industrial 374 1,223 1,597 431 693 1,124 
Commercial real estate 59 1,131 1,190 244 437 681 
Commercial lease financing 3 16 19 50 7 57 
436 2,370 2,806 725 1,137 1,862 
U.S. small business commercial — 51 51 — 38 38 
Total commercial troubled debt restructurings $ 436 $ 2,421 $ 2,857 $ 725 $ 1,175 $ 1,900 
Industry Concentrations
Table 36 presents commercial committed and utilized credit
exposure by industry . Our commercial credit exposure is
diversified across a broad range of industries. Total commercial
committed exposure increased $70.3 billion, or six percent,
during 2022 to $1.2 trillion. The increase in commercial
committed exposure was concentrated in Asset managers and
funds, Global commercial banks and Pharmaceuticals and
biotechnology .
Industry limits are used internally to manage industry
concentrations and are based on committed exposure that is
determined on an industry-by-industry basis. A risk management
framework is in place to set and approve industry limits as well
as to provide ongoing monitoring.
Asset managers and funds, our largest industry
concentration with committed exposure of $165.1 billion,increased $28.2 billion, or 21 percent, during 2022 primarily
driven by investment-grade exposures.
Real estate, our second  largest industry conce ntration with
committed exposure of $99.7 billion, increased $3.5 billion, or
four percent, during 2022. For more information on the
commercial real estate and related portfolios, see Commercial
Portfolio Credit Risk Management – Commercial Real Estate on
page 67.
Capital goods, our third largest industry conce ntration with
committed exposure of $87.3 billion, increased $3.0 billion, or
four percent, during 2022. The increase in committed exposure
occurred primarily as a result of increases in the Electrical
equipment and Trading  companies and distri butors, partially
offset by a decrease in Building products.
While the U.S. and global economies have shown signs of
relief from the pandemic, uncertainty remains as a result of(1, 2)
(3)
(4)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 68
geopolitical and inflationary pressures, and a number of
industries will likely continue to be adversely impacted due to
these conditions. W e continue to monitor all industries,particularly higher risk industries that are experiencing or could
experience a more significant impact to their financial condition.
Table 36Commercial Credit Exposure by Industry 
Commercial
UtilizedTotal Commercial
Committed 
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Asset managers & funds $ 106,842 $ 89,786 $ 165,087 $ 136,914 
Real estate 72,180 69,384 99,722 96,202 
Capital goods 45,580 42,784 87,314 84,293 
Finance companies 55,248 59,327 79,546 86,009 
Healthcare equipment and services 33,554 32,003 58,761 58,195 
Materials 26,304 25,133 55,589 53,652 
Retailing 24,785 24,514 53,714 50,816 
Government & public education 34,861 37,597 48,134 50,066 
Food, beverage and tobacco 23,232 21,584 47,486 45,419 
Consumer services 26,980 28,172 47,372 48,052 
Individuals and trusts 34,897 29,752 45,572 39,869 
Commercial services and supplies 23,628 22,390 41,596 42,451 
Utilities 20,292 17,082 40,164 36,855 
Energy 15,132 14,217 36,043 34,136 
Transportation 22,273 21,079 33,858 32,015 
Technology hardware and equipment 11,441 10,159 29,825 26,910 
Global commercial banks 27,217 20,062 29,293 21,390 
Media 14,781 12,495 28,216 26,318 
Pharmaceuticals and biotechnology 7,547 5,608 26,208 19,439 
Software and services 12,961 10,663 25,633 27,643 
Consumer durables and apparel 10,009 9,740 21,389 21,226 
Vehicle dealers 12,909 11,030 20,638 15,678 
Insurance 10,224 5,743 19,444 14,323 
Telecommunication services 9,679 10,056 17,349 21,270 
Automobiles and components 8,774 9,236 16,911 17,052 
Food and staples retailing 7,157 6,902 11,908 12,226 
Financial markets infrastructure (clearinghouses) 3,913 3,876 8,752 6,076 
Religious and social organizations 2,467 3,154 4,689 5,394 
Total commercial credit exposure by industry $ 704,867 $ 653,528 $ 1,200,213 $ 1,129,889 
Includes U.S. small business commercial exposure.
Includes the notional amount of unfunded legally binding lending comm itments, net of amounts distributed (i.e., syndicated or participated) to other financial institutions. The distributed amounts
were $10.4 billion and $10.7 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Industries are viewed from a variety of perspectives to best isolate the perceived risks. For purposes of this table, the real estate industry is defined based on the primary business activity of the
borrowers or counterparties using operating cash flows and primary source of repayment as key factors.
Risk Mitigation
We purchas e credit protection to cover the funded portion as
well as the unfunded portion of certain credit exposures. To
lower the cost of obtain ing our desired credit protection levels,
we may add credit exposure within an indust ry, borrower or
counterparty group by selling protection.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, net notional credit default
protection purchased in our credit derivatives portfolio to hedge
our funded and unfunde d exposures for which we elected the
fair value option, as well as certain other credit exposures, was
$9.0 billion and $2.6 billion. We recorded net losses of $37
million in 2022 compared to net losses $91 million in 2021. The
gains and losses on these instruments were largely offset by
gains and losses on the related exposures. The Value-at-Risk
(VaR) result s for these exposures are included in the fair value
option portfolio information in Table 43. For more information,
see Trading Risk Management on page 76.Tables 37 and 38 present the maturity profiles and the credit
exposure debt ratings of the net credit default protection portfolio
at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Table 37Net Credit Default Protection by Maturity
December 31
2022 2021
Less than or equal to one year 14 % 34 %
Greater than one year and less than or equal
to five years 85 62 
Greater than five years 1 4 
Total net credit default protection 100 % 100 %(1)
(2)
 (3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
69 Bank of America
Table 38Net Credit Default Protection by Credit
Exposure Debt Rating
Net
Notional Percent of
TotalNet
Notional Percent of
Total
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Ratings     
AAA $ (379) 4.0 %$ — — %
AA (867) 10.0 — — 
A (3,257) 36.0 (350) 13.4 
BBB (2,476) 28.0 (710) 27.1 
BB (1,049) 12.0 (809) 30.9 
B (676) 7.0 (659) 25.2 
CCC and below (93) 1.0 (35) 1.3 
NR (182) 2.0 (55) 2.1 
Total net credit
default protection$ (8,979) 100.0 %$(2,618) 100.0 %
Represents net credit default protection purchased.
Ratings are refreshed on a quarterly basis.
Ratings of BBB- or higher are considered to meet the definition of investment grade.
NR is comprised of index positions held and any names that have not been rated.
In addition to our net notional credit default protection
purchased to cover the funded and unfunded portion of certain
credit exposures, credit derivatives are used for market-making
activities for clients and establishing positions intended to profit
from directional or relative value changes. We execute the
majority of our credit derivative trades in the OTC market with
large, multin ational financial institutions, including broker-dealers
and, to a lesser degree, with a variety of other investors.
Because these transactions are executed in the OTC market,
we are subject to settlem ent risk. We are also subject to credit
risk in the event that these counterparties fail to perform under
the terms of these contracts. In order to properly reflect
counterparty credit risk, we record counterparty credit risk
valuation adjustments on certain derivative asse ts, including our
purchased credit default protection. In most cases, credit
derivative transactions are executed on a daily margin basis.
Therefore, events such as a credit downgrade, depending on
the ultimate rating level, or a breach of credit covenants would
typically require an incre ase in the amount of collateral required
by the counterparty , where applicable, and/or allow us to take
additional protective measures such as early termination of alltrades. For more information on credit derivatives and
counterparty credit risk valuation adjustments, see Note 3 –
Derivatives  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Non-U.S. Portfolio
Our non-U.S. credit and trading portfolios are subject to country
risk. We define country risk as the risk of loss from unfavorable
economic and political conditions, currency fluctuations, social
instability and changes in government policies. A risk
management framework is in place to measure, monitor and
manage non-U.S. risk and exposures. In addition to the direct
risk of doing business in a country , we also are exposed to
indirect country risks (e.g., related to the collate ral received on
secured financing transactions or related to client clearing
activities). These indirect exposures are managed in the normal
course of business through credit, market and operational risk
governance rather than through country risk governance.
Table 39 presents our 20 largest non-U.S. country exposures
at December 31, 2022. These exposures accounted for 89
percent of our total non-U.S. exposure at both December 31,
2022 and 2021. Net country exposure for these 20 countries
increased $24.0 billion in 2022 primarily driven by increases in
Germany , Japan, Ireland, India and Switzerland, partially offset
by decreases in China, Belgium, Australia and Singapore.
Non-U.S. exposure is presented on an internal risk
management basis and includes sovereign and non-sovereign
credit exposure, securities and other investments issued by or
domiciled in countries other than the U.S.
Funded loans and loan equivalents include loans, leases,
and other extensions of credit and funds, including letters of
credit and due from placements. Unfunded commitments are the
undrawn portion of legally binding commitments related to loans
and loan equivalents. Net counterparty exposu re includes the
fair value of derivatives, including the counterparty risk
associated with credit default swaps (CDS), and secured
financing transactions. Securities and other investments are
carried at fair value and long securities exposures are netted
against short exposures with the same underlying issuer to, but
not below , zero. Net country exposure represents country
exposure less hedges and credit default protec tion purchased,
net of credit default protection sold.(1) (1)
(2, 3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 70
Table 39Top 20 Non-U.S. Countries Exposure
(Dollars in millions)Funded Loans
 and Loan
 EquivalentsUnfunded
 Loan
 CommitmentsNet
 Counterparty
 ExposureSecurities/
Other
InvestmentsCountry
Exposure at
December 31
2022Hedges and
Credit Default
ProtectionNet Country
Exposure at
December 31
2022Increase
(Decrease)
from
December 31
2021
United Kingdom $ 29,965 $ 16,601 $ 7,243 $ 2,570 $ 56,379 $ (1,034)$ 55,345 $ 376 
Germany 32,248 9,431 2,190 2,742 46,611 (885) 45,726 11,901 
France 13,888 8,064 2,023 3,604 27,579 (986) 26,593 1,686 
Canada 10,992 10,094 1,472 3,383 25,941 (368) 25,573 (738)
Japan 19,239 1,806 1,366 1,502 23,913 (826) 23,087 5,825 
Australia 14,412 4,013 568 1,510 20,503 (286) 20,217 (1,087)
Brazil 6,175 1,413 741 4,199 12,528 (28) 12,500 (250)
China 6,489 294 1,378 2,932 11,093 (285) 10,808 (1,774)
India 6,805 589 614 2,841 10,849 (80) 10,769 2,138 
Switzerland 7,039 3,063 469 438 11,009 (321) 10,688 2,113 
Singapore 4,017 627 126 4,874 9,644 (37) 9,607 (1,058)
Netherlands 3,169 4,892 617 1,402 10,080 (797) 9,283 (313)
South Korea 6,103 927 504 1,664 9,198 (72) 9,126 974 
Ireland 7,678 1,157 151 230 9,216 (126) 9,090 3,551 
Mexico 4,444 1,753 514 743 7,454 (62) 7,392 930 
Hong Kong 5,123 523 466 1,181 7,293 (22) 7,271 (56)
Spain 2,433 2,170 398 1,067 6,068 (227) 5,841 (79)
Italy 3,883 1,777 184 426 6,270 (602) 5,668 464 
Saudi Arabia 2,428 1,465 219 15 4,127 (109) 4,018 545 
Belgium 1,433 1,489 184 910 4,016 (153) 3,863 (1,168)
Total top 20 non-U.S.
countries exposure $ 187,963 $ 72,148 $ 21,427 $ 38,233 $ 319,771 $ (7,306)$ 312,465 $ 23,980 
Our largest non-U.S. country exposure at December 31,
2022 was the United Kingdom with net exposure of $55.3 billion,
which represents an increase of $376 million from December 31,
2021. The increase was primarily driven by net counterparty
exposure with financial institutions, partially offset by a reduction
in deposits with the central bank. Our second largest non-U.S.
country exposure was Germany with net exposure of $45.7
billion at December 31, 2022, an increase of $11.9 billion from
December 31, 2021. The increase was driven by higher deposits
with the central bank and increased exposure with financial
institutions and corporates.Loan and Lease Contractual Maturities
Table 40 disaggregates total outstanding loans and leases by
remaining scheduled principal due dates and interest rates. The
amounts provided do not reflect prepayment assumptions or
hedging activities related  to the loan portfolio. For information on
the asset sensitivity of our total banking book balance sheet, see
Interest Rate Risk Mana gement for the Banking Book on page
79.
71 Bank of America
Table 40Loan and Lease Contractual Maturities 
 December 31, 2022
(Dollars in millions)Due in One
Year or LessDue After One
Year Through
Five YearsDue After Five
Years Through
15 YearsDue After 15
Years Total
Residential mortgage $ 5,660 $ 32,546 $ 94,544 $ 96,991 $ 229,741 
Home equity 251 1,195 5,076 20,309 26,831 
Credit card 93,421 — — — 93,421 
Direct/Indirect consumer 65,877 35,066 4,464 829 106,236 
Other consumer 156 — — — 156 
Total consumer loans 165,365 68,807 104,084 118,129 456,385 
U.S. commercial 97,153 242,313 20,343 1,584 361,393 
Non-U.S. commercial 49,662 52,826 22,436 2,075 126,999 
Commercial real estate 19,199 48,051 1,650 866 69,766 
Commercial lease financing 2,737 8,214 1,026 1,667 13,644 
U.S. small business commercial 10,615 4,474 2,407 64 17,560 
Total commercial loans 179,366 355,878 47,862 6,256 589,362 
Total loans and leases $ 344,731 $ 424,685 $ 151,946 $ 124,385 $ 1,045,747 
Amount due in one year or less at: Amount due after one year at:
(Dollars in millions)Variable Interest
RatesFixed Interest
RatesVariable Interest
RatesFixed Interest
Rates Total
Residential mortgage $ 1,007 $ 4,653 $ 83,441 $ 140,640 $ 229,741 
Home equity 203 48 22,438 4,142 26,831 
Credit card 88,113 5,308 — — 93,421 
Direct/Indirect consumer 47,240 18,637 2,857 37,502 106,236 
Other consumer — 156 — — 156 
Total consumer loans 136,563 28,802 108,736 182,284 456,385 
U.S. commercial 73,593 23,560 223,099 41,141 361,393 
Non-U.S. commercial 42,692 6,970 75,355 1,982 126,999 
Commercial real estate 18,361 838 49,247 1,320 69,766 
Commercial lease financing 229 2,508 3,696 7,211 13,644 
U.S. small business commercial 6,363 4,252 109 6,836 17,560 
Total commercial loans 141,238 38,128 351,506 58,490 589,362 
Total loans and leases $ 277,801 $ 66,930 $ 460,242 $ 240,774 $ 1,045,747 
Includes loans accounted for under the fair value option.(1)
(1)
Bank of America 72
Allowance for Credit Losses
The allowance for credit losses increased $379 million from
December 31, 2021 to $14.2 billion at December 31, 2022,
which includ ed a $202 million reserve increase related to the
consumer portfolio and a $177 million reserve increase related
to the commercial portfolio. The increase in the allowance wasprimarily driven by loan growth and a dampened
macroeconomic outlook, partially offset by a reserve release for
reduced pandemic uncertainties.
Table 41 presents an allocation of the allowan ce for credit
losses by product type at December 31, 2022  and 2021.
Table 41Allocation of the Allowance for Credit Losses by Product Type
AmountPercent of
TotalPercent of
Loans and
Leases
Outstanding AmountPercent of
TotalPercent of
Loans and
Leases
Outstanding 
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Allowance for loan and lease losses       
Residential mortgage $ 328 2.59 % 0.14 %$ 351 2.83 % 0.16 %
Home equity 92 0.73 0.35 206 1.66 0.74 
Credit card 6,136 48.38 6.57 5,907 47.70 7.25 
Direct/Indirect consumer 585 4.61 0.55 523 4.22 0.51 
Other consumer 96 0.76 n/m 46 0.37 n/m
Total consumer 7,237 57.07 1.59 7,033 56.78 1.62 
U.S. commercial 3,007 23.71 0.80 3,019 24.37 0.87 
Non-U.S. commercial 1,194 9.41 0.96 975 7.87 0.86 
Commercial real estate 1,192 9.40 1.71 1,292 10.43 2.05 
Commercial lease financing 52 0.41 0.38 68 0.55 0.46 
Total commercial 5,445 42.93 0.93 5,354 43.22 1.00 
Allowance for loan and lease losses 12,682 100.00 % 1.22 12,387 100.00 % 1.28 
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments 1,540 1,456  
Allowance for credit losses $ 14,222 $ 13,843 
Ratios are calculated as allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of loans and leases outstanding excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Includes allowance for loan and lease losses for U.S. small business commercial loans of $844 million and $1.2 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
n/m = not meaningful
Net charge-of fs for both 2022 and 2021 were $2.2 billion as
credit card losses, which remained near historic lows, were
partially offset by higher overdrafts charged off in other
consumer due to payment activity related to checking accounts.
The provision for credit losses increased $7.1 billion to an
expense of $2.5 billion during 2022 compared to 2021. The
provision for credit losses in 2022 was primarily  driven by loan
growth and a dampened  macroeconomic outlook, partially offset
by a reserve release for reduced pandemic uncertainties. The
provision for credit losses for the consumer portfolio, including
unfunded lending comm itments, increased $3.2 billion to an
expense of $2.0 billion during 2022 compared to 2021. Theprovision for credit losses for the commercial portfolio, including
unfunded lending commitments, increased $3.9 billion to an
expense of $495 million for 2022 compared to 2021.
Table 42 presents a rollforward of the allowan ce for credit
losses, including certain  loan and allowance ratios for 2022 and
2021. For more information on the Corporation’ s credit loss
accounting policies and activity related to the allowance for
credit losses , see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles and Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and Leases and
Allowance for Credit Losses  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.(1) (1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
73 Bank of America
Table 42Allowance for Credit Losses
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 12,387 $ 18,802 
Loans and leases charged off
Residential mortgage (161) (34)
Home equity (45) (44)
Credit card (1,985) (2,411)
Direct/Indirect consumer (232) (297)
Other consumer (538) (292)
Total consumer charge-offs (2,961) (3,078)
U.S. commercial (354) (626)
Non-U.S. commercial (41) (47)
Commercial real estate (75) (46)
Commercial lease financing (8) — 
Total commercial charge-offs (478) (719)
Total loans and leases charged off (3,439) (3,797)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off
Residential mortgage 89 62 
Home equity 135 163 
Credit card 651 688 
Direct/Indirect consumer 214 296 
Other consumer 17 22 
Total consumer recoveries 1,106 1,231 
U.S. commercial 129 298 
Non-U.S. commercial 20 12 
Commercial real estate 9 12 
Commercial lease financing 3 1 
Total commercial recoveries 161 323 
Total recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 1,267 1,554 
Net charge-offs (2,172) (2,243)
Provision for loan and lease losses 2,460 (4,173)
Other 7 1 
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 12,682 12,387 
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 1,456 1,878 
Provision for unfunded lending commitments 83 (421)
Other 1 (1)
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 1,540 1,456 
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 14,222 $ 13,843 
Loan and allowance ratios :
Loans and leases outstanding at December 31 $ 1,039,976 $ 971,305 
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total loans and leases outstanding at December 31 1.22 % 1.28 %
Consumer allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total consumer loans and leases outstanding at December 31 1.59 1.62 
Commercial allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total commercial loans and leases outstanding at December
31 0.93 1.00 
Average loans and leases outstanding $ 1,010,799 $ 913,354 
Net charge-offs as a percentage of average loans and leases outstanding 0.21 % 0.25 %
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming loans and leases at December 31 333 271 
Ratio of the allowance for loan and lease losses at December 31 to net charge-offs 5.84 5.52 
Amounts included in allowance for loan and lease losses for loans and leases that are excluded from nonperforming loans and
leases at December 31 $ 6,998 $ 7,027 
Allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of total nonperforming loans and leases, excluding the allowance for loan
and lease losses for loans and leases that are excluded from nonperforming loans and leases at December 31 149 % 117 %
Includes U.S. small business commercial charge-of fs of $203 million in 2022 compared to $425 million in 2021.
Includes U.S. small business commercial recoveries of $49 million in 2022 compared to $74 million in 2021.
Ratios are calculated as allowance for loan and lease losses as a percentage of loans and leases outstanding excluding loans accounted for under the fair value option.
Primarily includes amounts related to credit card and unsecured consumer lending portfolios in Consumer Banking .(1)
(2)
(3) 
(4)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 74
Market Risk Management
Market risk is the risk that changes in market conditions may
adversely impact the value of assets or liabilities, or otherwise
negatively impact earnin gs. This risk is inherent in the financial
instruments associated with our operations, primarily within our
Global Mark ets segment. We are also exposed to these risks in
other areas of the Corp oration (e.g., our ALM activities). In the
event of market stress, these risks could have a material impact
on our results. For more information, see Interest Rate Risk
Management for the Banking Book on page 79.
Our traditional banking loan and deposit products are non-
trading positions and are generally reported at amortized cost
for assets or the amou nt owed for liabilities (historical cost).
However , these positions are still subject to changes in
economic value based on varying market conditions, with one of
the primary risks being changes in the levels of interest rates.
The risk of adverse changes in the economic value of our non-
trading positions arising from changes in interest rates is
managed through our ALM activities. We have elected to
account for certain assets and liabilities unde r the fair value
option.
Our trading positions are reported at fair value with changes
reflected in income. Trading positions are subject to various
changes in market-base d risk factors. The majority of this risk is
generated by our activities in the interest rate, foreign exchange,
credit, equity and commodities markets. In addition, the values
of assets and liabilities  could change due to market liquidity ,
correlations across markets and expectations of market volatility .
We seek to manage these risk exposures by using a variety of
techniques that encompass a broad range of financial
instruments. The key risk management techniques are
discussed in more detail in the Trading Risk Management
section.
GRM is responsible for providing senior management with a
clear and comprehensive understanding of the trading risks to
which we are exposed. These responsibilities include ownership
of market risk policy , developing and maintaining quantitative
risk models, calculating aggregated risk measures, establishing
and monitoring position limits consistent with risk appetite,
conducting daily reviews and analysis of trading inventory ,
approving material risk exposures and fulfilling regulatory
requirements. Market risks that impact busine sses outside of
Global Markets  are monitored and governed by their respective
governance functions.
Model risk is the potential for adverse consequences from
decisions based on incorrect or misused model outputs and
reports. Given that models are used across the Corporation,
model risk impacts all risk types including credit, market and
operational risks. The Enterprise Model Risk Policy defines
model risk standards, consistent with our Risk Framework and
risk appetite, prevailing regulatory guidance and industry best
practice. All models, including risk management, valuation and
regulatory capital models, must meet certain validation criteria,
including effective challenge of the conceptual soundness of the
model, independent model testing and ongoing monitoring
through outcomes analy sis and benchmarking. The Enterprise
Model Risk Committee, a subcommittee of the MRC, oversees
that model standards are consistent with model risk
requirements and monitors the effective challenge in the model
validation process across the Corporation.
Interest Rate Risk
Interest rate risk represents exposures to instruments whose
values vary with the level or volatility of interest rates. These
instruments include, but are not limited to, loans, debtsecurities, certain tradin g-related assets and liabilities, deposits,
borrowings and derivatives. Hedging instrum ents used to
mitigate these risks include derivatives such as options, futures,
forwards and swaps.
Foreign Exchange Risk
Foreign exchange risk represents exposures to changes in the
values of current holdings and future cash flows  denominated in
currencies other than the U.S. dollar . The types of instruments
exposed to this risk include investments  in non-U.S.
subsidiaries, foreign currency-denominated loans and securities,
future cash flows in foreign currencies arising from foreign
exchange transactions, foreign currency-denom inated debt and
various foreign exchan ge derivatives whose values fluctuate
with changes in the level or volatility of currency exchange rates
or non-U.S. interest rates. Hedging instruments used to mitigate
this risk include foreign exchange options, currency swaps,
futures, forwards, and foreign currency-denomi nated debt and
deposits.
Mortgage Risk
Mortgage risk represents exposures to changes in the values of
mortgage-related instruments. The values of these instruments
are sensitive to prepayment rates, mortgage rates, agency debt
ratings, default, market liquidity , government participation and
interest rate volatility . Our exposure to these instruments takes
several forms. For exam ple, we trade and engage in market-
making activities in a variety of mortgage securities including
whole loans , pass-through certificates, commercial mortgages
and collater alized mortgage obligations including collateralized
debt obligations using mortgages as underlyin g collateral. In
addition, we originate a variety of MBS, which involves the
accumulation of mortgage-related loans in anticipation of
eventual securitization, and we may hold positions in mortgage
securities and residential mortgage loans as part of the ALM
portfolio. We also record MSRs as part of our mortgage
origination activities. Hedging instruments used to mitigate this
risk include derivatives such as options, swaps, futures and
forwards as well as securities including MBS and U.S. Treasury
securities. For more information, see Mortgage Banking Risk
Management on page 80.
Equity Market Risk
Equity market risk represents exposures to securities that
represent an ownership interest in a corporatio n in the form of
domestic and foreign common stock or other equity-linked
instruments. Instruments that would lead to this exposure
include, but are not limited to, the following: common stock,
exchange-traded funds, American Depositary Receipts,
convertible bonds, listed equity options (puts and calls), OTC
equity options, equity total return swaps, equity index futures
and other equity derivative products. Hedging instruments used
to mitigate this risk include options, futures, swaps, convertible
bonds and cash positions.
Commodity Risk
Commodity risk represents exposures to instru ments traded in
the petroleum, natural gas, power and metals markets. These
instruments consist primarily of futures, forwards, swaps and
options. Hedging instruments used to mitigate this risk include
options, futures and swaps in the same or similar commodity
product, as well as cash positions.
75 Bank of America
Issuer Credit Risk
Issuer credit risk represents exposures to changes in the
creditworthiness of individual issuers or groups of issuers. Our
portfolio is exposed to issuer credit risk where the value of an
asset may be adversely  impacted by changes in the levels of
credit spreads, by credit migration or by defaults. Hedging
instruments used to mitigate this risk include bonds, CDS and
other credit fixed-income instruments.
Market Liquidity Risk
Market liquidity risk repre sents the risk that the level of expected
market activity changes dramatically and, in certain cases, may
even cease. This expose s us to the risk that we will not be able
to transact business and execute trades in an orderly manner
which may impact our results. This impact could be further
exacerbated if expected hedging or pricing correlations are
compromised by disproportionate demand or lack of demand for
certain instruments. We utilize various risk mitigating techniques
as discussed in more detail in Trading Risk Management.
Trading Risk Management
To evaluate risks in our trading activities, we focus on the actual
and potential volatility of revenues generated by individual
positions as well as portfolios of positions. Various techniques
and procedures are utilized to enable the most complete
understanding of these risks. Quantitative measures of market
risk are evaluated on a daily basis from a single  position to the
portfolio of the Corporation. These measures include
sensitivities of positions to various market risk factors, such as
the potential impact on revenue from a one basis point change
in interest rates, and statistical measures utilizing both actual
and hypothetical market moves, such as VaR and stress testing.
Periods of extreme market stress influence the reliability of
these techniques to varying degrees. Qualitative evaluations of
market risk utilize the suite of quantitative risk measures while
understanding each of their respective limitations. Additionally ,
risk managers independently evaluate the risk of the portfolios
under the current market environment and potential future
environments.
VaR is a common statistic used to measure market risk as it
allows the aggregation of market risk factors, including the
effects of portfolio diversification. A VaR model simulates the
value of a portfolio under a range of scenarios in order to
generate a distribution of potential gains and losses. VaR
represents the loss a portfolio is not expected to exceed more
than a certain number of times per period, based on a specified
holding period, confidence level and window of historical data.
We use one VaR model consistently across the trading portfolios
and it uses a historical simulation approach based on a three-
year window of historical data. Our primary VaR statistic is
equivalent to a 99 percent confidence level, which means that
for a VaR with a one-day holding period, there should not be
losses in excess of V aR, on average, 99 out of 100 trading days.
Within any VaR model, there are significant and numerous
assumptions that will differ from company to company . The
accuracy of a VaR mode l depends on the availability and quality
of historical data for each of the risk factors in the portfolio. A
VaR model may require additional modeling assumptions for
new products that do not have the necessary historical market
data or for less liquid positions for which accur ate daily prices
are not consistently available. For positions with insuf ficient
historical data for the VaR calculation, the process for
establishing an appropriate proxy is based on fundamental andstatistical analysis of the new product or less liquid position. This
analysis identifies reasonable alternatives that replicate both the
expected volatility and correlation to other market risk factors
that the missing data would be expected to experience.
VaR may not be indica tive of realized revenue volatility as
changes in market conditions or in the composition of the
portfolio can have a material impact on the results. In particular ,
the historical data used for the VaR calculation  might indicate
higher or lower levels of portfolio diversification than will be
experienced. In order for the VaR model to reflect current market
conditions, we update the historical data underlying our VaR
model on a weekly basis, or more frequently during periods of
market stress, and regularly review the assump tions underlying
the model. A minor portion of risks related to our trading
positions is not included in VaR. These risks are reviewed as
part of our ICAAP . For more information regard ing ICAAP , see
Capital Management on page 49.
GRM continually reviews, evaluates and enhances our VaR
model so that it reflects the material risks in our trading portfolio.
Changes to the VaR model are reviewed and approved prior to
implementation and any material changes are reported to
management through the appropriate management committees.
Trading limits on quanti tative risk measures, including VaR,
are independently set by Global Markets  Risk Management and
reviewed on a regular basis so that trading limits remain relevant
and within our overall risk appetite for market risks. Trading
limits are reviewed in the context of market liquidity , volatility and
strategic business priorities. Trading limits are set at both a
granular level to allow for extensive coverage of risks as well as
at aggregated portfolios to account for correlations among risk
factors. All trading limits are approved at least annually .
Approved trading limits are stored and tracked in a centralized
limits management system. Trading limit excesses are
communicated to management for review . Certain quantitative
market risk measures and corresponding limits have been
identified as critical in the Corporation’ s Risk Appetite
Statement. These risk appetite limits are reported on a daily
basis and are approved  at least annually by the ERC and the
Board.
In periods of market stress, Global Markets  senior leadership
communicates daily to discuss losses, key risk positions and
any limit excesses. As a result of this process, the businesses
may selectively reduce risk.
Table 43 presents the total market-based portfolio VaR,
which is the combination  of the total covered positions (and less
liquid trading positions) portfolio and the fair value option
portfolio. Covered positions are defined by regulatory standards
as trading assets and liabilities, both on- and off-balance sheet,
that meet a defined set of specifications. These specifications
identify the most liquid trading positions which are intended to
be held for a short-term horizon and where we are able to hedge
the material risk elemen ts in a two-way market. Positions in less
liquid markets, or where  there are restrictions on the ability to
trade the positions, typically do not qualify as covered positions.
Foreign exchange and commodity positions are always
considered covered positions, except for structural foreign
currency positions that are excluded with prior regulatory
approval.
In addition, Table 43 presents our fair value option portfolio,
which includes substantially all of the funded and unfunded
exposures for which we elect the fair value option, and their
corresponding hedges. Additionally , market risk VaR for trading
activities as presented in Table 43 differs from VaR used for
regulatory capital calculations due to the holding period being
Bank of America 76
used. The holding perio d for VaR used for regulatory capital
calculations is 10 days, while for the market risk VaR presented
below , it is one day. Both measures utilize the same process
and methodology .
The total market-based portfolio VaR results in Table 43
include market risk to which we are exposed from all business
segments, excluding credit valuation adjustment (CVA), DVA
and related hedges. The majority of this portfolio is within the
Global Markets  segment.
Table 43 presents year-end, average, high and low daily
trading V aR for 2022 and 2021 using a 99 percent confidencelevel. The amounts disclosed in Table 43 and Table 44 align to
the view of covered positions used in the Basel 3 capital
calculations. Foreign exchange and commodity positions are
always cons idered cove red positions, regardless of trading or
banking treatment for the trade, except for structural foreign
currency positions that are excluded with prior regulatory
approval.
The annual average of total covered positions and less liquid
trading positions portfolio VaR increased for 2022 compared to
2021 driven by heigh tened market volatility and reduced
diversification across asset classes.
Table 43Market Risk VaR for Trading Activities
2022 2021
(Dollars in millions)Year
End Average High LowYear
End Average High Low
Foreign exchange $ 38 $ 21 $ 39 $ 12 $ 11 $ 12 $ 21 $ 5 
Interest rate 36 36 56 24 54 40 80 16 
Credit 76 71 106 52 73 69 84 53 
Equity 18 20 33 12 21 24 35 19 
Commodities 8 13 27 7 6 8 28 4 
Portfolio diversification (81) (91) n/a n/a (114) (100) n/a n/a
Total covered positions portfolio 95 70 140 42 51 53 85 34 
Impact from less liquid exposures 35 38 n/a n/a 8 20 n/a n/a
Total covered positions and less liquid trading positions portfolio 130 108 236 61 59 73 125 46 
Fair value option loans 48 51 65 37 51 50 65 31 
Fair value option hedges 16 17 24 13 15 16 20 11 
Fair value option portfolio diversification (38) (36) n/a n/a (27) (32) n/a n/a
Total fair value option portfolio 26 32 44 23 39 34 53 23 
Portfolio diversification 9 (11) n/a n/a (24) (10) n/a n/a
Total market-based portfolio $ 165 $ 129 287 70 $ 74 $ 97 169 54 
The high and low for each portfolio may have occurred on different trading days than the high and low for the components. Therefore the impact from less liquid exposures and the amount of
portfolio diversification, which is the dif ference between the total portfolio and the sum of the individual components, is not relevant.
Impact is net of diversification ef fects between the covered positions and less liquid trading positions portfolios.
n/a = not applicable
The following graph presents the daily covered positions and less liquid trading positions portfoli o VaR for 2022, corresponding to
the data in Table 43.
Additional VaR statistics produced within our single VaR model are provided in Table 44 at the same level of detail as in Table 43.
Evaluating VaR with additional statistics allows for an increased understanding of the risks in the portfolio, as the historical market
data used in the VaR calculation does not nece ssarily follow a predefined statistical distribution . Table 44 presents average trading
VaR statistics at 99 percent and 95 percent confidence levels for 2022 and 2021. (1)  (1)  (1)  (1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
77 Bank of America
Table 44Average Market Risk VaR for Trading Activities – 99 percent and 95 percent VaR Statistics
2022 2021
(Dollars in millions) 99 percent 95 percent 99 percent 95 percent
Foreign exchange $ 21 $ 12 $ 12 $ 8 
Interest rate 36 17 40 20 
Credit 71 28 69 21 
Equity 20 11 24 12 
Commodities 13 7 8 4 
Portfolio diversification (91) (46) (100) (39)
Total covered positions portfolio 70 29 53 26 
Impact from less liquid exposures 38 7 20 2 
Total covered positions and less liquid trading positions portfolio 108 36 73 28 
Fair value option loans 51 14 50 12 
Fair value option hedges 17 10 16 9 
Fair value option portfolio diversification (36) (13) (32) (9)
Total fair value option portfolio 32 11 34 12 
Portfolio diversification (11) (7) (10) (7)
Total market-based portfolio $ 129 $ 40 $ 97 $ 33 
Backtesting
The accuracy of the VaR methodology is evaluated by
backtesting, which compares the daily VaR results, utilizing a
one-day holding period, against a comparable subset of trading
revenue. A backtesting excess occurs when a trading loss
exceeds the V aR for the corresponding day . These excesses are
evaluated to understand the positions and market moves that
produced the trading loss with a goal to help confirm that the
VaR methodology accurately represents those losses. We
expect the frequency of trading losses in excess of VaR to be in
line with the confidence  level of the VaR statistic being tested.
For example, with a 99 percent confidence level, we expect one
trading loss in excess of VaR every 100 days or between two to
three trading losses in excess of VaR over the course of a year.
The number of backtesting excesses observed can differ from
the statistically expected number of excesses if the current level
of market volatility is materially different than the level of market
volatility that existed during the three years of historical data
used in the V aR calculation.
The trading revenue used for backtesting is defined by
regulatory agencies in order to most closely align with the VaR
component of the regulatory capital calculation. This revenue
differs from total trading-related revenue in that it excludes
revenue from trading activities that either do not generate
market risk or the market risk cannot be included in VaR. Some
examples of the types of revenue excluded for backtesting are
fees, commissions, reserves, net interest income and intra-day
trading revenues.
We conduct  daily backtesting on the VaR results used for
regulatory capital calculations as well as the VaR results for key
legal entities, regions and risk factors. These results are
reported to senior market risk management. Senior
management regularly reviews and evaluates the results of
these tests.
During 2022, there was one day where this subset of trading
revenue had losses that exceeded our total covered portfolio
VaR, utilizing a one-day holding period.
Total Trading-related Revenue
Total trading -related revenue, excluding brokerage fees, and
CVA, DVA and funding  valuation adjustment gains (losses),
represents the total amount earned from trading positions,
including market-based net interest income, which are taken in a
diverse range of financial instruments and markets. For more
information on fair value, see Note 20 – Fair Value
Measurements  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.Trading-related revenue can be volatile and is largely driven by
general market condition s and customer demand. Also, trading-
related revenue is dependent on the volume and type of
transactions, the level of risk assumed, and the volatility of price
and rate movements at any given time within the ever-changing
market environment. Significant daily revenue by business is
monitored and the primary drivers of these are reviewed.
The following histogram is a graphic depiction of trading
volatility and illustrates the daily level of trading-related revenue
for 2022 and 2021. During 2022, positive trading-related
revenue was recorded for 99 percent of the trading days, of
which 90 percent were daily trading gains of over $25 million,
and the largest loss was $9 million. This compares to 2021
where posit ive trading-related revenue was recorded for 97
percent of the trading days, of which 80 percent were daily
trading gains of over $25 million, and the largest loss was $45
million.
Trading Portfolio Stress Testing
Because the very nature of a VaR model suggests results can
exceed our estimates and it is dependent on a limited historical
window , we also stress test our portfolio using scenario analysis.
This analysis estimates the change in the value of our trading
portfolio that may result from abnormal market movements.
A set of scenarios, categorized as either historical or
hypothetical, are computed daily for the overall trading portfolio
and individual businesses. These scenarios include shocks to
underlying market risk factors that may be well beyond the
shocks found in the historical data used to calculate V aR.
Bank of America 78
Historical scenarios simulate the impact of the market moves
that occurred during a period of extended historical market
stress. Generally , a multi-week period representing the most
severe point during a crisis is selected for each historical
scenario. Hypothetical scenarios provide estimated portfolio
impacts from potential future market stress events. Scenarios
are reviewed and updated in response to changing positions
and new economic or political information. In addition, new or ad
hoc scenarios are developed to address specific potential
market events or particular vulnerabilities in the portfolio. The
stress tests are reviewe d on a regular basis and the results are
presented to senior management.
Stress testing for the trading portfolio is integrated with
enterprise-wide stress testing and incorporated  into the limits
framework. The macroeconomic scenarios used  for enterprise-
wide stress testing purposes differ from the typical trading
portfolio scenarios in that they have a longer time horizon and
the results are forecasted over multiple periods for use in
consolidated capital and liquidity planning. For more information,
see Managing Risk on page 46.
Interest Rate Risk Management for the
Banking Book
The following discussion presents net intere st income for
banking book activities.
Interest rate risk represents the most significant market risk
exposure to our banking  book balance sheet. Interest rate risk is
measured as the potential change in net interest income caused
by movements in market interest rates. Client-facing activities,
primarily lending and deposit-taking, create  interest rate
sensitive positions on our balance sheet.
We prepare forward-looking forecasts of net interest income.
The baseline  forecast takes into consideration expected future
business growth, ALM positioning and the future direction of
interest rate movements as implied by market-based forward
curves.
We then measure and evaluate the impact that alternative
interest rate scenarios have on the baseline forecast in order to
assess interest rate sensitivity under varied conditions. The net
interest income forecast is frequently updated for changing
assumptions and differing outlooks based on economic trends,
market cond itions and business strategies. Thus , we continually
monitor our banking book balance sheet position in order to
maintain an acceptable level of exposure to interest rate
changes.
The interes t rate scenarios that we analyze incorporate
balance sheet assumptions such as loan and deposit growth
and pricing, changes in funding mix, product repricing, maturity
characteristics and investment securities premium amortization.
Our overall goal is to manage interest rate risk so that
movements in interest rates do not significantly adversely affect
earnings and capital.
Table 45 presents the spot and 12-month forwar d rates used
in developing the forward curve used in our baseline forecasts at
December 31, 2022 and 2021.Table 45Forward Rates
December 31, 2022
 Federal
FundsThree-month
LIBOR10-Year
Swap
Spot rates 4.50 % 4.77 % 3.84 %
12-month forward rates 4.75 4.78 3.62 
December 31, 2021
Spot rates 0.25 % 0.21 % 1.58 %
12-month forward rates 1.00 1.07 1.84 
Table 46 shows the pretax impact to forecasted net interest
income over the next 12 months from Decembe r 31, 2022 and
2021 resulting from instantaneous parallel and non-parallel
shocks to the market-based forward curve. Periodically , we
evaluate the scenarios presented so that they are meaningful in
the context of the curre nt rate environment. The interest rate
scenarios also assume U.S. dollar interest rates are floored at
zero. Depending on the level of interest rates, Down-rate
scenarios may not receive the full impact of the rate shock,
particularly in low rate environments.
The overall decrease in asset sensitivity , as shown in the
following table, to Up-rate scenarios was primarily due to an
increase in long-end and short-end rates. We continue to be
asset sensit ive to a parallel upward move in interest rates with
the majority of that impact coming from the short end of the yield
curve. Additionally , higher interest rates negatively impact the
fair value of our debt securities classified as available for sale
and adversely affect accumulated OCI and thus capital levels
under the Basel 3 capital rules. Under instantaneous upward
parallel shifts, the near- term adverse impact to Basel 3 capital
would be reduced over time by offsetting positiv e impacts to net
interest income generated from the banking book activities. For
more information on Basel 3, see Capital Management –
Regulatory Capital on page 50.
Table 46Estimated Banking Book Net Interest
Income Sensitivity to Curve Changes
Short
Rate
(bps)Long
Rate
(bps)December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Parallel Shifts
+100 bps
instantaneous shift +100 +100$ 3,829 $ 6,542 
 -100 bps
  instantaneous shift -100 -100 (4,591) n/m
Flatteners   
Short-end
instantaneous change +100 — 3,698 4,982 
Long-end
instantaneous change — -100 (157) n/m
Steepeners   
Short-end
instantaneous change -100 — (4,420) n/m
Long-end
instantaneous change — +100 131 1,646 
n/m = not meaningful
79 Bank of America
The sensitivity analysis in Table 46 assumes that we take no
action in response to these rate shocks and does not assume
any change  in other macroeconomic variables normally
correlated with changes in interest rates. As part of our ALM
activities, we use securities, certain residential mortgages, and
interest rate and foreign exchange derivative s in managing
interest rate sensitivity .
The behavior of our deposit portfolio in the baseline forecast
and in alternate interest  rate scenarios is a key assumption in
our projected estimates of net interest income. The sensitivity
analysis in Table 46 assu mes no change in deposit portfolio size
or mix from the baseline forecast in alternate rate environments.
In higher rate scenarios, any customer activity resulting in the
replacement of low-cost or noninterest-bearing  deposits with
higher yielding deposits or market-based funding would reduce
our benefit in those scenarios.
Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Derivative
Contracts
We use interest rate and foreign exchange derivative contracts
in our ALM activities to manage our interest rate and foreign
exchange risks. Specifically , we use those derivatives to
manage both the variability in cash flows and changes in fair
value of various assets  and liabilities arising from those risks.
Our interest rate derivative contracts are generally non-
leveraged swaps tied to various benchmark interest rates and
foreign exchange basis swaps, options, futures  and forwards,
and our foreign excha nge contracts include cross-currency
interest rate swaps, foreign currency futures contracts, foreign
currency forward contracts and options.
The derivati ves used in our ALM activities can be split into
two broad categories: designated accounting hedges and other
risk manage ment derivatives. Designated accounting hedges
are primarily used to manage our exposure to interest rates as
described in the Interest Rate Risk Management  for the Banking
Book section and are included in the sensitivities presented in
Table 46. The Corporation also uses foreign currency derivatives
in accounting hedges to manage substantially all of the foreign
exchange risk of our foreign operations. By hedging the foreign
exchange risk of our foreign operations, the Corporation's
market risk exposure in this area is not significant.
Risk management derivatives are predominan tly used to
hedge foreign exchange risks related to various foreign
currency-denominated assets and liabilities and eliminate
substantially all foreign currency exposures in the cash flows of
the Corporation’ s non-trading foreign currency-denominated
financial instruments. These foreign exchange derivatives are
sensitive to other market risk exposures such as cross-currency
basis spreads and interest rate risk. However , as these features
are not a significant component of these foreign exchange
derivatives, the market risk related to this exposure is not
significant. For more information on the accounting for
derivatives, see Note 3 – Derivatives  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements.
Mortgage Banking Risk Management
We originate, fund and service mortgage loans, which subject us
to credit, liquidity and interest rate risks, among others. We
determine whether loans will be held for investm ent or held for
sale at the time of commitment and manage credit and liquidity
risks by selling or securitizing a portion of the loans we originate.
Interest rate risk and market risk can be substantial in the
mortgage business. Changes in interest rates and other market
factors impact the volume of mortgage originations. Changes ininterest rates also impact the value of interest rate lock
commitments (IRLCs) and the related residential first mortgage
LHFS betwe en the date of the IRLC and the date the loans are
sold to the secondary market. An increase in mortgage interest
rates typica lly leads to a decrease in the value of these
instruments. Conversely , when there is an increase in interest
rates, the value of the MSRs will increase driven by lower
prepayment expectations. Because the interest rate risks of
these hedged items offset, we combine them into one overall
hedged item with one combined economic hedge portfolio
consisting of derivative contracts and securities.
During 2022, 2021 and 2020, we recorded gains of $78
million, $39 million and $321 million. For more information on
MSRs, see Note 20 – Fair Value Measurements  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
Compliance and Operational Risk
Management
Compliance risk is the risk of legal or regula tory sanctions,
material financial loss or damage to the reputation of the
Corporation arising from the failure of the Corpo ration to comply
with the requirements of applicable laws, rules, regulations and
our internal policies and procedures (collectively , applicable
laws, rules and regulations). We are subject to comprehensive
regulation under federal and state laws, rules and regulations in
the U.S. and the laws of the various jurisdictions in which we
operate, including those related to financial crimes and anti-
money laundering, market conduct, trading activities, fair
lending, privacy , data protection and unfair , deceptive or abusive
acts or practices.
Operational risk is the risk of loss resulting from inadequate
or failed processes or systems, people or exter nal events, and
includes legal risk. Operational risk may occur anywhere in the
Corporation, including third-party business processes, and is not
limited to operations functions. The Corporation faces a number
of key operational risks including third-party risk, model risk,
conduct risk, technology risk, information security risk and data
risk. Operational risk can result in financial losses and
reputational impacts and is a component in the calculation of
total RWA used in the Basel 3 capital calculation. For more
information on Basel 3 calculations, see Capital Management on
page 49.
FLUs and control functions are first and foremost responsible
for managing all aspects of their businesses, including their
compliance and operational risk. FLUs and control functions are
required to understand their business process es and related
risks and controls, including third-party depend encies and the
related regulatory requirements, and monitor and report on the
effectiveness of the control environment. In order to actively
monitor and assess the performance of their processes and
controls, they must conduct comprehensive quality assurance
activities and identify issues and risks to remedi ate control gaps
and weaknesses. FLUs and control functions must also adhere
to compliance and operational risk appetite limits to meet
strategic, capital and financial planning objectives. Finally , FLUs
and control functions are responsible for the proactive
identification, managem ent and escalation of compliance and
operational risks across the Corporation. Collectively , these
efforts are important to strengthen their compliance and
operational resiliency , which is the ability to deliver critical
operations through disruption.
Global Compliance and Operational Risk teams
independently assess compliance and operation al risk, monitor
business activities and processes and evaluate FLUs and
control functions for adherence to applicable laws, rules and
regulations, including identifying issues and risks, and reporting
Bank of America 80
on the state of the control environment. Corporate Audit
provides an independent assessment and validation through
testing of key compliance and operational risk processes and
controls across the Corporation.
The Corpor ation's Glob al Compliance – Enter prise Policy
and Operational Risk Management – Enterprise Policy set the
requirements for reporting compliance and operational risk
information to executive management as well as the Board or
appropriate Board-leve l committees and reflect Global
Compliance and Operational Risk’ s responsibilities for
conducting independent oversight of the Corporation’ s
compliance and operational risk management  activities. The
Board provides oversight of compliance risk through its Audit
Committee and the ERC, and operational risk through its ERC.
A key operational risk facing the Corporation is information
security , which includes cybersecurity . Cybersecurity risk
includes exposure to failures or interruptions of service or
security breaches result ing from malicious techn ological attacks
that impact the confidentiality , integrity or availability of our or
third parties' operations, systems or data. The Corporation
seeks to mitigate information security risk and associated
reputational and compliance risk by employing  a multi-layered
and intellig ence-led Global Information Security Program
focused on preparing for, preventing, detecting, mitigating,
responding to and recovering from cyber threats and incidents
and effectively operating the Corporation ’s processes.
Additionally , our business continuity policy , standards and
procedures are designed to maintain the availability of business
functions and enable impacted units within the Corporation and
third parties to achieve  strategic objectives in the event of a
cybersecurity incident.
The Global Information Security Program is supported by
three lines of defense. The Global Information Security Team
within the first line of defense is responsible for the day-to-day
management of the Global Information Security Program, which
includes defining policies and procedures to safeguard the
Corporation’ s informati on systems and data, conducting
vulnerability and third-party information securit y assessments,
information security event management (e.g.,  responding to
ransomware and distributed denial of service attacks),
evaluation of external cyber intelligence, supporting industry
cybersecurity efforts and working with governmental agencies,
and developing employee training to support adherence to the
Corporation’ s policies and procedures. As the second line of
defense, Global Compliance and Operational Risk
independently assesses , monitors and tests information security
risk across the Corporation, as well as the effectiveness of the
Global Information Security Program. Corporate Audit serves as
the third line of defen se, conducting additional independent
review and validation of the first-line processes and functions.
As part of our Global Information Security Progra m, we leverage
both internal and external assessments and partnerships with
industry leaders to help approach information security
holistically . Additionally the Corporation maintains a
comprehensive enterpris e-wide program that defines standards
for the planning, sourcing, management, and oversight of third-
party relationships and third-party access to its system, facilities,
and/or confidential or proprietary data for a business purpose or
supervisory function.
Through established governance structures , we have
processes to help facilitate appropriate and effective oversight of
information security risk. These routines enable our three lines
of defense and management to debate information security risks
and monitor control performance to allow for further escalation
to executive management, management andBoard-level committees or to the Board, as appropriate. The
Board is actively engage d in the oversight of Bank of America’ s
Global Information Security Program and devotes significant
time and attention to the oversight of cybersecurity and
information security risk. The Board regularly discusses
cybersecurity and information security risks with the Chief
Technology and Information Officer and the Chief Information
Security Officer. Additionally , the ERC receives regular reporting,
and reviews and approves the Information Security Program and
Policy on an annual basis.
Reputational Risk Management
Reputational risk is the risk that negative perception of the
Corporation may adversely impact profitability  or operations.
Reputational risk may result from many of the Corporation’ s
activities, including those related to the management of our
strategic, operational, compliance and credit risks.
The Corporation manages reputational risk through
established policies and controls embedded throughout its
business and risk management processes. We proactively
monitor and identify potential reputational risk events and have
processes established to mitigate reputational risks in a timely
manner . If reputational risk events occur , we focus on
remediating the underlying issue and taking action to minimize
damage to the Corporation’ s reputation. The Corporation has
processes and procedures in place to respond  to events that
give rise to reputational risk, including educating individuals and
organizations that influence public opinion, implementing
external communication strategies to mitigate the risk, and
informing key stakehold ers of potential reputational risks. The
Corporation’ s organization and governance structure provides
oversight of reputational risks. Reputational risk reporting is
provided regularly and directly to senior management and the
ERC, which provides primary oversight of reputational risk. In
addition, each FLU has a committee, which includes
representatives from Legal and Risk, that is responsible for the
oversight of reputational risk, including approv al for business
activities that present elevated levels of reputational risks.
Climate Risk Management
Climate-related risks are divided into two major categories: (1)
risks related to the physical impacts of climate change, driven by
extreme weather events such as hurricanes and floods, as well
as chronic longer-term shifts such as rising average global
temperatures and sea levels, and (2) risks related to the
transition to a low-carbon economy , which may entail extensive
policy , legal, technology and market changes. These changes
and events may have broad impacts on operations, supply
chains, distribution networks, customers and markets and are
otherwise referred to, respectively , as physical risk and transition
risk. These risks may impact both financial and nonfinancial risk
types. Physical risk may lead to increased credit risk by
diminishing borrowers’  repayment capacity or impacting the
value of collateral. Physical risk may also increase operational
risk by impacting the Corporation’ s facilities, employees,
customers or vendors. Transition risks may amplify credit risk
through the financial impacts of changes in policy, technology or
the market  on the Corporation or its counterparties.
Unanticipated market changes can lead to sudden price
adjustments and give rise to heightened market risk. In addition,
reputational risk may arise, including from our climate-related
practices and disclosures and if we do not meet our climate-
related commitments.
Effective management of climate risk requires  coordinated
governance, clearly defined roles and responsibilities and well-
81 Bank of America
developed processes to identify , measure, monitor and control
risks. As climate risk spans all key risk types, we have
developed and continue to enhance processes to embed
climate risk considerations into our Risk Framework and risk
management programs established for strategic, credit, market,
liquidity , compliance, operational and reputational risks. Our
Environmental and Social Risk Policy Framework aligns with our
Risk Fram ework and provides additional clarity and
transparency regarding our approach to environmental and
social risks, inclusive of climate risk.
Our governance framework establishes oversig ht of climate
risk practice s and strategies by the Board, supported by its
ERC, as well as the MRC and the Responsible Growth
Committee, both of which are management-level committees
comprised of senior leaders across every major FLU and control
function. The Responsible Growth Committee is supported by
the ESG Disclosure sub-committee, which is responsible for
reviewing and providing oversight of the Corporation’ s climate
and ESG-related public disclosures.
Our climate risk management efforts are overseen by an
executive officer who reports to the CRO. The Climate Risk
Council, which consists of leaders across risk, FLU and control
functions, meets routinely to discuss our approach to managing
climate-related risks in line with our Risk Framework.
In 2021, we publicly announced our commitment to achieve
net zero emissions in our financing activities, operations, and
supply chain before 2050 (Net Zero Goal) and set 2030
emissions targets for our operations and supply chain. In
connection with our Net Zero Goal, in 2022, we announced a
target to reduce emissions by 2030 associated with our
financing activities related to auto manufacturing, energy and
power generation (2030 Targets). In our September 2022 Task
Force on Climate-related Financial Disclosur es Report, we
disclosed our 2019 and 2020 financed emissions and emissions
intensity metrics for these sectors, with 2019 serving as the
baseline for our 2030 Targets.
We plan to disclose the financed emissions for additional
portions of our business loan portfolio in 2023, and we plan to
set financing activity emission reduction targets for other key
sectors by April 2024.
Achieving our climate--r elated goals and targe ts, including
our Net Zero Goal and 2030 Targets, may require technological
advances, clearly define d roadmaps for industry sectors, new
standards and public policies, including those that improve the
cost of capital for the transition to a low-carbon economy and
better emissions data reporting, as well as ongo ing, strong and
active enga gement with customers, suppliers, investors,
government of ficials and other stakeholders.
Given the extended period of these and other climate-related
goals we have establish ed, our initiatives have not resulted in a
significant effect on our results of operations or financial position
in the relevant periods presented herein.
For more information about climate-related matters, including
how the Corporation  manages climate risk, and the
Corporation’ s climate-re lated goals and commitments, including
our plans to achieve our Net Zero Goal and 2030 Targets and
progress on our sustainable finance goals, see the Corporation’ s
website, including our 2022 Task Force on Climate-related
Financial Disclosures Report and the 2022Annual Report to shareholders available on the Investor
Relations portion of our website in March 2023. The contents of
the Corporation’ s website and 2022 Annual Report to
shareholders are not incorporated by reference into this Annual
Report on Form 10-K. For more information on climate-related
risks, see Item 1A. Risk Factors on page 8.
The foregoing discussion and our discussion in the 2022
Annual Report to shareholders regarding our goals and
commitments with respect to climate risk manage ment, including
environmental transition considerations, include “forward-looking
statements” within the meaning of the Private Securities
Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are not
guarantees of future results or performance and involve certain
known and unknown risks, uncertainties and assumptions that
are difficult to predict and are often beyond the Corporation’ s
control. Actual outcomes and results may differ materially from
those expressed in, or implied by, any of these forward-looking
statements.
Complex Accounting Estimates
Our significant accounting principles, as describ ed in Note 1 –
Summary of Significant Accounting Principles  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements, are essential in
understanding the MD&A. Many of our signific ant accounting
principles require complex judgments to estimate the values of
assets and liabilities. We have procedures and processes in
place to facilitate making these judgments.
The more judgmental estimates are summarized in the
following discussion. We have identified and described the
development of the variables most important in the estimation
processes that involve mathematical models to derive the
estimates. In many cases, there are numerous alternative
judgments that could be used in the process of determining the
inputs to the models. Where alternatives exist, we have used the
factors that we believe represent the most reasonable value in
developing the inputs. Actual performance that differs from our
estimates of the key variables could materially impact our results
of operations. Separate from the possible future impact to our
results of operations from input and model variables, the value
of our lending portfolio and market-sensitive assets and liabilities
may change subsequent to the balance sheet date, often
significantly , due to the nature and magnitude of future credit
and market conditions. Such credit and market conditions may
change quickly and in unforeseen ways and the resulting
volatility could have a significant, negative effect on future
operating results. These fluctuations would not be indicative of
deficiencies in our models or inputs.
Allowance for Credit Losses
The allowan ce for credit losses includes the allowance for loan
and lease losses and the reserve for unfunded lending
commitments. Our process for determining the allowance for
credit losses  is discussed in Note 1 – Summary of Significant
Accounting Principles  and Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and
Leases and Allowance for Credit Losses  to the Consolidated
Financial Statements.
The determination of the allowance for credit losses is based
on numerous estimates and assumptions, which require
Bank of America 82
a high degree of judgment and are often interrelated. A critical
judgment in the process  is the weighting of our forward-looking
macroeconomic scenar ios that are incorpo rated into our
quantitative models. As any one economic outlook is inherently
uncertain, the Corporation uses multiple macroeconomic
scenarios in its ECL calculation, which have included a baseline
scenario derived from consensus estimates , an adverse
scenario reflecting an extended moderate recession, a downside
scenario reflecting persistent inflation and interest rates above
the baseline  scenario, a tail risk scenario similar  to the severely
adverse scenario used in stress testing and an upside scenario
that considers the potential for improvement above the baseline
scenario. The overall economic outlook is weighted 95 percent
towards a recessionary environment in 2023, with continued
inflationary pressures leading to lower gross domestic product
(GDP) and higher unemployment rate expectations as
compared to the prior year. Generally , as the consensus
estimates improve or deteriorate, the allowance for credit losses
will change in a similar direction. There are multiple variables
that drive the macroeconomic scenarios with the key variables
including, but not limited to, U.S. GDP  and unem ployment rates.
As of December 31, 2021, the weighted macroeconomic outlook
for the U.S. average unemployment rate was forecasted at 5.2
percent, 4.7 percent and 4.3 percent in the fourth quarters of
2022, 2023  and 2024, respectively , and the weighted
macroeconomic outlook for U.S. GDP  was forecasted to grow at
2.1 percent,  1.9 percent and 1.9 percent year-over-year in the
fourth quart ers of 2022, 2023 and 2024, respectively . As of
December 31, 2022, the latest consensus estimates for the U.S.
average unemployment rate for the fourth quarter of 2022 was
3.7 percent and U.S. GDP  was forecasted to grow 0.4 percent
year-over-year in the fourth quarter of 2022, reflecting a tighter
labor market and depressed growth expectations compared to
our macroeconomic outlook as of December 31, 2021, and were
factored into our allowance for credit losses estimate as of
December 31, 2022. In addition, as of Decembe r 31, 2022, the
weighted macroeconomic outlook for the U.S. average
unemployment rate was forecasted at 5.6 percent and 5.0
percent in the fourth quarters of 2023 and 2024, and the
weighted macroeconomic outlook for U.S. GDP  was forecasted
to contract 0.4 percent and grow 1.2 percent year-over-year in
the fourth quarters of 2023 and 2024.
In addition to the above judgments and estimates, the
allowance for credit losses can also be impacted by
unanticipated changes in asset quality of the portfolio, such as
increases or decreases in credit and/or internal risk ratings in
our commercial portfolio, improvement or deterioration in
borrower delinquencies or credit scores in our credit card
portfolio and increases or decreases in home prices, which is a
primary drive r of LTVs, in our consumer real estate portfolio, all
of which have some degree of uncertainty . The allowance for
credit losses increased to $14.2 billion from $13.8 billion at
December 31, 2021, primarily due to loan growth and a
dampened macroeconomic outlook in 2022.
To provide an illustration of the sensitivity of the
macroeconomic scenarios and other assumptions on the
estimate of our allowance for credit losses, the Corporation
compared the December 31, 2022 modeled ECL from the
baseline scenario and our adverse scenario. Relative to the
baseline scenario, the adverse scenario assumed a peak U.S.
unemployment rate of nearly three percentag e points higher
than the baseline scena rio, a decline in U.S. GDP  followed by a
prolonged recovery and a lower home price outlook with a
difference of approximately eight percent at the trough. Thissensitivity analysis resulted in a hypothetical increase in the
allowance for credit losses of approximately $4 billion.
While the sensitivity analysis may be useful to understand
how change s in macroeconomic assumptions could impact our
modeled ECLs, it is not meant to forecast how our allowance for
credit losses is expected to change in a different
macroeconomic outlook . Importantly , the analysis does not
incorporate a variety of factors, including qualitative reserves
and the weighting of alternate scenarios, which could have
offsetting effects on the estimate. Considering the variety of
factors contemplated when developing and weighting
macroeconomic outlooks such as recent economic events,
leading economic indicators, views of internal  and third-party
economists and industry trends, in addition to other qualitative
factors, the Corporation believes the allowance for credit losses
at December 31, 2022 is appropriate.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
Under appli cable accou nting standards, we are required to
maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of
unobservable inputs in measuring fair value. We classify fair
value measu rements of financial instruments and MSRs based
on the three-level fair value hierarchy in the accounting
standards.
The fair values of assets and liabilities may include
adjustments, such as market liquidity and credit quality , where
appropriate. Valuations of products using models or other
techniques are sensitive to assumptions used for the significant
inputs. Where market data is available, the inputs used for
valuation reflect that information as of our valuation date. Inputs
to valuation models are considered unobservable if they are
supported by little or no market activity . In periods of extreme
volatility , lessened liquid ity or in illiquid markets, there may be
more variability in marke t pricing or a lack of market data to use
in the valuation process.  In keeping with the prudent application
of estimates and management judgment in determining the fair
value of assets and liabilities, we have in place various
processes and controls that include: a model validation policy
that requires review and approval of quantitative models used
for deal pricing, financial statement fair value determination and
risk quantif ication; a trading product valuation policy that
requires verification of all traded product valuations; and a
periodic review and substantiation of daily profit and loss
reporting for all traded products. Primarily through validation
controls, we utilize both broker and pricing service inputs which
can and do include both market-observable and internally-
modeled values and/or valuation inputs. Our reliance on this
information is affected by our understanding of how the broker
and/or pricin g service develops its data with a higher degree of
reliance applied to those  that are more directly observable and
lesser reliance applied to those developed through their own
internal modeling. For example, broker quotes in less active
markets may only be indicative and therefore less reliable.
These processes and controls are performed independently of
the business. For more  information, see Note 20 – Fair Value
Measurements  and Note 21 – Fair Value Option to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
Level 3 Assets and Liabilities
Financial assets and liabilities, and MSRs, where values are
based on valuation techniques that require inputs that are both
unobservable and are significant to the overall fair value
measurement are classified as Level 3 under the fair value
hierarchy established in applicable accounting standards. The
fair value of these Level 3 financial assets and liabilities and
83 Bank of America
MSRs is determined using pricing models, discounted cash flow
methodologies or similar techniques for which the determination
of fair value requires significant managemen t judgment or
estimation.
Level 3 financial instruments may be hedged with derivatives
classified as Level 1 or 2; therefore, gains or losses associated
with Level 3 financial instruments may be offset by gains or
losses associated with financial instruments classified in other
levels of the fair value hierarchy . The Level 3 gains and losses
recorded in earnings did not have a significant impact on our
liquidity or capital. We conduct a review of our fair value
hierarchy classifications on a quarterly basis. Transfers into or
out of Level 3 are made if the significant inputs used in the
financial models measuring the fair values of the assets and
liabilities became unobs ervable or observable, respectively , in
the current marketplace. For more information on transfers into
and out of Level 3 during 2022, 2021 and 2020, see Note 20 –
Fair Value Measurements to the Consolidated Financial
Statements.
Accrued Income Taxes and Deferred Tax Assets
Accrued income taxes, reported as a component of either other
assets or accrued expenses and other liabilities on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet, represent the net amount of
current income taxes we expect to pay to or receive from
various taxing jurisdictions attributable to our operations to date.
We currently file income tax returns in more than 100
jurisdictions and consider many factors, including statutory ,
judicial and regulatory guidance, in estimating the appropriate
accrued income taxes for each jurisdiction.
Net deferred tax assets , reported as a component of other
assets on the Consolidated Balance Sheet, represent the net
decrease in taxes expected to be paid in the future because of
net operating loss (NOL) and tax credit carryforwards andbecause of future reversals of temporary differences in the
bases of assets and liabilities as measured by tax laws and their
bases as reported in the financial statements. NOL and tax
credit carryforwards result in reductions to future tax liabilities,
and many of these attributes can expire if not utilized within
certain periods. We consider the need for valuation allowances
to reduce net deferred  tax assets to the amounts that we
estimate are more likely than not to be realized.
Consistent with the applicable accounting guidance, we
monitor relevant tax authorities and change our estimates of
accrued income taxes and/or net deferred tax assets due to
changes in income tax laws and their interpretation by the courts
and regulatory authorities. These revisions of our estimates,
which also may result from our income tax planning and from
the resolution of income  tax audit matters, may be material to
our operating results for any given period.
See Note 19 – Income Taxes  to the Consolidated Financial
Statements for a table of significant tax attributes and additional
information. For more information, see page 17 under Item 1A.
Risk Factors – Regulatory , Compliance and Legal.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets
The nature of and accounting for goodwill and intangible assets
are discussed in Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles , and Note 7 – Goodwill and Intangible Assets  to the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
We completed our annual goodwill impairment test as of
June 30, 2022. Based on our assessment, we have concluded
that goodwill was not impaired.
Certain Contingent Liabilities
For more information on the complex judgments associated with
certain contingent liabilities, see Note 12 – Commitments and
Contingencies  to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
Bank of America 84
Non-GAAP  Reconciliations
Tables 47 and 48 provide reconciliations of certain non-GAAP  financial measures to GAAP  financial measures.
Table 47Annual Reconciliations to GAAP Financial Measures 
(Dollars in millions, shares in thousands) 2022 2021 2020
Reconciliation of average shareholders’ equity to average tangible shareholders’ equity and average tangible
common shareholders’ equity 
  
Shareholders’ equity $270,299 $273,757 $267,309 
Goodwill (69,022) (69,005) (68,951)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (2,117) (2,177) (1,862)
Related deferred tax liabilities 922 916 821 
Tangible shareholders’ equity $200,082 $203,491 $197,317 
Preferred stock (28,318) (23,970) (23,624)
Tangible common shareholders’ equity $171,764 $179,521 $173,693 
Reconciliation of year-end shareholders’ equity to year-end tangible shareholders’ equity and year-end tangible
common shareholders’ equity  
Shareholders’ equity $273,197 $270,066 $272,924 
Goodwill (69,022) (69,022) (68,951)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (2,075) (2,153) (2,151)
Related deferred tax liabilities 899 929 920 
Tangible shareholders’ equity $202,999 $199,820 $202,742 
Preferred stock (28,397) (24,708) (24,510)
Tangible common shareholders’ equity $174,602 $175,112 $178,232 
Reconciliation of year-end assets to year-end tangible assets   
Assets $3,051,375 $3,169,495 $2,819,627 
Goodwill (69,022) (69,022) (68,951)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (2,075) (2,153) (2,151)
Related deferred tax liabilities 899 929 920 
Tangible assets $2,981,177 $3,099,249 $2,749,445 
Presents reconcilia tions of non-GAAP  financial measures to GAAP  finan cial measures. For more information on non-GAAP  financial measures and ratios we use in assessing the results of the
Corporation, see Supplemental Financial Data on page 32.
Table 48Quarterly Reconciliations to GAAP Financial Measures 
2022 Quarters 2021 Quarters
(Dollars in millions) Fourth Third Second First Fourth Third Second First
Reconciliation of average shareholders’
equity to average tangible shareholders’
equity and average tangible common
shareholders’ equity         
Shareholders’ equity $272,629 $271,017 $268,197 $269,309 $270,883 $275,484 $274,632 $274,047 
Goodwill (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,023) (69,023) (68,951)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (2,088) (2,107) (2,127) (2,146) (2,166) (2,185) (2,212) (2,146)
Related deferred tax liabilities 914 920 926 929 913 915 915 920 
Tangible shareholders’ equity $202,433 $200,808 $197,974 $199,070 $200,608 $205,191 $204,312 $203,870 
Preferred stock (28,982) (29,134) (28,674) (26,444) (24,364) (23,441) (23,684) (24,399)
Tangible common shareholders’ equity $173,451 $171,674 $169,300 $172,626 $176,244 $181,750 $180,628 $179,471 
Reconciliation of period-end shareholders’
equity to period-end tangible shareholders’
equity and period-end tangible common
shareholders’ equity         
Shareholders’ equity $273,197 $269,524 $269,118 $266,617 $270,066 $272,464 $277,119 $274,000 
Goodwill (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,023) (69,023) (68,951)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (2,075) (2,094) (2,114) (2,133) (2,153) (2,172) (2,192) (2,134)
Related deferred tax liabilities 899 915 920 926 929 913 915 915 
Tangible shareholders’ equity $202,999 $199,323 $198,902 $196,388 $199,820 $202,182 $206,819 $203,830 
Preferred stock (28,397) (29,134) (29,134) (27,137) (24,708) (23,441) (23,441) (24,319)
Tangible common shareholders’ equity $174,602 $170,189 $169,768 $169,251 $175,112 $178,741 $183,378 $179,511 
Reconciliation of period-end assets to
period-end tangible assets         
Assets $3,051,375 $3,072,953 $3,111,606 $3,238,223 $3,169,495 $3,085,446 $3,029,894 $2,969,992 
Goodwill (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,022) (69,023) (69,023) (68,951)
Intangible assets (excluding MSRs) (2,075) (2,094) (2,114) (2,133) (2,153) (2,172) (2,192) (2,134)
Related deferred tax liabilities 899 915 920 926 929 913 915 915 
Tangible assets $2,981,177 $3,002,752 $3,041,390 $3,167,994 $3,099,249 $3,015,164 $2,959,594 $2,899,822 
Presents reconcilia tions of non-GAAP  financial measures to GAAP  finan cial measures. For more information on non-GAAP  financial measures and ratios we use in assessing the results of the
Corporation, see Supplemental Financial Data on page 32.(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
85 Bank of America
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
See Market Risk Management on page 75 in the MD&A  and the sections referenced therein for Quantitative and Qualitative
Disclosures about Market Risk.
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Table of Contents
Page
Consolidated Statement of Income 90
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income 90
Consolidated Balance Sheet 91
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Shareholders’  Equity 92
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows 93
Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles 94
Note 2 – Net Interest Income and Noninterest Income 103
Note 3 – Derivatives 104
Note 4 – Securities 111
Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and Leases and Allowance for Credit Losses 114
Note 6 – Securitizations and Other V ariable Interest Entities 124
Note 7 – Goodwill and Intangible Assets 128
Note 8 – Leases
129
Note 9 – Deposits 130
Note 10 – Securities Financing Agreements, Short-term Borrowings, Collateral and Restricted Cash 130
Note 11 – Long-term Debt 132
Note 12 – Commitments and Contingencies 133
Note 13 – Shareholders’  Equity 137
Note 14 – Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income 139
Note 15 – Earnings Per Common Share 139
Note 16 – Regulatory Requirements and Restrictions 140
Note 17 – Employee Benefit Plans 141
Note 18 – Stock-based Compensation Plans 146
Note 19 – Income Taxes 146
Note 20 – Fair V alue Measurements 148
Note 21 – Fair V alue Option 157
Note 22 – Fair V alue of Financial Instruments 159
Note 23 – Business Segment Information 160
Note 24 – Parent Company Information 163
Note 25 – Performance by Geographical Area 165
Glossary 166
Acronyms 168
Bank of America 86
Report of Management on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The management of Bank of America Corporation is responsible
for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over
financial reporting.
The Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting is a
process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of
financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America. The Corporation’ s internal control over financial
reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail,
accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of
the assets of the Corporation; (ii) provide reasonable assurance
that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of financial statements in accordance with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of
America, and that receipts and expenditures of the Corporation
are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the Corporation; and (iii) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection
of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the
Corporation’ s assets that could have a materi al effect on the
financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over
financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future
periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree
of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.Management assessed the effectiveness of the Corporation’ s
internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022
based on the framework set forth by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizatio ns of the Treadway Commission in
Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) . Based on that
assessment, manageme nt concluded that, as of December 31,
2022, the Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting
is effective.
The Corpora tion’s intern al control over financial reporting as
of December 31, 2022 has been audited by
PricewaterhouseCoopers , LLP, an independent registered
public accounting firm, as stated in their accompanying report
which expresses an unqualified opinion on the effectiveness of
the Corporation’ s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2022.
Brian T . Moynihan
Chair , Chief Executive Of ficer and President
Alastair M. Borthwick
Chief Financial Of ficer
87 Bank of America
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of
Bank of America Corporation
Opinions on the Financial Statements and
Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying conso lidated balance
sheets of Bank of Ameri ca Corporation and its subsidiaries (the
“Corporation”) as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the
related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive
income, changes in shareholders’  equity and cash flows for
each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022,
including the related notes (collectively referred to as the
“consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the
Corporation's internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal
Control - Integrated Framework  (2013) issued by the Committee
of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(COSO).
In our opinio n, the consolidated financial statements referred
to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial
position of the Corporati on as of December 31, 2022 and 2021,
and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of
the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022 in
conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United State s of America. Also in our opinion, the Corporation
maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control
over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022, based on
criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework
(2013) issued by the COSO.
Change in Accounting Principle
As discussed in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements,
the Corporation changed the manner in which it accounts for
credit losses on certain financial instruments in 2020.
Basis for Opinions
The Corporation’ s management is respons ible for these
consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective
internal control over financial reporting, and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting,
included in the accompanying Report of Management on
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to
express opinions on the Corporation’ s consolidated financial
statements and on the Corporation's interna l control over
financial reporting based on our audits. We are a public
accounting firm registered with the Public Comp any Accounting
Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to
be independent with respect to the Corporation in accordance
with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
We conducted our audits  in accordance with the standards of
the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform
the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the
consolidated financial statements are free of material
misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether
effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained
in all materia l respects. Our audits of the consolidated financial
statements included performing procedures to assess the risks
of material  misstatem ent of the consolid ated financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing
procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures
included examining, on a test basis, evidenceregarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated
financial statements. Our audits also included  evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of
the consolid ated financial statements. Our audit of internal
control over financia l reporting included obtaining an
understanding of internal control over financial reporting,
assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing
and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal
control based on the assessed risk. Our audit s also included
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary
in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a
reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control
over Financial Reporting
A company’ s internal control over financial report ing is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company’ s internal control
over financia l reporting includes those policies and procedures
that (i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable
detail, accu rately and fairly reflect the transactions and
dispositions of the assets of the company; (ii) provide
reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as
necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in
accordance with generally accepted accounting  principles, and
that receipts  and expenditures of the company are being made
only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance
regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized
acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’ s assets that
could have a material ef fect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over
financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future
periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree
of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters
arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that were communicated or required to be
communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relate to
accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated
financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging,
subjective, or complex judgments. The commun ication of critical
audit matter s does not alter in any way our opinion on the
consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are
not, by communicating the critical audit matters below , providing
separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the
accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Allowance for Loan and Lease Losses - Commercial and
Consumer Card Loans
As describe d in Notes 1 and 5 to the conso lidated financial
statements, the allowance for loan and lease losses represents
management’ s estimate of the expected credit losses in the
Corporation’ s loan and lease portfolio, exclud ing loans and
unfunded lending commitments accounted for under the fair
Bank of America 88
value option. As of December 31, 2022, the allowance for loan
and lease losses was $12.7 billion on total loans and leases of
$1,040.0 billion, which excludes loans accounted for under the
fair value option. For commercial and consumer card loans, the
expected credit loss is typically estimated using quantitative
methods that consider a variety of factors such as historical loss
experience, the current credit quality of the portfolio as well as
an economic outlook over the life of the loan. In its loss
forecasting framework, the Corporation incorporates forward
looking information through the use of macroeconomic
scenarios applied over the forecasted life of the assets. These
macroeconomic scenarios include variable s that have
historically been key drivers of increases and decreases in credit
losses. These variables include, but are not limited to,
unemployment rates, real estate prices, gross domestic product
levels and corporate bond spreads. The scenarios that are
chosen and the weightin g given to each scenario depend on a
variety of factors including recent economic events, leading
economic indicators, views of internal as well as third-party
economists and industry trends. Also included in the allowance
for loan and lease losses are qualitative reserves to cover
losses that are expected but, in the Corporation's assessment,
may not be adequately reflected in the quantita tive methods or
the economic assumptions. Factors that the Corporation
considers include chang es in lending policies and procedures,
business conditions, the nature and size of the portfolio, portfolio
concentrations, the volume and severity of past due loans and
nonaccrual loans, the effect of external factors such as
competition, and legal and regulatory requirements, among
others. Further , the Corporation considers the inherent
uncertainty in quantitative models that are built on historical
data.
The principal considerations for our determination that
performing procedures relating to the allowance for loan and
lease losses for the commercial and consumer card portfolios is
a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment and
estimation by management in developing lifetime economic
forecast scenarios, related weightings to each scenario and
certain qualitative reserves, which in turn led to a high degree of
auditor judgment, subjectivity and effort in performing
procedures and in evaluating audit evidence obtained, and (ii)
the audit effort involved professionals with specialized skill and
knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and
evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the conso lidated financial statements. These
procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating
to the allowance for loan and lease losses, including controls
over the evaluation and approval of models, forecast scenarios
and related  weighting s, and qualitative reserves. These
procedures also included, among others, testing management’ s
process for estimating the allowance for loan and lease losses,
including (i) evaluating the appropriateness of the loss forecast
models and methodology , (ii) evaluating the reasonableness of
certain macroeconom ic variables, (iii) evaluating the
reasonableness of management’ s developmen t, selection and
weighting of lifetime economic forecast scenarios used in the
loss foreca st models, (iv) testing the completeness and
accuracy of data used in the estimate, and (v) evaluating the
reasonableness of certain qualitative reserve s made to the
model output results to determine the overall allowance for loanand lease losses. The procedures also included the involvement
of professionals with specialized skill and knowledge to assist in
evaluating the appropriateness of certain loss forecast models,
the reasonableness of economic forecast scenarios and related
weightings and the reasonableness of certain qualitative
reserves.
Valuation of Certain Level 3 Financial Instruments
As described in Notes 1 and 20 to the consolidated financial
statements, the Corporation carries certain financial instruments
at fair value, which includes $10.7 billion of assets and $7.1
billion of liabilities classified as Level 3 fair value measurements
that are valued on a recurring basis and $3.4 billion of assets
classified as Level 3 fair value measurements that are valued on
a nonrecurri ng basis, for which the determinati on of fair value
requires significant management judgment or estimation. The
Corporation determines the fair value of Level 3 financial
instruments using pricing models, discoun ted cash flow
methodologies, or similar techniques that require inputs that are
both unobservable and are significant to the overall fair value
measurement. Unobserv able inputs, such as volatility or implied
yield, may be determined using quantitative-based
extrapolations, pricing models or other internal methodologies
which incorporate management estimates and available market
information.
The principal considerations for our determination that
performing procedures relating to the valuation of certain Level 3
financial instruments is a critical audit matter are the significant
judgment and estimation used by management to determine the
fair value of these financial instruments, which in turn led to a
high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity and effort in
performing procedures  and in evaluating audit evidence
obtained, including the involvement of professionals with
specialized skill and knowledge.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and
evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These
procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating
to the valuation of financial instruments, including controls
related to valuation models, significant unobservable inputs, and
data. These  procedures also included, among others, the
involvement of professionals  with specia lized skill and
knowledge to assist in developing an independent estimate of
fair value for a sample of these certain financial instruments and
comparison of management’ s estimate to the independently
developed estimate of fair value. Developing the independent
estimate involved testin g the completeness and accuracy of
data provided by management and evaluating the
reasonableness of management’ s significant unobservable
inputs.
Charlotte, North Carolina
February 22, 2023
We have served as the Corporation’ s auditor since 1958.
89 Bank of America
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statement of Income
(In millions, except per share information) 2022 2021 2020
Net interest income  
Interest income $ 72,565 $ 47,672 $ 51,585 
Interest expense 20,103 4,738 8,225 
Net interest income 52,462 42,934 43,360 
Noninterest income  
Fees and commissions 33,212 39,299 34,551 
Market making and similar activities 12,075 8,691 8,355 
Other income (2,799) (1,811) (738)
Total noninterest income 42,488 46,179 42,168 
Total revenue, net of interest expense 94,950 89,113 85,528 
Provision for credit losses 2,543 (4,594) 11,320 
Noninterest expense
Compensation and benefits 36,447 36,140 32,725 
Occupancy and equipment 7,071 7,138 7,141 
Information processing and communications 6,279 5,769 5,222 
Product delivery and transaction related 3,653 3,881 3,433 
Professional fees 2,142 1,775 1,694 
Marketing 1,825 1,939 1,701 
Other general operating 4,021 3,089 3,297 
Total noninterest expense 61,438 59,731 55,213 
Income before income taxes 30,969 33,976 18,995 
Income tax expense 3,441 1,998 1,101 
Net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 
Preferred stock dividends and other 1,513 1,421 1,421 
Net income applicable to common shareholders $ 26,015 $ 30,557 $ 16,473 
Per common share information  
Earnings $ 3.21 $ 3.60 $ 1.88 
Diluted earnings 3.19 3.57 1.87 
Average common shares issued and outstanding 8,113.7 8,493.3 8,753.2 
Average diluted common shares issued and outstanding 8,167.5 8,558.4 8,796.9 
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net-of-tax:
Net change in debt securities (6,028) (2,077) 4,799 
Net change in debit valuation adjustments 755 356 (498)
Net change in derivatives (10,055) (2,306) 826 
Employee benefit plan adjustments (667) 624 (98)
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments (57) (45) (52)
Other comprehensive income (loss) (16,052) (3,448) 4,977 
Comprehensive income (loss) $ 11,476 $ 28,530 $ 22,871 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Bank of America 90
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Balance Sheet
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Assets
Cash and due from banks $ 30,334 $ 29,222 
Interest-bearing deposits with the Federal Reserve, non-U.S. central banks and other banks 199,869 318,999 
Cash and cash equivalents 230,203 348,221 
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments 7,259 7,144 
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell
   (includes $146,999 and $150,665 measured at fair value) 267,574 250,720 
Trading account assets (includes $115,505 and $103,434 pledged as collateral) 296,108 247,080 
Derivative assets 48,642 35,344 
Debt securities:  
Carried at fair value 229,994 308,073 
Held-to-maturity, at cost (fair value – $524,267 and $665,890) 632,825 674,554 
Total debt securities 862,819 982,627 
Loans and leases (includes $5,771 and $7,819 measured at fair value) 1,045,747 979,124 
Allowance for loan and lease losses (12,682) (12,387)
Loans and leases, net of allowance 1,033,065 966,737 
Premises and equipment, net 11,510 10,833 
Goodwill 69,022 69,022 
Loans held-for-sale (includes $1,115 and $4,455 measured at fair value) 6,871 15,635 
Customer and other receivables 67,543 72,263 
Other assets (includes $9,594 and $12,144 measured at fair value) 150,759 163,869 
Total assets $ 3,051,375 $ 3,169,495 
Liabilities   
Deposits in U.S. offices:   
Noninterest-bearing $ 640,745 $ 784,189 
Interest-bearing (includes $311 and $408 measured at fair value) 1,182,590 1,165,914 
Deposits in non-U.S. offices:
Noninterest-bearing 20,480 27,457 
Interest-bearing 86,526 86,886 
Total deposits 1,930,341 2,064,446 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase
   (includes $151,708 and $139,641 measured at fair value) 195,635 192,329 
Trading account liabilities 80,399 100,690 
Derivative liabilities 44,816 37,675 
Short-term borrowings (includes $832 and $4,279 measured at fair value) 26,932 23,753 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities (includes $9,752 and $11,489 measured at fair value
   and $1,540 and $1,456 of reserve for unfunded lending commitments) 224,073 200,419 
Long-term debt (includes $33,070 and $29,708 measured at fair value) 275,982 280,117 
Total liabilities 2,778,178 2,899,429 
Commitments and contingencies (Note 6 – Securitizations and Other Variable Interest Entities
   and Note 12 – Commitments and Contingencies)
Shareholders’ equity  
Preferred stock, $0.01 par value; authorized – 100,000,000 shares; issued and outstanding – 4,088,101 and 3,939,686 shares 28,397 24,708 
Common stock and additional paid-in capital, $0.01  par value; authorized – 12,800,000,000 shares;
   issued and outstanding – 7,996,777,943 and 8,077,831,463 shares 58,953 62,398 
Retained earnings 207,003 188,064 
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (21,156) (5,104)
Total shareholders’ equity 273,197 270,066 
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity $ 3,051,375 $ 3,169,495 
Assets of consolidated variable interest entities included in total assets above (isolated to settle the liabilities of the variable interest
entities)
Trading account assets $ 2,816  $ 5,004  
Loans and leases 16,738  17,135  
Allowance for loan and lease losses (797) (958)
Loans and leases, net of allowance 15,941  16,177  
All other assets 116 189 
Total assets of consolidated variable interest entities $ 18,873  $ 21,370  
Liabilities of consolidated variable interest entities included in total liabilities above   
Short-term borrowings (includes $42 and $ 51 of non-recourse short-term borrowings) $ 42 $ 247 
Long-term debt (includes $4,581  and $ 3,587  of non-recourse debt) 4,581  3,587  
All other liabilities (includes $13 and $ 7 of non-recourse liabilities) 13 7 
Total liabilities of consolidated variable interest entities $ 4,636  $ 3,841  
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
91 Bank of America
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Shareholders’  Equity
Preferred
StockCommon Stock and
Additional Paid-in CapitalRetained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Total
Shareholders’
Equity (In millions) Shares Amount
Balance, December 31, 2019 $ 23,401 8,836.1 $ 91,723 $ 156,319 $ (6,633)$ 264,810 
Cumulative adjustment for adoption of credit loss accounting
   standard (2,406) (2,406)
Net income 17,894 17,894 
Net change in debt securities 4,799 4,799 
Net change in debit valuation adjustments (498) (498)
Net change in derivatives 826 826 
Employee benefit plan adjustments (98) (98)
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments (52) (52)
Dividends declared:
Common (6,289) (6,289)
Preferred (1,421) (1,421)
Issuance of preferred stock 2,181 2,181 
Redemption of preferred stock (1,072) (1,072)
Common stock issued under employee plans, net, and other 41.7 1,284 (9) 1,275 
Common stock repurchased (227.0) (7,025) (7,025)
Balance, December 31, 2020 $ 24,510 8,650.8 $ 85,982 $ 164,088 $ (1,656)$ 272,924 
Net income 31,978 31,978 
Net change in debt securities (2,077) (2,077)
Net change in debit valuation adjustments 356 356 
Net change in derivatives (2,306) (2,306)
Employee benefit plan adjustments 624 624 
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments (45) (45)
Dividends declared:
Common (6,575) (6,575)
Preferred (1,421) (1,421)
Issuance of preferred stock 2,169 2,169 
Redemption of preferred stock (1,971) (1,971)
Common stock issued under employee plans, net, and other 42.3 1,542 (6) 1,536 
Common stock repurchased (615.3) (25,126) (25,126)
Balance, December 31, 2021 $ 24,708 8,077.8 $ 62,398 $ 188,064 $ (5,104)$ 270,066 
Net income 27,528 27,528 
Net change in debt securities (6,028) (6,028)
Net change in debit valuation adjustments 755 755 
Net change in derivatives (10,055) (10,055)
Employee benefit plan adjustments (667) (667)
Net change in foreign currency translation adjustments (57) (57)
Dividends declared:
Common (6,963) (6,963)
Preferred (1,596) (1,596)
Issuance of preferred stock 4,426 4,426 
Redemption of preferred stock (737) 83 (654)
Common stock issued under employee plans, net, and other 44.9 1,545 (30) 1,515 
Common stock repurchased (125.9) (5,073) (5,073)
Balance, December 31, 2022 $ 28,397 7,996.8 $ 58,953 $ 207,003 $ (21,156)$ 273,197 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
Bank of America 92
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating activities    
Net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Provision for credit losses 2,543 (4,594) 11,320 
Gains on sales of debt securities (32) (22) (411)
Depreciation and amortization 1,978 1,898 1,843 
Net amortization of premium/discount on debt securities 2,072 5,837 4,101 
Deferred income taxes 739 (838) (1,737)
Stock-based compensation 2,862 2,768 2,031 
Loans held-for-sale:
Originations and purchases (24,862) (43,635) (19,657)
Proceeds from sales and paydowns of loans originally classified as held for sale and instruments
from related securitization activities 31,567 34,684 19,049 
Net change in:
Trading and derivative assets/liabilities (95,772) (22,104) 16,942 
Other assets 20,799 (34,455) (12,883)
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 23,029 16,639 (4,385)
Other operating activities, net 1,222 4,651 3,886 
Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities (6,327) (7,193) 37,993 
Investing activities    
Net change in:
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments (115) (598) 561 
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell (16,854) 53,338 (29,461)
Debt securities carried at fair value:
Proceeds from sales 69,114 6,893 77,524 
Proceeds from paydowns and maturities 110,195 159,616 91,084 
Purchases (134,962) (238,398) (194,877)
Held-to-maturity debt securities:
Proceeds from paydowns and maturities 63,852 124,880 93,835 
Purchases (24,096) (362,736) (257,535)
Loans and leases:
Proceeds from sales of loans originally classified as held for investment and instruments
from related securitization activities 26,757 10,396 13,351 
Purchases (5,798) (5,164) (5,229)
Other changes in loans and leases, net (86,010) (58,039) 36,571 
Other investing activities, net (4,612) (3,479) (3,489)
Net cash used in investing activities (2,529) (313,291) (177,665)
Financing activities    
Net change in:
Deposits (134,190) 268,966 360,677 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase 3,306 22,006 5,214 
Short-term borrowings 3,179 4,432 (4,893)
Long-term debt:
Proceeds from issuance 65,910 76,675 57,013 
Retirement (34,055) (46,826) (47,948)
Preferred stock:
Proceeds from issuance 4,426 2,169 2,181 
Redemption (654) (1,971) (1,072)
Common stock repurchased (5,073) (25,126) (7,025)
Cash dividends paid (8,576) (8,055) (7,727)
Other financing activities, net (312) (620) (601)
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities (106,039) 291,650 355,819 
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents (3,123) (3,408) 2,756 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents (118,018) (32,242) 218,903 
Cash and cash equivalents at January 1 348,221 380,463 161,560 
Cash and cash equivalents at December 31 $ 230,203 $ 348,221 $ 380,463 
Supplemental cash flow disclosures
Interest paid $ 18,526 $ 4,506 $ 8,662 
Income taxes paid, net 2,288 2,760 2,894 
See accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
93 Bank of America
Bank of America Corporation and
Subsidiaries
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
NOTE 1 Summary of Significant Accounting
Principles
Bank of America Corporation, a bank holding company and a
financial holding company , provides a diverse range of financial
services and products throughout the U.S. and in certain
international markets. The term “the Corporation” as used herein
may refer to Bank of America Corporation, individually , Bank of
America Corporation and its subsidiaries, or certain of Bank of
America Corporation’ s subsidiaries or af filiates.
Principles of Consolidation and Basis of
Presentation
The Consoli dated Finan cial Statements include the accounts of
the Corpora tion and its majority-owned subsidi aries and those
variable interest entities (VIEs) where the Corporation is the
primary beneficiary . Intercompany accounts and transactions
have been eliminated.  Results of operations of acquired
companies are included from the dates of acquisition, and for
VIEs, from the dates that the Corporation beca me the primary
beneficiary . Assets held in an agency or fiducia ry capacity are
not included in the Consolidated Financial Statements. The
Corporation accounts for investments in companies for which it
owns a voting interest and for which it has the ability to exercise
significant influence over operating and financing decisions
using the equity metho d of accounting. Thes e investments,
which includ e the Corporation’ s interests in affordable housing
and renewable energy partnerships, are recorded in other
assets. Equity method investments are subject to impairment
testing, and the Corporation’ s proportionate share of income or
loss is included in other income.
The prepara tion of the Consolidated Financial Statements in
conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America requires management to make
estimates and assumpt ions that affect reported amounts and
disclosures. Actual results could materially differ from those
estimates and assumpti ons. Certain prior-period amounts have
been reclassified to conform to current period presentation.
New Accounting Standards
Hedge Accounting
The FASB issued a new accounting standard that makes
targeted improvements to the application of the fair value hedge
accounting guidance for closed portfolios of financial assets.
The targeted improvements were effective Janua ry 1, 2023 on a
prospective basis.
Financial Instruments – Credit Losses
The FASB amended the accounting and disclosure
requirements for expected credit losses (ECL) by removing the
recognition and measurement guidance on troubled debt
restructurings (TDRs) and adding disclosures on the financial
effect and subsequent performance of certain types of
modifications made to borrowers experiencing financial
difficulties. The effects of these changes on the Corporation’ s
consolidated financial position, results of operations or
disclosures in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial
Statements are not significant. The amendments were effective
on January 1, 2023, which the Corporation adopted using a
modified retrospective approach.Significant Accounting Principles
Cash and Cash Equivalents
Cash and cash equivale nts include cash on hand, cash items in
the process of collection, cash segregated under federal and
other brokerage regulations, and amounts due from
correspondent banks, the Federal Reserve Bank and certain
non-U.S. central banks. Certain cash balances are restricted as
to withdraw al or usage by legally bindi ng contractual
agreements or regulatory requirements.
Securities Financing Agreements
Securities borrowed or purchased under agree ments to resell
and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase
(securities financing agreements) are treated as collateralized
financing transactions except in instances where the transaction
is required to be accounted for as individual sale and purchase
transactions. Generally , these agreements are recorded at
acquisition or sale price plus accrued interest. In instances
where the interest is negative, the Corporation’ s policy is to
present negative interest on financial assets as interest income
and negative interest on financial liabilities as interest expense.
For securiti es financing agreements that are accounted for
under the fair value optio n, the changes in the fair value of these
securities financing agreements are recorded in market making
and similar activities in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
The Corpora tion’s policy is to monitor the market  value of the
principal amount loaned under resale agreements and obtain
collateral from or return collateral pledged to counterparties
when appropriate. Securities financing agree ments do not
create material credit risk due to these collateral provisions;
therefore, an allowance for loan losses is not necessary .
In transactio ns where the Corporation acts as the lender in a
securities lending agreement and receives securities that can be
pledged or sold as collateral, it recognizes an asset on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet at fair value, representing the
securities received, and a liability , representing the obligation to
return those securities.
Trading Instruments
Financial instruments utilized in trading activities are carried at
fair value. Fair value is generally based on quote d market prices
for the same or similar  assets and liabilities. If these market
prices are not available , fair values are estimated based on
dealer quotes, pricing models, discounted cash flow
methodologies, or similar techniques where the determination of
fair value may require significant manageme nt judgment or
estimation. Realized gains and losses are recorded on a trade-
date basis. Realized and unrealized gains and losses are
recognized in market making and similar activities.
Derivatives and Hedging Activities
Derivatives are entered into on behalf of customers, for trading
or to support risk manag ement activities. Derivatives used in risk
management activities include derivatives that are both
designated in qualifying accounting hedge relationships and
derivatives used to hedg e market risks in relationships that are
not designated in qualifying accounting hedge relationships
(referred to as other risk management activities). The
Corporation manages interest rate and foreign currency
exchange rate sensitivity predominantly through the use of
derivatives. Derivatives  utilized by the Corporation include
swaps, futures and forward settlement contracts, and option
contracts.
Bank of America 94
All derivatives are recorded on the Consolidated Balance
Sheet at fair value, taking into consideration the effects of legally
enforceable master netting agreements that allow the
Corporation to settle positive and negative positions and offset
cash collateral held with the same counterparty on a net basis.
For exchange-traded contracts, fair value is based on quoted
market prices in active or inactive markets or is derived from
observable market-based pricing parameters, similar to those
applied to over-the-co unter (OTC) derivatives. For non-
exchange traded contracts, fair value is based on dealer quotes,
pricing models, discounted cash flow methodol ogies or similar
techniques for which the determination of fair value may require
significant management judgment or estimation.
Valuations of derivative assets and liabilities reflect the value
of the instrument including counterparty credit risk. These values
also take into account the Corporation’ s own credit standing.
Trading Derivatives and Other Risk Management
Activities
Derivatives held for trading purposes are included in derivative
assets or derivative liabilities on the Consol idated Balance
Sheet with changes in fair value included in market making and
similar activities.
Derivatives used for other risk management activities are
included in derivative assets or derivative liabili ties. Derivatives
used in other risk management activities have not been
designated in qualifying accounting hedge relationships
because they did not qualify or the risk that is being mitigated
pertains to an item that is reported at fair value through earnings
so that the effect of measuring the derivative instrument and the
asset or liability to which  the risk exposure pertains will offset in
the Consolidated Statement of Income to the extent effective.
The changes in the fair value of derivatives that serve to mitigate
certain risks associated with mortgage servicing  rights (MSRs),
interest rate lock comm itments (IRLCs) and first-lien mortgage
loans held-for-sale (LHFS) that are originated by the Corporation
are recorde d in other income. Changes in the fair value of
derivatives that serve to mitigate interest rate risk and foreign
currency risk are included in market making and similar
activities. Credit derivati ves are also used by the Corporation to
mitigate the risk associated with various credit exposures. The
changes in the fair value of these derivatives are included in
market making and similar activities and other income.
Derivatives Used For Hedge Accounting Purposes
(Accounting Hedges)
For accounting hedges, the Corporation formally documents at
inception all relationshi ps between hedging instruments and
hedged items, as well as the risk management objectives and
strategies for undertaking various accounting hedges.
Additionally , the Corporation primarily uses regression analysis
at the inception of a hedge and for each reporting period
thereafter to assess whether the derivative used in an
accounting hedge transaction is expected to be and has been
highly effective in offsetting changes in the fair value or cash
flows of a hedged item or forecasted transaction. The
Corporation discontinues hedge accounting when it is
determined that a derivative is not expected to be or has ceased
to be highly effective as a hedge, and then reflects changes in
fair value of the derivative in earnings after termination of the
hedge relationship.
Fair value hedges are used to protect against changes in the
fair value of the Corpo ration’ s assets and liabilities that are
attributable to interest rate or foreign exchange volatility .
Changes in the fair value of derivatives designated as fair valuehedges are recorded in earnings, together and in the same
income statement line item with changes in the fair value of the
related hedg ed item. If a derivative instrument in a fair value
hedge is terminated or the hedge designation removed, the
previous adjustments to the carrying value of the hedged asset
or liability are subseque ntly accounted for in the same manner
as other components of the carrying value of that asset or
liability . For interest-earning assets and interest-bearing
liabilities, such adjustments are amortized to earnings over the
remaining life of the respective asset or liability .
Cash flow hedges are used primarily to minimize the
variability in cash flows of assets and liabilities or forecasted
transactions caused by interest rate or foreign exchange rate
fluctuations. The Corporation also uses cash flow hedges to
hedge the price risk associated with deferred compensation.
Changes in the fair value of derivatives used in cash flow
hedges are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive
income (OCI) and are reclassified into the line item in the
income statement in which the hedged item is recorded in the
same period  the hedged item affects earnings. Components of a
derivative that are excluded in assessing hedge effectiveness
are recorde d in the same income statement line item as the
hedged item.
Net investment hedges are used to manage the foreign
exchange rate sensitivi ty arising from a net investment in a
foreign operation. Changes in the spot prices of derivatives that
are designated as net investment hedges of foreign operations
are recorded as a component of accumulated OCI. The
remaining components of these derivatives are excluded in
assessing hedge effectiveness and are recorded in market
making and similar activities.
Securities
Debt securities are reported on the Consolidated Balance Sheet
at their trade date. Their classification is dependent on the
purpose for which the securities were acquired. Debt securities
purchased for use in the Corporation’ s trading activities are
reported in trading account assets at fair value with unrealized
gains and losses included in market making and similar
activities. Substantially all other debt securities  purchased are
used in the Corporation’ s asset and liability management (ALM)
activities and are reported on the Consolidated Balance Sheet
as either debt securitie s carried at fair value or as held-to-
maturity (HTM) debt securities. Debt securities carried at fair
value are either available-for-sale (AFS) securities with
unrealized gains and losses net-of-tax included  in accumulated
OCI or carried at fair value with unrealized gains and losses
reported in market making and similar activities. HTM debt
securities are debt securities that management has the intent
and ability to hold to maturity and are reported at amortized cost.
The Corporation evaluates each AFS security  where the
value has declined below amortized cost. If the Corporation
intends to sell or believes it is more likely than not that it will be
required to sell the debt security , it is written down to fair value
through earnings. For AFS debt securities the Corporation
intends to hold, the Corporation evaluates the debt securities for
ECL, except for debt securities that are guaranteed by the U.S.
Treasury , U.S. governm ent agencies or sovereign entities of
high credit quality wher e the Corporation applies a zero credit
loss assumption. For the remaining AFS debt securities, the
Corporation considers qualitative parameters such as internal
and external credit ratings and the value of underlying collateral.
If an AFS debt security fails any of the qualitative parameters, a
discounted cash flow analysis is used by the Corporation to
95 Bank of America
determine if a portion of the unrealized loss is a result of an
ECL. The Corporation will then recognize either credit loss
expense or a reversal of credit loss expense in other income for
the amount necessary to adjust the debt securities valuation
allowance to its current estimate of expected credit losses. Cash
flows expec ted to be collected are estimated using all relevant
information available such as remaining payment terms,
prepayment speeds, the financial condition of the issuer ,
expected defaults and the value of the underly ing collateral. If
any of the decline in fair value is related to market factors, that
amount is recognized in accumulated OCI. In certain instances,
the credit loss may exceed the total decline in fair value, in
which case, the allowance recorded is limited to the difference
between the amortized cost and the fair value of the asset.
The Corpo ration sepa rately evaluates its HTM debt
securities for any credit losses, of which substantially all qualify
for the zero loss assum ption. For the remaining  securities, the
Corporation performs a discounted cash flow analysis to
estimate any credit losse s which are then recognized as part of
the allowance for credit losses.
Interest on debt securities, including amortization of
premiums and accretion of discounts, is included in interest
income. Premiums and discounts are amortized or accreted to
interest income at a constant effective yield over the contractual
lives of the securities. Realized gains and losses from the sales
of debt securities are determined using the specific identification
method.
Equity securities with readily determinable fair values that
are not held for trading purposes are carried at fair value with
unrealized gains and losses included in other income. Equity
securities that do not have readily determinable fair values are
recorded at cost less impairment, if any, plus or minus qualifying
observable price changes. These securities are reported in other
assets.
Loans and Leases
Loans, with the exceptio n of loans accounted for under the fair
value option, are measured at historical cost and reported at
their outstanding principal balances net of any unearned
income, charge-of fs, unamortized deferred fees and costs on
originated loans, and for purchased loans, net of any
unamortized premiums or discounts. Loan origination fees and
certain direct origination costs are deferred and recognized as
adjustments to interest income over the lives of the related
loans. Unearned income, discounts and premiums are
amortized to interest income using a level yield methodology .
The Corporation elects to account for certain consumer and
commercial loans under the fair value option with interest
reported in interest incom e and changes in fair value reported in
market making and similar activities or other income.
Under applicable accounting guidance, for reporting
purposes, the loan and lease portfolio is categor ized by portfolio
segment and, within each portfolio segment, by class of
financing receivable. A portfolio segment is defin ed as the level
at which an entity develops and documents a systematic
methodology to determine the allowance for credit losses, and a
class of financing receivable is defined as the level of
disaggregation of portfolio segments based on the initial
measurement attribute, risk characteristics and methods for
assessing risk. The Corporation’ s three  portfolio segments are
Consumer Real Estate, Credit Card and Other Consumer , and
Commercial. The classes within the Consumer Real Estate
portfolio segment are residential mortgage and home equity .
The classes within the Credit Card and Other Consumer
portfolio segment are credit card, direct/indirect consumer and
otherconsumer . The classes within the Commercial portfolio segment
are U.S. commercial, non-U.S. commercial, commercial real
estate, commercial lease financing and U.S. small business
commercial.
Leases
The Corporation provides equipment financing to its customers
through a variety of lessor arrangements. Direct financing leases
and sales-type leases are carried at the aggregate of lease
payments receivable plus the estimated residual value of the
leased property less unearned income, which is accreted to
interest income over the lease terms using methods that
approximate the interest method. Operating lease income is
recognized on a straight-line basis. The Corporation's lease
arrangements generally do not contain non-lease components.
Allowance for Credit Losses
On January 1, 2020, the Corporation adopted the new
accounting standard that requires the measurement of the
allowance for credit losses, which includes both the allowance
for loan and lease losse s and the reserve for unfunded lending
commitments, to be based on management’ s best estimate of
the ECL in the Corporation’ s loan and lease portfolio, excluding
loans and unfunded lending commitments acco unted for under
the fair value option. Upon adoption, a $3.3 billion, or 32
percent, increase in the allowance for credit losses was
recorded on January 1, 2020, which was comprised of a net
increase of $2.9 billion in the allowance for loan and lease
losses and a $310 million increase in the reserve for unfunded
lending commitments. The ECL on funded consumer and
commercial loans and leases is referred to as the allowance for
loan and lease losses and is reported separately as a contra-
asset to loans and leases on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
The ECL for unfunded lending commitments, including home
equity lines of credit (HELOCs), standby letters of credit
(SBLCs) and binding unfunded loan commitments is reported on
the Consolidated Balance Sheet in accrued expenses and other
liabilities. The provision for credit losses related  to the loan and
lease portfolio and unfunded lending commitments is reported in
the Consolidated Statement of Income at the amount necessary
to adjust the allowance for credit losses to the current estimate
of ECL.
For loans and leases, the ECL is typically estimated using
quantitative methods that consider a variety of factors such as
historical loss experience, the current credit quality of the
portfolio as well as an economic outlook over the life of the loan.
The life of the loan for closed-ended products is based on the
contractual maturity of the loan adjusted for any expected
prepayments. The contractual maturity includes any extension
options that are at the sole discretion of the borrower . For open-
ended products (e.g., lines of credit), the ECL is determined
based on the maximum repayment term associated with future
draws from credit lines unless those lines of credit are
unconditionally cancellable (e.g., credit cards) in which case the
Corporation does not record any allowance.
In its loss forecasting framework, the Corporation
incorporates forward-loo king information through the use of
macroeconomic scenarios applied over the forecasted life of the
assets. These macroeconomic scenarios include variables that
have historically been key drivers of increases and decreases in
credit losses . These variables include, but are not limited to,
unemployment rates, real estate prices, gross domestic product
levels and corporate bond spreads. As any one economic
outlook is inherently uncertain, the Corporation leverages
multiple scenarios. The scenarios that are chosen each quarter
Bank of America 96
and the weighting given to each scenario depen d on a variety of
factors including recen t economic events, leading economic
indicators, views of internal and third-party economists and
industry trends.
The estimate of credit losses includes expected recoveries of
amounts previously charged off (i.e., negative allowance). If a
loan has been charged off, the expected cash flows on the loan
are not limited by the current amortized cost balance. Instead,
expected cash flows can be assumed up to the unpaid principal
balance immediately prior to the charge-of f.
The allowance for loan and lease losses for TDRs is
measured based on the present value of projected future lifetime
principal and interest cash flows discounted at the loan’ s original
effective interest rate, or in cases where foreclo sure is probable
or the loan is collateral dependent, at the loan’ s collateral value
or its observable market  price, if available. The measurement of
ECL for the renegotiated  consumer credit card TDR portfolio is
based on the present value of projected cash flows discounted
using the average TDR portfolio contractual interest rate,
excluding promotionally priced loans, in effect prior to
restructuring. Projected cash flows for TDRs use the same
economic outlook as discussed above. For purposes of
computing this specific loss component of the allowance, larger
impaired loans are evaluated individually and smaller impaired
loans are evaluated as a pool.
Also included in the allowance for loan and lease losses are
qualitative reserves to cover losses that are expected but, in the
Corporation's assessment, may not be adequa tely reflected in
the quantit ative meth ods or the economi c assumptions
described above. For example, factors that the Corporation
considers include chang es in lending policies and procedures,
business conditions, the nature and size of the portfolio, portfolio
concentrations, the volume and severity of past due loans and
nonaccrual loans, the effect of external factors such as
competition, and legal and regulatory requirements, among
others. Further , the Corporation considers the inherent
uncertainty in quantitative models that are built on historical
data.
With the exception of the Corporation's credit card portfolio,
the Corporation does not include reserves for interest receivable
in the meas urement of the allowance for credit losses as the
Corporation generally  classifies consumer loans as
nonperforming at 90 days past due and reverses interest income
for these loans at that time. For credit card loans, the
Corporation reserves for interest and fees as part of the
allowance for loan and lease losses. Upon charg e-off of a credit
card loan, the Corporation reverses the interest and fee income
against the income statement line item where it was originally
recorded.
The Corporation has identified the following three  portfolio
segments and measures the allowance for credit losses using
the following methods.
Consumer Real Estate
To estimate ECL for consumer loans secured by residential real
estate, the Corporation estimates the number of loans that will
default over the life of the existing portfolio, after factoring in
estimated prepayments, using quantitative modeling
methodologies. The attributes that are most significant in
estimating the Corporation’ s ECL include refreshed loan-to-
value (LTV) or, in the case of a subordinated  lien, refreshed
combined LTV (CLTV), borrower credit score, months since
origination and geography , all of which are further broken down
by present collection status (whether the loan is current,
delinquent, in default, or in bankruptcy). The estimates are
based on theCorporation’ s historical  experience with the loan portfolio,
adjusted to reflect the economic outlook. The outlook on the
unemployment rate and consumer real estate prices are key
factors that impact the frequency and severity of loss estimates.
The Corporation does not reserve for credit losses on the unpaid
principal balance of loans insured by the Federal Housing
Administration (FHA) and long-term standby loans, as these
loans are fully insured. The Corporation records a reserve for
unfunded lending commitments for the ECL associated with the
undrawn portion of the Corporation’ s HELOCs, which can only
be canceled by the Corporation if certain criteria are met. The
ECL associated with these unfunded lending commitments is
calculated using the same models and methodologies noted
above and incorporate utilization assumptions at time of default.
For loans that are more than 180 days  past due and
collateral-dependent TDRs, the Corporatio n bases the
allowance on the estimated fair value of the unde rlying collateral
as of the reporting date less costs to sell. The fair value of the
collateral securing these loans is generally determined using an
automated valuation model (AVM) that estimate s the value of a
property by reference to market data including sales of
comparable properties and price trends specific to the
Metropolitan Statistical Area in which the property being valued
is located. In the event that an AVM value is not available, the
Corporation utilizes publicized indices or if these methods
provide less reliable valuations, the Corporation uses appraisals
or broker price opinion s to estimate the fair value of the
collateral. While there is inherent imprecision in these
valuations, the Corporation believes that they are representative
of this portfolio in the aggregate.
For loans that are more than 180 days  past due and
collateral-dependent TDRs, with the exce ption of the
Corporation’ s fully insured portfolio, the outstan ding balance of
loans that is in excess  of the estimated property value after
adjusting for costs to sell is charged off. If the estimated property
value decreases in periods subsequent to the initial charge-of f,
the Corporation will record an additional charge-of f; however , if
the value increases in periods subsequent to the charge-of f, the
Corporation will adjust the allowance to account for the increase
but not to a level above the cumulative charge-of f amount.
Credit Cards and Other Consumer
Credit cards  are revolving lines of credit without a defined
maturity date. The estim ated life of a credit card receivable is
determined by estimating the amount and timing of expected
future paym ents (e.g., borrowers making full payments,
minimum payments or somewhere in between) that it will take
for a receiv able balanc e to pay off. The ECL on the future
payments incorporates the spending behavior of a borrower
through time using key borrower-specific factors and the
economic outlook described above. The Corporation applies all
expected payments in accordance with the Credit Card
Accountability Responsi bility and Disclosure Act of 2009 (i.e.,
paying down the highest interest rate bucket first). Then
forecasted future payme nts are prioritized to pay off the oldest
balance until it is brought to zero or an expected charge-of f
amount. Unemployment rate outlook, borrower credit score,
delinquency status and historical payment behavior are all key
inputs into the credit card receivable loss forecasting model.
Future draw s on the credit card lines are excluded from the ECL
as they are unconditionally cancellable.
The ECL for the consumer vehicle lending portfolio is also
determined using quantitative methods supplemented with
97 Bank of America
qualitative analysis. The quantitative model estimates ECL
giving consideration to key borrower and loan characteristics
such as delinquency status, borrower credit score, LTV ratio,
underlying collateral type and collateral value.
Commercial
The ECL on commercia l loans is forecasted using models that
estimate credit losses over the loan’ s contractual life at an
individual loan level. The models use the contractual terms to
forecast future principal cash flows while also considering
expected prepayments. For open-ended commitments such as
revolving lines of credit, changes in funded balance are captured
by forecasting a borrowe r’s draw and payment behavior over the
remaining life of the commitment. For loans collateralized with
commercial real estate and for which the underlying asset is the
primary source of repayment, the loss forecasting models
consider key loan and customer attributes such as LTV ratio, net
operating income and debt service coverage , and captures
variations in behavior according to property type and region. The
outlook on the unemployment rate, gross domestic product, and
forecasted real estate prices are utilized to determine indicators
such as rent levels and vacancy rates, which impact the ECL
estimate. For all other commercial loans and leases, the loss
forecasting model determines the probabilities of transition to
different credit risk ratings or default at each point over the life of
the asset based on the borrower ’s current credit risk rating,
industry sector, size of the exposure and the geographic market.
The severity of loss is determined based on the type of collateral
securing the exposure, the size of the exposure, the borrower ’s
industry sector, any guarantors and the geographic market.
Assumptions of expected loss are conditioned to the economic
outlook, and the model considers key economic variables such
as unemploy ment rate, gross domestic product,  corporate bond
spreads, real estate and other asset prices and equity market
returns.
In addition to the allowance for loan and lease losses, the
Corporation also estimates ECL related to unfunded lending
commitments such as letters of credit, financial guarantees,
unfunded bankers acceptances and binding loan commitments,
excluding commitments accounted for under the fair value
option. Reserves are estimated for the unfunded exposure using
the same models and methodologies as the funded exposure
and are reported as reserves for unfunded lending
commitments.
Nonperforming Loans and Leases, Charge-offs and
Delinquencies
Nonperforming loans and leases generally include loans and
leases that have been placed on nonaccrual status. Loans
accounted for under the fair value option and LHFS are not
reported as nonperforming. When a nonaccrual loan is deemed
uncollectible, it is charged off against the allowance for credit
losses. If the charged-of f amount is later recovered, the amount
is reversed through the allowance for credit  losses at the
recovery date. Charge-of fs are reported net of recoveries (net
charge-of fs). If recoveries for the period are greater than charge-
offs, net charge-of fs are reported as a negative amount.
In accordance with the Corporation’ s policies, consumer real
estate-secured loans, including residential mortgages and home
equity loans, are generally placed on nonaccrual status and
classified as nonperforming at 90 days past due unless
repayment of the loan is insured by the FHA or through
individually insured long-term standby agreements with Fannie
Mae (FNMA) or Freddie Mac (FHLMC) (the fully-insured
portfolio). Residential mortgage loans in the fully-insured
portfolio are notplaced on nonaccrual status and, therefore, are not reported as
nonperforming. Junior-lien home equity loans are placed on
nonaccrual status and classified as nonperforming when the
underlying first-lien mortgage loan becomes 90 days past due
even if the junior-lien loan is current. The outstan ding balance of
real estate-secured loans that is in excess of the estimated
property value less costs to sell is charged off no later than the
end of the month in which the loan becomes 180 days past due
unless the loan is fully insured, or for loans in bankruptcy , within
60 days of receipt of notification of filing, with the remaining
balance classified as nonperforming.
Credit card and other unsecured consumer loans are
charged off when the loan becomes 180 days past due, within
60 days after receipt of notification of death or bankruptcy or
upon confir mation of fraud. These loans continue to accrue
interest until they are charged off and, therefore, are not
reported as nonperforming loans. Consumer vehicle loans are
placed on nonaccrual status when they become 90 days past
due, within 60 days after receipt of notification of bankruptcy or
death or upon confirmati on of fraud. These loans are charged off
to their collateral values when the loans become 120 days past
due, upon repossession of the collateral, within 60 days after
receipt of notification of bankruptcy or death or upon
confirmation of fraud. If repossession of the collateral is not
expected, the loans are fully charged of f.
Commercial loans and leases, excluding business card
loans, that are past due 90 days or more as to principal or
interest, or where reasonable doubt exists as to timely
collection, including loans that are individually identified as being
impaired, are generally placed on nonaccrual status and
classified as nonperforming unless well-secured and in the
process of collection.
Business card loans are charged off in the same manner as
consumer credit card loans. Other commercial loans and leases
are generall y charged off when all or a portion  of the principal
amount is determined to be uncollectible.
The entire balance of a consumer loan or commercial loan or
lease is contractually delinquent if the minimum payment is not
received by the specified due date on the customer ’s billing
statement. Interest and fees continue to accru e on past due
loans and leases until the date the loan is place d on nonaccrual
status, if applicable. Accrued interest receivable is reversed
when loans and leases are placed on nonaccrual status. Interest
collections on nonaccruing loans and leases for which the
ultimate collectability of principal is uncertain are applied as
principal reductions; otherwise, such collections are credited to
income when received. Loans and leases may be restored to
accrual status when all principal and interest is current and full
repayment of the remaining contractual principal and interest is
expected.
Troubled Debt Restructurings
Consumer and commercial loans and leases whose contractual
terms have been restructured in a manner that grants a
concession to a borrow er experiencing financial difficulties are
classified as TDRs. Concessions could include a reduction in
the interest rate to a rate that is below market on the loan,
payment extensions, forgiveness of principal, forbearance or
other actions designed to maximize collections. Loans that are
carried at fair value and LHFS are not classified as TDRs.
Loans and leases whose contractual terms have been
modified in a TDR and are current at the time of restructuring
may remain on accrual status if there is demonstrated
performance prior to the restructuring and paym ent in full under
the restructured terms is expected. Otherwise, the loans are
Bank of America 98
placed on nonaccrual status and reported as nonperforming,
except for fully-insured consumer real estate loans, until there is
sustained repayment performance for a reasonable period,
generally six months. If accruing TDRs cease to perform in
accordance with their modified contractual terms, they are
placed on nonaccrual status and reported as nonperforming
TDRs.
Secured consumer loans that have been discharged in
Chapter 7 bankruptcy and have not been reaffirmed by the
borrower are classified as TDRs at the time of discharge. Such
loans are placed on nonaccrual status and written down to the
estimated collateral value less costs to sell no later than at the
time of discharge. If these loans are contractually current,
interest collections are generally recorded in interest income on
a cash  basis. Consumer real estate-secured loans for which a
binding offer to restructure has been extended are also
classified as TDRs. Credit card and other unsecured consumer
loans that have been renegotiated in a TDR generally remain on
accrual statu s until the loan is either paid in full or charged off,
which occurs no later than the end of the month in which the
loan becomes 180 days past due or, for loans that have been
placed on a fixed payment plan, 120 days  past due.
A loan that had previously been modified in a TDR and is
subsequently refinanced under current underwriting standards at
a mark et rate with no concessionary terms is accounted for as a
new loan and is no longer reported as a TDR.
Loans Held-for-sale
Loans that the Corpora tion intends to sell in the foreseeable
future, includ ing resident ial mortgages, loan syndications, and to
a lesser degree, commercial real estate, consumer finance and
other loans, are reported as LHFS and are carried at the lower
of aggregate cost or fair value. The Corporation accounts for
certain LHFS, including residential mortgage LHFS, under the
fair value option. Loan origination costs for LHFS carried at the
lower of cost or fair value are capitalized as part of the carrying
value of the loans and, upon the sale of a loan, are recognized
as part of the gain or loss in noninterest income . LHFS that are
on nonaccrual status and are reported as nonperforming, as
defined in the policy herein, are reported separately from
nonperforming loans and leases.
Premises and Equipment
Premises and equipment are carried at cost less accumulated
depreciation and amortization. Depreciation and amortization
are recognized using the straight-line method over the estimated
useful lives of the assets. Estimated lives range up to 40 years
for buildings, up to 12 years for furniture and equipment, and the
shorter of lease term or estimated useful life for leasehold
improvements .
Other Assets
For the Corporation’ s financial assets that are measured at
amortized cost and are not included in debt securities or loans
and leases on the Consolidated Balance Sheet, the Corporation
evaluates these assets for ECL using various techniques. For
assets that are subject to collateral maintena nce provisions,
including federal funds sold and securities borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell, wher e the collateral
consists of daily margining of liquid and marketable assets
where the margining is expected to be maintained into the
foreseeable future, the expected losses are assu med to be zero.
For all other assets, the Corporation performs qualitative
analyses, including consideration of historical losses and current
economic conditions, to estimate any ECL  which arethen included in a valuation account that is recorded as a
contra-asset against the amortized cost basis of the financial
asset.
Lessee Arrangements
Substantially all of the Corporation’ s lessee arrangements are
operating leases. Under these arrangements, the Corporation
records right-of-use assets and lease liabilities at lease
commencement. Right- of-use assets are reported in other
assets  on the Consolidated Balance Sheet, and the related
lease liabilities are reported in accrued expenses and other
liabilities . All leases are recorded on the Consolidated Balance
Sheet except leases with an initial term less than 12 months for
which the Corporation made the short-term lease election.
Lease expense is recognized on a straight-line basis over the
lease term and is recorded in occupancy and equipment
expense in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
The Corporation made an accounting policy election not to
separate lease and non-lease components of a contract that is
or contains a lease for its real estate and equipment leases. As
such, lease payments represent payments on both lease and
non-lease components. At lease commencement, lease
liabilities are recognized based on the present value of the
remaining lease payments and discounted using the
Corporation’ s increment al borrowing rate. Right-of-use assets
initially equal the lease liability , adjusted for any lease payments
made prior to lease commencement and for any lease
incentives.
Goodwill and Intangible Assets
Goodwill is the purchase premium after adjus ting for the fair
value of net assets acquired. Goodwill is not amortized but is
reviewed for potential impairment on an annual  basis, or when
events or circumstances indicate a potential impairment, at the
reporting unit level. A reporting unit is a business segment or
one level below a business segment.
The Corporation assesses the fair value of each reporting
unit against its carrying value, including goodwill, as measured
by allocated equity . For purposes of goodwill impairment testing,
the Corporation utilizes allocated equity as a proxy for the
carrying value of its reporting units. Allocated equity in the
reporting units is comprised of allocated capital plus capital for
the portion of goodwill and intangibles specifically assigned to
the reporting unit.
In performin g its goodwill impairment testing, the Corporation
first assesses qualitative factors to determine whether it is more
likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than
its carrying value. Qualitative factors include , among other
things, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market
considerations, financial  performance of the respective reporting
unit and other relevant entity- and reporti ng-unit specific
considerations.
If the Corporation conclu des it is more likely than not that the
fair value of a reporting  unit is less than its carrying value, a
quantitative assessment is performed. The Corporation has an
unconditional option to bypass the qualitative assessment for
any reporting unit in any period and proceed directly to
performing the quantitative goodwill impairment test. The
Corporation may resume performing the qualitative assessment
in any subsequent period.
When performing the quantitative assessmen t, if the fair
value of the reporting unit exceeds its carrying value, goodwill of
the reporting unit would not be considered impaired. If the
carrying value of the reporting unit exceeds its fair value, a
goodwill impairment loss would be recognized for the amount by
99 Bank of America
which the reporting unit’s allocated equity exceeds its fair value.
An impairment loss recognized cannot exceed the amount of
goodwill assigned to a reporting unit. An impairment loss
establishes a new basis in the goodwill, and subsequent
reversals of goodwill impairment losses are not permitted under
applicable accounting guidance.
For intangible assets subject to amortization, an impairment
loss is recognized if the carrying value of the intangible asset is
not recovera ble and exceeds fair value. The carrying value of
the intangibl e asset is considered not recoverable if it exceeds
the sum of the undiscounted cash flows expected to result from
the use of the asset. Intangible assets deemed to have indefinite
useful lives are not subject to amortization. An impairment loss
is recognized if the carrying value of the intangible asset with an
indefinite life exceeds its fair value.
Variable Interest Entities
A VIE is an entity that lacks equity investors or whose equity
investors do not have a controlling financial interest in the entity
through their equity investments. The Corporation consolidates
a VIE if it has both the power to direct the activities of the VIE
that most significantly impact the VIE’s econom ic performance
and an obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive
benefits that could potentially be significant to the VIE. On a
quarterly basis, the Corporation reassesses its involvement with
the VIE and evaluates the impact of changes in governing
documents and its financial interests in the VIE. The
consolidation status of the VIEs with which the Corporation is
involved may change as a result of such reassessments.
The Corporation primarily uses VIEs for its securitization
activities, in which the Corporation transfers whole loans or debt
securities into a trust or other vehicle. When the Corporation is
the servicer of whole loans held in a securitization trust,
including non-agency residential mortgages, home equity loans,
credit cards, and other loans, the Corporation has the power to
direct the most significan t activities of the trust. The Corporation
generally does not have the power to direct the most significant
activities of a residential mortgage agency trust except in certain
circumstances in which the Corporation holds substantially all of
the issued securities and has the unilateral right to liquidate the
trust. The power to direct the most significant activities of a
commercial mortgage securitization trust is typically held by the
special servicer or by the party holding specific subordinate
securities which embody certain controlling rights. The
Corporation consolidate s a whole-loan securiti zation trust if it
has the power to direct  the most significant activities and also
holds secur ities issued by the trust or has other contractual
arrangements, other than standard representations and
warranties, that could potentially be significant to the trust.
The Corpora tion may also transfer trading accou nt securities
and AFS securities into municipal bond or resecuritization trusts.
The Corporation consolidates a municipal bond or
resecuritization trust if it has control over the ongoing activities
of the trust such as the remarketing of the trust’s liabilities or, if
there are no ongoing activities, sole discretion over the design of
the trust, including the identification of securities to be
transferred in and the structure of securities to be issued, and
also retains securities or has liquidity or other commitments that
could potent ially be significant to the trust. The Corporation does
not consolidate a municipal bond or resecuritization trust if one
or a limited number of third-party investors share responsibility
for the design of the trust or have control over the significant
activities of the trust through liquidation or other substantive
rights.Other VIEs used by the Corporation include collateralized
debt obligations (CDOs), investment vehicles created on behalf
of customer s and other investment vehicles. The Corporation
does not routinely serve  as collateral manager  for CDOs and,
therefore, does not typically have the power to direct the
activities that most significantly impact the economic
performance of a CDO. However , following an event of default, if
the Corporation is a majority holder of senior securities issued
by a CDO and acquires  the power to manage its assets, the
Corporation consolidates the CDO.
The Corporation consolidates a customer or other
investment vehicle if it has control over the initial design of the
vehicle or manages the assets in the vehicle and also absorbs
potentially significant gains or losses through an investment in
the vehicle, derivative contracts or other arrangements. The
Corporation does not consolidate an investment vehicle if a
single inves tor controlle d the initial design of the vehicle or
manages the assets in the vehicles or if the Corporation does
not have a variable interest that could potential ly be significant
to the vehicle.
Retained interests in securitized assets are initially recorded
at fair value. In addition, the Corporation may invest in debt
securities issued by unconsolidated VIEs. Fair values of these
debt securities, which are classified as trading account assets,
debt securities carried at fair value or HTM securities, are based
primarily on quoted market prices in active or inactive markets.
Generally , quoted market prices for retained residual interests
are not available; therefore, the Corporation  estimates fair
values based on the present value of the associated expected
future cash flows.
Fair Value
The Corporation measures the fair values of its assets and
liabilities, where applicable, in accordance with accounting
guidance that requires an entity to base fair value on exit price.
Under this guidance, an entity is required to maximize the use of
observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs
in measuring  fair value. Under applicable accou nting standards,
fair value measurements are categorized into one of three levels
based on the inputs to the valuation technique with the highest
priority given  to unadjusted quoted prices in active markets and
the lowest priority given to unobservable inputs. The Corporation
categorizes its fair value measurements of financial instruments
based on this three-level hierarchy .
Level 1Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for
identical assets or liabilities. Level 1 assets and
liabilities include debt and equity securities and
derivative contracts that are traded in an active
exchange market, as well as certain U.S. Treasury
securities that are highly liquid and are actively traded
in OTC markets.
Level 2Observable inputs other than Level 1 prices, such as
quoted price s for similar assets or liabilities, quoted
prices in markets that are not active, or other inputs
that are observable or can be corroborated by
observable market data for substantially the full term of
the assets or liabilities. Level 2 assets and liabilities
include debt securities with quoted prices that are
traded less frequently than exchange-traded
instruments and derivative contracts where fair value is
determined using a pricing model with inputs that are
observable in the market or can be derived principally
from or corroborated by observable market data. This
category generally includes U.S. government and
Bank of America 100
agency mortgage-backed (MBS) and asset-backed
securities (ABS), corporate debt securities, derivative
contracts, certain loans and LHFS.
Level 3Unobservable inputs that are supported by little or no
market activity and that are significant to the overall fair
value of the assets or liabilities. Level 3 assets and
liabilities include financ ial instruments for which the
determination of fair value requires significant
management judgment or estimation. The fair value for
such assets and liabilities is generally determined using
pricing mode ls, discount ed cash flow methodolo gies or
similar techniques that incorporate the assumptions a
market participant would use in pricing the asset or
liability . This category generally includes retained
residual interests in securitizations, consumer MSRs,
certain ABS, highly structured, complex or long-dated
derivative contracts, certain loans and LHFS, IRLCs
and certain CDOs where independent pricing
information cannot be obtained for a significant portion
of the underlying assets.
Income Taxes
There are two components of income tax expen se: current and
deferred. Current income tax expense reflects taxes to be paid
or refunded for the current period. Deferred income tax expense
results from changes in deferred tax assets and liabilities
between periods. These gross deferred tax assets and liabilities
represent decreases or increases in taxes expe cted to be paid
in the future because of future reversals of temporary
differences in the bases of assets and liabilities as measured by
tax laws and their bases as reported in the financial statements.
Deferred tax assets are also recognized for tax attributes such
as net operating loss carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards.
Valuation allowances are recorded to reduce deferred tax assets
to the amounts managem ent concludes are more likely than not
to be realized.
Income tax benefits are recognized and meas ured based
upon a two-step model: first, a tax position must be more likely
than not to be sustained based solely on its technical merits in
order to be recognized, and second, the benefit is measured as
the largest dollar amount of that position that is more likely than
not to be sustained upon  settlement. The differen ce between the
benefit recognized and the tax benefit claimed on a tax return is
referred to as an unrecognized tax benefit. The Corporation
records income tax-related interest and penaltie s, if applicable,
within income tax expense.
Revenue Recognition
The following summarizes the Corporation’ s revenue recognition
accounting policies for certain noninterest income activities.
Card Income
Card income includes annual, late and over-limit fees as well as
interchange, cash advances and other miscellaneous items from
credit and debit card transactions and from processing card
transactions for merchants. Card income is presented net of
direct costs. Interchange fees are recognized upon settlement of
the credit and debit card payment transactions and are generally
determined on a perce ntage basis for credit cards and fixed
rates for debit cards based on the corresponding payment
network’ s rates. Substantially all card fees are recognized at the
transaction date, except for certain time-based fees such as
annual fees, which are recognized over 12 months. Fees
charged to cardholders and merchants that are estimated to be
uncollectible are reserved in the allowancefor loan and lease losses. Included in direct cost are rewards
and credit card partner payments. Rewards paid to cardholders
are related to points earned by the cardholder that can be
redeemed for a broad range of rewards including cash, travel
and gift cards. The points to be redeemed are estimated based
on past redemption behavior , card product type, account
transaction activity and other historical card performance. The
liability is reduced as the points are redeemed. The Corporation
also makes payments to credit card partners. The payments are
based on revenue-sharing agreements that are generally driven
by cardholder transactions and partner sales volumes. As part of
the revenue-sharing agreements, the credi t card partner
provides the Corporation exclusive rights to market to the credit
card partner ’s members or customers on behalf of the
Corporation.
Service Charges
Service charges include deposit and lending-related fees.
Deposit-related fees consist of fees earned on consumer and
commercial deposit activities and are generally recognized when
the transactions occur or as the service is performed. Consumer
fees are earned on consumer deposit accounts for account
maintenance and various transaction-based services, such as
ATM transa ctions, wire transfer activities, check and money
order processing and insufficient funds/overdraft transactions.
Commercial deposit-rela ted fees are from the Corporation’ s
Global Transaction Services business and consist of commercial
deposit and treasury management services, including account
maintenance and other services, such as payroll, sweep
account and other cash management services. Lending-related
fees generally represent transactional fees earned from certain
loan commitments, financial guarantees and SBLCs.
Investment and Brokerage Services
Investment and brokerage services consist of asset
management and brokerage fees. Asset manag ement fees are
earned from the management of client assets under advisory
agreements or the full discretion of the Corporation’ s financial
advisors (collectively referred to as assets under management
(AUM)). Asset management fees are earned as a percentage of
the client’s AUM and generally range from 50 basis points  (bps)
to 150 bps of the AUM. In cases where a third party is used to
obtain a client’ s investment allocation, the fee remitted to the
third party is recorded net and is not reflected in the transaction
price, as the Corporation is an agent for those services.
Brokerage fees include income earned from transaction-
based services that are performed as part of investment
management services and are based on a fixed price per unit or
as a percent age of the total transaction amount.  Brokerage fees
also include distribution fees and sales commissions that are
primarily in the Global Wealth & Investment Management
(GWIM)  segm ent and are earned over time. In addition, primarily
in the Global Markets  segment, brokerage fees are earned when
the Corporation fills customer orders to buy or sell various
financial products or when it acknowledges, affirms, settles and
clears transactions and/or submits trade information to the
appropriate clearing broker . Certain customers pay brokerage,
clearing and/or exchange fees imposed by relevant regulatory
bodies or exchanges in order to execute or clear trades. These
fees are recorded net and are not reflected in the transaction
price, as the Corporation is an agent for those services.
Investment Banking Income
Investment banking income includes underwriting income and
financial advisory services income. Underwriting consists of fees
101 Bank of America
earned for the placem ent of a customer ’s debt or equity
securities. The revenue is generally earned based on a
percentage of the fixed  number of shares or principal placed.
Once the number of shares or notes is determined and the
service is completed, the underwriting fees are recognized. The
Corporation incurs certain out-of-pocket expense s, such as legal
costs, in performing these services. These expenses are
recovered through the revenue the Corporation earns from the
customer and are includ ed in operating expens es. Syndication
fees represent fees earned as the agent or lead lender
responsible for structuring, arranging and administering a loan
syndication.
Financial advisory services consist of fees earned for
assisting clients with transactions related to mergers and
acquisitions and financial restructurings. Revenue varies
depending on the size of the transaction and scope of services
performed and is genera lly contingent on succe ssful completion
of the transaction. Revenue is typically recognized once the
transaction is completed and all services have been rendered.
Additionally , the Corporation may earn a fixed fee in merger and
acquisition transactions to provide a fairness opinion, with the
fees recognized when the opinion is delivered to the client.
Other Revenue Measurement and Recognition
Policies
The Corpor ation did not disclose the value of any open
performance obligations at December 31, 2022, as its contracts
with custome rs generally  have a fixed term that is less than one
year, an open term with a cancellation period that is less than
one year, or provisions that allow the Corporati on to recognize
revenue at the amount it has the right to invoice.
Earnings Per Common Share
Earnings per common share (EPS) is computed by dividing net
income allocated to common shareholders by the weighted-
average common shares outstanding, excluding unvestedcommon shares subject to repurchase or cancellation. Net
income allocated to common shareholders is net income
adjusted for preferred stock dividends including dividends
declared, accretion of discounts on preferred stock including
accelerated accretion when preferred stock is repaid early , and
cumulative dividends related to the current dividend period that
have not been declared as of period end, less income allocated
to participating securities. Diluted EPS is computed by dividing
income allocated to common shareholders plus dividends on
dilutive convertible preferred stock and preferred stock that can
be tendered to exercise warrants, by the weighted-average
common shares outstanding plus amounts representing the
dilutive effect of stock options outstanding, restricted stock,
restricted stock units (RSUs), outstanding warrants and the
dilution resulting from the conversion of convertible preferred
stock, if applicable.
Foreign Currency Translation
Assets, liabilities and operations of foreign branches and
subsidiaries are recorded based on the functional currency of
each entity . When the functional currency of a foreign operation
is the local currency , the assets, liabilities and operations are
translated, for consolidation purposes, from the local currency to
the U.S. dollar reporting currency at period-end rates for assets
and liabilities and generally at average rates for results of
operations. The resulting unrealized gains and losses are
reported as a component of accumulated OCI, net-of-tax. When
the foreign entity’ s functional currency is the U.S. dollar , the
resulting remeasurement gains or losses on foreign currency-
denominated assets or liabilities are included in earnings.
Bank of America 102
NOTE 2  Net Interest Income and Noninterest Income
The table below present s the Corporation’ s net interest income and noninterest income disaggre gated by revenue source for 2022,
2021 and 2020. For more information, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles. For a disaggregation of
noninterest income by business segment and All Other , see Note 23 – Business Segment Information .
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Net interest income
Interest income
Loans and leases $ 37,919 $ 29,282 $ 34,029 
Debt securities 17,127 12,376 9,790 
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell 4,560 (90) 903 
Trading account assets 5,521 3,770 4,128 
Other interest income 7,438 2,334 2,735 
Total interest income 72,565 47,672 51,585 
Interest expense
Deposits 4,718 537 1,943 
Short-term borrowings 6,978 (358) 987 
Trading account liabilities 1,538 1,128 974 
Long-term debt 6,869 3,431 4,321 
Total interest expense 20,103 4,738 8,225 
Net interest income $ 52,462 $ 42,934 $ 43,360 
Noninterest income
Fees and commissions
Card income
Interchange fees $ 4,096 $ 4,560 $ 3,954 
Other card income 1,987 1,658 1,702 
Total card income 6,083 6,218 5,656 
Service charges
Deposit-related fees 5,190 6,271 5,991 
Lending-related fees 1,215 1,233 1,150 
Total service charges 6,405 7,504 7,141 
Investment and brokerage services
Asset management fees 12,152 12,729 10,708 
Brokerage fees 3,749 3,961 3,866 
Total investment and brokerage services 15,901 16,690 14,574 
Investment banking fees
Underwriting income 1,970 5,077 4,698 
Syndication fees 1,070 1,499 861 
Financial advisory services 1,783 2,311 1,621 
Total investment banking fees 4,823 8,887 7,180 
Total fees and commissions 33,212 39,299 34,551 
Market making and similar activities 12,075 8,691 8,355 
Other income (loss) (2,799) (1,811) (738)
Total noninterest income $ 42,488 $ 46,179 $ 42,168 
For more information on negative interest, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles.
Gross interchange fees and merchant income were $12.9 billion, $11.5 billion and $9.2 billion for 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively , and are presented net of $8.8 billion, $6.9 billion and $5.5
billion of expenses for rewards and partner payments as well as certain other card costs for the same periods.(1)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
103 Bank of America
NOTE 3 Derivatives
Derivative Balances
Derivatives are entered into on behalf of customers, for trading
or to support risk management activities. Derivatives used in risk
management activities include derivatives that may or may not
be designated in qualifying hedge accounting relationships.
Derivatives that are not designated in qualifying hedge
accounting relationships are referred to as other risk
management derivatives. For more information on theCorporation’ s derivatives and hedging activities, see Note 1 –
Summary of Significan t Accounting Principles . The following
tables present derivative instruments included on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet in derivative assets and liabilities at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. Balances are presented on a
gross basis,  prior to the application of counter party and cash
collateral netting. Total derivative assets and liabilities are
adjusted on an aggregate basis to take into consideration the
effects of legally enforc eable master netting agreements and
have been reduced by cash collateral received or paid.
December 31, 2022
Gross Derivative Assets Gross Derivative Liabilities
(Dollars in billions)Contract/
Notional Trading and
Other Risk
Management
DerivativesQualifying
Accounting
Hedges TotalTrading and
Other Risk
Management
DerivativesQualifying
Accounting
Hedges Total
Interest rate contracts        
Swaps $ 18,285.9 $ 138.2 $ 20.7 $ 158.9 $ 120.3 $ 36.7 $ 157.0 
Futures and forwards 2,796.3 8.6 — 8.6 7.8 — 7.8 
Written options 1,657.9 — — — 41.4 — 41.4 
Purchased options 1,594.7 42.4 — 42.4 — — — 
Foreign exchange contracts  
Swaps 1,509.0 44.0 0.3 44.3 43.3 0.4 43.7 
Spot, futures and forwards 4,159.3 59.9 0.1 60.0 62.1 0.6 62.7 
Written options 392.2 — — — 8.1 — 8.1 
Purchased options 362.6 8.3 — 8.3 — — — 
Equity contracts  
Swaps 394.0 10.8 — 10.8 12.2 — 12.2 
Futures and forwards 114.6 3.3 — 3.3 1.0 — 1.0 
Written options 746.8 — — — 45.0 — 45.0 
Purchased options 671.6 40.9 — 40.9 — — — 
Commodity contracts   
Swaps 56.0 5.1 — 5.1 5.3 — 5.3 
Futures and forwards 157.3 3.0 — 3.0 2.3 0.8 3.1 
Written options 59.5 — — — 3.3 — 3.3 
Purchased options 61.8 3.6 — 3.6 — — — 
Credit derivatives    
Purchased credit derivatives:    
Credit default swaps 319.9 2.8 — 2.8 1.6 — 1.6 
Total return swaps/options 71.5 0.7 — 0.7 3.0 — 3.0 
Written credit derivatives:   
Credit default swaps 295.2 1.2 — 1.2 2.4 — 2.4 
Total return swaps/options 85.3 4.4 — 4.4 0.9 — 0.9 
Gross derivative assets/liabilities $ 377.2 $ 21.1 $ 398.3 $ 360.0 $ 38.5 $ 398.5 
Less: Legally enforceable master netting
agreements   (315.9)   (315.9)
Less: Cash collateral received/paid    (33.8)   (37.8)
Total derivative assets/liabilities    $ 48.6   $ 44.8 
Represents the total contract/notional amount of derivative assets and liabilities outstanding.
Includes certain out-of-the-money purchased options that have a liability amount primarily due to the deferral of the option premiums to the end of the contract.
Includes certain out-of-the-money written options that have an asset amount primarily due to the deferral of the option premiums to the end of the contract.
The net derivative asset (liability) and notional amount of written credit derivatives for which the Corporation held purchased credit derivatives with identical underlying referenced names were
$(1.2) billion and $ 276.9  billion at December 31, 2022.(1)
(2)
(3)
(2)
(3)
 (2)
(3)
(2)
 (3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 104
December 31, 2021
Gross Derivative Assets Gross Derivative Liabilities
(Dollars in billions)Contract/
Notional Trading and
Other Risk
Management
DerivativesQualifying
Accounting
Hedges TotalTrading and
Other Risk
Management
DerivativesQualifying
Accounting
Hedges Total
Interest rate contracts        
Swaps $18,068.1 $ 150.5 $ 8.9 $ 159.4 $ 156.4 $ 4.4 $ 160.8 
Futures and forwards 2,243.2 1.1 — 1.1 1.0 — 1.0 
Written options 1,616.1 — — — 28.8 — 28.8 
Purchased options 1,673.6 33.1 — 33.1 — — — 
Foreign exchange contracts       
Swaps 1,420.9 28.6 0.2 28.8 30.5 0.2 30.7 
Spot, futures and forwards 4,087.2 37.1 0.3 37.4 37.7 0.2 37.9 
Written options 287.2 — — — 4.1 — 4.1 
Purchased options 267.6 4.1 — 4.1 — — — 
Equity contracts        
Swaps 443.8 12.3 — 12.3 14.5 — 14.5 
Futures and forwards 113.3 0.5 — 0.5 1.7 — 1.7 
Written options 737.7 — — — 58.5 — 58.5 
Purchased options 657.0 55.9 — 55.9 — — — 
Commodity contracts        
Swaps 47.7 3.1 — 3.1 6.0 — 6.0 
Futures and forwards 101.5 2.3 — 2.3 0.3 1.1 1.4 
Written options 44.4 — — — 2.6 — 2.6 
Purchased options 38.3 3.2 — 3.2 — — — 
Credit derivatives        
Purchased credit derivatives:        
Credit default swaps 297.0 1.9 — 1.9 4.3 — 4.3 
Total return swaps/options 85.3 0.2 — 0.2 1.1 — 1.1 
Written credit derivatives:       
Credit default swaps 279.8 4.2 — 4.2 1.6 — 1.6 
Total return swaps/options 85.3 0.9 — 0.9 0.5 — 0.5 
Gross derivative assets/liabilities  $ 339.0 $ 9.4 $ 348.4 $ 349.6 $ 5.9 $ 355.5 
Less: Legally enforceable master netting agreements    (282.3)   (282.3)
Less: Cash collateral received/paid    (30.8)   (35.5)
Total derivative assets/liabilities    $ 35.3   $ 37.7 
Represents the total contract/notional amount of derivative assets and liabilities outstanding.
Includes certain out-of-the-money purchased options that have a liability amount primarily due to the deferral of the option premiums to the end of the contract.
Includes certain out-of-the-money written options that have an asset amount primarily due to the deferral of the option premiums to the end of the contract.
The net derivative asset (liability) and notional amount of written credit derivatives for which the Corporation held purchased credit derivatives with identical underlying referenced names were $2.3
billion and $ 258.4  billion at December 31, 2021.
Offsetting of Derivatives
The Corporation enters into International Swaps  and Derivatives
Association, Inc. (ISDA) master netting agreements or similar
agreements with substantially all of the Corpora tion’s derivative
counterparties. Where legally enforceable, these  master netting
agreements give the Corporation, in the event of default by the
counterparty , the right to liquidate securities held as collateral
and to offset receivables and payables with the same
counterparty . For purposes of the Consolidated Balance Sheet,
the Corporation offsets derivative assets and liabilities and cash
collateral held with the same counterparty where it has such a
legally enforceable master netting agreement.
The following table presents derivative instruments included
in derivative assets and liabilities on the Consolidated BalanceSheet at December 31, 2022 and 2021 by primary risk (e.g.,
interest rate risk) and the platform, where appli cable, on which
these derivatives are transacted. Balances are presented on a
gross basis,  prior to the application of counter party and cash
collateral netting. Total gross derivative assets and liabilities are
adjusted on an aggregate basis to take into consideration the
effects of legally enforceable master netting agreements, which
include reducing the balance for counterparty netting and cash
collateral received or paid.
For more information on offsetting of securities financing
agreements, see Note 10 – Securities Financing Agreements,
Short-term Borrowings, Collateral and Restricted Cash .(1)
(2)
(3)
(2)
(3)
 (2)
(3)
(2)
 (3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
105 Bank of America
Offsetting of Derivatives 
Derivative
AssetsDerivative
 LiabilitiesDerivative
AssetsDerivative
 Liabilities
(Dollars in billions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Interest rate contracts     
Over-the-counter $ 138.4 $ 132.3 $ 171.3 $ 166.3 
Exchange-traded 0.4 0.1 0.2 — 
Over-the-counter cleared 71.4 71.1 22.6 22.5 
Foreign exchange contracts
Over-the-counter 109.7 110.6 67.9 70.5 
Over-the-counter cleared 1.3 1.2 1.1 1.1 
Equity contracts
Over-the-counter 21.5 22.6 29.2 32.9 
Exchange-traded 33.0 33.8 38.3 38.4 
Commodity contracts
Over-the-counter 8.3 9.3 6.1 7.6 
Exchange-traded 2.4 1.9 1.4 1.3 
Over-the-counter cleared 0.3 0.3 0.1 0.1 
Credit derivatives
Over-the-counter 8.9 7.5 5.2 5.3 
Over-the-counter cleared — — 1.8 1.8 
Total gross derivative assets/liabilities, before netting
Over-the-counter 286.8 282.3 279.7 282.6 
Exchange-traded 35.8 35.8 39.9 39.7 
Over-the-counter cleared 73.0 72.6 25.6 25.5 
Less: Legally enforceable master netting agreements and cash collateral received/paid
Over-the-counter (243.8) (248.2) (250.3) (254.6)
Exchange-traded (33.5) (33.5) (37.8) (37.8)
Over-the-counter cleared (72.4) (72.0) (25.0) (25.4)
Derivative assets/liabilities, after netting 45.9 37.0 32.1 30.0 
Other gross derivative assets/liabilities 2.7 7.8 3.2 7.7 
Total derivative assets/liabilities 48.6 44.8 35.3 37.7 
Less: Financial instruments collateral (18.5) (7.4) (11.8) (10.6)
Total net derivative assets/liabilities $ 30.1 $ 37.4 $ 23.5 $ 27.1 
Over-the-counter derivatives include bilateral transactions between the Corporation and a particular counterparty . Over-the-counter cleared derivatives include bilateral transactions between the
Corporation and a counterparty where the transaction is cleared through a clearinghouse. Exchange-traded derivatives include listed options transacted on an exchange.
Consists of derivatives entered into under master netting agreements where the enforceability of these agreements is uncertain under bankruptcy laws in some countries or industries.
Amounts are limited to the derivati ve asset/liability balance and, accordingly , do not include excess collateral received/pledged. Financial instruments collateral includes securities collateral
received or pledged and cash securities held and posted at third-party custodians that are not offset on the Consolidated Balance Sheet but shown as a reduction to derive net derivative assets
and liabilities.
ALM and Risk Management Derivatives
The Corpora tion’s ALM and risk management activities include
the use of derivatives  to mitigate risk to the Corporation
including derivatives designated in qualifying hedge accounting
relationships and derivatives used in other risk management
activities. Interest rate, foreign exchange, equity , commodity and
credit contracts are utilized in the Corporation's ALM and risk
management activities.
The Corporation maintains an overall interest rate risk
management strategy that incorporates the use of interest rate
contracts, which are generally non-leveraged generic interest
rate and basis swaps, options, futures and forwards, to minimize
significant fluctuations in earnings caused by interest rate
volatility . The Corporation’ s goal is to manage interest rate
sensitivity and volatility so that movements in interest rates do
not significa ntly adversely affect earnings or capital. As a result
of interest rate fluctuations, hedged fixed-rate assets and
liabilities appreciate or depreciate in fair value. Gains or losses
on the derivative instruments that are linked to the hedged fixed-
rate assets and liabilities  are expected to substantially offset this
unrealized appreciation or depreciation.
Market risk, including interest rate risk, can be substantial in
the mortgage business. Market risk in the mortgage business is
the risk that values of mortgage assets or revenues will be
adversely affected by changes in market conditions such as
interest rate movements. To mitigate the interest rate risk in
mortgage banking production income, the Corporation utilizesforward loan sale commitments and other derivative
instruments, including purchased options, and certain debt
securities. The Corporation also utilizes derivatives such as
interest rate options, interest rate swaps, forward settlement
contracts and eurodollar futures to hedge certain market risks of
MSRs.
The Corporation uses foreign exchange contract s to manage
the foreign exchange risk associated with certain foreign
currency-denominated assets and liabilities, as well as the
Corporation’ s investments in non-U.S. subsidiaries. Exposure to
loss on these contracts will increase or decrease over their
respective lives as currency exchange and interest rates
fluctuate.
The Corporation purchases credit derivatives to manage
credit risk related to certain funded and unfunded credit
exposures. Credit derivatives include credit default swaps
(CDS), total return swaps and swaptions. These derivatives are
recorded on the Consolidated Balance Sheet at fair value with
changes in fair value recorded in other income.
Derivatives Designated as Accounting Hedges
The Corporation uses various types of interest rate and foreign
exchange derivative contracts to protect against changes in the
fair value of its assets and liabilities due to fluctuations in
interest rates and foreign exchange rates (fair value hedges).
The Corpora tion also uses these types of contracts to protect
against changes in the cash flows of its assets and liabilities,(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
Bank of America 106
and other forecasted transactions (cash flow hedges). The
Corporation hedges its net investment in consolidated non-U.S.
operations determined to have functional curren cies other than
the U.S. dollar using forward exchange contracts and cross-
currency basis swaps, and by issuing foreign currency-denominated debt (net investment hedges).
Fair Value Hedges
The table below summarizes information related to fair value
hedges for 2022, 2021 and 2020.
Gains and Losses on Derivatives Designated as Fair Value Hedges
Derivative Hedged Item
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Interest rate risk on long-term debt $ (26,654)$ (7,018)$ 7,091 $ 26,825 $ 6,838 $ (7,220)
Interest rate and foreign currency risk on long-term debt (120) (90) 783 119 79 (783)
Interest rate risk on available-for-sale securities 21,991 5,203 (44) (22,280) (5,167) 49 
Price risk on commodity inventory 674 — — (674) — — 
Total $ (4,109)$ (1,905)$ 7,830 $ 3,990 $ 1,750 $ (7,954)
Amounts are recorded in interest expense in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
For 2022, 2021 and 2020, the derivative amount includes gains (losses) of $(37) million, $(73) million and $701 million in interest expense, $(81) million, $0 and $73 million in market making and
similar activities, and $(2) million, $(17) million and $9 million in accumulated OCI, respec tively . Line item totals are in the Consolidated Statement of Income and on the Consolidated Balance
Sheet.
Amounts are recorded in interest income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
Amounts are recorded in market making and similar activities in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
The table below summa rizes the carrying value  of hedged assets and liabilities that are designated and qualifying in fair value
hedging relationships along with the cumulative  amount of fair value hedging adjustments included in the carrying value that have
been recorded in the current hedging relationships. These fair value hedging adjustments are open basis adjustments that are not
subject to amortization as long as the hedging relationship remains designated.
Designated Fair Value Hedged Assets and Liabilities
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(Dollars in millions) Carrying ValueCumulative
Fair Value
 Adjustments Carrying ValueCumulative
Fair Value
 Adjustments
Long-term debt $ 187,402 $ (21,372)$ 181,745 $ 3,987 
Available-for-sale debt securities 167,518 (18,190) 209,038 (2,294)
Trading account assets 16,119 146 2,067 32 
Increase (decrease) to carrying value.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the cumulative fair value adjustments  remaining on long-term debt and available-for-sale debt securities from discontinued hedging relationships resulted in an
increase of $137 million and $1.5 billion in the relate d liability and a decrease in the related asset of $4.9 billion and $1.0 billion, which are being amortized over the remaining contractual life of the
de-designated hedged items.
These amounts include the amortized cost of the prepayable financial assets used to designate hedging relationships in which the hedged item is the last layer expected to be remaining at the end
of the hedging relationship (i.e. last-o f-layer hedging relationship). At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the amortized cost of the closed portfolios used in these hedging relationships was $21.4 billion
and $21.1 billion, of which $9.2 billion and $6.9 billion was designated in the last-of-layer hedging relationship. At Dece mber 31, 2022 and 2021, the cumulative adjustment associated with these
hedging relationships was a decrease of $ 451 million and $ 172 million.
Carrying value represents amortized cost.
Represents hedging activities related to certain commodities inventory .
Cash Flow and Net Investment Hedges
The table below summarizes certain information related to cash
flow hedges and net investment hedges for 2022, 2021 and
2020. Of the $11.9 billion after-tax net loss ($15.9 billion pretax)
on derivatives in accumulated OCI at December 31, 2022,
losses of $4.4 billion after-tax ($5.9 billion pretax) related to both
open and terminated cash flow hedges are expected to be
reclassified into earnings in the next 12 months. These net
losses reclassified into earnings are expectedto primarily decrease net interest income related to the
respective hedged items. For open cash flow hedges, the
maximum length of time over which forecasted transactions are
hedged is approximately seven years . For terminated cash flow
hedges, the time period over which the forecasted transactions
will be recognized in interest income is approxim ately five years,
with the aggregated amount beyond this time period being
insignificant.
Gains and Losses on Derivatives Designated as Cash Flow and Net Investment Hedges
Gains (Losses) Recognized in
Accumulated OCI on DerivativesGains (Losses) in Income
Reclassified from Accumulated OCI
(Dollars in millions, amounts pretax) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Cash flow hedges
Interest rate risk on variable-rate portfolios $ (13,492)$ (2,686)$ 763 $ (338)$ 148 $ (7)
Price risk on forecasted MBS purchases (129) (249) 241 11 26 9 
Price risk on certain compensation plans (88) 93 85 29 55 12 
Total $ (13,709)$ (2,842)$ 1,089 $ (298)$ 229 $ 14 
Net investment hedges
Foreign exchange risk $ 1,710 $ 1,451 $ (834)$ 3 $ 23 $ 4 
Amounts reclassified from accumulated OCI are recorded in interest income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
Amounts reclassified from accumulated OCI are recorded in compensation and benefits expense in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
Amounts reclassified from accumulated OCI are recorded in other income in the Consolidated Statement of Income. Amounts excluded from ef fectiveness testing and recognized in market making
and similar activities were losses of $ 38 million, $ 123 million and $ 11 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)  (1)
(2)
(2, 3, 4)
(5)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
107 Bank of America
Other Risk Management Derivatives
Other risk management derivatives are used by the Corporation
to reduce certain risk exposures by econom ically hedging
various assets and liabilities. The table below presents gains
(losses) on these derivatives for 2022, 2021 and 2020. These
gains (losse s) are largely offset by the income or expense
recorded on the hedged item.
Gains and Losses on Other Risk Management
Derivatives
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Interest rate risk on mortgage activities $ (326)$ (18)$ 611 
Credit risk on loans (37) (25) (68)
Interest rate and foreign currency risk on
asset and liability management activities
4,713 1,757 (2,971)
Price risk on certain compensation plans (1,073) 917 700 
Includes hedges of interest rate risk on MSRs and IRLCs to originate mortgage loans that will
be held for sale.
Gains (losses) on these derivatives are recorded in other income.
Gains (losses) on these derivatives are recorded in market making and similar activities.
Gains (losses) on these derivatives are recorded in compensation and benefits expense.
Transfers of Financial Assets with Risk Retained
through Derivatives
The Corporation enters into certain transactions involving the
transfer of financial asse ts that are accounted for as sales where
substantially all of the economic exposure to the transferred
financial assets is retained through derivatives (e.g., interest rate
and/or credi t), but the Corporation does not retain control over
the assets transferred. At both December 31, 2022 and 2021,
the Corporation had transferred $4.8 billion of non-U.S.
government-guaranteed mortgage-backed securities to a third-
party trust and retained economic exposure to the transferred
assets through derivative contracts. In connec tion with these
transfers, the Corporation received gross cash proceeds of $4.9
billion and $4.8 billion at the transfer dates. At December 31,
2022 and 2021, the fair value of the transferred securities was
$4.7 billion and $ 5.0 billion.
Sales and Trading Revenue
The Corporation enters into trading derivatives to facilitate client
transactions and to manage risk exposures arising from trading
account assets and liabilities. It is the Corporation’ s policy to
include these derivative instruments in its trading activities,
which includ e derivative s and non-derivative cash instruments.
The resulting risk from these derivatives is managed on a
portfolio basis as part of the Corporation’ s Global Markets
business segment. The related sales and trading revenue
generated within Global Markets  is recorded in various income
statement line items, including market making and similar
activities and net interest income as well as other revenue
categories.
Sales and trading revenue includes changes in the fair value
and realized  gains and losses on the sales of trading and other
assets, net interest income, and fees primarily from
commissions on equity securities. Revenue is generated by the
difference in the client price for an instrument and the price at
which the trading desk  can execute the trade in the dealer
market. For equity secur ities, commissions related to purchases
and sales are recorded in the “Other” column in the Sales and
Trading Revenue table. Changes in the fair value of these
securities are included in market making and similar activities.
For debt securities, revenue, with the exception of interest
associated with the debt securities, is typically included in
market making and similar activities. Unlike commissions for
equity securities, the initial revenue related to broker-dealerservices for debt securit ies is typically included in the pricing of
the instrument rather than being charged through separate fee
arrangements. Therefor e, this revenue is recorded in market
making and similar activities as part of the initial mark to fair
value. For derivatives, the majority of revenue  is included in
market making and similar activities. In transactions where the
Corporation acts as agent, which include exchange-traded
futures and options, fees are recorded in other income.
The table below , which includes both derivatives and non-
derivative cash instruments, identifies the amounts in the
respective income statement line items attributable to the
Corporation’ s sales and trading revenue in Global Mark ets,
categorized by primary risk, for 2022, 2021 and 2020. This table
includes debit valuation adjustment (DVA) and funding valuation
adjustment (FVA) gains (losses). Global Markets  results in Note
23 – Business Segmen t Information  are presented on a fully
taxable-equivalent (FTE) basis. The table below is not presented
on an FTE basis.
Sales and Trading Revenue
Market
making and
similar
activitiesNet
Interest
Income Other Total
(Dollars in millions) 2022
Interest rate risk $ 1,919 $ 1,619 $ 392 $ 3,930 
Foreign exchange risk 1,981 46 (44) 1,983 
Equity risk 6,077 (1,288) 1,757 6,546 
Credit risk 592 2,228 177 2,997 
Other risk 835 (171) 15 679 
Total sales and
trading revenue $ 11,404 $ 2,434 $ 2,297 $ 16,135 
2021
Interest rate risk $ 523 $ 1,794 $ 217 $ 2,534 
Foreign exchange risk 1,505 (80) 14 1,439 
Equity risk 4,581 (5) 1,834 6,410 
Credit risk 1,390 1,684 556 3,630 
Other risk 759 (128) 124 755 
Total sales and
trading revenue $ 8,758 $ 3,265 $ 2,745 $ 14,768 
2020
Interest rate risk $ 2,236 $ 2,279 $ 229 $ 4,744 
Foreign exchange risk 1,486 (19) 2 1,469 
Equity risk 3,656 (77) 1,801 5,380 
Credit risk 783 1,758 331 2,872 
Other risk 308 4 44 356 
Total sales and
trading revenue $ 8,469 $ 3,945 $ 2,407 $ 14,821 
Represents amounts in investmen t and brokerage services and other income that are
recorded in Global Markets  and included in the definition of sales and trading revenue.
Includes investment and brokerage services revenue of $2.0 billion, $1.9 billion and $1.9
billion in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Includes commodity risk.
Credit Derivatives
The Corporation enters into credit derivatives primarily to
facilitate client transactions and to mana ge credit risk
exposures. Credit derivatives derive value based on an
underlying third-party referenced obligation or a portfolio of
referenced obligations and generally require the Corporation, as
the seller of credit protection, to make payments to a buyer upon
the occurrence of a predefined credit event. Such credit events
generally include bankruptcy of the referenced credit entity and
failure to pay under the obligation, as well as acceleration of
indebtedness and payment repudiation or morato rium. For credit
derivatives based on a portfolio of referenced credits or credit
indices, the Corporation  may not be required to make payment
until a specified amount of loss has(1, 2)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(2)
(2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 108
occurred and/or may only be required to make payment up to a
specified amount.
Credit derivatives are classified as investment and non-
investment grade based on the credit quality of the underlying
referenced obligation. The Corporation considers ratings of
BBB- or higher as investment grade. Non-investment grade
includes non-rated credit derivative instruments. The
Corporationdiscloses internal categorizations of investment grade and non-
investment grade consistent with how risk is managed for these
instruments.
Credit derivative instruments where the Corpo ration is the
seller of credit protection and their expiration at December 31,
2022 and 2021 are summarized in the table below .
Credit Derivative Instruments
Less than
One YearOne to
Three YearsThree to
Five YearsOver Five
Years Total
December 31, 2022
(Dollars in millions) Carrying Value
Credit default swaps:      
Investment grade $ 2 $ 25 $ 133 $ 34 $ 194 
Non-investment grade 120 516 870 697 2,203 
Total 122 541 1,003 731 2,397 
Total return swaps/options:      
Investment grade 55 336 — — 391 
Non-investment grade 332 9 132 10 483 
Total 387 345 132 10 874 
Total credit derivatives $ 509 $ 886 $ 1,135 $ 741 $ 3,271 
Credit-related notes:      
Investment grade $ — $ — $ 19 $ 1,017 $ 1,036 
Non-investment grade — 7 6 1,035 1,048 
Total credit-related notes $ — $ 7 $ 25 $ 2,052 $ 2,084 
 Maximum Payout/Notional
Credit default swaps:      
Investment grade $ 34,670 $ 66,170 $ 93,237 $ 18,677 $ 212,754 
Non-investment grade 15,229 29,629 30,891 6,662 82,411 
Total 49,899 95,799 124,128 25,339 295,165 
Total return swaps/options:      
Investment grade 38,722 10,407 — — 49,129 
Non-investment grade 32,764 500 2,054 897 36,215 
Total 71,486 10,907 2,054 897 85,344 
Total credit derivatives $ 121,385 $ 106,706 $ 126,182 $ 26,236 $ 380,509 
December 31, 2021
Carrying Value
Credit default swaps:
Investment grade $ — $ 5 $ 79 $ 49 $ 133 
Non-investment grade 34 250 453 769 1,506 
Total 34 255 532 818 1,639 
Total return swaps/options:      
Investment grade 35 388 — — 423 
Non-investment grade 105 — 16 — 121 
Total 140 388 16 — 544 
Total credit derivatives $ 174 $ 643 $ 548 $ 818 $ 2,183 
Credit-related notes:      
Investment grade $ — $ — $ 36 $ 412 $ 448 
Non-investment grade 5 — 9 1,334 1,348 
Total credit-related notes $ 5 $ — $ 45 $ 1,746 $ 1,796 
 Maximum Payout/Notional
Credit default swaps:
Investment grade $ 34,503 $ 66,334 $ 73,444 $ 17,844 $ 192,125 
Non-investment grade 16,119 29,233 34,356 7,961 87,669 
Total 50,622 95,567 107,800 25,805 279,794 
Total return swaps/options:      
Investment grade 49,626 11,494 78 — 61,198 
Non-investment grade 22,621 717 642 73 24,053 
Total 72,247 12,211 720 73 85,251 
Total credit derivatives $ 122,869 $ 107,778 $ 108,520 $ 25,878 $ 365,045 
The notional amount represents the maximum amount
payable by the Corporation for most credit derivatives. However ,
the Corporation does not monitor its exposure to credit
derivatives based solely on the notional amount because this
measure does not take into consideration the probability of
occurrence. As such, the notional amount is not a reliableindicator of the Corporation’ s exposure to these contracts.
Instead, a risk framework is used to define risk tolerances and
establish limits so that certain credit risk-related losses occur
within acceptable, predefined limits.
Credit-related notes in the preceding table include
investments in securities issued by CDO, collateralized loan
109 Bank of America
obligation (CLO) and credit-linked note vehicles. These
instruments are primarily classified as trading securities. The
carrying value of these instruments equals the Corporation’ s
maximum exposure to loss. The Corporation is not obligated to
make any payments to the entities under the terms of the
securities owned.
Credit-related Contingent Features and Collateral
The Corporation executes the majority of its derivative contracts
in the OTC market with large, international financial institutions,
including broker-dealers and, to a lesser degree, with a variety
of non-financial companies. A significant majority of the
derivative transactions are executed on a daily margin basis.
Therefore, events such as a credit rating downgrade (depending
on the ultimate rating level) or a breach of credit covenants
would typica lly require an increase in the amount of collateral
required of the counterparty , where applicable, and/or allow the
Corporation to take additional protective measures such as early
termination of all trades. Further , as previously discussed on
page 105, the Corporation enters into legally enforceable master
netting agreements that reduce risk by permitting closeout and
netting of transactions with the same counterparty upon the
occurrence of certain events.
Certain of the Corpora tion’s derivative contracts contain
credit risk-related contingent features, primarily in the form of
ISDA  master netting  agreements and credit support
documentation that enhance the creditworthiness of these
instruments compared to other obligations of the respective
counterparty with whom the Corporation has transacted. These
contingent features may be for the benefit of the Corporation as
well as its counterpar ties with respect to changes in the
Corporation’ s creditworthiness and the mark-to-market exposure
under the derivative transactions. At December 31, 2022 and
2021, the Corporation held cash and securities collateral of
$101.3  billion and $91.4 billion and posted cash  and securities
collateral of $81.2 billion and $79.3 billion in the normal course
of business under derivative agreements, excluding cross-
product margining agreements where clients are permitted to
margin on a net basis for both derivative and secured financing
arrangements.
In connection with certain OTC derivative contracts and other
trading agreements, the Corporation can be required to provide
additional collateral or to terminate transactions with certain
counterparties in the event of a downgrade of the senior debt
ratings of the Corporation or certain subsidiaries. The amount of
additional collateral required depends on the contract and is
usually a fixed incremen tal amount and/or the market value of
the exposure.
At December 31, 2022, the amount of collateral, calculated
based on the terms of the contracts, that the Corporation and
certain subsidiaries could be required to post to counterparties
but had not yet posted to counterparties was $3.2 billion,
including $1.6 billion for Bank of America, National Association
(BANA).
Some counterparties are currently able to unilaterally
terminate certain contracts, or the Corporation or certain
subsidiaries may be required to take other actio n such as find a
suitable replacement or obtain a guarantee. At December 31,
2022 and 2021, the liability recorded for these derivative
contracts was not significant.
The following table presents the amount of additional
collateral that would have been contractually required byderivative contracts and other trading agreements at
December 31, 2022 if the rating agencies had downgraded their
long-term senior debt ratings for the Corporation or certain
subsidiaries by one incremental notch and by an additional
second incremental notch. The table also presents derivative
liabilities that would be subject to unilateral termination by
counterparties upon downgrade of the Corpora tion's or certain
subsidiaries' long-term senior debt ratings.
Additional Collateral Required to be Posted and Derivative
Liabilities Subject to Unilateral T ermination Upon
Downgrade
at December 31, 2022
(Dollars in millions)One
Incremental
 NotchSecond
Incremental
 Notch
Additional collateral required to be
posted upon downgrade
Bank of America Corporation $ 230 $ 913 
Bank of America, N.A. and subsidiaries66 668 
Derivative liabilities subject to
unilateral termination upon
downgrade
Derivative liabilities $ 92 $ 1,073 
Collateral posted 77 300 
Included in Bank of America Corporation collateral requirements in this table.
Valuation Adjustments on Derivatives
The Corporation records credit risk valuation adjustments on
derivatives in order to properly reflect the credit quality of the
counterparties and its own credit quality . The Corporation
calculates valuation adjustments on derivatives based on a
modeled expected exposure that incorporates current market
risk factors. The exposure also takes into consideration credit
mitigants such as enforceable master netting agreements and
collateral. CDS spread data is used to estimate the default
probabilities and severities that are applied to the exposures.
Where no observable credit default data is available for
counterparties, the Corporation uses proxies and other market
data to estimate default probabilities and severity .
The table below presents credit valuation adjustment (CVA),
DVA and FVA gains (losses) on derivatives (excluding the effect
of any related hedge activities), which are recorded in market
making and similar activities, for 2022, 2021 and 2020. CVA
gains reduce the cumulative CVA thereby increasing the
derivative assets balanc e. DVA gains increase the cumulative
DVA thereby decreasing the derivative liabilitie s balance. CVA
and DVA losses have the opposite impact. FVA gains related to
derivative assets reduce the cumulative FVA thereby increasing
the derivative assets balance. FVA gains related to derivative
liabilities increase the cumulative FVA thereby decreasing the
derivative liabilities balance. FVA losses have the opposite
impact.
Valuation Adjustments Gains (Losses) on Derivatives
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Derivative assets (CVA) $ (80)$ 208 $ (118)
Derivative assets/liabilities (FVA) 125 (2) (24)
Derivative liabilities (DVA) 194 3 24 
At December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, cumulative CVA reduced the derivative assets
balance by $518 million, $438 million and $646 million, cumulative FVA reduced the net
derivative balance by $54 million, $179 million and $177 million, and cumulative DVA reduced
the derivative liabilities balance by $ 506 million, $ 312 million and $ 309 million, respectively .(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
Bank of America 110
NOTE 4 Securities
The table below present s the amortized cost, gross unrealized gains and losses, and fair value  of AFS debt securities, other debt
securities carried at fair value and HTM debt securities at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Debt Securities
Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
LossesFair
ValueAmortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
LossesFair
Value
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Available-for-sale debt securities
Mortgage-backed securities:
Agency $ 25,204 $ 5 $ (1,767)$23,442 $45,268 $ 1,257 $ (186)$46,339 
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations 2,452 — (231) 2,221 3,331 74 (25) 3,380 
Commercial 6,894 28 (515) 6,407 19,036 647 (79) 19,604 
Non-agency residential 461 15 (90) 386 591 25 (33) 583 
Total mortgage-backed securities 35,011 48 (2,603) 32,456 68,226 2,003 (323) 69,906 
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 160,773 18 (1,769) 159,022 197,853 1,610 (318) 199,145 
Non-U.S. securities 13,455 4 (52) 13,407 11,933 — — 11,933 
Other taxable securities 4,728 1 (84) 4,645 2,725 39 (3) 2,761 
Tax-exempt securities 11,518 19 (279) 11,258 15,155 317 (39) 15,433 
Total available-for-sale debt securities 225,485 90 (4,787) 220,788 295,892 3,969 (683) 299,178 
Other debt securities carried at fair value 8,986 376 (156) 9,206 8,873 105 (83) 8,895 
Total debt securities carried at fair value 234,471 466 (4,943) 229,994 304,765 4,074 (766) 308,073 
Held-to-maturity debt securities
Agency mortgage-backed securities 503,233 — (87,319) 415,914 553,721 3,855 (10,366) 547,210 
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 121,597 — (20,259) 101,338 111,859 254 (2,395) 109,718 
Other taxable securities 8,033 — (1,018) 7,015 9,011 147 (196) 8,962 
Total held-to-maturity debt securities 632,863 — (108,596) 524,267 674,591 4,256 (12,957) 665,890 
Total debt securities $867,334 $ 466 $(113,539)$754,261 $979,356 $ 8,330 $(13,723)$973,963 
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the underlying collateral type included approximately 17 percent and 21 percent prime and 83 percent and 79 percent subprime.
Primarily includes non-U.S. securities used to satisfy certain international regulatory requirements. Any changes in value are reported in market making and similar activities. For detail on the
components, see Note 20 – Fair V alue Measurements .
Includes securities pledged as collateral of $ 104.5  billion and $ 111.9  billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
The Corporation held debt securities  from FNMA  and FHLMC that each exceeded 10 percent of shareholders’  equity , with an amortized cost of $290.5  billion and $176.7  billion, and a fair value of
$239.6  billion and $ 144.6  billion at December 31, 2022, and an amortized cost of $ 345.3  billion and $ 205.3  billion, and a fair value of $ 342.5  billion and $ 202.4  billion at December 31, 2021.
At December 31, 2022, the accumulated net unrealized loss
on AFS debt securities, excluding the amount related to debt
securities previously transferred to held to maturity , included in
accumulated OCI was $3.5 billion, net of the related income tax
benefit of $1.2 billion. At December 31, 2022 and 2021,
nonperforming AFS debt securities held by the Corporation were
not significant.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had
$191.1  billion and $268.5  billion in AFS debt securities, which
were primarily U.S. agency and U.S. Treasury securities that
have a zero credit loss assumption. For more information on the
zero credit loss assum ption, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles . For the remaining $29.7 billion
and $30.7 billion in AFS debt securities at December 31, 2022
and 2021, the amou nt of ECL was not significant. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had $524.3
billion and $665.9  billion in HTM debt securities, which were
substantially all U.S agency and U.S. Treasury securities that
have a zero credit loss assumption.
At Decembe r 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporatio n held equity
securities at an aggregate fair value of $ 581 millionand $ 513 million and other equity securities, as valued under the
measurement alternative , at a carrying value of $340 million and
$266 million, both of which  are included in other assets. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation also held money
market investments at a fair value of $868 million and $707
million, which are includ ed in time deposits placed and other
short-term investments.
The gross realized gains and losses on sales of AFS debt
securities for 2022, 2021 and 2020 are presented in the table
below .
Gains and Losses on Sales of AFS Debt Securities
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Gross gains $1,251 $ 49 $ 423 
Gross losses (1,219) (27) (12)
   Net gains on sales of AFS debt
securities $ 32 $ 22 $ 411 
Income tax expense attributable to
realized net gains on sales of AFS debt
securities $ 8 $ 5 $ 103 (1)
(2)
(3,4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
111 Bank of America
The table below presen ts the fair value and the associated gross unrealized losses on AFS debt securities and whether these
securities have had gross unrealized losses for less than 12 months or for 12 months or longer at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Total AFS Debt Securities in a Continuous Unrealized Loss Position
Less than Twelve Months Twelve Months or Longer Total
Fair
ValueGross
 Unrealized
 LossesFair
ValueGross
 Unrealized
 LossesFair
ValueGross
 Unrealized
 Losses
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Continuously unrealized loss-positioned AFS debt securities
Mortgage-backed securities:    
Agency $ 18,759 $ (1,118)$ 4,437 $ (649)$ 23,196 $ (1,767)
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations 1,165 (96) 1,022 (135) 2,187 (231)
Commercial 3,273 (150) 2,258 (365) 5,531 (515)
Non-agency residential 264 (65) 97 (25) 361 (90)
Total mortgage-backed securities 23,461 (1,429) 7,814 (1,174) 31,275 (2,603)
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 36,730 (308) 118,636 (1,461) 155,366 (1,769)
Non-U.S. securities 9,399 (34) 756 (18) 10,155 (52)
Other taxable securities 2,036 (16) 1,580 (68) 3,616 (84)
Tax-exempt securities 607 (28) 2,849 (251) 3,456 (279)
Total AFS debt securities in a continuous
   unrealized loss position $ 72,233 $ (1,815)$ 131,635 $ (2,972)$ 203,868 $ (4,787)
December 31, 2021
Continuously unrealized loss-positioned AFS debt securities
Mortgage-backed securities:
Agency $ 11,733 $ (166)$ 815 $ (20)$ 12,548 $ (186)
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations 1,427 (22) 122 (3) 1,549 (25)
Commercial 3,451 (41) 776 (38) 4,227 (79)
Non-agency residential 241 (13) 174 (20) 415 (33)
Total mortgage-backed securities 16,852 (242) 1,887 (81) 18,739 (323)
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 103,307 (272) 4,850 (46) 108,157 (318)
Other taxable securities — — 82 (3) 82 (3)
Tax-exempt securities 502 (16) 109 (23) 611 (39)
Total AFS debt securities in a continuous
   unrealized loss position $ 120,661 $ (530)$ 6,928 $ (153)$ 127,589 $ (683)
Bank of America 112
The remaining contractual maturity distribution and yields of the Corporation’ s debt securities carried at fair value and HTM debt
securities at December 31, 2022 are summarized in the table below . Actual duration and yields may differ as prepayments on the
loans underlying the MBS or other ABS are passed through to the Corporation.
Maturities of Debt Securities Carried at Fair Value and Held-to-maturity Debt Securities
Due in One
Year or LessDue after One Year
through Five YearsDue after Five Years
through T en YearsDue after
Ten Years Total
(Dollars in millions) Amount Yield Amount Yield Amount Yield Amount Yield Amount Yield 
Amortized cost of debt securities carried at fair
value           
Mortgage-backed securities:           
Agency $ — — % $ 3 5.67 % $ 56 4.39 % $25,145  3.37 % $25,204  3.37 %
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations — — 10 2.60 — — 2,442  2.89 2,452  2.89 
Commercial 22 2.09 670 3.07 4,591  2.03 1,624  2.31 6,907  2.20 
Non-agency residential — — — — — — 825 9.54 825 9.54 
Total mortgage-backed securities 22 2.09 683 3.08 4,647  2.06 30,036  3.44 35,388  3.25 
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 3,306  1.59 79,618  1.68 78,378  1.64 32 3.38 161,334  1.66 
Non-U.S. securities 17,499  2.41 3,002  4.58 723 3.93 279 6.87 21,503  2.82 
Other taxable securities 2,034  4.77 2,102  4.85 455 3.46 137 3.35 4,728  4.64 
Tax-exempt securities 890 3.36 4,765  3.55 2,022  3.73 3,841  3.88 11,518  3.68 
Total amortized cost of debt securities
carried at fair value $23,751  2.53 $90,170  1.96 $86,225  1.74 $34,325  3.52 $234,471  2.16 
Amortized cost of HTM debt securities
Agency mortgage-backed securities $ — — % $ — — % $ 14 2.64 % $503,219  2.13 % $503,233  2.13 %
U.S. Treasury and government agencies — — 4,544  1.80 117,053  1.37 — — 121,597  1.39 
Other taxable securities 38 9.06 1,251  2.23 313 3.00 6,431  2.45 8,033  2.47 
Total amortized cost of HTM debt
securities $ 38 9.06 $ 5,795  1.89 $117,380  1.37 $509,650  2.13 $632,863  1.99 
Debt securities carried at fair value           
Mortgage-backed securities:           
Agency $ —  $ 3  $ 56  $23,383   $23,442   
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations —  10  —  2,211   2,221   
Commercial 22  650  4,342   1,404   6,418   
Non-agency residential —  2  —  751  753  
Total mortgage-backed securities 22 665 4,398  27,749  32,834  
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 3,312  79,013  77,228  30 159,583  
Non-U.S. securities 17,709   2,960   723  279  21,671   
Other taxable securities 2,028   2,085   413  122  4,648   
Tax-exempt securities 887  4,729   1,997   3,645   11,258   
Total debt securities carried at fair value $23,958   $89,452   $84,759   $31,825   $229,994   
Fair value of HTM debt securities
Agency mortgage-backed securities $ — $ — $ 13 $415,901  $415,914  
U.S. Treasury and government agencies — 4,164  97,174  — 101,338  
Other taxable securities 38 1,170  295 5,512  7,015  
Total fair value of HTM debt securities $ 38 $ 5,334  $97,482  $421,413  $524,267  
The weighted-average yield is computed based on a constant effectiv e interest rate over the contractual life of each security . The average  yield considers the contractual coupon and the
amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts, excluding the ef fect of related hedging derivatives.(1) (1) (1) (1) (1)
(1)
113 Bank of America
NOTE 5  Outstanding Loans and Leases and Allowance for Credit Losses
The following tables present total outstanding loans and leases and an aging analysis for the Consumer Real Estate, Credit Card
and Other Consumer , and Commercial portfolio segments, by class of financing receivables, at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
30-59 Days
 Past Due 60-89 Days
 Past Due 90 Days or
More
Past Due Total Past
Due 30 Days
or MoreTotal
 Current or
 Less Than
 30 Days
 Past Due Loans
 Accounted
 for Under
 the Fair
 Value
 OptionTotal
Outstandings
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Consumer real estate       
Residential mortgage $ 1,077 $ 245 $ 945 $ 2,267 $227,403 $ 229,670 
Home equity 88 32 211 331 26,232 26,563 
Credit card and other consumer
Credit card 466 322 717 1,505 91,916 93,421 
Direct/Indirect consumer 204 59 45 308 105,928 106,236 
Other consumer — — — — 156 156 
Total consumer 1,835 658 1,918 4,411 451,635 456,046 
Consumer loans accounted for under the fair
value option $ 339 339 
Total consumer loans and leases 1,835 658 1,918 4,411 451,635 339 456,385 
Commercial
U.S. commercial 827 288 330 1,445 357,036 358,481 
Non-U.S. commercial 317 59 144 520 123,959 124,479 
Commercial real estate 409 81 77 567 69,199 69,766 
Commercial lease financing 49 9 11 69 13,575 13,644 
U.S. small business commercial 107 63 356 526 17,034 17,560 
Total commercial 1,709 500 918 3,127 580,803 583,930 
Commercial loans accounted for under the fair
value option 5,432 5,432 
Total commercial loans and leases 1,709 500 918 3,127 580,803 5,432 589,362 
Total loans and leases $ 3,544 $ 1,158 $ 2,836 $ 7,538 $1,032,438 $ 5,771 $1,045,747 
Percentage of outstandings 0.34 % 0.11 % 0.27 % 0.72 % 98.73 % 0.55 % 100.00 %
Consumer real estate loans 30-59 days past due includes fully-insured loans of $184 million and nonperforming loans of $155 million. Consumer real estate loans 60-89 days past due includes
fully-insured loans  of $75 million and nonpe rforming loans of $88 million. Consumer real estate loans 90 days or more past due includes fully-insured loans of $368 million and nonpe rforming loans
of $788 million. Consumer real estate loans current or less than 30 days past due includes $ 1.6 billion, and direct/indirect consumer includes $ 27 million of nonperforming loans.
Total outstandings primarily includes auto and specialty lending loans and leases of $ 51.8 billion, U.S. securities-based lending loans of $ 50.4 billion and non-U.S. consumer loans of $ 3.0 billion.
Consumer loans accounted for unde r the fair value option includes residential mortgage loans of $71 million and home equity loans of $268 million. Commerc ial loans accounted for under the fair
value option includes U.S. commercial loans of $2.9 billion and non-U.S. commercial loans of $2.5 billion. For more information, see Note 20 – Fair Value Measurements  and Note 21 – Fair Value
Option .
Total outstandings includes U.S. commercial real estate loans of $ 64.9 billion and non-U.S. commercial real estate loans of $ 4.8 billion.
Includes Paycheck Protection Program loans.
Total outstandings includes loans and leases pledged as collateral of $18.5 billion. The Corporation also pledge d $163.6  billion of loans with no related outstanding borrowings to secure potenti al
borrowing capacity with the Federal Reserve Bank and Federal Home Loan Bank.(1) (1) (1) (1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(3)
(6)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
Bank of America 114
30-59 Days
Past Due 60-89 Days
 Past Due 90 Days or
More
Past Due Total Past
Due 30 Days
or MoreTotal
Current or
Less Than
30 Days
Past Due Loans
Accounted
for Under
the Fair
Value OptionTotal
Outstandings
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2021
Consumer real estate       
Residential mortgage $ 1,005 $ 297 $ 1,571 $ 2,873 $219,090 $ 221,963 
Home equity 123 69 369 561 27,374 27,935 
Credit card and other consumer      
Credit card 298 212 487 997 80,441  81,438 
Direct/Indirect consumer 147 52 18 217 103,343  103,560 
Other consumer — — — — 190  190 
Total consumer 1,573 630 2,445 4,648 430,438 435,086 
Consumer loans accounted for under the fair
value option $ 618 618 
Total consumer loans and leases 1,573 630 2,445 4,648 430,438 618 435,704 
Commercial        
U.S. commercial 815 308 396 1,519 324,417  325,936 
Non-U.S. commercial 148 20 83 251 113,015  113,266 
Commercial real estate 115 34 285 434 62,575  63,009 
Commercial lease financing 104 28 13 145 14,680  14,825 
U.S. small business commercial 129 259 89 477 18,706  19,183 
Total commercial 1,311 649 866 2,826 533,393  536,219 
Commercial loans accounted for under the fair
value option 7,201 7,201 
Total commercial loans and leases 1,311 649 866 2,826 533,393 7,201 543,420 
Total loans and leases $ 2,884 $ 1,279 $ 3,311 $ 7,474 $963,831 $ 7,819 $ 979,124 
Percentage of outstandings 0.29 % 0.13 % 0.34 % 0.76 % 98.44 % 0.80 % 100.00 %
Consumer real estate loans 30-59 days past due includes fully-insured loans of $164 million and nonperforming loans of $118 million. Consumer real estate loans 60-89 days past due includes
fully-insured loans  of $89 million and nonpe rforming loans of $100 million. Consumer real estate loans 90 days or more past due includes fully-insured loans of $633 million and nonperforming
loans of $ 1.3 billion. Consumer real estate loans current or less than 30 days past due includes $ 1.4 billion, and direct/indirect consumer includes $ 55 million of nonperforming loans.
Total outstandings primarily includes auto and specialty lending loans and leases of $ 48.5 billion, U.S. securities-based lending loans of $ 51.1 billion and non-U.S. consumer loans of $ 3.0 billion.
Consumer loans accounted for unde r the fair value option includes residential mortgage loans of $279 million and home equity loans of $339 million. Commercial loans accounte d for under the fair
value option includes U.S. commercial loans of $4.6 billion and non-U.S. commercial loans of $2.6 billion. For more information, see Note 20 – Fair Value Measurements  and Note 21 – Fair Value
Option .
Total outstandings includes U.S. commercial real estate loans of $ 58.2 billion and non-U.S. commercial real estate loans of $ 4.8 billion.
Includes Paycheck Protection Program loans.
Total outstandings includes loans and leases pledged as collateral of $13.0 billion. The Corporation also pledge d $146.6  billion of loans with no related outstanding borrowings to secure potenti al
borrowing capacity with the Federal Reserve Bank and Federal Home Loan Bank.
The Corpora tion has entered into long-term credit protection
agreements with FNMA  and FHLMC on loans totaling $9.5
billion and $10.5 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021,
providing full credit protection on residential mortgage loans that
become severely delinquent. All of these loans are individually
insured, and therefore the Corporation does not record an
allowance for credit losses related to these loans.
Nonperforming Loans and Leases
Commercial nonperform ing loans decreased to $1.1 billion at
December 31, 2022 from $1.6 billion at December 31, 2021, as
paydowns and returns to performing status more  than offset new
downgrades to nonaccrual status. Consumer  nonperforming
loans decreased to $ 2.8 billion at December 31, 2022 from$3.0 billion  at December 31, 2021 primarily due to decreases
from consumer real estate loan sales, partially offset by
increases from loans whose prior-period deferr als expired and
were modified in TDRs during the first quarter of 2022.
The following table prese nts the Corporation’ s nonperforming
loans and leases, including nonperforming TDRs, and loans
accruing past due 90 days or more at December 31, 2022 and
2021. Nonp erforming LHFS are excluded from nonperforming
loans and leases as they are recorded at either fair value or the
lower of cost or fair value. For more information on the criteria
for classification as nonperforming, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles.(1) (1) (1) (1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(3)
(6)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
115 Bank of America
Credit Quality
Nonperforming Loans
and LeasesAccruing Past Due
90 Days or More
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
Residential mortgage $ 2,167 $ 2,284 $ 368 $ 634 
With no related allowance 1,973 1,950 — — 
Home equity 510 630 — — 
With no related allowance 393 414 — — 
Credit Card                      n/a                     n/a 717 487 
Direct/indirect consumer 77 75 2 11 
Total consumer 2,754 2,989 1,087 1,132 
U.S. commercial 553 825 190 171 
Non-U.S. commercial 212 268 25 19 
Commercial real estate 271 382 46 40 
Commercial lease financing 4 80 8 8 
U.S. small business commercial 14 23 355 87 
Total commercial 1,054 1,578 624 325 
Total nonperforming loans $ 3,808 $ 4,567 $ 1,711 $ 1,457 
Percentage of outstanding loans and leases 0.37 % 0.47 % 0.16 % 0.15 %
Residential mortga ge loans accruing past due 90 days or more are fully-insured loans. At December 31, 2022 and 2021 residential mortgage included $260 million and $444 million of loans on
which interest had been curtailed by the FHA, and therefore were no longer accruing interest, although principal was still insured, and $108 million and $190 million of loans on which interest was
still accruing.
Primarily relates to loans for which the estimated fair value of the underlying collateral less any costs to sell is greater than the amortized cost of the loans as of the reporting date.
n/a = not applicable
Credit Quality Indicators
The Corporation monitors credit quality within its Consumer Real
Estate, Credit Card and Other Consumer , and Commercial
portfolio segments based on primary credit quality indicators.
For more information on the portfolio segments, see Note 1 –
Summary of Significant Accounting Principl es. Within the
Consumer Real Estate portfolio segment, the primary credit
quality indicators are refreshed LTV and refreshed Fair Isaac
Corporation (FICO) score. Refreshed LTV measures the
carrying value of the loan as a percentage of the value of the
property securing the loan, refreshed quarterly . Home equity
loans are evaluated using CLTV, which measures the carrying
value of the Corporatio n’s loan and available line of credit
combined with any outstanding senior liens against the property
as a percen tage of the value of the property securing the loan,
refreshed quarterly . FICO score measures the creditworthiness
of the borrower based  on the financial obligations of the
borrower and the borrower ’s credit history . FICO scores are
typically refreshed quarterly or more frequently . Certain
borrowers (e.g., borrowers that have had debts discharged in a
bankruptcy proceeding) may not have their FICO scores
updated. FICO scores are also aprimary credit quality indicator for the Credit Card and Other
Consumer portfolio segment and the business card portfolio
within U.S. small busine ss commercial. Within the Commercial
portfolio segment, loans are evaluated using the internal
classifications of pass rated or reservable criticized as the
primary credit quality indicators. The term reservable criticized
refers to those commercial loans that are internally classified or
listed by the Corporation as Special Mention, Substandard or
Doubtful, which are asset quality categories defined by
regulatory authorities. These assets have an elevated level of
risk and may have a high probability of default or total loss. Pass
rated refers to all loans not considered reserva ble criticized. In
addition to these primary credit quality indicators, the
Corporation uses other credit quality indicators for certain types
of loans.
The following tables present certain credit quality indicators
and gross charge-of fs for the Corporation's Consumer Real
Estate, Credit Card and Other Consumer , and Commercial
portfolio segments by year of origination, except for revolving
loans and revolving loans that were modified into term loans,
which are shown on an aggregate basis at December 31, 2022. (1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 116
Residential Mortgage – Credit Quality Indicators By Vintage
Term Loans by Origination Year
(Dollars in millions)Total as of
December 31,
 2022 2022 2021 2020 2019 2018 Prior
Residential Mortgage
Refreshed LTV    
Less than or equal to 90 percent $ 215,713 $ 39,625 $ 81,437 $ 37,228 $ 18,980 $ 5,734 $ 32,709 
Greater than 90 percent but less than or equal to 100
percent 1,615 950 530 93 15 8 19 
Greater than 100 percent 648 374 169 43 15 8 39 
Fully-insured loans 11,694 580 3,667 3,102 949 156 3,240 
Total Residential Mortgage $ 229,670 $ 41,529 $ 85,803 $ 40,466 $ 19,959 $ 5,906 $ 36,007 
Residential Mortgage
Refreshed FICO score
Less than 620 $ 2,156 $ 377 $ 518 $ 373 $ 124 $ 84 $ 680 
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than 680 4,978 1,011 1,382 840 329 233 1,183 
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740 25,444 5,411 8,290 4,369 2,187 830 4,357 
Greater than or equal to 740 185,398 34,150 71,946 31,782 16,370 4,603 26,547 
Fully-insured loans 11,694 580 3,667 3,102 949 156 3,240 
Total Residential Mortgage $ 229,670 $ 41,529 $ 85,803 $ 40,466 $ 19,959 $ 5,906 $ 36,007 
Gross charge-offs $ 161 $ — $ 6 $ 5 $ 6 $ 1 $ 143 
Home Equity - Credit Quality Indicators
TotalHome Equity Loans
and Reverse
Mortgages Revolving LoansRevolving Loans
Converted to Term
Loans
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Home Equity
Refreshed LTV    
Less than or equal to 90 percent $ 26,395 $ 1,304 $ 19,960 $ 5,131 
Greater than 90 percent but less than or equal to 100 percent 62 20 24 18 
Greater than 100 percent 106 37 35 34 
Total Home Equity $ 26,563 $ 1,361 $ 20,019 $ 5,183 
Home Equity
Refreshed FICO score
Less than 620 $ 683 $ 166 $ 189 $ 328 
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than 680 1,190 152 507 531 
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740 4,321 312 2,747 1,262 
Greater than or equal to 740 20,369 731 16,576 3,062 
Total Home Equity $ 26,563 $ 1,361 $ 20,019 $ 5,183 
Gross charge-offs $ 45 $ 5 $ 24 $ 16 
Includes reverse mortgages of $ 937 million and home equity loans of $ 424 million, which are no longer originated.
Credit Card and Direct/Indirect Consumer – Credit Quality Indicators By Vintage
Direct/Indirect
Term Loans by Origination Year Credit Card
(Dollars in millions)Total Direct/
Indirect as of
December 31,
2022Revolving
Loans 2022 2021 2020 2019 2018 PriorTotal Credit
Card as of
December 31,
2022Revolving
LoansRevolving
Loans
Converted
to Term
Loans 
Refreshed FICO score   
Less than 620 $ 847 $ 12 $ 237 $ 301 $ 113 $ 84 $ 43 $ 57 $ 4,056  $ 3,866  $ 190 
Greater than or equal to 620
and less than 680 2,521  12 1,108  816 269 150 69 97 10,994  10,805  189 
Greater than or equal to 680
and less than 740 8,895  52 4,091  2,730  992 520 214 296 32,186  32,017  169 
Greater than or equal to 740 39,679  83 16,663  11,392  5,630  2,992  1,236  1,683  46,185  46,142  43 
Other internal credit
   metrics 54,294  53,404  259 305 70 57 40 159 — — — 
Total credit card and other
   consumer $ 106,236  $53,563  $22,358  $15,544  $ 7,074  $ 3,803  $ 1,602  $ 2,292  $ 93,421  $92,830  $ 591 
Gross charge-offs $ 232 $ 7 $ 31 $ 79 $ 34 $ 27 $ 14 $ 40 $ 1,985  $ 1,909  $ 76 
Represents TDRs that were modified into term loans.
Other internal credit metrics may include delinquency status, geography or other factors.
Direct/indirect consumer includes $53.4 billion of securities-based lending, which is typically supported by highly liquid collateral with market value greater than or equal to the outstanding loan
balance and therefore has minimal credit risk at December 31, 2022.(1)
(1)
(1)
(2,3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
117 Bank of America
Commercial – Credit Quality Indicators By Vintage 
Term Loans
Amortized Cost Basis by Origination Year
(Dollars in millions)Total as of
December 31,
2022 2022 2021 2020 2019 2018 PriorRevolving
Loans
U.S. Commercial
Risk ratings     
Pass rated $ 348,447 $ 61,200 $ 39,717 $ 18,609 $ 16,566 $ 8,749 $ 30,282 $173,324 
Reservable criticized 10,034 278 794 697 884 1,202 856 5,323 
Total U.S. Commercial $ 358,481 $ 61,478 $ 40,511 $ 19,306 $ 17,450 $ 9,951 $ 31,138 $178,647 
Gross charge-offs $ 151 $ 2 $ 24 $ 24 $ 9 $ 6 $ 13 $ 73 
Non-U.S. Commercial
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 121,890 $ 24,839 $ 19,098 $ 5,183 $ 3,882 $ 2,423 $ 4,697 $ 61,768 
Reservable criticized 2,589 45 395 331 325 98 475 920 
Total Non-U.S. Commercial $ 124,479 $ 24,884 $ 19,493 $ 5,514 $ 4,207 $ 2,521 $ 5,172 $ 62,688 
Gross charge-offs $ 41 $ — $ 3 $ 1 $ — $ 37 $ — $ — 
Commercial Real Estate
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 64,619 $ 15,290 $ 13,089 $ 5,756 $ 9,013 $ 4,384 $ 8,606 $ 8,481 
Reservable criticized 5,147 11 837 545 1,501 1,151 1,017 85 
Total Commercial Real Estate $ 69,766 $ 15,301 $ 13,926 $ 6,301 $ 10,514 $ 5,535 $ 9,623 $ 8,566 
Gross charge-offs $ 75 $ — $ — $ 6 $ — $ 26 $ 43 $ — 
Commercial Lease Financing
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 13,404 $ 3,255 $ 2,757 $ 1,955 $ 1,578 $ 1,301 $ 2,558 $ — 
Reservable criticized 240 9 35 12 71 50 63 — 
Total Commercial Lease Financing $ 13,644 $ 3,264 $ 2,792 $ 1,967 $ 1,649 $ 1,351 $ 2,621 $ — 
Gross charge-offs $ 8 $ — $ 4 $ — $ 4 $ — $ — $ — 
U.S. Small Business Commercial 
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 8,726 $ 1,825 $ 1,953 $ 1,408 $ 864 $ 624 $ 1,925 $ 127 
Reservable criticized 329 11 35 48 76 51 105 3 
Total U.S. Small Business Commercial$ 9,055 $ 1,836 $ 1,988 $ 1,456 $ 940 $ 675 $ 2,030 $ 130 
Gross charge-offs $ 31 $ — $ 1 $ 11 $ 4 $ 1 $ 6 $ 8 
Total $ 575,425 $106,763 $ 78,710 $ 34,544 $ 34,760 $ 20,033 $ 50,584 $250,031 
Total gross charge-offs $ 306 $ 2 $ 32 $ 42 $ 17 $ 70 $ 62 $ 81 
 Excludes $ 5.4 billion of loans accounted for under the fair value option at December 31, 2022.
     Exclu des U.S. Small Business Card loans of $8.5 billion. Refreshed FICO scores for this portfolio are $297 million for less than 620; $859 million for greater than or equal to 620 and less than
680; $ 2.4 billion for greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740; and $ 5.0 billion greater than or equal to 740. Excludes U.S. Small Business Card loans gross charge-of fs of $ 172 million.(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 118
The followin g tables present certain credit qualit y indicators for the Corporation's Consumer Real Estate, Credit Card and Other
Consumer , and Commercial portfolio segments by year of origination, except for revolving loans and revolving loans that were
modified into term loans, which are shown on an aggregate basis at December 31, 2021.
Residential Mortgage – Credit Quality Indicators By Vintage
Term Loans by Origination Year
(Dollars in millions)Total as of
 December 31,
 2021 2021 2020 2019 2018 2017 Prior
Residential Mortgage
Refreshed LTV
Less than or equal to 90 percent $ 206,562 $ 87,051 $ 43,597 $ 23,205 $ 7,392 $ 10,956 $ 34,361 
Greater than 90 percent but less than or equal to 100
percent 1,938 1,401 331 81 17 14 94 
Greater than 100 percent 759 520 112 29 11 12 75 
Fully-insured loans 12,704 3,845 3,486 1,150 216 235 3,772 
Total Residential Mortgage $ 221,963 $ 92,817 $ 47,526 $ 24,465 $ 7,636 $ 11,217 $ 38,302 
Residential Mortgage
Refreshed FICO score
Less than 620 $ 2,451 $ 636 $ 442 $ 140 $ 120 $ 104 $ 1,009 
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than 680 5,199 1,511 1,123 477 294 307 1,487 
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740 24,532 8,822 5,454 2,785 1,057 1,434 4,980 
Greater than or equal to 740 177,077 78,003 37,021 19,913 5,949 9,137 27,054 
Fully-insured loans 12,704 3,845 3,486 1,150 216 235 3,772 
Total Residential Mortgage $ 221,963 $ 92,817 $ 47,526 $ 24,465 $ 7,636 $ 11,217 $ 38,302 
Home Equity - Credit Quality Indicators
TotalHome Equity Loans
and Reverse
Mortgages Revolving LoansRevolving Loans
Converted to Term
Loans
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2021
Home Equity
Refreshed LTV
Less than or equal to 90 percent $ 27,594 $ 1,773 $ 19,095 $ 6,726 
Greater than 90 percent but less than or equal to 100 percent 130 55 34 41 
Greater than 100 percent 211 85 54 72 
Total Home Equity $ 27,935 $ 1,913 $ 19,183 $ 6,839 
Home Equity
Refreshed FICO score
Less than 620 $ 893 $ 244 $ 209 $ 440 
Greater than or equal to 620 and less than 680 1,434 222 495 717 
Greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740 4,625 468 2,493 1,664 
Greater than or equal to 740 20,983 979 15,986 4,018 
Total Home Equity $ 27,935 $ 1,913 $ 19,183 $ 6,839 
Includes reverse mortgages of $ 1.3 billion and home equity loans of $ 582 million, which are no longer originated.(1)
(1)
119 Bank of America
Credit Card and Direct/Indirect Consumer – Credit Quality Indicators By Vintage
Direct/Indirect
Term Loans by Origination Year Credit Card
(Dollars in millions)Total
Direct/Indirect
as of December
31, 2021Revolving
Loans 2021 2020 2019 2018 2017 PriorTotal Credit
Card as of
December 31,
2021Revolving
LoansRevolving
Loans
Converted
to Term
Loans 
Refreshed FICO score
Less than 620 $ 685 $ 13 $ 179 $ 115 $ 129 $ 79 $ 101 $ 69 $ 3,017  $ 2,857  $ 160 
Greater than or equal to 620
and less than 680 2,313  14 1,170  414 313 148 134 120 9,264  9,064  200 
Greater than or equal to 680
and less than 740 8,530  60 4,552  1,659  1,126  466 314 353 28,347  28,155  192 
Greater than or equal to 740 37,164  94 15,876  8,642  6,465  2,679  1,573  1,835  40,810  40,762  48 
Other internal credit
   metrics 54,868  54,173  283 53 77 75 63 144 — — — 
Total credit card and other
   consumer $ 103,560  $54,354  $22,060  $10,883  $ 8,110  $ 3,447  $ 2,185  $ 2,521  $ 81,438  $80,838  $ 600 
Represents TDRs that were modified into term loans.
Other internal credit metrics may include delinquency status, geography or other factors.
Direct/indirect consumer includes $54.2 billion of securities-based lending, which is typically supported by highly liquid collateral with market value greater than or equal to the outstanding loan
balance and therefore has minimal credit risk at December 31, 2021.
Commercial – Credit Quality Indicators By Vintage 
Term Loans
Amortized Cost Basis by Origination Year
(Dollars in millions)Total as of
December 31,
2021 2021 2020 2019 2018 2017 PriorRevolving
Loans
U.S. Commercial
Risk ratings     
Pass rated $ 315,618 $ 55,862 $ 25,012 $ 23,373 $ 11,439 $ 10,426 $ 23,877 $165,629 
Reservable criticized 10,318 598 687 1,308 1,615 514 1,072 4,524 
Total U.S. Commercial $ 325,936 $ 56,460 $ 25,699 $ 24,681 $ 13,054 $ 10,940 $ 24,949 $170,153 
Non-U.S. Commercial
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 110,787 $ 25,749 $ 8,703 $ 7,133 $ 4,521 $ 3,016 $ 3,062 $ 58,603 
Reservable criticized 2,479 223 324 487 275 257 216 697 
Total Non-U.S. Commercial $ 113,266 $ 25,972 $ 9,027 $ 7,620 $ 4,796 $ 3,273 $ 3,278 $ 59,300 
Commercial Real Estate
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 55,511 $ 14,402 $ 7,244 $ 11,237 $ 5,710 $ 3,326 $ 6,831 $ 6,761 
Reservable criticized 7,498 277 990 2,237 1,710 596 1,464 224 
Total Commercial Real Estate $ 63,009 $ 14,679 $ 8,234 $ 13,474 $ 7,420 $ 3,922 $ 8,295 $ 6,985 
Commercial Lease Financing
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 14,438 $ 3,280 $ 2,485 $ 2,427 $ 2,030 $ 1,741 $ 2,475 $ — 
Reservable criticized 387 25 18 91 67 48 138 — 
Total Commercial Lease Financing $ 14,825 $ 3,305 $ 2,503 $ 2,518 $ 2,097 $ 1,789 $ 2,613 $ — 
U.S. Small Business Commercial 
Risk ratings
Pass rated $ 11,618 $ 4,257 $ 2,922 $ 1,059 $ 763 $ 623 $ 1,853 $ 141 
Reservable criticized 433 12 29 91 87 64 147 3 
Total U.S. Small Business Commercial$ 12,051 $ 4,269 $ 2,951 $ 1,150 $ 850 $ 687 $ 2,000 $ 144 
 Total $ 529,087 $104,685 $ 48,414 $ 49,443 $ 28,217 $ 20,611 $ 41,135 $236,582 
 Excludes $ 7.2 billion of loans accounted for under the fair value option at December 31, 2021.
 Excludes U.S. Small Business Card loans of $7.1 billion. Refreshed  FICO scores for this portfolio are $192 million for less than 620; $618 million for greater  than or equal to 620 and less than 680;
$1.9 billion for greater than or equal to 680 and less than 740; and $ 4.4 billion greater than or equal to 740.(1)
(2, 3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 120
During 2022, commercial credit quality showed some signs
of stabilization. Commercial reservable criticized utilized
exposure decreased to $19.3 billion at December 31, 2022 from
$22.4 billion (to 3.12 percent from 3.91 percent of total
commercial reservable utilized exposure) at December 31,
2021, which was broad-based across industries.
Troubled Debt Restructurings
Consumer Real Estate
Modifications of consumer real estate loans are classified as
TDRs when the borrow er is experiencing financial difficulties
and a concession has been granted. Concessions may include
reductions in interest rates, capitalization of past due amounts,
principal and/or interest forbearance, payme nt extensions,
principal and/or interest  forgiveness, or combi nations thereof.
Prior to permanently modifying a loan, the Corporation may
enter into trial modifications with certain borrowers under both
government and proprietary programs. Trial modifications
generally represent a three- to four-month period during which
the borrower makes monthly payments under the anticipated
modified payment terms. Upon successful completion of the trial
period, the Corporation and the borrower enter into a permanent
modification. Binding trial modifications are classified as TDRs
when the trial offer is made and continue to be classified as
TDRs regardless of whether the borrower enters into a
permanent modification.
Consumer real estate loans of $211 millio n that have been
discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy with no change inrepayment terms and not reaffirmed by the borrower were
included in TDRs at December 31, 2022, of which $53 million
were classified as nonperforming and $33 million were loans
fully insured.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, remaining commitments to
lend additional funds to debtors whose terms have been
modified in a consumer real estate TDR were  not significant.
Consumer real estate foreclosed properties totaled $121 million
and $101 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021. The carrying
value of consumer real estate loans, includi ng fully-insured
loans, for which formal foreclosure proceedings were in process
at Decembe r 31, 2022 and 2021 was $871 million and $1.1
billion. During 2022 and 2021, the Corporation reclassified $190
million and $64 millio n of consumer real estate loans to
foreclosed properties or, for properties acquired upon
foreclosure of certain government-guaranteed loans (principally
FHA-insured loans), to other assets. The reclassifications
represent non-cash investing activities and, accordingly , are not
reflected in the Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows.
The table below presents the December 31, 2022, 2021 and
2020 unpaid principal balance, carrying value, and average pre-
and post-modification interest rates of consum er real estate
loans that were modified  in TDRs during 2022, 2021 and 2020.
The following Consumer Real Estate portfolio segment tables
include loans that were initially classified as TDRs during the
period and also loans that had previously been classified as
TDRs and were modified again during the period.
Consumer Real Estate – TDRs Entered into During 2022, 2021 and 2020
Unpaid
Principal
BalanceCarrying
ValuePre-
Modification
Interest RatePost-
Modification
Interest Rate 
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Residential mortgage $ 1,144 $ 1,015 3.52 % 3.40 %
Home equity 238 191 4.61 4.65 
Total $ 1,382 $ 1,206 3.71 3.62 
December 31, 2021
Residential mortgage $ 891 $ 788 3.48 % 3.38 %
Home equity 107 77 3.60 3.59 
Total $ 998 $ 865 3.49 3.41 
December 31, 2020
Residential mortgage $ 732 $ 646 3.66 % 3.59 %
Home equity 87 69 3.67 3.61 
Total $ 819 $ 715 3.66 3.59 
The post-modification interest rate reflects the interest rate applicable only to permanently completed modifications, which exclude loans that are in a trial modification period.
The table below presen ts the December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 carrying value for consumer real estate loans that were
modified in a TDR during 2022, 2021 and 2020, by type of modification.
Consumer Real Estate – Modification Programs
TDRs Entered into During
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Modifications under government programs $ 2 $ 4 $ 13 
Modifications under proprietary programs 1,100 774 570 
Loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy 14 33 53 
Trial modifications 90 54 79 
Total modifications $ 1,206 $ 865 $ 715 
Includes loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy with no change in repayment terms that are classified as TDRs.
The following table presents the carrying value  of consumer real estate loans that entered into payment default during 2022,
2021 and 2020 that were modified in a TDR during the 12 months preceding payment default. A payment default for consumer real
estate TDRs is recognized when a borrower has missed three  monthly payments (not necessarily consecutively) since modification.(1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
121 Bank of America
Consumer Real Estate – TDRs Entering Payment Default that were Modified During the Preceding 12 Months
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Modifications under government programs $ — $ 4 $ 16 
Modifications under proprietary programs 189 128 51 
Loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy 2 9 19 
Trial modifications 25 19 54 
Total modifications $ 216 $ 160 $ 140 
Includes loans discharged in Chapter 7 bankruptcy with no change in repayment terms that are classified as TDRs.
Includes trial modification of fers to which the customer did not respond.
Credit Card and Other Consumer
The Corporation seeks to assist customers who are
experiencing financial difficulty by modifyin g loans while
ensuring compliance with federal and local laws and guidelines.
Credit card and other consumer loan modifications generally
involve reducing the interest rate on the account, placing the
customer on a fixed payment plan not exceeding  60 months and
canceling the customer ’s available line of credit,  all of which are
considered TDRs. The Corporation makes loan modifications
directly with borrowers for debt held only by the Corporation
(internal programs). Additionally , the Corporation makes loan
modifications for borrowers working with third-party
renegotiationagencies that provide solutions to customers’  entire unsecured
debt structures (external programs). The Corporation classifies
other secured consumer loans that have been discharged in
Chapter 7 bankruptcy as TDRs, which are written down to
collateral value and placed on nonaccrual status no later than
the time of discharge.
The table below provides information on the Corporation’ s
Credit Card and Other Consumer TDR portfolio including the
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 unpaid principal balance,
carrying value, and average pre- and post-mod ification interest
rates of loans that were  modified in TDRs during 2022, 2021
and 2020.
Credit Card and Other Consumer – TDRs Entered into During 2022, 2021 and 2020
 Unpaid
Principal
BalanceCarrying
Value Pre-
Modification
Interest RatePost-
Modification
Interest Rate
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Credit card $ 284 $ 293 22.34 % 3.89 %
Direct/Indirect consumer 6 5 5.51 5.50 
Total $ 290 $ 298 22.06 3.92 
December 31, 2021
Credit card $ 237 $ 248 18.45 % 4.09 %
Direct/Indirect consumer 23 16 5.88 5.88 
Total $ 260 $ 264 17.68 4.20 
December 31, 2020
Credit card $ 269 $ 277 18.16 % 5.63 %
Direct/Indirect consumer 52 37 5.83 5.83 
Total $ 321 $ 314 16.70 5.65 
Includes accrued interest and fees.
The table below present s the December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020 carrying value for Credit Card and Other Consumer loans that
were modified in a TDR during 2022, 2021 and 2020 by program type.
Credit Card and Other Consumer – TDRs by Program Type at December 31 
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Internal programs $ 251 $ 214 $ 225 
External programs 44 44 73 
Other 3 6 16 
Total $ 298 $ 264 $ 314 
Includes accrued interest and fees.
Credit card and other consumer loans are deem ed to be in
payment default during the quarter in which a borrower misses
the second of two consecutive payments. Payment defaults are
one of the factors considered when projecting future cash flows
in the calculation of the allowance for loan and lease losses for
credit card and other consumer . Based on historical experience,
the Corporation estimates that 15 percent of new credit card
TDRs and 15 percent of new direct/indirect consumer TDRs
may be in payment default within 12 months after modification.Commercial Loans
Modifications of loans to commercial borrowers that are
experiencing financial difficulty are designed to reduce the
Corporation’ s loss exposure while providing the borrower with
an opportunity to work through financial difficulties, often to
avoid foreclosure or bankruptcy . Each modification is unique and
reflects the individua l circumstances of the borrower .
Modifications that result in a TDR may includ e extensions of
maturity at a concessionary (below market) rate of interest,
payment forbearances or other actions designed to benefit the
borrower while mitigating the Corporation’ s risk exposure.(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(1)
(1)
(1) 
Bank of America 122
Reductions in interest rates are rare. Instead, the interest rates
are typically increased, although the increased rate may not
represent a market rate of interest. Infrequently , concessions
may also include principal forgiveness in connection with
foreclosure, short sale or other settlement agreements leading
to termination or sale of the loan.
At the time of restructuring, the loans are remeasured to
reflect the impact, if any, on projected cash flows resulting from
the modified  terms. If a portion of the loan is deemed to be
uncollectible, a charge-of f may be recorded at the time of
restructuring. Alternative ly, a charge-of f may have already been
recorded in a previous period such that no charge-of f is required
at the time of modification.
During 2022, the carrying value of the Corporation’ s
commercial loans that were modified as TDRs was $1.9 billion
compared to $1.3 billion and $1.2 billion for 2021 and 2020. At
December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, the Corporation had
commitments to lend $358 million, $283 million and $402 million
to commercial borrowers whose loans were classified as TDRs.
The balance of commercial TDRs in payment default was $105
million, $262 million and $218 million at December 31, 2022,
2021 and 2020.
Loans Held-for-sale
The Corporation had LHFS of $6.9 billion and $15.6 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. Cash and non-cash proceeds
from sales and paydown s of loans originally classified as LHFS
were $32.0 billion, $43.6 billion and $20.1 billion for 2022, 2021
and 2020, respectively . Cash used for originations and
purchases of LHFS totaled $24.9 billion, $37.3 billion and $19.7
billion for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively . Also included were
non-cash net transfers into LHFS of $1.9 billion during 2022,
primarily driven by the transfer of a $1.6 billion affinity card loan
portfolio to held for sale that was sold in October 2022, and
$808 million during 2021.
Accrued Interest Receivable
Accrued interest receivable for loans and leases  and loans held-
for-sale at December 31, 2022 and 2021 was $3.8 billion and
$2.2 billion and is reported in customer and other receivables  on
the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Outstanding credit card loan balances include unpaid
principal, interest and fees. Credit card loans are not classified
as nonperfo rming but are charged off no later than the end of
the month in which the account becomes 180 days past due,
within 60 days after receipt of notification of death or bankruptcy ,
or upon confirmation of fraud . During 2022 and 2021, the
Corporation reversed $332 million and $446 million of interest
and fee income against the income statement line item in which
it was originally recorded upon charge-of f of the principal
balance of the loan.
For the outstanding residential mortgage, home equity ,
direct/indirect consumer and commercial loan balances
classified as nonperforming during 2022 and 2021, interest and
fee income reversed at the time the loans were classified as
nonperforming was not significant. For more information on the
Corporation's nonperfo rming loan policies, see Note 1 –
Summary of Significant Accounting Principles .
Allowance for Credit Losses
The allowance for credit losses is estimated using quantitative
and qualitative methods that consider a variety of factors, such
as historical  loss experience, the current credit quality of the
portfolio and an economic outlook over the life of the loan.
Qualitative reserves cover losses that are expected but, in the
Corporation's assessment, may not be adequately reflected inthe quantitative methods or the economic assumptions. The
Corporation incorporates forward-looking information through
the use of several macroeconomic scenarios in determining the
weighted economic outlook over the forecasted life of the
assets. Thes e scenarios  include key macroeco nomic variables
such as gross domestic product, unemployment rate, real estate
prices and corporate bond spreads. The scenarios that are
chosen each quarter and the weighting given to each scenario
depend on a variety of factors including recent economic events,
leading econ omic indica tors, internal and third- party economist
views, and industry trends. For more information on the
Corporation's credit loss accounting policies including the
allowance for credit losses, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant
Accounting Principles .
The December 31, 2022 estimate for allowance for credit
losses was based on various economic scenarios, including a
baseline scenario derived from consensus estimates, an
adverse scenario reflecting an extended moderate recession, a
downside scenario reflecting persistent inflation and interest
rates above the baseline  scenario, a tail risk scenario similar to
the severely  adverse scenario used in stress testing and an
upside scenario that considers the potential for improvement
above the baseline scenario. The overall economic outlook is
weighted 95 percent towards a recessionary environment in
2023, with continued inflationary pressures leading to lower
GDP  and higher unemp loyment rate expectations as compared
to the prior year. The weighted economic outloo k assumes that
the U.S. average unem ployment rate will be above five and a
half percent by the fourth  quarter of 2023 and will slowly decline
to five percent by the fourth quarter of 2024. Additionally , in this
economic outlook, U.S. gross domestic product is forecasted to
contract at 0.4 percent and grow at 1.2 percent year-over-year in
the fourth quarters of 2023 and 2024. For comparison, as of
December 31, 2021, the weighted economic outlook for the U.S.
average unemployment rate was forecasted to be just above
five percent by the fourth quarter of 2022 and slowly decline to
just under five perce nt by the fourth quarter of 2023 and U.S.
gross dome stic product was forecasted at 2.1 percent and 1.9
percent year-over-year in the fourth quarters of 2022 and 2023.
The allowance for credi t losses at December 31, 2022 was
$14.2 billion, an increase of $379 million compared to
December 31, 2021. The increase in the allowance for credit
losses was primarily driven by loan growth and a dampened
macroeconomic outlook, partially offset by a reserve release for
reduced pandemic uncertainties. The change in the allowance
for credit losses was comprised of a net increase of $295 million
in the allowa nce for loan and lease losses and an increase of
$84 million in the reserve for unfunded lending commitments.
The increase in the allowance for credit losses was attributed to
increases in the credit card and other consumer portfolios of
$341 million, and commercial portfolio of $177 million, partially
offset by a decrease in the consumer real estate portfolio of
$139 million. The provision for credit losses increased $7.1
billion to an expense of $2.5 billion in 2022 compared to a
benefit of $4.6 billion in 2021 and an expense of $11.3 billion in
2020. The increase in the provision for credit losses in 2022 was
primarily driven by loan growth and a dampened
macroeconomic outlook , partially offset by reduced pandemic
uncertainties. The benefit in 2021 was prima rily due to an
improved macroeconomic outlook and credit quality .
Outstanding loans and leases excluding loans accounted for
under the fair value option increased $68.7 billion in 2022
primarily driven by commercial loans, which increased $47.7
billion, drive n by broad-based growth, and consumer loans
which
123 Bank of America
increased $21.0 billion, primarily driven by credit card and
residential mortgage.The changes in the allowance for credit losses, including net
charge-of fs and provision for loan and lease losses, are detailed
in the table below .
Consumer
Real EstateCredit Card and
 Other Consumer Commercial Total
(Dollars in millions) 2022
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 557 $ 6,476 $ 5,354 $ 12,387 
Loans and leases charged off (206) (2,755) (478) (3,439)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 224 882 161 1,267 
Net charge-offs 18 (1,873) (317) (2,172)
Provision for loan and lease losses (164) 2,215 409 2,460 
Other 9 (1) (1) 7 
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 420 6,817 5,445 12,682 
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 96 — 1,360 1,456 
Provision for unfunded lending commitments (3) — 86 83 
Other 1 — — 1 
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 94 — 1,446 1,540 
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 514 $ 6,817 $ 6,891 $ 14,222 
2021
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 858 $ 9,213 $ 8,731 $ 18,802 
Loans and leases charged off (78) (3,000) (719) (3,797)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 225 1,006 323 1,554 
Net charge-offs 147 (1,994) (396) (2,243)
Provision for loan and lease losses (449) (744) (2,980) (4,173)
Other 1 1 (1) 1 
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 557 6,476 5,354 12,387 
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 137 — 1,741 1,878 
Provision for unfunded lending commitments (41) — (380) (421)
Other — — (1) (1)
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 96 — 1,360 1,456 
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 653 $ 6,476 $ 6,714 $ 13,843 
2020
Allowance for loan and lease losses, January 1 $ 440 $ 7,430 $ 4,488 $ 12,358 
Loans and leases charged off (98) (3,646) (1,675) (5,419)
Recoveries of loans and leases previously charged off 201 891 206 1,298 
Net charge-offs 103 (2,755) (1,469) (4,121)
Provision for loan and lease losses 307 4,538 5,720 10,565 
Other 8 — (8) — 
Allowance for loan and lease losses, December 31 858 9,213 8,731 18,802 
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, January 1 119 — 1,004 1,123 
Provision for unfunded lending commitments 18 — 737 755 
Reserve for unfunded lending commitments, December 31 137 — 1,741 1,878 
Allowance for credit losses, December 31 $ 995 $ 9,213 $ 10,472 $ 20,680 
NOTE 6  Securitizations and Other V ariable
Interest Entities
The Corporation utilizes VIEs in the ordinary course of business
to support its own and its customers’  financin g and investing
needs. The Corporation  routinely securitizes loans and debt
securities using VIEs as a source of funding for the Corporation
and as a means of transferring the economic risk of the loans or
debt securities to third parties. The assets are transferred into a
trust or other securitization vehicle such that the assets are
legally isolat ed from the creditors of the Corpora tion and are not
available to satisfy its obligations. These asse ts can only be
used to settle obligations of the trust or other securitization
vehicle. The Corporation also administers, structures or invests
in other VIEs including CDOs, investment vehicles and other
entities. For more information on the Corporation’ s use of VIEs,
see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles.
The tables in this Note present the assets and liabilities of
consolidated and unconsolidated VIEs at December 31, 2022
and 2021 in situations where the Corporation has continuing
involvement with transferred assets or if the Corporationotherwise has a variab le interest in the VIE. The tables also
present the Corporat ion’s maximum loss exposure at
December 31, 2022 and 2021 resulting from its involvement with
consolidated VIEs and unconsolidated VIEs in which the
Corporation holds a variable interest. The Corporation’ s
maximum loss exposure is based on the unlikely  event that all of
the assets in the VIEs become worthless and incorporates not
only potential losses associated with assets recorded on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet but also potential losses
associated with off-balance sheet commitm ents, such as
unfunded liquidity commitments and other contractual
arrangements. The Corporation’ s maximum loss exposure does
not include losses previously recognized through  write-downs of
assets.
The Corporation invests in ABS issued by third-party VIEs
with which it has no other form of involvement and enters into
certain commercial lending arrangements that may also
incorporate the use of VIEs, for example to hold collateral.
These securities and loans are included in Note 4 – Securities  or
Note 5 – Outstanding Loans and Leases and Allowance for
Credit Losses. In addition, the Corporation has used VIEs in
connection with its funding activities.
Bank of America 124
The Corporation did not provide financial support to
consolidated or unconsolidated VIEs during 2022, 2021 and
2020 that it was not previously contractually required to provide,
nor does it intend to do so.
The Corporation had liquidity commitments, including written
put options  and collateral value guarantees, with certain
unconsolidated VIEs of $978 million and $968 million at
December 31, 2022 and 2021.
First-lien Mortgage Securitizations
As part of its mortgage banking activities, the Corporation
securitizes a portion of the first-lien residential mortgage loans it
originates or purchases from third parties, gene rally in the form
of residentia l mortgage-backed securities (RMBS) guaranteed
by government-sponsored enterprises, FNMA  and FHLMC
(collectively the GSEs), or the Government National Mortgage
Association (GNMA) primarily in the case of FHA-insured and U.S. Department of Veterans  Affairs (VA)-
guaranteed mortgage loans. Securitization usually occurs in
conjunction with or shortly after origination or purchase, and the
Corporation may also securitize loans held in its residential
mortgage portfolio. In addition, the Corporation may, from time
to time, securitize commercial mortgages it originates or
purchases from other entities. The Corporation typically services
the loans it securitizes. Further , the Corporation may retain
beneficial interests in the securitization trusts including senior
and subordinate securities and equity tranches issued by the
trusts. Except as descr ibed in Note 12 – Commitmen ts and
Contingencies , the Corporation does not provide guarantees or
recourse to the securitization trusts other than standard
representations and warranties.
The table below summ arizes select information related to
first-lien mortgage securitizations for 2022, 2021 and 2020.
First-lien Mortgage Securitizations
 
Residential Mortgage - Agency Commercial Mortgage
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Proceeds from loan sales $ 8,084 $ 6,664 $ 15,823 $ 5,853 $ 10,874 $ 5,084 
Gains on securitizations 8 9 728 46 156 61 
Repurchases from securitization trusts 53 756 436 — — — 
The Corporation transfers residential mortgage loans to securitizations sponsored primarily by the GSEs or GNMA  in the normal course of business and primarily receives residential mortgage-
backed securities in exchange. Substantially all of these securities are classified as Level 2 within the fair value hierarchy and are typically sold shortly after receipt.
A majority of the first-lien residenti al mortgage loans securitized are initially classified as LHFS and accounted for under the fair value option. Gains recognized on these LHFS prior to
securitization, which totaled $ 41 million, $ 121 million and $ 160 million net of hedges, during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively , are not included in the table above.
The Corporation may have the option to repurchase delinquent loans out of securitization trusts, which reduces the amount of servicing advances it is required to make. The Corporation may also
repurchase loans from securitization trusts to perform modifications. Repurchased loans include FHA-insured mortgages collateralizing GNMA  securities.
The Corporation recognizes consumer MSRs from the sale
or securitization of consumer real estate loans. The unpaid
principal balance of loans serviced for investors, including
residential mortgage and home equity loans, totaled $100.1
billion and $115.4  billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Servicing fee and ancillary fee income on serviced loans was
$274 millio n, $392 millio n and $474 millio n during 2022, 2021
and 2020, respectively . Servicing advances on serviced loans,
including loans serviced for others and loans held for
investment, were $1.6 billion and $2.0 billion at December 31,
2022 and 2021. For more information on MSRs , see Note 20 –
Fair V alue Measurements .During 2022, the Corporation deconsolidated agency
residential mortgage securitization trusts with total assets of
$784 million, with no significant deconsolidations in 2021.
During 2020, the Corporation completed the sale of $9.3
billion of consumer real estate loans through GNMA  loan
securitizations. As part of the securitizations, the Corporation
retained $8.4 billion of MBS, which are classified as debt
securities carried at fair value on the Consolidated Balance
Sheet. Total gains on loan sales of $704 million were recorded in
other income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
The following table summarizes select informati on related to
first-lien mortgage secur itization trusts in which the Corporation
held a variable interest at December 31, 2022 and 2021.(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
125 Bank of America
First-lien Mortgage VIEs
Residential Mortgage   
   Non-agency   
 Agency Prime Subprime Alt-A Commercial Mortgage
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Unconsolidated VIEs           
Maximum loss exposure $ 9,112  $ 11,600  $ 91 $ 121 $ 735 $ 908 $ 28 $ 14 $ 1,594  $ 1,445  
On-balance sheet assets           
Senior securities:           
Trading account assets $ 232 $ 175 $ 3 $ 8 $ 25 $ 44 $ 26 $ 12 $ 91 $ 21 
Debt securities carried at fair
value 3,027  5,009  — — 410 537 — — — — 
Held-to-maturity securities 5,853  6,416  — — — — — — 1,268  1,157  
All other assets — — 3 3 25 29 2 2 101 93 
Total retained positions $ 9,112  $ 11,600  $ 6 $ 11 $ 460 $ 610 $ 28 $ 14 $ 1,460  $ 1,271  
Principal balance outstanding $ 81,644  $ 93,142  $ 3,973  $ 4,710  $ 5,034  $ 6,179  $ 11,568  $ 13,627  $ 85,101  $ 85,540  
Consolidated VIEs           
Maximum loss exposure $ 1,735  $ 1,644  $ — $ 49 $ 78 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
On-balance sheet assets           
Trading account assets $ 1,735  $ 1,644  $ — $ — $ 78 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Loans and leases, net — — — 58 — — — — — — 
Total assets $ 1,735  $ 1,644  $ — $ 58 $ 78 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Total liabilities $ — $ — $ — $ 9 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
Maximum loss exposure includes obligations under loss-sharing reinsura nce and other arrangements for non-agency residential mortgage and commercial mortgage securitizations, but excludes
the reserve for representations and warranties obligations and corporate guarantees and also excludes servicing advances and other servicing rights and obligations. For more information, see
Note 12 – Commitments and Contingencies  and Note 20 – Fair V alue Measurements .
Principal balance outstanding includes loans where the Corporation was the transferor to securitization VIEs with which it has continuing involvement, which may include servicing the loans.
Other Asset-backed Securitizations
The table below summarizes select information related to home equity , credit card and other asset-backed VIEs in which the
Corporation held a variable interest at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Home Equity Loan, Credit Card and Other Asset-backed VIEs
 Home Equity Credit Card Resecuritization T rusts Municipal Bond T rusts
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Unconsolidated VIEs       
Maximum loss exposure $ 119 $ 152 $ — $ — $ 4,243  $ 6,089  $ 2,537  $ 4,094  
On-balance sheet assets       
Securities :       
Trading account assets $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 456 $ 1,030  $ — $ — 
Debt securities carried at fair value 1 1 — — 1,259  1,903  — — 
Held-to-maturity securities — — — — 2,528  3,156  — — 
Total retained positions $ 1 $ 1 $ — $ — $ 4,243  $ 6,089  $ — $ — 
Total assets of VIEs $ 326 $ 430 $ — $ — $ 12,255  $ 18,633  $ 3,016  $ 4,655  
Consolidated VIEs       
Maximum loss exposure $ 32 $ 45 $ 9,555  $ 10,279  $ 551 $ 680 $ — $ 210 
On-balance sheet assets       
Trading account assets $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 650 $ 686 $ — $ 122 
Loans and leases 97 140 14,555  14,434  — — — — 
Allowance for loan and lease losses 12 14 (808) (970) — — — — 
All other assets 2 3 68 70 — — — 88 
Total assets $ 111 $ 157 $ 13,815  $ 13,534  $ 650 $ 686 $ — $ 210 
On-balance sheet liabilities       
Short-term borrowings $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 196 
Long-term debt 79 113 4,247  3,248  99 6 — — 
All other liabilities — — 13 7 — — — — 
Total liabilities $ 79 $ 113 $ 4,260  $ 3,255  $ 99 $ 6 $ — $ 196 
For unconsolidated home equity loan VIEs, the maximum loss expos ure includes outstanding trust certificates issued by trusts in rapid amortization, net of recorded reserves. For both
consolidated and unconsolidated home equity loan VIEs, the maximum loss exposure excludes the reserve for representations and warranties obligations and corporate guarantees. For more
information, see Note 12 – Commitments and Contingencies .
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, loans and leases in the consolidated credit card trust included $ 3.3 billion and $ 4.3 billion of seller ’s interest.
The retained senior securities were valued using quoted market prices or observable market inputs (Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy).(1)
(2)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(1) (2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
Bank of America 126
Home Equity Loans
The Corpora tion retains  interests, primarily senior securities, in
home equity securitization trusts to which it transferred home
equity loans. In addition, the Corporation may be obligated to
provide subordinate funding to the trusts during a rapid
amortization event. This obligation is included in the maximum
loss exposure in the preceding table. The charges that will
ultimately be recorded as a result of the rapid amortization
events depend on the undrawn portion of the home equity lines
of credit, performance of the loans, the amount of subsequent
draws and the timing of related cash flows.
Credit Card Securitizations
The Corporation securitizes originated and purchased credit
card loans. The Corporation’ s continuing involv ement with the
securitization trust includes servicing the receivables, retaining
an undivided interest (seller ’s interest) in the receivables, and
holding certain retained interests, including subordinate interests
in accrued interest and fees on the securitized receivables and
cash reserve accounts.
During 2022, 2021 and 2020, the Corporation issued new
senior debt securities to third-party investors from the credit card
securitization trust totaling $2.3 billion, $1.0 billion, and $1.0
billion, respectively .
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation held
subordinate securities issued by the credit card securitization
trust with a notional principal amount of $6.7 billion and $6.5
billion. These securities serve as a form of credit enhancement
to the senio r debt securities and have a stated interest rate of
zero perce nt. During 2022, 2021 and 2020, the credit card
securitization trust issued $363 million, $161 million and $161
million, respectively , of these subordinate securities.
Resecuritization Trusts
The Corporation transfers securities, typica lly MBS, into
resecuritization VIEs generally at the request of customers
seeking securities with specific characteristics. Generally , there
are no significant ongoing activities performed in a
resecuritization trust, and no single investor has the unilateral
ability to liquidate the trust.The Corporation resecuritized $21.8 billion, $28.9 billion and
$39.0 billion of securities during 2022, 2021 and 2020,
respectively . Securities transferred into resecuritization VIEs
were measu red at fair value with changes in fair value recorded
in market making and similar activities prior to the
resecuritization and, accordingly , no gain or loss on sale was
recorded. Securities received from the resecuritization VIEs
were recognized at their fair value of $2.4 billion , $2.2 billion  and
$6.1 billion during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively . In 2022
and 2021, substantially all of the securities were classified as
trading account assets. All of the securities received as
resecuritization proceeds during 2020 were classified as trading
account assets. Of the securities received as resecuritization
proceeds during 2020, $2.4 billion, $2.1 billion and $1.7 billion
were classified as trading account assets, debt securities carried
at fair value and HTM securities, respectively . Substantially all of
the trading account securities carried at fair value were
categorized as Level 2 within the fair value hierarchy .
Municipal Bond Trusts
The Corpor ation admin isters municipal bond trusts that hold
highly-rated, long-term, fixed-rate municipal bonds. The trusts
obtain financing by issuing floating-rate trust certificates that
reprice on a weekly or other short-term basis to third-party
investors.
The Corpora tion’s liquidity commitments to unconsolidated
municipal bond trusts, including those for which the Corporation
was transferor , totaled $2.5 billion and $4.1 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. The weighted-ave rage remaining
life of bonds held in the trusts at December 31, 2022 was 8.7
years. There were no significant write-downs or downgrades of
assets or issuers during 2022, 2021 and 2020.
Other Variable Interest Entities
The table below summarizes select information related to other
VIEs in which the Corporation held a variable interest at
December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Other VIEs
Consolidated Unconsolidated Total Consolidated Unconsolidated Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Maximum loss exposure $ 2,286 $ 31,405 $ 33,691 $ 4,819 $ 27,790 $ 32,609 
On-balance sheet assets       
Trading account assets $ 353 $ 638 $ 991 $ 2,552 $ 626 $ 3,178 
Debt securities carried at fair value — 5 5 — 7 7 
Loans and leases 2,086 90 2,176 2,503 47 2,550 
Allowance for loan and lease losses (1) (12) (13) (2) (12) (14)
All other assets 46 30,221 30,267 28 26,628 26,656 
Total $ 2,484 $ 30,942 $ 33,426 $ 5,081 $ 27,296 $ 32,377 
On-balance sheet liabilities       
Short-term borrowings $ 42 $ — $ 42 $ 51 $ — $ 51 
Long-term debt 156 — 156 211 — 211 
All other liabilities — 7,318 7,318 — 6,548 6,548 
Total $ 198 $ 7,318 $ 7,516 $ 262 $ 6,548 $ 6,810 
Total assets of VIEs $ 2,484 $ 101,271 $ 103,755 $ 5,081 $ 92,249 $ 97,330 
127 Bank of America
Customer VIEs
Customer VIEs include credit-linked, equity-linked and
commodity-linked note VIEs, repackaging VIEs and asset
acquisition VIEs, which are typically created on behalf of
customers who wish to obtain market or credit exposure to a
specific company , index, commodity or financial instrument.
The Corporation’ s maximum loss exposure to consolidated
and unconsolidated customer VIEs totaled $914 million and $2.9
billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021, including the notional
amount of derivatives to which the Corporation is a counterparty ,
net of losses previously recorded, and the Corporation’ s
investment, if any , in securities issued by the VIEs.
Collateralized Debt Obligation VIEs
The Corporation receives fees for structuring CDO VIEs, which
hold diversified pools of fixed-income securities, typically
corporate debt or ABS,  which the CDO VIEs fund by issuing
multiple tranches of debt and equity securities. CDOs are
generally managed by third-party portfolio managers. The
Corporation typically transfers assets to these CDOs, holds
securities issued by the CDOs and may be a derivative
counterparty to the CDOs. The Corporation’ s maximum loss
exposure to consolidat ed and unconsolidated CDOs totaled
$197 million and $ 235 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Investment VIEs
The Corporation sponsors, invests in or provides financing,
which may be in connec tion with the sale of assets, to a variety
of investment VIEs that hold loans, real estate, debt securities or
other financial instruments and are designed to provide the
desired investment profile to investors or the Corporation. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation’ s consolidated
investment VIEs had total assets of $854 million and $1.0 billion.
The Corpora tion also held investments in unco nsolidated VIEs
with total assets of $12.2 billion  and $7.1 billion  at December 31,
2022 and 2021. The Corporation’ s maximum  loss exposure
associated with both consolidated and unconsolidated
investment VIEs totaled $2.4 billion and $2.0 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021 comprised primarily of on-balance
sheet assets less non-recourse liabilities.
Leveraged Lease Trusts
The Corporation’ s net investment in consolidated leveraged
lease trusts totaled $1.2 billion and $1.5 billion at December 31,
2022 and 2021. The trusts hold long-lived equipment such as
rail cars, power generation and distribution equipment, and
commercial aircraft. The Corporation structures the trusts and
holds a significant residual interest. The net investment
represents the Corpora tion’s maximum loss exposure to the
trusts in the unlikely event that the leveraged lease investments
become worthless. Debt  issued by the leveraged lease trusts is
non-recourse to the Corporation.
Tax Credit VIEs
The Corporation holds investments in unconsolidated limited
partnerships and similar entities that construct, own and operate
affordable housing, wind and solar projects. An unrelated third
party is typically the general partner or managi ng member and
has control over the significant activities of the VIE. As an
investor , tax credits associated with the investments in these
entities are allocated to the Corporation, as provided by the U.S.
Internal Revenue Code and related regulations, and are
recognized as income tax benefits in the Corporation’ s
Consolidated Statement of Income in the year they are earned,which varies  based on the type of investments. Tax credits from
environmental, social and governance (ESG) investments in
affordable housing are recognized ratably over a term of up to
10 years, and tax credits from wind and solar energy
investments are recognized either at inception for transactions
electing Investment Tax Credits (ITCs) or as energy is produced
for transactions electing Production Tax Credits (PTCs), which is
generally up to a 10-yea r time period. The volume and types of
investments held by the Corporation will influence the amount of
tax credits recognized each period. The maximum loss exposure
included in the Other VIEs table was $28.8 billion and $25.7
billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021. In addition to that
amount, the Corporation had unfunded capital contributions for
renewable energy investments of $1.9 billion  and $1.0 billion  at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. The capital contributions are
contingent on various conditions precedent to funding over the
next two years. The Corp oration’ s risk of loss is generally
mitigated by policies requiring that the project qualify for the
expected tax credits prior to making its investment.
The Corpo ration’ s investments in affordable housing
partnerships, which are reported in other assets on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet, totaled $14.1 billion and $12.6
billion, including unfunded commitments to provide capital
contributions of $6.6 billion and $5.8 billion, at December 31,
2022 and 2021. The unfunded commitments are expected to be
paid over the next five years. Durin g 2022, 2021 and 2020, the
Corporation recognized tax credits and other tax benefits of $1.5
billion, $1.3 billion and $1.2 billion and reported pretax losses in
other income  of $1.2 billion, $1.1 billion and $1.0 billion. These
tax credits are recogniz ed as part of the Corporation’ s annual
effective tax rate used to determine tax expe nse in a given
quarter . The Corporation may be asked to invest additional
amounts to support a troubled affordable housing project. Such
additional investments have not been and are not expected to
be significant.
NOTE 7 Goodwill and Intangible Assets
Goodwill
The table below presents goodwill balance s by business
segment at December 31, 2022 and 2021. The reporting units
utilized for goodwill impairment testing are the operating
segments or one level below .
Goodwill
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Consumer Banking $ 30,137 $ 30,137 
Global Wealth & Investment Management 9,677 9,677 
Global Banking 24,026 24,026 
Global Markets 5,182 5,182 
Total goodwill $ 69,022 $ 69,022 
During 2022, the Corporation completed its annual goodwill
impairment test as of June 30, 2022 using qualitative
assessments for all applicable reporting units. Based on the
results of the annual goodwill impairment test, the Corporation
determined there was no impairment. For more information on
the use of qualitative assessments, see Note 1 – Summary of
Significant Accounting Principles .
Intangible Assets
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the net carrying value of
intangible assets was $2.1 billion and $2.2 billion. At both
December 31, 2022 and 2021, intangible assets included $ 1.6
Bank of America 128
billion of intangible assets associated with trade names,
substantially all of which had an indefinite life and, accordingly ,
are not being amortized. Amortization of intan gibles expense
was $78 million, $76 million and $95 million for 2022, 2021 and
2020.
NOTE 8 Leases
The Corpo ration enters into both lessor and lessee
arrangements. For more information on lease accounting, see
Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles  and on
lease financing receivables, see Note 5 – Outstanding Loans
and Leases and Allowance for Credit Losses .
Lessor Arrangements
The Corporation’ s lessor arrangements primarily consist of
operating, sales-type and direct financing leases for equipment.
Lease agree ments may include options to renew and for the
lessee to purchase the leased equipment at the end of the lease
term.
The table below presents the net investment in sales-type
and direct financing leases at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Net Investment 
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Lease receivables $ 15,123 $ 16,806 
Unguaranteed residuals 2,143 2,078 
   Total net investment in sales-type and direct
      financing leases $ 17,266 $ 18,884 
In certain cases, the Corporation obtains third-party residual value insurance to reduce its
residual asset risk. The carrying value of residual assets with third-party residual value
insurance for at least a portion of the asset value was $6.5 billion and $7.1 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021.
The table below presents lease income for 2022, 2021 and
2020.
Lease Income
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Sales-type and direct financing leases $ 589 $ 613 $ 707 
Operating leases 941 930 931 
   Total lease income $ 1,530 $ 1,543 $ 1,638 
Lessee Arrangements
The Corporation's lessee arrangements predom inantly consist
of operating leases for premises and equipment; the
Corporation's financing leases are not significant.
Lease terms may contain renewal and extension options and
early termination features. Generally , these options do not
impact the lease term because the Corporation is not
reasonably certain that it will exercise the options.
The followin g table provides information on the right-of-use
assets, lease liabilities and weighted-average discount rates and
lease terms at December 31, 2022 and 2021.Supplemental Information for Lessee Arrangements
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Right-of-use asset $ 9,755 $ 10,233 
Lease liabilities 10,359 10,858 
Weighted-average discount
rate used to calculate
present value of future
minimum lease payments 3.25 % 2.91 %
Weighted-average lease term
(in years) 8.6 9.0
Right-of-use assets obtained
in
  exchange for new operating
  lease liabilities $ 824 $ 1,713 
2022 2021 2020
Operating cash flows from
  operating leases $ 1,986 $ 1,964 $ 2,039 
Lease Cost and Supplemental
  Information:
Operating lease cost $ 2,008 $ 2,025 $ 2,149 
Variable lease cost 464 462 474 
   Total lease cost $ 2,472 $ 2,487 $ 2,623 
Represents non-ca sh activity and, accordingly , is not reflected in the Consolidated Statement
of Cash Flows.
Represents cash paid for amounts included in the measurements of lease liabilities.
Primarily consists of payments for common area maintenance and property taxes.
Amounts are recorded in occupancy and equipment expense in the Consolidated Statement
of Income.
Maturity Analysis
The maturities of lessor and lessee arrangements outstanding at
December 31, 2022 are presented in the table below based on
undiscounted cash flows.
Maturities of Lessor and Lessee Arrangements
Lessor Lessee 
Operating
LeasesSales-type and
Direct Financing
Leases Operating
Leases
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
2023 $ 819 $ 4,932 $ 1,998 
2024 682 4,399 1,850 
2025 509 2,539 1,567 
2026 368 1,993 1,354 
2027 289 990 1,131 
Thereafter 664 1,635 4,189 
Total undiscounted
cash flows $ 3,331 16,488 12,089 
Less: Net present
value adjustment 1,365 1,730 
Total $ 15,123 $ 10,359 
Excludes $278 million in commitments under lessee arrangements that have not yet
commenced with lease terms that will begin in 2023.
Includes $10.2 billion in commercial lease financing receivables and $4.9 billion in
direct/indirect consumer lease financing receivables.
Represents lease receivables for lessor arrangements and lease liabilities for lessee
arrangements.(1)
(1)(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
129 Bank of America
NOTE 9 Deposits
The scheduled contractual maturities for total time deposits at December 31, 2022 are presented in the table below .
Contractual Maturities of Total Time Deposits
(Dollars in millions) U.S. Non-U.S. Total
Due in 2023 $ 36,114 $ 7,393 $ 43,507 
Due in 2024 3,576 67 3,643 
Due in 2025 643 6 649 
Due in 2026 149 23 172 
Due in 2027 116 1,472 1,588 
Thereafter 238 8 246 
Total time deposits $ 40,836 $ 8,969 $ 49,805 
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had
aggregate U.S. time deposits of $12.8 billion and $9.4 billion
and non-U.S. time depo sits of $9.0 billion and $10.6 billion in
denominations that met or exceeded insurance limits.
NOTE 10 Securities Financing Agreements,
Short-term Borrowings, Collateral and
Restricted Cash
The Corporation enters into securities financing agreements
which include securit ies borrowed or purchased under
agreements to resell and securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase. These financing agreements (also
referred to as “matched-book transactions”) are to
accommodate custome rs, obtain securities to cover short
positions and finance inventory positions. The Corporation
elects to account for certain securities financing agreements
under the fair value option. For more information on the fair
value option, see Note 21 – Fair V alue Option .
Offsetting of Securities Financing Agreements
Substantially all of the Corporation’ s securities financing
activities are transacted under legally enforceable masterrepurchase agreements or legally enforceable master securities
lending agreements that give the Corporation, in the event of
default by the counterpa rty, the right to liquidate securities held
and to offset receivables and payables with the same
counterparty . The Corporation offsets secu rities financing
transactions with the same counterparty on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet where it has such a legally enforceable master
netting agreement and the transactions have the same maturity
date.
The Secur ities Financing Agreements table presents
securities financing agreements included on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet in federal funds sold and securit ies borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell, and in federal funds
purchased and securities loaned or sold under agreements to
repurchase at December 31, 2022 and 2021. Balances are
presented on a gross  basis, prior to the application of
counterparty netting. Gross assets and liabilities are adjusted on
an aggregate basis to take into consideration the effects of
legally enforceable master netting agreeme nts. For more
information on the offsetting of derivatives, see Note 3 –
Derivatives.
Securities Financing Agreements
Gross
Assets/LiabilitiesAmounts OffsetNet Balance
Sheet AmountFinancial
Instruments Net
Assets/Liabilities
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell $ 597,847 $ (330,273)$ 267,574 $ (240,120)$ 27,454 
Securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase $ 525,908 $ (330,273)$ 195,635 $ (183,265)$ 12,370 
Other 8,427 — 8,427 (8,427) — 
Total $ 534,335 $ (330,273)$ 204,062 $ (191,692)$ 12,370 
December 31, 2021
Securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell $ 527,054 $ (276,334)$ 250,720 $ (229,525)$ 21,195 
Securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase $ 468,663 $ (276,334)$ 192,329 $ (181,860)$ 10,469 
Other 11,391 — 11,391 (11,391) — 
Total $ 480,054 $ (276,334)$ 203,720 $ (193,251)$ 10,469 
Includes activity where uncertainty exists as to the enforceability of certain master netting agreements under bankruptcy laws in some countries or industries.
Includes securities  collateral received or pledged under repurchase or securities lending agreements where there is a legally enforceable master netting agreement. These amounts are not offset
on the Consolidated Balance Sheet, but are shown as a reduction to derive a net asset or liability . Securities collateral received or pledged where the legal enforceability of the master netting
agreements is uncertain is excluded from the table.
Excludes repurchase activity of $ 8.7 billion and $ 20.1 billion reported in loans and leases on the Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Balance is reported in accrued expenses and other liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet and relates to transactions where the Corp oration acts as the lender in a securities lending
agreement and receives securities that can be pledged as collateral or sold. In these transactions, the Corporation recognizes an asset at fair value, representing the securities received, and a
liability , representing the obligation to return those securities.
Repurchase Agreements and Securities Loaned
Transactions Accounted for as Secured
Borrowings
The following tables present securities sold under agreements to
repurchase and securities loaned by remaining contractual term
to maturity and class of collateral pledged. Included in “Other”
are transactions where the Corporation acts as thelender in a securities lending agreement and receives securities
that can be pledged as collateral or sold. Certain agreements
contain a right to substitute collateral and/or terminate the
agreement prior to maturity at the option of the Corporation or
the counterparty . Such agreements are included in the table
below based on the remaining contractual term to maturity .(1) (2)
(3)
(4)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 130
Remaining Contractual Maturity
Overnight and
Continuous 30 Days or LessAfter 30 Days
Through 90 DaysGreater than
90 Days Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase $ 200,087 $ 181,632 $ 41,666 $ 30,107 $ 453,492 
Securities loaned 66,909 288 1,139 4,080 72,416 
Other 8,427 — — — 8,427 
Total $ 275,423 $ 181,920 $ 42,805 $ 34,187 $ 534,335 
December 31, 2021
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase $ 148,023 $ 194,964 $ 36,939 $ 36,501 $ 416,427 
Securities loaned 46,231 466 1,428 4,111 52,236 
Other 11,391 — — — 11,391 
Total $ 205,645 $ 195,430 $ 38,367 $ 40,612 $ 480,054 
No agreements have maturities greater than four years .
Class of Collateral Pledged
Securities Sold
Under Agreements
to RepurchaseSecurities
Loaned Other Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
U.S. government and agency securities $ 193,005 $ 18 $ — $ 193,023 
Corporate securities, trading loans and other 14,345 2,896 317 17,558 
Equity securities 10,249 69,432 8,110 87,791 
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 232,171 70 — 232,241 
Mortgage trading loans and ABS 3,722 — — 3,722 
Total $ 453,492 $ 72,416 $ 8,427 $ 534,335 
December 31, 2021
U.S. government and agency securities $ 201,546 $ 27 $ — $ 201,573 
Corporate securities, trading loans and other 12,838 3,440 1,148 17,426 
Equity securities 19,907 48,650 10,192 78,749 
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 178,019 119 51 178,189 
Mortgage trading loans and ABS 4,117 — — 4,117 
Total $ 416,427 $ 52,236 $ 11,391 $ 480,054 
Under repurchase agreements, the Corporation is required to
post collateral with a market value equal to or in excess of the
principal amount borrow ed. For securities loaned transactions,
the Corporat ion receives collateral in the form of cash, letters of
credit or other securities. To determine whether the market value
of the underlying collateral remains sufficien t, collateral is
generally valued daily, and the Corporation may be required to
deposit additional collateral or may receive or return collateral
pledged when appropriate. Repurchase agreements and
securities loaned transactions are generally either overnight,
continuous (i.e., no stated term) or short-term. The Corporation
manages liquidity risks related to these agreements by sourcing
funding from a diverse group of counterparties, providing a
range of securities collateral and pursuing longer durations,
when appropriate.
Short-term Bank Notes
Bank of America, N.A. maintains a global progra m to offer up to
a maximum of $75.0 billion  outsta nding at any one time, of bank
notes with fixed or floatin g rates and maturities of at least seven
days  from the date of issue. Short-term bank notes outstanding
under this program totaled $6.2 billion and $1.8 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. These short-term bank notes,
along with Federal Home Loan Bank advances, U.S.Treasury tax and loan notes, and term federal funds purchased,
are included in short-term borrowings on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet.
Collateral
The Corporation accepts securities and loans as collateral that it
is permitted  by contract or practice to sell or repledge. At
December 31, 2022 and 2021, the fair value of this collateral
was $827.6  billion and $854.8  billion, of which $764.1  billion and
$782.7  billion were sold or reple dged. The primary source of this
collateral is securities borrowed or purchased under agreements
to resell.
The Corpor ation also pledges company-owned securities
and loans as collateral in transactions that include repurchase
agreements, securities loaned, public and trust deposits, U.S.
Treasury tax and loan notes, and short-term borrowings. This
collateral, which in some cases can be sold or repledged by the
counterparties to the transactions, is parenthetically disclosed
on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
In certain cases, the Corporation has transferred assets to
consolidated VIEs where those restricted assets serve as
collateral for the interests issued by the VIEs. These assets are
included on the Consolidated Balance Sheet in Assets of
Consolidated VIEs.(1)
(1)
131 Bank of America
In addition, the Corporation obtains collateral in connection
with its derivative contracts. Required collate ral levels vary
depending on the credit risk rating and the type of counterparty .
Generally , the Corporatio n accepts collateral in the form of cash,
U.S. Treasury securities and other marketable securities. Based
on provision s contained in master netting agreements, the
Corporation nets cash collateral received against derivative
assets. The Corporation also pledges collateral on its own
derivative positions which can be applied against derivativeliabilities. For more information on the collateral of derivatives,
see Note 3 – Derivatives.
Restricted Cash
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporatio n held restricted
cash included within cash and cash equivalents on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet of $7.6 billion and $5.9 billion,
predominantly related to cash segregated in compliance with
securities regulations and cash held on deposit with central
banks to meet reserve requirements.
NOTE 11 Long-term Debt
Long-term debt consists of borrowings having an original maturity of one year or more. The table below presents the balance of
long-term debt at December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the related contractual rates and maturity dates as of December 31, 2022.
Weighted-
average RateDecember 31
(Dollars in millions) Interest Rates Maturity Dates 2022 2021
Notes issued by Bank of America Corporation   
Senior notes:   
Fixed 3.03% 0.25 - 8.05% 2023 - 2052$ 188,429 $ 194,191 
Floating 4.2 0.74 - 9.16 2023 - 2044 17,469 18,753 
Senior structured notes 11,608 15,086 
Subordinated notes:
Fixed 4.88 2.94 - 8.57 2024 - 2045 21,098 22,311 
Floating 3.45 2.48 - 5.53 2026 - 2037 4,544 2,371 
Junior subordinated notes:
Fixed 6.71 6.45 - 8.05 2027 - 2066 743 741 
Floating 5.56 5.56 2056 1 1 
Total notes issued by Bank of America Corporation 243,892 253,454 
Notes issued by Bank of America, N.A.   
Senior notes:   
Fixed — 501 
Floating 5.05   5.05   2024 2,600 3,173 
Subordinated notes 6.00 6.00 2036 1,485 1,780 
Advances from Federal Home Loan Banks:
Fixed 4.49 0.01 - 7.42 2023 - 2034 681 290 
Securitizations and other BANA VIEs 4,300 3,338 
Other 908 680 
Total notes issued by Bank of America, N.A. 9,974 9,762 
Other debt   
Structured liabilities 21,835 16,599 
Nonbank VIEs 281 249 
Other — 53 
Total notes issued by nonbank and other entities 22,116 16,901 
Total long-term debt $ 275,982 $ 280,117 
Includes total loss-absorbing capacity compliant debt.
Represents liabiliti es of consolidated VIEs included in total long-term debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Long-term debt of VIEs is collateralized by the assets of the VIEs. At December 31,
2022, amount includes debt predom inantly from credit card securitization and other VIEs of $4.2 billion and $156 million. For more information, see Note 6 – Securitiz ations and Other Variable
Interest Entities.
Includes debt outstanding of $8.0 billion and $5.4 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021 that was issued by BofA  Finance LLC, a consolidated finance subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation ,
the parent company , and is fully and unconditionally guaranteed by the parent company .
During 2022, the Corporation issued $66.0 billion of long-
term debt consisting of $44.2 billion of notes issued by Bank of
America Corporation, $10.0 billion of notes issued by Bank of
America, N.A. and $11.8 billion of other debt. During 2021, the
Corporation issued $76.7 billion of long-term debt consisting of
$56.2 billion of notes issued by Bank of America Corporation,
$8.0 billion  of notes issued by Bank of America, N.A. and $12.5
billion of other debt.
During 2022, the Corporation had total long-term debt
maturities and redemptions in the aggregate of $33.3 billion
consisting of $19.8 billion for Bank of America Corporation, $9.9
billion for Bank of America, N.A. and $3.6 billion of other debt.
During 2021, the Corporation had total long-term debt maturities
and redemp tions in the aggregate of $46.4 billion consisting of
$24.4 billion  for Bank of America Corporation, $10.4 billion  for
Bank of America, N.A. and $ 11.6 billion of other debt.Bank of America Corporation and Bank of America, N.A.
maintain various U.S. and non-U.S. debt programs to offer both
senior and subordinated notes. The notes may be denominated
in U.S. dollars or foreign  currencies. At Decemb er 31, 2022 and
2021, the amount of foreign currency-denominated debt
translated into U.S. dollars included in total long-term debt was
$46.7 billion and $53.1 billion. Foreign currency contracts may
be used to convert certain foreign currency-denominated debt
into U.S. dollars.
The weighted-average effective interest rates for total long-
term debt (excluding senior structured notes), total fixed-rate
debt and total floating-ra te debt were 3.27 percent, 3.23 percent
and 4.14 percent, respectively , at December 31, 2022, and 2.83
percent, 3.08 percent and 0.75 percent, respectively , at
December 31, 2021. The Corporation’ s ALM activities maintain
an overall interest rate risk management  strategy that
incorporates the use of interest rate contracts to manage
fluctuations in earnings caused by interest rate volatility . The(1)
 (2)
 (3)
 (2)
(1)
(2)
(3)
Bank of America 132
Corporation’ s goal is to manage interest rate sensitivity so that
movements in interest rates do not have a significantly adverse
effect on earnings and capital. The weighted-average rates are
the contractu al interest rates on the debt and do not reflect the
impacts of derivative transactions.
The table below shows the carrying value for aggregate
annual contractual maturities of long-term debt as of
December 31, 2022. Included in the table are certain structured
notes issued by the Corporation that contain provisions whereby
the borrowings are redeemable at the option of the holder (putoptions) at specified dates prior to maturity . Other structured
notes have coupon or repayment terms linked to the
performance of debt or equity securities, indices, currencies or
commodities, and the maturity may be accelerated based on the
value of a referenced index or security . In both cases, the
Corporation or a subsidiary may be required to settle the
obligation for cash or other securities prior to the contractual
maturity date. These borrowings are reflected in the table as
maturing at their contractual maturity date.
Long-term Debt by Maturity
(Dollars in millions) 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 Thereafter Total
Bank of America Corporation
Senior notes $ 8,029 $ 22,570 $ 24,730 $ 23,972 $ 16,055 $ 110,542 $ 205,898 
Senior structured notes 767 456 558 946 641 8,240 11,608 
Subordinated notes — 3,205 5,132 4,908 2,155 10,242 25,642 
Junior subordinated notes — — — — 188 556 744 
Total Bank of America Corporation 8,796 26,231 30,420 29,826 19,039 129,580 243,892 
Bank of America, N.A.
Senior notes — 2,600 — — — — 2,600 
Subordinated notes — — — — — 1,485 1,485 
Advances from Federal Home Loan Banks 600 — 15 9 4 53 681 
Securitizations and other Bank VIEs 1,000 1,000 2,248 — — 52 4,300 
Other 642 89 71 45 63 (2) 908 
Total Bank of America, N.A. 2,242 3,689 2,334 54 67 1,588 9,974 
Other debt
Structured Liabilities 5,253 2,426 2,482 1,474 2,001 8,199 21,835 
Nonbank VIEs — — — — — 281 281 
Other — — — — — — — 
Total other debt 5,253 2,426 2,482 1,474 2,001 8,480 22,116 
Total long-term debt $ 16,291 $ 32,346 $ 35,236 $ 31,354 $ 21,107 $ 139,648 $ 275,982 
Represents liabilities of consolidated VIEs included in total long-term debt on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
NOTE 12 Commitments and Contingencies
In the norma l course of business, the Corporation enters into a
number of off-balance sheet commitments. These commitments
expose the Corporation to varying degrees of credit and market
risk and are subject to the same credit and market risk limitation
reviews as those instruments recorded on the Consolidated
Balance Sheet.
Credit Extension Commitments
The Corporation enters into commitments to extend credit such
as loan commitments, SBLCs and commercial letters of credit to
meet the financing needs of its customers. The following table
includes the notional amount of unfunded legally binding lending
commitments net of amounts distributed (i.e., syndicated or
participated) to other financial institutions. The distributed
amounts were $10.4 billion and $10.7 billion at December 31,
2022 and 2021. The carrying value of the Corporation’ s credit
extension commitments  at December 31, 2022 and 2021,
excluding commitments accounted for underthe fair value option, was $1.6 billion and $1.5 billion, which
predominantly related to the reserve for unfunded lending
commitments. The carrying value of these commitments is
classified in accrued expenses and other liabilities on the
Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Legally binding commitments to extend credit generally have
specified rates and maturities. Certain of these commitments
have adverse change clauses that help to protect the
Corporation against deterioration in the borrower ’s ability to pay .
The following table includes the notional amount of
commitments of $3.0 billion and $4.8 billion at December 31,
2022 and 2021 that are accounted for under the fair value
option. Howe ver, the table excludes the cumulative net fair value
for these commitments of $110 millio n and $97 millio n at
December 31, 2022 and 2021, which is classified in accrued
expenses and other liabilities. For more inform ation regarding
the Corporation’ s loan commitments accounted for under the fair
value option, see Note 21 – Fair V alue Option.(1)
(1)
(1)     
133 Bank of America
Credit Extension Commitments
Expire in One
Year or LessExpire After One
Year Through
Three YearsExpire After Three
Years Through
Five YearsExpire After
Five Years Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Notional amount of credit extension commitments      
Loan commitments $ 113,962 $ 162,890 $ 221,374 $ 13,667 $ 511,893 
Home equity lines of credit 1,479 7,230 11,578 22,154 42,441 
Standby letters of credit and financial guarantees 22,565 9,237 2,787 628 35,217 
Letters of credit 853 46 52 49 1,000 
Other commitments 5 93 71 1,103 1,272 
Legally binding commitments 138,864 179,496 235,862 37,601 591,823 
Credit card lines 419,144 — — — 419,144 
Total credit extension commitments $ 558,008 $ 179,496 $ 235,862 $ 37,601 $ 1,010,967 
 December 31, 2021
Notional amount of credit extension commitments      
Loan commitments $ 102,464 $ 190,687 $ 174,978 $ 26,635 $ 494,764 
Home equity lines of credit 890 5,097 10,268 24,276 40,531 
Standby letters of credit and financial guarantees 22,359 10,742 2,017 422 35,540 
Letters of credit 1,145 124 56 98 1,423 
Other commitments 18 59 81 1,233 1,391 
Legally binding commitments 126,876 206,709 187,400 52,664 573,649 
Credit card lines 406,169 — — — 406,169 
Total credit extension commitments $ 533,045 $ 206,709 $ 187,400 $ 52,664 $ 979,818 
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, $ 2.6 billion and $ 4.6 billion of these loan commitments were held in the form of a security .
The notional amounts of SBLCs and financial guarantees classified as investment grade and non-investment grade based on the credit quality of the underlying reference name within the
instrument were $25.1 billion and $9.5 billion at Decemb er 31, 2022, and $26.3 billion and $8.7 billion at Decemb er 31, 2021. Amou nts in the table include consumer SBLCs of $575 million and
$512 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Primarily includes second-loss positions on lease-end residual value guarantees.
Includes business card unused lines of credit.
Other Commitments
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had
commitments to purchase loans (e.g., residential mortgage and
commercial real estate) of $636 million  and $181 million , which
upon settlement will be included in trading accou nt assets, loans
or LHFS, and commitments to purchase commercial loans of
$294 million and $518 million, which upon settlement will be
included in trading account assets.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had
commitments to purchase commodities, primarily liquefied
natural gas, of $0 and $949 million, which upon settlement will
be included in trading account assets.
At both December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had
commitments to enter into resale and forward-dated resale and
securities borrowing agreements of $92.0 billion, and
commitments to enter into forward-dated repurchase and
securities lending agreements of $57.8 billion and $32.6 billion
as of both period ends. These commitments generally expire
within the next 12 months.
At Decembe r 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had a
commitment to originate or purchase up to $3.7 billion and $4.0
billion on a rolling 12-month basis, of auto loans and leases from
a strategic partner . This commitment extends through November
2026 and can be terminated with 12 months prior notice.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporation had
unfunded equity investment commitments of $571 millio n and
$395 million.
Other Guarantees
Bank-owned Life Insurance Book Value Protection
The Corporation sells products that offer book value protection
to insurance carriers who offer group life insurance policies to
corporations, primarily banks. At December 31, 2022 and 2021,
the notional amount of these guarantees totaled $ 4.3billion and $6.3 billion. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the
Corporation’ s maximum  exposure related to these guarantees
totaled $632 million and $928 million, with estimated maturity
dates between 2033 and 2039.
Indemnifications
In the ordinary course of business, the Corporation enters into
various agreements that contain indemnifications, such as tax
indemnifications, where upon payment may become due if
certain exter nal events occur , such as a change in tax law. The
indemnification clauses are often standard contractual terms
and were entered into in the normal course of business based
on an assessment that the risk of loss would be remote. These
agreements typically contain an early termina tion clause that
permits the Corporation to exit the agreement upon these
events. The maximum  potential future payment under
indemnification agreements is difficult to assess for several
reasons, including the occurrence of an external event, the
inability to predict future changes in tax and other laws, the
difficulty in determining how such laws would apply to parties in
contracts, the absence of exposure limits contained in standard
contract language and the timing of any early termination
clauses. Historically , any payments made under these
guarantees have been de minimis. The Corporation has
assessed the probability of making such payments in the future
as remote.
Merchant Services
The Corpora tion in its role as merchant acquirer or as a sponsor
of other merchant acquir ers may be held liable for any reversed
charges that cannot be collected from the merchants, due to,
among other  things, merchant fraud or insolvency . If charges are
properly reversed after a purchase and cannot be collected from
either the merchants or merchant acquirers, the Corporation
may be held liable for these reversed charges. The ability to
reverse a charge is primarily governed by the applicable(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)     
(2) 
(3)     
(4)     
Bank of America 134
payment network rules and regulations, which include, but are
not limited to, the type of charge, type of payment used and time
limits. The total amount of transactions subject to reversal under
payment network rules and regulations processed for the
preceding six-month period, which was approximately $501
billion, is an estimate of the Corporation’ s maximum potential
exposure as of December 31, 2022. The Corporation’ s risk in
this area primarily relates to circumstances where a cardholder
has purchased goods or services for future delivery . The
Corporation mitigates this risk by requiring cash deposits,
guarantees, letters of credit or other types of collateral from
certain merchants. The Corporation’ s reserves for contingent
losses and the losses incurred related to the merchant
processing activity were not significant.
Exchange and Clearing House Member Guarantees
The Corporation is a member of various securities and
derivative exchanges and clearinghouses, both in the U.S. and
other countries. As a member , the Corporation may be required
to pay a pro-rata share of the losses incurred by some of these
organizations as a result of another member default and under
other loss scenarios. The Corporation’ s potential obligations
may be limited to its membership interests in such exchanges
and clearinghouses, to the amount (or multiple) of the
Corporation’ s contribution to the guarantee fund or, in limited
instances, to the full pro-rata share of the residual losses after
applying the guarantee fund. The Corporation’ s maximum
potential exposure under these membership agreements is
difficult to estimate; however , the Corporation has assessed the
probability of making any such payments as remote.
Prime Brokerage and Securities Clearing Services
In connection with its prime brokerage and clearing businesses,
the Corporation performs securities clearance and settlement
services with other brokerage firms and clearinghouses on
behalf of its clients. Under these arrangements, the Corporation
stands ready to meet the obligations of its clients with respect to
securities transactions. The Corporation’ s obligations in this
respect are secured by the assets in the clients’  accounts and
the account s of their customers as well as by any proceeds
received from the transactions cleared and settled by the
Corporation on behalf of clients or their customers. The
Corporation’ s maximum potential exposure  under these
arrangements is difficult to estimate; however , the potential for
the Corporation to incur material losses pursuant to these
arrangements is remote.
Fixed Income Clearing Corporation Sponsored
Member Repo Program
The Corporation acts as a sponsoring mem ber in a repo
program whereby the Corporation clears certain eligible resale
and repurchase agreements through the Government Securities
Division of the Fixed Income Clearing Corporation on behalf of
clients that are sponsored members in accordance with the
Fixed Income Clearing Corporation’ s rules. As part of this
program, the Corporation guarantees the payment and
performance of its sponsored members to the Fixed Income
Clearing Corporation. The Corporation’ s guarantee obligation is
secured by a security interest in cash or high-quality securities
collateral placed by clients with the clearinghouse and therefore,
the potential for the Corporation to incur significant losses under
this arrangement is remote. The Corporation’ s maximum
potential exposure, without taking into consideration the related
collateral, was $59.6 billion and $42.0 billion at December 31,
2022 and 2021.Other Guarantees
In the normal course of business, the Corporation periodically
guarantees the obligations of its affiliates in a variety of
transactions including ISDA-related transactions  and non-ISDA
related trans actions such as commodities trading, repurchase
agreements, prime brokerage agreement s and other
transactions.
Guarantees of Certain Long-term Debt
The Corporation, as the parent compa ny, fully and
unconditionally guarantees the securities issued by BofA
Finance LLC, a consolidated finance subsidiary of the
Corporation, and effectively provides for the full and
unconditional guarantee  of trust securities issued by certain
statutory trust companies that are 100 percent owned finance
subsidiaries of the Corporation.
Representations and Warranties Obligations and
Corporate Guarantees
The Corporation securitizes first-lien residential mortgage loans
generally in the form of RMBS guaranteed by the GSEs or by
GNMA  in the case of FHA-insured, VA-guaranteed and Rural
Housing Service-guaranteed mortgage loans, and sells pools of
first-lien residential mortgage loans in the form of whole loans. In
addition, in prior years, legacy companies and certain
subsidiaries sold pools of first-lien residential mortgage loans
and home equity loans as private-label securitizations or in the
form of whole loans. In connection with these transactions, the
Corporation or certain of its subsidiaries or legacy companies
make and have made various representations and warranties.
Breaches of these representations and warrantie s have resulted
in and may continue to result in the requiremen t to repurchase
mortgage loans or to otherwise make whole or provide
indemnification or other remedies to sponsors, investors,
securitization trusts, guarantors, insurers or other parties
(collectively , repurchases).
Unresolved Repurchase Claims
Unresolved representati ons and warranties repurchase claims
represent the notional amount of repurchase claims made by
counterparties, typically the outstanding principa l balance or the
unpaid principal balance at the time of default.  In the case of
first-lien mortgages, the claim amount is often significantly
greater than the expected loss amount due to the benefit of
collateral and, in some cases, mortgage insurance or mortgage
guarantee payments.
The notional amount of unresolved repurchase claims at
December 31, 2022 and 2021 was $5.5 billion and $8.4 billion.
These balances included $2.2 billion and $2.8 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021 of claims related to loans in
specific priva te-label securitization groups or tranches where the
Corporation owns substantially all of the outsta nding securities
or will otherwise realize the benefit of any repurchase claims
paid.
During 2022, the Corporation received $82 million in new
repurchase claims that were not time-barred. During 2022, $3.0
billion in claims were resolved.
Reserve and Related Provision
The reserve for representations and warranties  obligations and
corporate guarantees was $612 million and $1.2 billion at
December 31, 2022 and 2021 and is included in accrued
expenses and other liabilities on the Conso lidated Balance
Sheet, and the related provision is included in other income in
the Consolidated Statement of Income. The representations and
warranties reserve represents the Corporation’ s best estimate
135 Bank of America
of probable incurred losses, is based on its experience in
previous negotiations, and is subject to judgment, a variety of
assumptions, and known or unknown uncertainties. Future
representations and warranties losses may occur in excess of
the amounts recorded for these exposures; however , the
Corporation does not expect such amounts to be material to the
Corporation's financial condition and liquidity . See Litigation and
Regulatory Matters below for the Corporation's combined range
of possible loss in exces s of the reserve for representations and
warranties and the accrued liability for litigation.
Litigation and Regulatory Matters
In the ordinary course of business, the Corporation and its
subsidiaries are routinely defendants in or parties to many
pending and threatene d legal, regulatory and governmental
actions and proceedings. In view of the inher ent difficulty of
predicting the outcome of such matters, particularly where the
claimants seek very large or indeterminate damages or where
the matters present novel legal theories or involve a large
number of parties, the Corporation generally cannot predict the
eventual outcome of the pending matters, timing of the ultimate
resolution of these matters, or eventual loss, fines or penalties
related to each pending matter .
As a matter develops, the Corporation, in conjunction with
any outside  counsel handling the matter , evaluates whether
such matter  presents a loss contingency that is probable and
estimable, and, for the matters below , whether a loss in excess
of any accrued liability is reasonably possible in future periods.
Once the loss contingen cy is deemed to be both probable and
estimable, the Corporation will establish an accrued liability and
record a corresponding amount of expense. The Corporation
continues to monitor the matter for further developments that
could affect the amoun t of the accrued liability that has been
previously established. Excluding expenses of internal and
external legal service providers, litigation and regulatory
investigation-related expense of $1.2 billion and $164 million
was recognized in 2022 and 2021.
For any matter disclosed in this Note for which a loss in
future periods is reasonably possible and estimable (whether in
excess of an accrued liability or where there is no accrued
liability) and for representations and warranties exposures, the
Corporation’ s estimated  range of possible loss is $0 to $0.8
billion in excess of the accrued liability , if any, as of
December 31, 2022.
The accrued liability and estimated range of possible loss are
based upon currently available information and subject to
significant judgment, a variety of assumptions and known and
unknown uncertainties. The matters underlyin g the accrued
liability and estimated range of possible loss are unpredictable
and may change from time to time, and actual losses may vary
significantly from the current estimate and accrual. The
estimated range of possible loss does not represent the
Corporation’ s maximum loss exposure.
Information is provided below regarding the nature of the
litigation and, where specified, associated claimed damages.
Based on current knowledge, and taking into account accrued
liabilities, management does not believe that loss contingencies
arising from pending matters, including the matters described
below , will have a mate rial adverse effect on the consolidated
financial condition or liquidity of the Corporation. However , in
light of the significant judgment, variety of assumptions and
uncertainties involved in those matters, some of which are
beyond the Corporation’ s control, and the very large or
indeterminate damages sought in some of those matters, an
adverse outcome in one or more of those matters could bematerial to the Corporation’ s business or results of operations
for any particular reporting period, or cause significant
reputational harm.
Deposit Insurance Assessment
On January 9, 2017, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
(FDIC) filed suit against BANA  in the U.S. District Court for the
District of Columbia (“District Court”) alleging failure to pay a
December 15, 2016 invoice for additional deposit insurance
assessments and interest in the amount of $542 million for the
quarters ending June 30, 2013 through December 31, 2014.
On April 7, 2017, the FDIC amended its complaint to add a
claim for additional depo sit insurance and interest in the amount
of $583 million for the quarters ending March 31, 2012  through
March 31, 2013. The FDIC asserts these claims based on
BANA ’s alleged underre porting of counterparty exposures that
resulted in underpayment of assessments for those quarters,
and its Enforcement Section is also conducting a parallel
investigation related to the same alleged reporting error. BANA
disagrees with the FDIC’ s interpretation of the regulations as
they existed during the relevant time period and is defending
itself against the FDIC’ s claims. Pending final resolution, BANA
has pledged security satisfactory to the FDIC related to the
disputed additional asse ssment amounts. On March 27, 2018,
the District Court denied BANA ’s partial motion to dismiss
certain of the FDIC’ s claims. On January 24, 2023, the
magistrate judge assigned to the matter by the District Court
judge held oral argument on the parties’  motions for summary
judgment and took the motions under advisement.
LIBOR
The Corporation, BANA  and certain Merrill Lynch entities have
been named as defendants along with most of the other LIBOR
panel banks in a number of individual and putative class actions
by persons alleging they sustained losses on U.S. dollar LIBOR-
based financial instruments as a result of collusion or
manipulation by defendants regarding the setting of U.S. dollar
LIBOR. Plaintif fs assert a variety of claims, including antitrust,
Commodity Exchange Act, Racketeer Influenc ed and Corrupt
Organizations (RICO), Securities Exchange Act of 1934,
common law fraud and breach of contract claims, and seek
compensatory , treble and punitive damages, and injunctive
relief. All but one of the cases naming the Corporation and its
affiliates relating to U.S. dollar LIBOR are pending in the U.S.
District Court for the Southern District of New York (“District
Court”). The District Court has dismissed all RICO claims, and
dismissed all manipulation claims against Bank of America
entities based on alleged trader conduct. The District Court has
also substa ntially limite d the scope of antitrust, Commodity
Exchange Act and various other claims, including by dismissing
in their entirety certain individual and putative class plaintif fs’
antitrust claims for lack of standing. On December 30, 2021, the
U.S. Court of Appeals  for the Second Circuit affirmed the
dismissal of these antitrust claims for lack of standing. Certain
individual and putative class actions remain pending against the
Corporation, BANA  and certain Merrill Lynch entities. On
February 28, 2018, the District Court granted certification of a
class of persons that purchased OTC swaps and notes that
referenced U.S. dollar LIBOR from one of the U.S. dollar LIBOR
panel banks, limited to claims under Section 1 of the Sherman
Act.
Bank of America 136
NOTE 13 Shareholders’  Equity
Common Stock
Declared Quarterly Cash Dividends on Common
Stock 
Declaration Date Record Date Payment DateDividend
Per Share
February 1, 2023 March 3, 2023 March 31, 2023 $ 0.22 
October 19, 2022 December 2, 2022 December 30, 2022 0.22 
July 20, 2022 September 2, 2022 September 30, 2022 0.22 
April 27, 2022 June 3, 2022 June 24, 2022 0.21 
February 2, 2022 March 4, 2022 March 25, 2022 0.21 
In 2022, and through February 22, 2023.
The cash dividends paid per share of common stock were $0.86
$0.78 and $ 0.72 for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
The table below summarizes common stock repurchases
during 2022, 2021 and 2020.
Common Stock Repurchase Summary
(in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Total share repurchases, including
CCAR capital plan repurchases 126 615 227 
Purchase price of shares repurchased
and retired $5,073 $25,126 $7,025 
Consists of repurchases pursuant to the Corporation’ s CCAR capital plans.
During 2022, in connection with employee stock plans, the
Corporation issued 73 millio n shares of its common stock and,
to satisfy tax withholding obligations, repurcha sed 28 million
shares of its common stock.  At December 31, 2022, the
Corporation had reserved 491 million unissued shares of
common stock for future issuances under employee stock plans,
convertible notes and preferred stock.
Preferred Stock
The cash dividends declared on preferred stock were $ 1.6 billion
in 2022 and $ 1.4 billion in both 2021 and 2020.
On January 25, 2022, the Corporation issued 70,000  shares
of 4.375 % Fixed-Ra te Reset Non-Cumulative Preferred  Stock,
Series RR for $1.8 billion, with quarterly dividends commencing
in April 2022. The Serie s RR preferred stock has a liquidation
preference of $25,000  per share and is subject to certain
restrictions in the event the Corporation fails to declare and pay
full dividends.
On January 31, 2022 the Corporation issued 28,000  shares
of 4.750 % Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series SS for
$700 million, with quarterly dividends commencing in May 2022.
The Series SS preferre d stock has a liquidation preference of
$25,000  per share and is subject to certain restriction s in the
event the Corporation fails to declare and pay full dividends.On April 22, 2022, the Corporation issued 80,000  shares of
6.125 % Fixed-Ra te Reset Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock,
Series TT for $2.0 billion, with quarterly dividends commencing
in July 2022. The Series TT preferred stock has a liquidation
preference of $25,000  per share and is subject to certain
restrictions in the event the Corporation fails to declare and pay
full dividends.
Through a cash tender offer announced and completed in
the fourth quarter of 2022, the Corporation partially repurchased
Series E, Series FF, Series HH, Series JJ, Series KK, Series LL,
Series MM, Series NN, Series PP, Series QQ, Series RR, Series
SS, Series 1 and Series 5 preferred stock with a total carrying
value of $737 millio n for $654 millio n in cash, with $83 million
recognized in additional paid-in capital as a preferred stock
benefit.
All series of preferred stock in the Preferred Stock Summary
table have a par value of $0.01 per share, are not subje ct to the
operation of a sinking fund, have no participation  rights, and with
the exception of the Series L Preferred Stock, are not
convertible. The holders of the Series B Preferred Stock and
Series 1 through 5 Preferred Stock have gene ral voting rights
and vote together with the common stock. The holders of the
other series included in the table have no gene ral voting rights.
All outstandi ng series of preferred stock of the Corporation have
preference over the Corporation’ s common stock with respect to
the payment of dividends and distribution of the Corporation’ s
assets in the event of a liquidation or dissolution. With the
exception of the Series  B, F and G Preferred Stock, if any
dividend payable on these series is in arrears for three  or more
semi-annual or six or more quarterly dividend periods, as
applicable (whether consecutive or not), the holders of these
series and any other class or series of preferred stock ranking
equally as to payment of dividends and upon which equivalent
voting rights have been conferred and are exerci sable (voting as
a single class) will be entitled to vote for the election of two
additional directors. These voting rights terminate when the
Corporation has paid in full dividends on these series for at least
two semi-annual or four quarterly dividend periods, as
applicable, following the dividend arrearage.
The 7.25% Non-Cum ulative Perpetual Convertible Preferred
Stock, Series L (Series L Preferred Stock) does not have early
redemption/call rights. Each share of the Series L Preferred
Stock may be converted at any time, at the option of the holder ,
into 20 shares of the Corporation’ s common stock plus cash in
lieu of fractional shares. The Corporation may cause some or all
of the Series L Preferred  Stock, at its option, at any time or from
time to time, to be converted into shares of common stock at the
then-applicable conversion rate if, for 20 tradin g days during any
period of 30 cons ecutive trading days, the closing price of
common stock exceeds 130 percent of the then-a pplicable
conversion price of the Series L Preferred Stock. If a conversion
of Series L Preferred Stock occurs at the option of the holder ,
subsequent to a dividen d record date but prior to the dividend
payment date, the Corporation will still pay any accrued
dividends payable.(1)
(1) 
(1)
(1) 
137 Bank of America
The table below presents a summary of perpetual preferred stock outstanding at December 31, 2022 .
Preferred Stock Summary
(Dollars in millions, except as noted)
Series DescriptionInitial
Issuance
DateTotal
Shares
OutstandingLiquidation
Preference
per Share
(in dollars)Carrying
ValuePer Annum
Dividend RateDividend per
Share
(in dollars)Annual
DividendRedemption Period
Series B 7.000 % Cumulative
RedeemableJune
1997 7,076  $ 100 $ 1 7.00 % $ 7 $ — n/a
Series EFloating Rate Non-
CumulativeNovember
2006 12,317  25,000  308 3-mo. LIBOR + 35 bps 1.01 13 On or after
November 15, 2011
Series FFloating Rate Non-
CumulativeMarch
2012 1,409  100,000  141 3-mo. LIBOR + 40 bps 4,055.56  6 On or after
March 15, 2012
Series GAdjustable Rate Non-
CumulativeMarch
2012 4,925  100,000  492 3-mo. LIBOR + 40 bps 4,055.56  20 On or after
March 15, 2012
Series L7.25% Non-Cumulative
Perpetual ConvertibleJanuary
2008 3,080,182  1,000  3,080  7.25 % 72.50  223 n/a
Series U Fixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeMay
2013 40,000  25,000  1,000  5.2% to, but excluding,
6/1/23; 3-mo. LIBOR
+313.5  bps thereafter 52.00  52 On or after
June 1, 2023
Series X Fixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeSeptember
2014 80,000  25,000  2,000  6.250 % to, but excluding,
9/5/24; 3-mo. LIBOR
+370.5  bps thereafter 62.50  125 On or after
September 5, 2024
Series Z Fixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeOctober
2014 56,000  25,000  1,400  6.500 % to, but excluding,
10/23/24; 3-mo. LIBOR
+417.4  bps thereafter 65.00  91 On or after
October 23, 2024
Series AA Fixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeMarch
2015 76,000  25,000  1,900  6.100 % to, but excluding,
3/17/25; 3-mo. LIBOR
+389.8  bps thereafter 61.00  116 On or after
March 17, 2025
Series DDFixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeMarch
2016 40,000  25,000  1,000  6.300 % to, but excluding,
3/10/26; 3-mo. LIBOR
+455.3  bps thereafter 63.00  63 On or after
March 10, 2026
Series FFFixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeMarch
2018 90,834  25,000  2,271  5.875 % to, but excluding,
3/15/28; 3-mo. LIBOR
+293.1  bps thereafter 58.75  139 On or after
March 15, 2028
Series GG 6.000 % Non-CumulativeMay
2018 54,000  25,000  1,350  6.000  % 1.50 81 On or after
May 16, 2023
Series HH 5.875 % Non-CumulativeJuly
2018 34,049  25,000  851 5.875  % 1.47 50 On or after
July 24, 2023
Series JJ Fixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeJune
2019 34,171  25,000  854 5.125 % to, but excluding,
6/20/24; 3-mo. LIBOR
+329.2  bps thereafter 51.25  51 On or after
June 20, 2024
Series KK 5.375 % Non-CumulativeJune
2019 55,273  25,000  1,382  5.375  % 1.34 75 On or after
June 25, 2024
Series LL  5.000 % Non-CumulativeSeptember
2019 52,045  25,000  1,301  5.000  % 1.25 66 On or after
September 17, 2024
Series MMFixed-to-Floating Rate
Non-CumulativeJanuary
2020 30,753  25,000  769 4.300  % 43.00  46 On or after
January 28, 2025
Series NN 4.375 % Non-CumulativeOctober
2020 42,993  25,000  1,075  4.375  % 1.09 48 On or after
November 3, 2025
Series PP  4.125 % Non-CumulativeJanuary
2021 36,500  25,000  912 4.125  % 1.03 38 On or after
February 2, 2026
Series QQ 4.250 % Non-CumulativeOctober
2021 51,879  25,000  1,297  4.250  % 1.12 58 On or after
November 17, 2026
Series RR 4.375 % Fixed-Rate
Reset Non-CumulativeJanuary
2022 66,738  25,000  1,668  4.375 % to, but excluding,
1/27/27; 5-yr U.S.
Treasury Rate + 276 bps
thereafter 43.99  77 On or after
January 27, 2027
Series SS 4.750 % Non-
CumulativeJanuary
2022 27,463  25,000  687 4.750  % 0.95 27 On or after
February 17, 2027
Series TT 6.125 % Fixed-Rate
Reset Non-Cumulative April 2022 80,000  25,000  2,000  6.125 % to, but excluding,
4/27/27; 5-yr U.S.
Treasury Rate + 323.1  bps
thereafter 46.79  94 On or after
April 27, 2027
Series 1 Floating Rate Non-
CumulativeNovember
2004 3,186  30,000  96 3-mo. LIBOR + 75 bps 0.80 3 On or after
November 28, 2009
Series 2Floating Rate Non-
CumulativeMarch
2005 9,967  30,000  299 3-mo. LIBOR + 65 bps 0.80 10 On or after
November 28, 2009
Series 4Floating Rate Non-
CumulativeNovember
2005 7,010  30,000  210 3-mo. LIBOR + 75 bps 1.01 9 On or after
November 28, 2010
Series 5 Floating Rate Non-
CumulativeMarch
2007 13,331  30,000  400 3-mo. LIBOR + 50 bps 1.01 17 On or after
May 21, 2012
Issuance costs and certain adjustments (347)
Total   4,088,101   $28,397    
For all series of preferred stock other than Series B, Series F , Series G and Series L, “Dividend per Share” means the amount of dividends per depositary share of such series.
The Corporation may redeem series of preferred stock on or after the redemption date, in whole or in part, at its option, at the liquidation preference plus declared and unpaid dividends. Series B
and Series L  Preferred Stock do not have early redemption/call rights.
Ownership is held in the form of depositary shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of preferred stock, paying a quarterly cash dividend, if and when declared.
Subject to 4.00% minimum rate per annum.
Ownership is held in the form of depositary shares, each representing a 1/25th interest in a share of preferred stock, paying a semi-annual cash dividend, if and when declared, until the first
redemption date at which time, it adjusts to a quarterly cash dividend, if and when declared, thereafter .
Ownership is held in the form of depositary shares, each representing a 1/25th interest in a share of preferred stock, paying a quarterly cash dividend, if and when declared.
Ownership is held in the form of depositary shares, each representing a 1/1,200th interest in a share of preferred stock, paying a quarterly cash dividend, if and when declared.
Subject to 3.00% minimum rate per annum.
n/a = not applicable(1) (2)
 (3) (4)
(4)
(4)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(5)
 (5)
 (5)
(3)
(3)
(5)
(3)
(3)
 (5)
 (3)
(3)
(3)
(6)
 (3)
(6)
(7) (8)
 (7) (8)
 (7) (4)
(7) (4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
(8)
Bank of America 138
NOTE 14  Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
The table below presents the changes in accumulated OCI after-tax for 2022, 2021 and 2020.
(Dollars in millions) Debt SecuritiesDebit Valuation
Adjustments DerivativesEmployee
Benefit PlansForeign
Currency Total
Balance, December 31, 2019 $ 323 $ (1,494)$ (400)$ (4,168)$ (894)$ (6,633)
Net change 4,799 (498) 826 (98) (52) 4,977 
Balance, December 31, 2020 $ 5,122 $ (1,992)$ 426 $ (4,266)$ (946)$ (1,656)
Net change (2,077) 356 (2,306) 624 (45) (3,448)
Balance, December 31, 2021 $ 3,045 $ (1,636)$ (1,880)$ (3,642)$ (991)$ (5,104)
Net change (6,028) 755 (10,055) (667) (57) (16,052)
Balance, December 31, 2022 $ (2,983)$ (881)$ (11,935)$ (4,309)$ (1,048)$ (21,156)
The table below present s the net change in fair value recorded in accumulated OCI, net realized gains and losses reclassified
into earnings and other changes for each component of OCI pre- and after-tax for 2022, 2021 and 2020.
PretaxTax
effectAfter-
tax PretaxTax
effectAfter-
tax Pretax Tax effectAfter-
tax
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Debt securities:
Net increase (decrease) in fair value $(7,995)$1,991 $(6,004)$(2,749)$ 689 $(2,060)$6,819 $(1,712)$5,107 
Net realized (gains) losses reclassified into earnings (32) 8 (24) (22) 5 (17) (411) 103 (308)
Net change (8,027) 1,999 (6,028) (2,771) 694 (2,077) 6,408 (1,609) 4,799 
Debit valuation adjustments:
Net increase (decrease) in fair value 980 (237) 743 449 (103) 346 (669) 156 (513)
Net realized (gains) losses reclassified into earnings 16 (4) 12 13 (3) 10 19 (4) 15 
Net change 996 (241) 755 462 (106) 356 (650) 152 (498)
Derivatives:
Net increase (decrease) in fair value (13,711) 3,430 (10,281) (2,849) 703 (2,146) 1,098 (268) 830 
Reclassifications into earnings:
Net interest income 332 (84) 248 (166) 48 (118) 6 (1) 5 
Compensation and benefits expense (29) 7 (22) (55) 13 (42) (12) 3 (9)
Net realized (gains) losses reclassified into earnings 303 (77) 226 (221) 61 (160) (6) 2 (4)
Net change (13,408) 3,353 (10,055) (3,070) 764 (2,306) 1,092 (266) 826 
Employee benefit plans:
Net increase (decrease) in fair value (1,103) 276 (827) 463 (72) 391 (381) 80 (301)
Net actuarial losses and other reclassified into earnings 198 (49) 149 295 (67) 228 261 (63) 198 
Settlements, curtailments and other 11 — 11 5 — 5 5 — 5 
Net change (894) 227 (667) 763 (139) 624 (115) 17 (98)
Foreign currency:
Net increase (decrease) in fair value 332 (390) (58) 296 (341) (45) (251) 199 (52)
Net realized (gains) losses reclassified into earnings — 1 1 (5) 5 — (1) 1 — 
Net change 332 (389) (57) 291 (336) (45) (252) 200 (52)
Total other comprehensive income (loss) $(21,001)$4,949 $(16,052)$(4,325)$ 877 $(3,448)$6,483 $(1,506)$4,977 
Reclassifications of pretax debt securities, DV A and foreign currency (gains) losses are recorded in other income in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
Reclassifications of pretax employee benefit plan costs are recorded in other general operating expense in the Consolidated Statement of Income.
NOTE 15 Earnings Per Common Share
The calculation of EPS and diluted EPS for 2022, 2021 and 2020  is presented below . For more information on the calculation of
EPS, see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles.
(In millions, except per share information) 2022 2021 2020
Earnings per common share   
Net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 
Preferred stock dividends and other (1,513) (1,421) (1,421)
Net income applicable to common shareholders $ 26,015 $ 30,557 $ 16,473 
Average common shares issued and outstanding 8,113.7 8,493.3 8,753.2 
Earnings per common share $ 3.21 $ 3.60 $ 1.88 
Diluted earnings per common share   
Net income applicable to common shareholders $ 26,015 $ 30,557 $ 16,473 
Average common shares issued and outstanding 8,113.7 8,493.3 8,753.2 
Dilutive potential common shares 53.8 65.1 43.7 
Total diluted average common shares issued and outstanding 8,167.5 8,558.4 8,796.9 
Diluted earnings per common share $ 3.19 $ 3.57 $ 1.87 
Includes incremental dilutive shares from preferred stock, restricted stock units, restricted stock and warrants.(1)
(1)
(2)
(1)
(1)    
(2)    
(1)
(1)
139 Bank of America
For 2022, 2021 and 2020 , 62 average dilutive potential
common shares associated with the Series L preferred stock
were not included in the diluted share count because the result
would have been antidilutive under the “if-converted” method.
NOTE 16 Regulatory Requirements and
Restrictions
The Federal  Reserve, Office of the Comptroller of the Currency
(OCC) and FDIC (collectively , U.S. banking regulators) jointly
establish regulatory capital adequacy rules, including Basel 3,
for U.S. banking organizations. As a financial holding company ,
the Corporation is subje ct to capital adequacy rules issued by
the Federal Reserve. The Corporation’ s banking entity affiliates
are subject to capital adequacy rules issued by the OCC.
The Corporation and its primary banking entity affiliate,
BANA, are Advanced approaches institutions under Basel 3. As
Advanced approaches institutions, the Corporation and itsbanking entity affiliates are required to report regulatory risk-
based capital ratios and risk-weighted assets under both the
Standardized and Advanced approaches. The approach that
yields the lower ratio is used to assess capital adequacy ,
including under the Prompt Corrective Action (PCA) framework.
The Corporation is required to maintain a minimum
supplementary leverage ratio (SLR) of 3.0 percent plus a
leverage buffer of 2.0 percent in order to avoid certain
restrictions on capital distributions and discretionary bonus
payments. The Corporation’ s insured depository institution
subsidiaries are required to maintain a minimum 6.0 percent
SLR to be considered well capitalized under the PCA
framework.
The table below presents capital ratios and related
information in accordance with Basel 3 Standardized and
Advanced approaches as measured at December 31, 2022 and
2021 for the Corporation and BANA.
Regulatory Capital under Basel 3
Bank of America Corporation Bank of America, N.A.
Standardized
Approach Advanced
ApproachesRegulatory
MinimumStandardized
Approach Advanced
ApproachesRegulatory
Minimum
(Dollars in millions, except as noted) December 31, 2022
Risk-based capital metrics:   
Common equity tier 1 capital $180,060 $180,060 $181,089 $181,089 
Tier 1 capital 208,446 208,446 181,089 181,089 
Total capital 238,773 230,916 194,254 186,648 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,605 1,411 1,386 1,087 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 11.2 % 12.8 % 10.4 % 13.1 % 16.7 % 7.0 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 13.0 14.8 11.9 13.1 16.7 8.5 
Total capital ratio 14.9 16.4 13.9 14.0 17.2 10.5 
Leverage-based metrics:
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) $ 2,997 $ 2,997 $ 2,358 $ 2,358 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 7.0 % 7.0 % 4.0 7.7 % 7.7 % 5.0 
Supplementary leverage exposure (in billions) $ 3,523 $ 2,785 
Supplementary leverage ratio 5.9 % 5.0 6.5 % 6.0 
 December 31, 2021
Risk-based capital metrics:     
Common equity tier 1 capital $171,759 $171,759 $182,526 $182,526 
Tier 1 capital 196,465 196,465 182,526 182,526 
Total capital 227,592 220,616 194,773 188,091 
Risk-weighted assets (in billions) 1,618 1,399 1,352 1,048 
Common equity tier 1 capital ratio 10.6 % 12.3 % 9.5 % 13.5 % 17.4 % 7.0 %
Tier 1 capital ratio 12.1 14.0 11.0 13.5 17.4 8.5 
Total capital ratio 14.1 15.8 13.0 14.4 17.9 10.5 
Leverage-based metrics:
Adjusted quarterly average assets (in billions) $ 3,087 $ 3,087 $ 2,414 $ 2,414 
Tier 1 leverage ratio 6.4 % 6.4 % 4.0 7.6 % 7.6 % 5.0 
Supplementary leverage exposure (in billions) $ 3,604 $ 2,824 
Supplementary leverage ratio 5.5 % 5.0 6.5 % 6.0 
As of December 31, 2022 and 2021 , capital ratios are calculated using the regulatory capital rule that allows a five-year transition period related to the adoption of the current expected credit
losses accounting standard on January 1, 2020.
The capital conservation buffer and global systemically important bank (G-SIB) surcharge were 2.5 percent at both December 31, 2022 and 2021. The Corporation’ s stress capital buffer applied in
place of the capital conservation buffer under the Standardized approach was 3.4 percent at Decem ber 31, 2022 and 2.5 percent at Decem ber 31, 2021. The countercyclical capital buffer for both
periods was zero.  The CET1 capital regulatory minimum is the sum of the CET1 capital ratio minimum of 4.5 percent, the Corporation’ s G-SIB surcharge of 2.5 percent and the Corporation’ s
capital conservation buffer of 2.5 percent or the SCB, as applicable, of 3.4 percent at Decem ber 31, 2022 and 2.5 percent at Decem ber 31, 2021. The SLR regulatory minimum includes a leverage
buffer of 2.0 percent.
Risk-based capital  regulatory minimums at December 31, 2022 and 2021  are the minimum ratios under Basel 3, including a capital conservation buffer of 2.5 percent. The regulatory minimums for
the leverage ratios as of both period ends are the percent required to be considered well capitalized under the PCA  framework.
Total capital under the Advanced approaches dif fers from the Standardized approach due to dif ferences in the amount permitted in Tier 2 capital related to the qualifying allowance for credit losses.
Reflects total average assets adjusted for certain Tier 1 capital deductions.(1)  (1)  (2) (1)  (1)  (3)
(4)
(5)
(4)
(5)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
Bank of America 140
The capital adequacy rules issued by the U.S. banking
regulators require institu tions to meet the established minimums
outlined in the table above. Failure to meet the minimum
requirements can lead to certain mandatory and discretionary
actions by regulators that could have a material  adverse impact
on the Corporation’ s financial position. At December 31, 2022
and 2021, the Corporati on and its banking entity affiliates were
well capitalized.
Other Regulatory Matters
At Decembe r 31, 2022 and 2021, the Corporatio n had cash and
cash equivalents in the amount of $5.6 billion and $4.0 billion,
and securitie s with a fair value of $16.6 billion and $10.6 billion
that were segregated in compliance with securities regulations.
Cash and cash equivalents segregated in compliance with
securities regulations are a component of restricted cash. For
more information, see Note 10 – Securities Financing
Agreements, Short-term  Borrowings, Collateral and Restricted
Cash . In additio n, at December 31, 2022 and 2021, the
Corporation had cash deposited with clearing organizations of
$20.7 billion and $28.6 billion primarily recorded in other assets
on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Bank Subsidiary Distributions
The primary sources of funds for cash distributions by the
Corporation to its shareh olders are capital distributions received
from its bank subsidiaries, BANA  and Bank of America
California, N.A. In 2022, the Corporation received dividends of
$22.0 billion from BANA  and $250 million from Bank of America
California, N.A.
The amount of dividends  that a subsidiary bank may declare
in a calendar year without OCC approval is the subsidiary
bank’ s net profits for that year combined with its retained net
profits for the precedin g two years . Retained net profits, as
defined by the OCC, consist of net income less dividends
declared during the period. In 2023, BANA  can declare and pay
dividends of approximately $16.1 billion to the Corporation plus
an additiona l amount equal to its retained net profits for 2023 up
to the date of any such dividend declaration. Bank of America
California, N.A. can pay dividends of $173 million in 2023 plus
an additiona l amount equal to its retained net profits for 2023 up
to the date of any such dividend declaration.
NOTE 17 Employee Benefit Plans
Pension and Postretirement Plans
The Corpora tion sponso rs a qualified noncontr ibutory trusteed
pension plan (Qualified Pension Plan), a number of
noncontributory nonqualified pension plans and postretirement
health and life plans that cover eligible employees. Non-U.S.pension plans sponsore d by the Corporation vary based on the
country and local practices.
The Qualified Pension Plan has a balance guarantee feature
for account  balances with participant-selected investments,
applied at the time a benefit payment is made from the plan that
effectively provides principal protection for participant balances
transferred and certain compensation credits. The Corporation is
responsible for funding any shortfall on the guarantee feature.
Benefits earned under the Qualified Pension Plan have been
frozen. Thereafter , the cash balance accounts continue to earn
investment credits or interest credits in accordance with the
terms of the plan document.
The Corporation has an annuity contract that guarantees the
payment of benefits vested under a terminated U.S. pension
plan (Other Pension Plan). The Corporation, under a
supplemental agreement, may be responsible for or benefit from
actual experience and investment performance  of the annuity
assets. The Corporation made no contribution under this
agreement in 2022 or 2021. Contributions may be required in
the future under this agreement.
The Corporation’ s noncontributory , nonqualified pension
plans are unfunded and provide supplemental defined pension
benefits to certain eligible employees.
In addition to retirement pension benefits, certain benefits-
eligible employees may become eligible to continue participation
as retirees in health care and/or life insurance plans sponsored
by the Corporation. These plans are referred to as the
Postretirement Health and Life Plans.
The Pension and Postre tirement Plans table summarizes the
changes in the fair value of plan assets, changes in the
projected benefit obligation (PBO), the funded status of both the
accumulated benefit obligation (ABO) and the PBO, and the
weighted-average assumptions used to determine benefit
obligations for the pension plans and postretirement plans at
December 31, 2022 and 2021. The estimate of the Corporation’ s
PBO associated with these plans considers various actuarial
assumptions, including assumptions for mortality rates and
discount rates. The discount rate assumptions are derived from
a cash  flow matching technique that utilizes rates that are based
on Aa-rated corporate bonds with cash flows that match
estimated benefit payme nts of each of the plans . The increases
in the weighted-average discount rates in 2022 resulted in a
decrease to the PBO of $5.3 billion at December 31, 2022. The
increases in the weighted-average discount rates in 2021
resulted in a decrease to the PBO of approximately $895 million
at Decembe r 31, 2021. Significant gains and losses related to
changes in the PBO for 2022 and 2021 primarily resulted from
changes in the discount rate.
141 Bank of America
Pension and Postretirement
Plans 
Qualified
Pension PlanNon-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified and Other
Pension PlansPostretirement
Health and Life Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Fair value, January 1 $ 22,078  $ 21,776  $ 3,031  $ 3,078  $ 2,585  $ 2,789  $ 117 $ 143 
Actual return on plan assets (3,896 ) 1,215  (898) 62 (332) (55) 2 — 
Company contributions (withdrawals) — — 30 24 (135) 87 45 38 
Plan participant contributions — — 1 1 — — 104 107 
Settlements and curtailments — — (51) (11) (6) — — — 
Benefits paid (924) (913) (62) (84) (226) (236) (161) (171)
Federal subsidy on benefits paid  n/a n/a  n/a n/a  n/a n/a — — 
Foreign currency exchange rate changes  n/a n/a (323) (39)  n/a n/a  n/a n/a
Fair value, December 31 $ 17,258  $ 22,078  $ 1,728  $ 3,031  $ 1,886  $ 2,585  $ 107 $ 117 
Change in projected benefit obligation         
Projected benefit obligation, January 1 $ 15,676  $ 16,427  $ 3,116  $ 3,340  $ 2,753  $ 3,005  $ 928 $ 1,007  
Service cost — — 29 28 — — 4 5 
Interest cost 438 414 53 45 74 67 25 24 
Plan participant contributions — — 1 1 — — 104 107 
Plan amendments — — 3 — — — — — 
Settlements and curtailments — — (51) (11) (6) — — — 
Actuarial loss (gain) (3,610 ) (252) (1,054 ) (152) (486) (83) (198) (44)
Benefits paid (924) (913) (62) (84) (226) (236) (161) (171)
Federal subsidy on benefits paid  n/a n/a  n/a n/a  n/a n/a — — 
Foreign currency exchange rate changes  n/a n/a (283) (51)  n/a n/a (2) — 
Projected benefit obligation, December 31 $ 11,580  $ 15,676  $ 1,752  $ 3,116  $ 2,109  $ 2,753  $ 700 $ 928 
Amounts recognized on Consolidated Balance
Sheet
Other assets $ 5,678  $ 6,402  $ 370 $ 550 $ 495 $ 777 $ — $ — 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities — — (394) (635) (718) (945) (593) (811)
Net amount recognized, December 31 $ 5,678  $ 6,402  $ (24) $ (85) $ (223) $ (168) $ (593) $ (811)
Funded status, December 31         
Accumulated benefit obligation $ 11,580  $ 15,676  $ 1,694  $ 3,031  $ 2,109  $ 2,753   n/a n/a
Overfunded (unfunded) status of ABO 5,678  6,402  34 — (223) (168)  n/a n/a
Provision for future salaries — — 58 85 — —  n/a n/a
Projected benefit obligation 11,580  15,676  1,752  3,116  2,109  2,753  $ 700 $ 928 
Weighted-average assumptions, December 31         
Discount rate 5.54 % 2.86 % 4.59 % 1.85 % 5.58 % 2.80 % 5.56 % 2.85 %
Rate of compensation increase n/a n/a 4.25 4.46 4.00 4.00 n/a n/a
Interest-crediting rate 5.36 % 4.83 % 2.03 1.90 4.69 4.22  n/a n/a
The measurement date for all of the above plans was December 31 of each year reported.
n/a = not applicable
The Corporation’ s estimate of its contributions to be made to
the Non-U.S. Pension Plans, Nonqualified and Other Pension
Plans, and Postretirement Health and Life Plans  in 2023 is $26
million, $89 million and $22 million, respectively . The
Corporation does not expect to make a contribution to the
Qualified Pension Plan in 2023. It is the policy of the Corporation
to fund no less than the minimum funding amountrequired by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974 (ERISA).
Pension Plans with ABO  and PBO in excess of plan assets
as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 are presented in the table
below . For these plans, funding strategies vary due to legal
requirements and local practices.
Plans with ABO and PBO in Excess of Plan Assets
Non-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified
and Other
Pension Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021
PBO $ 458 $ 841 $ 719 $ 945 
ABO 416 780 719 945 
Fair value of plan assets 71 207 1 1 (1)
(1)
Bank of America 142
Components of Net Periodic Benefit Cost
 Qualified Pension Plan Non-U.S. Pension Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Components of net periodic benefit cost (income)
Service cost $ — $ — $ — $ 29 $ 28 $ 20 
Interest cost 438 414 500 53 45 49 
Expected return on plan assets (1,204) (1,173) (1,154) (59) (70) (66)
Amortization of actuarial loss (gain) and prior service cost 140 193 173 14 19 9 
Other — — — 10 5 8 
Net periodic benefit cost (income) $ (626) $ (566) $ (481) $ 47 $ 27 $ 20 
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine net cost for years ended
December 31       
Discount rate 2.86 % 2.57 % 3.32 % 1.85 % 1.35 % 1.81 %
Expected return on plan assets 5.75 5.75 6.00 2.17 2.30 2.57 
Rate of compensation increase  n/a n/a n/a 4.46 4.11 4.10 
Nonqualified and
Other Pension PlansPostretirement Health
and Life Plans
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Components of net periodic benefit cost (income)
Service cost $ — $ — $ 1 $ 4 $ 5 $ 5 
Interest cost 74 67 90 25 24 32 
Expected return on plan assets (59) (49) (71) (2) (3) (4)
Amortization of actuarial loss (gain) and prior service cost 54 63 50 (9) 20 29 
Other 1 — — — — (2)
Net periodic benefit cost (income) $ 70 $ 81 $ 70 $ 18 $ 46 $ 60 
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine net cost for years ended
December 31       
Discount rate 2.80 % 2.33 % 3.20 % 2.85 % 2.48 % 3.27 %
Expected return on plan assets 2.38 1.88 2.77 2.00 2.00 2.00 
Rate of compensation increase 4.00 4.00 4.00   n/a n/a n/a
n/a = not applicable
The asset valuation method used to calculate the expected
return on plan assets component of net periodic benefit cost for
the Qualified  Pension Plan recognizes 60 percent of the prior
year’s mark et gains or losses at the next measurement date
with the remaining 40 percent spread equally over the
subsequent four years.
Gains and losses for all benefit plans except postretirement
health care are recognized in accordance with the standard
amortization provisions of the applicable accounting guidance.
Net periodi c postretirement health and life expense was
determined using the “projected unit credit” actuarial method.
For the Postretirement Health and Life Plans, 50 percent of the
unrecognized gain or loss at the beginning of the year (or at
subsequent remeasurement) is recognized on a level basis
during the year .Assumed health care cost trend rates affect the
postretirement benefit obligation and benefit cost reported for
the Postretirement Health and Life Plans. The assumed health
care cost trend rate used to measure the expected cost of
benefits covered by the Postretirement Health and Life Plans is
6.50 percent for 2023, reducing in steps to 5.00 percent in 2028
and later years.
The Corporation’ s net periodic benefit cost (income)
recognized for the plans is sensitive to the discount rate and
expected return on plan assets. For the Qualified Pension Plan,
Non-U.S. Pension Plans , Nonqualified and Other Pension Plans,
and Postretirement Health and Life Plans, a 25 bp decline in
discount rates and expected return on assets would not have
had a significant impact on the net periodic benefit cost for 2022.
Pretax Amounts included in Accumulated OCI
and OCI
 Qualified
Pension PlanNon-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified
and Other
Pension PlansPostretirement
Health and
Life Plans Total
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021 2022 2021
Net actuarial loss (gain) $4,775 $3,425 $312 $456 $796 $945 $(187)$ 4 $5,696 $4,830 
Prior service cost (credits) — — 43 17 — — (1) (3) 42 14 
Amounts recognized in accumulated OCI $4,775 $3,425 $355 $473 $796 $945 $(188)$ 1 $5,738 $4,844 
Current year actuarial loss (gain) $1,490 $(294)$(107)$(154)$ (95)$ 21 $(198)$ (41)$1,090 $(468)
Amortization of actuarial gain (loss) and
prior service cost (140) (193) (14) (19) (54) (63) 9 (20) (199) (295)
Current year prior service cost (credit) — — 3 — — — — — 3 — 
Amounts recognized in OCI $1,350 $(487)$(118)$(173)$(149)$ (42)$(189)$ (61)$894 $(763)
143 Bank of America
Plan Assets
The Qualified Pension Plan has been established as a
retirement vehicle for participants, and trusts have been
established to secure benefits promised unde r the Qualified
Pension Plan. The Corporation’ s policy is to invest the trust
assets in a prudent manner for the exclus ive purpose of
providing benefits to participants and defraying reasonable
expenses of administration. The Corporatio n’s investment
strategy is designed to provide a total return that, over the long
term, increa ses the ratio of assets to liabilities. The strategy
attempts to maximize the investment return on assets at a level
of risk deemed appropriate by the Corporation while complying
with ERISA  and any applicable regulations and laws. The
investment strategy utilizes asset allocation as a principal
determinant for establishing the risk/return profile of the assets.
Asset alloca tion ranges  are established, period ically reviewed
and adjuste d as funding levels and liability characteristics
change. Active and passive investment manager s are employed
to help enhance the risk/return profile of the assets. An
additional aspect of the investment strategy used to minimize
risk (part of the asset allocation plan) include s matching the
exposure of participant-selected investment measures.
The assets of the Non-U.S. Pension Plans are primarily
attributable to a U.K. pension plan. This U.K. pension plan’ s
assets are invested prudently so that the benefits promised to
members are provided with consideration given to the nature
and the duration of the plans’  liabilities. The selected assetallocation strategy is designed to achieve a higher return than
the lowest risk strategy .
The expected rate of return on plan assets assumption was
developed through analysis of historical market returns,
historical asset class volatility and correlations,  current market
conditions, anticipated future asset allocations, the funds’  past
experience and expecta tions on potential future market returns.
The expected return on plan assets assumption is determined
using the calculated market-related value for the Qualified
Pension Plan and the Other Pension Plan and the fair value for
the Non-U.S. Pension Plans and Postretirement Health and Life
Plans. The expected return on plan assets assumption
represents a long-term average view of the performance of the
assets in the Qualified Pension Plan, the Non-U.S. Pension
Plans, the Other Pension Plan, and Postretirement Health and
Life Plans, a return that may or may not be achieved during any
one calendar year. The Other Pension Plan is invested solely in
an annuity contract, which is primarily invested in fixed-income
securities structured such that asset maturi ties match the
duration of the plan’ s obligations.
The target allocations for 2023 by asset category for the
Qualified Pension Plan, Non-U.S. Pension Plans, and
Nonqualified and Other Pension Plans are presented in the table
below . Equity securities for the Qualified Pension Plan include
common stock of the Corporation in the amounts of $296 million
(1.72 percent of total plan assets) and $ 398 million ( 1.80 percent
of total plan assets) at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
2023 Target Allocation
Percentage
Asset CategoryQualified
Pension PlanNon-U.S.
Pension PlansNonqualified
and Other
Pension Plans
Equity securities 15 - 50% 0 - 20% 0 - 5%
Debt securities 45 - 80% 40 - 75% 95 - 100%
Real estate 0 - 10% 0 - 15% 0 - 5%
Other 0 - 5% 10 - 40% 0 - 5%
Fair Value Measurements
For more information on fair value measurements, including descriptions of Level 1, 2 and 3 of the fair value hierarchy and the
valuation methods employed by the Corporation , see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles  and Note 20 – Fair
Value Measu rements . Combined plan investment assets measured at fair value by level and in total at December 31, 2022 and 2021
are summarized in the Fair V alue Measurements table.
Bank of America 144
Fair Value Measurements
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Money market and interest-bearing cash $ 1,329 $ — $ — $ 1,329 $ 1,339 $ — $ — $ 1,339 
U.S. government and government agency
obligations 3,313 704 5 4,022 4,948 934 6 5,888 
Corporate debt — 3,587 — 3,587 — 4,900 — 4,900 
Non-U.S. debt securities 327 933 — 1,260 925 1,165 — 2,090 
Asset-backed securities — 1,273 — 1,273 — 1,485 — 1,485 
Mutual and exchange-traded funds 1,247 — — 1,247 1,395 — — 1,395 
Collective investment funds — 1,988 — 1,988 — 3,419 — 3,419 
Common and preferred stocks 3,901 — — 3,901 4,826 — — 4,826 
Real estate investment trusts 76 — — 76 87 — — 87 
Participant loans — — 6 6 — — 7 7 
Other investments 1 23 410 434 1 29 630 660 
Total plan investment assets, at fair value $10,194 $ 8,508 $ 421 $19,123 $13,521 $11,932 $ 643 $26,096 
Other investments includes insurance annuity contracts of $ 390 million and $ 612 million and other various investments of $ 44 million and $ 48 million at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, excludes $1.9 billion and $1.7 billion of certain investments that are measured at fair value using the net asset value per share (or its equivalent) as a practical
expedient and are not required to be classified in the fair value hierarchy .
The Level 3 Fair Value Measurements table presents a reconciliation of all plan investment assets measured at fair value using
significant unobservable inputs (Level 3) during 2022, 2021 and 2020.
Level 3 Fair Value Measurements
 Balance
January 1Actual Return on
Plan Assets Still
Held at the
Reporting DatePurchases, Sales
and SettlementsBalance
December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022
U.S. government and government agency obligations $ 6 $ — $ (1)$ 5 
Participant Loans 7 — (1) 6 
Other investments 630 (8) (212) 410 
Total $ 643 $ (8)$ (214)$ 421 
 2021
U.S. government and government agency obligations $ 7 $ — $ (1)$ 6 
Participant Loans 7 — — 7 
Other investments 684 (5) (49) 630 
Total $ 698 $ (5)$ (50)$ 643 
2020
U.S. government and government agency obligations $ 8 $ — $ (1)$ 7 
Participant loans 8 — (1) 7 
Other investments 628 6 50 684 
Total $ 644 $ 6 $ 48 $ 698 
Projected Benefit Payments
Benefit paym ents projec ted to be made from the Qualified Pension Plan, Non-U.S. Pension Plans, Nonqualified and Other Pension
Plans, and Postretirement Health and Life Plans are presented in the table below .
Projected Benefit Payments
(Dollars in millions)Qualified
Pension Plan Non-U.S.
Pension Plans Nonqualified
and Other
Pension Plans Postretirement
Health and
Life Plans 
2023 $ 892 $ 114 $ 235 $ 73 
2024 927 108 232 70 
2025 918 116 223 67 
2026 921 117 215 64 
2027 908 114 209 61 
2028 - 2032 4,289 580 884 263 
Benefit payments expected to be made from the plan’ s assets.
Benefit payments expected to be made from a combination of the plans’  and the Corporation’ s assets.
Benefit payments (net of retiree contributions) expected to be made from a combination of the plans’  and the Corporation’ s assets.(1)
 (2)
(1)
(2)
(1) (2) (2) (3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
145 Bank of America
Defined Contribution Plans
The Corpora tion mainta ins qualified and non-q ualified defined
contribution retirement plans. The Corporation recorded
expense of $1.2 billion in 2022, 2021 and 2020 related to the
qualified defined contribution plans. At December 31, 2022 and
2021, 179 million and 173 million shares of the Corporation’ s
common stock were held by these plans. Payme nts to the plans
for dividends on commo n stock were $153 million, $139 million
and $ 138 million in 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Certain non-U.S. employees are covered under defined
contribution pension plans that are separately administered in
accordance with local laws.
NOTE 18  Stock-based Compensation Plans
The Corporation administers a number of equit y compensation
plans, with awards being granted predominantly from the Bank
of America Corporation Equity Plan (BACEP). Under this plan,
715 million shares of the Corporation’ s common stock are
authorized to be used for grants of awards.
During 2022 and 2021, the Corporation granted 102 million
and 99 millio n RSU awards to certain employees under the
BACEP . These RSUs were authorized to settle predominantly in
shares of common stock of the Corporation. Certain RSUs will
be settled in cash or contain settlement provisions that subject
these award s to variable accounting whereby compensation
expense is adjusted to fair value based on changes in the share
price of the Corporation’ s common stock up to the settlement
date. The RSUs grante d in 2022 will generally vest over four
years . Of the RSUs granted in 2021, 81 million will generally
vest over four years  and 18 million will vest over three years .
The four-year awards vest primarily in one-fourth increments on
each of the first four anniversaries of the grant date while the
three-year awards vest primarily in one-third increments on each
of the first three anniversaries of the grant date, provided that
the employee remains continuously employed with the
Corporation during that time, and will be expens ed ratably over
the vesting period, net of estimated forfeitures, for non-
retirement eligible employees based on the grant-date fair value
of the share s. Of the RSUs granted in 2022 and 2021 that vest
over four years , 39 million and 27 million do not include
retirement eligibility . For all other RSUs granted to employees
who are retirement eligible, they are deemed authorized as of
the beginning of the year preceding the grant date when the
incentive award plans are generally approved. As a result, the
estimated value is expensed ratably over the year preceding the
grant date. The compensation cost for the stock-based plans
was $2.9 billion, $3.0 billion and $2.1 billion, and the related
income tax benefit was $697 million, $723 million and $505
million for 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively . At December 31,
2022, there was an estimated $3.6 billion of total unrecognized
compensation cost related to certain share-based compensation
awards that is expected to be recognized over a period of up to
four years , with a weighted-average period of 2.7 years.Restricted Stock and Restricted Stock Units
The total fair value of restricted stock and restri cted stock units
vested in 2022, 2021 and 2020 was $3.4 billion , $2.3 billion  and
$2.3 billion , respectively . The table below presents the status at
December 31, 2022 of the share-settled restricted stock and
restricted stock units and changes during 2022.
 Stock-settled Restricted Stock and Restricted Stock
Units
Shares/UnitsWeighted-
average Grant
Date Fair Value
Outstanding at January 1, 2022 185,050,842 $ 31.54 
Granted 100,108,395 46.10 
Vested (73,288,792) 30.85 
Canceled (9,310,647) 39.80 
Outstanding at December 31, 2022 202,559,798 38.60 
NOTE 19 Income T axes
The components of income tax expense for 2022, 2021 and
2020 are presented in the table below .
Income Tax Expense
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Current income tax expense    
U.S. federal $ 1,157 $ 1,076 $ 1,092 
U.S. state and local 389 775 1,076 
Non-U.S. 1,156 985 670 
Total current expense 2,702 2,836 2,838 
Deferred income tax expense    
U.S. federal 110 962 (799)
U.S. state and local 254 491 (233)
Non-U.S. 375 (2,291) (705)
Total deferred expense 739 (838) (1,737)
Total income tax expense$ 3,441 $ 1,998 $ 1,101 
Total income  tax expense does not reflect the tax effects of
items that are included in OCI each period. For more
information, see Note 14 – Accumulated  Other Comprehensive
Income (Loss). Other tax effects included in OCI each period
resulted in a benefit of $4.9 billion and $877 million in 2022 and
2021 and an expense of $ 1.5 billion in 2020.
Income tax expense for 2022, 2021 and 2020 varied from the
amount computed by applying the statutory income tax rate to
income before income taxes. The Corporation’ s federal statutory
tax rate was 21 percent for 2022, 2021 and 2020. A
reconciliation of the expected U.S. federal income tax expense,
calculated by applying the federal statutory tax rate, to the
Corporation’ s actual income tax expense, and the effective tax
rates for 2022, 2021 and 2020 are presented in the following
table.
Bank of America 146
Reconciliation of Income Tax Expense
 Amount Percent Amount Percent Amount Percent
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Expected U.S. federal income tax expense $ 6,504 21.0 %$ 7,135 21.0 %$ 3,989 21.0 %
Increase (decrease) in taxes resulting from:
State tax expense, net of federal benefit 756 2.4 1,087 3.2 728 3.8 
Affordable housing/energy/other credits (3,698) (11.9) (3,795) (11.2) (2,869) (15.1)
Tax-exempt income, including dividends (273) (0.9) (352) (1.0) (346) (1.8)
Changes in prior-period UTBs, including interest (273) (0.9) (155) (0.5) (41) (0.2)
Rate differential on non-U.S. earnings 368 1.2 45 0.1 218 1.1 
Nondeductible expenses 352 1.1 206 0.6 324 1.7 
Tax law changes 186 0.6 (2,050) (6.0) (699) (3.7)
Other (481) (1.5) (123) (0.3) (203) (1.0)
Total income tax expense $ 3,441 11.1 %$ 1,998 5.9 %$ 1,101 5.8 %
Tax Law changes reflec t the impact of the 2022, 2021 and
2020 U.K. enacted corporate income tax rate changes, which
resulted in a negative tax adjustment of approximately
$186 million in 2022 and positive income tax adjustments of
approximately $2.0 billion and $700 million in 2021 and 2020,
with corresponding adjustments of U.K. net deferred tax assets.
The U.K. net deferred tax assets are primarily net operating
losses (NOLs), incurred by the Corporation’ s U.K. broker-dealer
entity in historical period s, which do not expire under U.K. tax
law and are assessed regularly for impairment. If further U.K. tax
law change s are enacted, a corresponding income tax
adjustment will be made  based on the amount of available net
deferred tax assets and applicable tax rate changes.
Tax credits originate from ESG investments in affordable
housing and renewable energy partnerships and similar entities.
Significant increases in the tax credits recogniz ed over the last
three annual periods have been primarily driven by the
Corporation’ s continued growth in the volume of investments in
wind and solar energy production facilities, consistent with the
Corporation’ s commitment to support the transition to a lower
carbon economy . For additional information, see Note 6 –
Securitizations and Other V ariable Interest Entities .
The reconcil iation of the beginning unrecognized  tax benefits
(UTB) balance to the ending balance is presented in the table
below .
Reconciliation of the Change in Unrecognized Tax
Benefits
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Balance, January 1 $ 1,322 $ 1,340 $ 1,175 
Increases related to positions
taken during the current year 121 208 238 
Increases related to positions
taken during prior years 167 265 99 
Decreases related to positions
taken during prior years (289) (413) (172)
Settlements (99) (23) — 
Expiration of statute of limitations (166) (55) — 
Balance, December 31 $ 1,056 $ 1,322 $ 1,340 
The sum of the positions taken during prior years differs from the $(273) million,
$(155) million and $(41) million in the Reconciliation of Income Tax Expense table due to
temporary items, state items and jurisdictional offsets, as well as the inclusion of interest in
the Reconciliation of Income Tax Expense table.At Decembe r 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020, the balance of the
Corporation’ s UTBs which would, if recognized, affect the
Corporation’ s effective tax rate was $709 million, $959 million
and $976 million, respectively . Included in the UTB balan ce are
some items the recognition of which would not affect the
effective tax rate, such as the tax effect of certain temporary
differences, the portion of gross state UTBs that would be offset
by the tax benefit of the associated federal deduction and the
portion of gross non-U .S. UTBs that would be offset by tax
reductions in other jurisdictions.
It is reasonably possible  that the UTB balance may decrease
by as much as $375 million during the next 12 months, since
resolved items will be removed from the balanc e whether their
resolution results in payment or recognition.
The Corporation recognized an interest benefit of $50 million
in 2022 and interest expense of $32 millio n and $9 millio n in
2021 and 2020. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the
Corporation’ s accrual for interest and penalties that related to
income taxes, net of taxes and remittances, was $107 million
and $ 167 million.
The Corpora tion files income tax returns in more than 100
state and non-U.S. jurisdictions each year. The IRS and other
tax authorities in countries and states in which the Corporation
has signific ant busine ss operations examine tax returns
periodically (continuousl y in some jurisdictions). The table below
summarizes the status of examinations by major jurisdiction for
the Corporation and various subsidiaries at December 31, 2022.
Tax Examination Status
Years under
Examination Status at
December 31 2022
United States 2017-2021 Field Examination
California 2012-2014 Appeals
California 2015-2017 Field Examination
California 2018-2020 To begin in 2023
New York 2019-2021 To begin in 2023
United Kingdom 2019-2020 Field Examination
All tax years subsequent to the years shown remain subject to examination.
Field examination for tax year 2021 to begin in 2023.
Significant components of the Corporation’ s net deferred tax
assets and liabilities at December 31, 2022 and 2021 are
presented in the following table. (1)
(1)
(1)    (1)
(2)
(1)    
(2) 
147 Bank of America
Deferred Tax Assets and Liabilities
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Deferred tax assets   
Net operating loss carryforwards $ 9,029 $ 9,360 
Security, loan and debt valuations 4,788 2,746 
Allowance for credit losses 3,503 3,097 
Lease liability 2,443 2,508 
Employee compensation and retirement benefits 1,625 1,392 
Accrued expenses 1,143 1,626 
Available-for-sale securities 960 — 
Credit carryforwards 769 705 
Other 1,371 1,160 
Gross deferred tax assets 25,631 22,594 
Valuation allowance (2,133) (1,988)
Total deferred tax assets, net of valuation
   allowance 23,498 20,606 
  
Deferred tax liabilities
Equipment lease financing 2,432 3,083 
Right-of-use asset 2,303 2,358 
ESG-related tax credit investments 1,759 1,387 
Fixed Assets 1,200 2,082 
Available-for-sale securities — 1,016 
Other 2,459 1,527 
Gross deferred tax liabilities 10,153 11,453 
Net deferred tax assets $ 13,345 $ 9,153 
The table below summarizes the deferred tax assets and related
valuation allowances recognized for the net operating loss
(NOL) and tax credit carryforwards at December 31, 2022.
Net Operating Loss and Tax Credit Carryforward
Deferred Tax Assets
(Dollars in millions)Deferred
Tax AssetValuation
AllowanceNet
Deferred
Tax AssetFirst Year
Expiring
Net operating losses -
U.K. $ 7,661 $ — $ 7,661 None
Net operating losses -
other non-U.S. 331 (147) 184 Various
Net operating losses -
U.S. states 1,036 (627) 409 Various
Foreign tax credits 769 (769) — After 2028
Represents U.K. broker-dealer net operating losses that may be carried forward indefinitely .
The net operating losses and related valuation allowances for U.S. states before considering
the benefit of federal deductions were $ 1.3 billion and $ 794 million.
Management concluded  that no valuation allowance was
necessary to reduce the deferred tax assets related to the U.K.
NOL carryforwards and U.S. federal and certain state NOL
carryforwards since estimated future taxable income will be
sufficient to utilize these assets prior to their expiration. The
majority of the Corporation’ s U.K. net deferred tax assets, which
consist primarily of NOLs, are expected to be realized by certain
subsidiaries over an extended number of years . Management’ s
conclusion is supported by financial results, profit forecasts for
the relevant  entities and the indefinite period to carry forward
NOLs. However , a material change in those estimates could
lead management to reassess such valuation allowance
conclusions.
At December 31, 2022,  U.S. federal income taxes had not
been provid ed on approximately $5.0 billion of temporary
differences associated with investments in non-U.S. subsidiaries
that are essentially permanent in duration. If the Corporation
were to record the asso ciated deferred tax liability , the amount
would be approximately $ 1.0 billion.NOTE 20 Fair V alue Measurements
Under applicable accounting standards, fair value is defined as
the exchange price that would be received for an asset or paid
to transfer a liability (an exit price) in the principal or most
advantageous market for the asset or liability  in an orderly
transaction between market participants on the measurement
date. The Corporation determines the fair values of its financial
instruments under applicable accounting standards that require
an entity to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize
the use of unobservable inputs. The Corporation categorizes its
financial instruments into three levels based on the established
fair value hierarchy and conducts a review of fair value hierarchy
classifications on a quarterly basis. Transfers into or out of fair
value hierarchy classifications are made if the significant inputs
used in the financial models measuring the fair values of the
assets and liabilities become unobservable or observable in the
current marketplace. For more information regarding the fair
value hierarchy and how the Corporation measures fair value,
see Note 1 – Summary of Significant Accounting Principles . The
Corporation accounts for certain financial instrum ents under the
fair value option. For more information, see Note 21 – Fair Value
Option.
Valuation Techniques
The following sections outline the valuation methodologies for
the Corpora tion’s asset s and liabilities. While the Corporation
believes its valuation methods are appropriate and consistent
with other market participants, the use of different
methodologies or assumptions to determine the fair value of
certain financial instruments could result in a different estimate
of fair value at the reporting date.
During 2022, there were no significant changes to valuation
approaches or techniques that had, or are expe cted to have, a
material impact on the Corporation’ s consolidated financial
position or results of operations.
Trading Account Assets and Liabilities and Debt
Securities
The fair values of trading account assets and liabilities are
primarily based on actively traded markets where prices are
based on either direct market quotes or observed transactions.
The fair values of debt securities are generally based on quoted
market prices or market  prices for similar assets. Liquidity is a
significant factor in the determination of the fair values of trading
account assets and liabilities and debt securities. Market price
quotes may not be readily available for some positions such as
positions within a market sector where trading activity has
slowed significantly or ceased. Some of these instruments are
valued using  a discounted cash flow model, which estimates the
fair value of the securities using internal credit risk, and interest
rate and prepayment risk models that incorporate
management’ s best estimate of current key assumptions such
as default rates, loss severity and prepayment rates. Principal
and interest cash flows are discounted using an observable
discount rate for similar instruments with adjustments that
management believes a market participant would consider in
determining fair value for the specific security . Other instruments
are valued using a net asset value approach which considers
the value of the underlying securities. Underlying assets are
valued using external pricing services, where available, or matrix
pricing based on the vintages and ratings. Situations of illiquidity
generally are triggered by the market’ s perception of credit
uncertainty regarding a single company or a specific market
sector . In these instanc es, fair value is determined based on
limited available market information and other factors,(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
Bank of America 148
principally from reviewing the issuer ’s financial statements and
changes in credit ratings made by one or more rating agencies.
Derivative Assets and Liabilities
The fair values of derivative assets and liabilities traded in the
OTC market are determined using quantitative models that
utilize multiple market inputs including interest rates, prices and
indices to generate continuous yield or pricing curves and
volatility factors to value the position. The majority of market
inputs are actively quote d and can be validated through external
sources, including brokers, market transactions and third-party
pricing services. When third-party pricing services are used, the
methods and assumptio ns are reviewed by the Corporation.
Estimation risk is greater for derivative asset and liability
positions that are either option-based or have longer maturity
dates where observable market inputs are less readily available,
or are unobservable, in which case, quantitative-based
extrapolations of rate, price or index scenario s are used in
determining fair values. The fair values of derivative assets and
liabilities include adjustm ents for market liquidi ty, counterparty
credit quality and other instrument-specific factors, where
appropriate. In addition, the Corporation incorp orates within its
fair value measurements of OTC derivative s a valuation
adjustment to reflect the credit risk associated with the net
position. Positions are netted by counterparty , and fair value for
net long exposures is adjusted for counterparty credit risk while
the fair value for net short exposures is adjusted for the
Corporation’ s own credit risk. The Corporation also incorporates
FVA within its fair value measurements to include funding costs
on uncollateralized derivatives and derivativ es where the
Corporation is not perm itted to use the collateral it receives. An
estimate of severity of loss is also used in the determination of
fair value, primarily based on market data.
Loans and Loan Commitments
The fair values of loans  and loan commitment s are based on
market prices, where available, or discoun ted cash flow
analyses using market-based credit spreads of comparable debt
instruments or credit derivatives of the specific borrower or
comparable borrowers.  Results of discoun ted cash flow
analyses may be adjusted, as appropriate, to reflect other
market conditions or the perceived credit risk of the borrower .
Mortgage Servicing Rights
The fair values of MSRs are primarily determ ined using an
option-adjusted spread valuation approach, which factors in
prepayment risk to determine the fair value of MSRs. This
approach consists of projecting servicing cash flows under
multiple interest rate scenarios and discounting these cash flows
using risk-adjusted discount rates.Loans Held-for-sale
The fair values of LHFS  are based on quoted market prices,
where available, or are determined by discounting estimated
cash flows using interes t rates approximating the Corporation’ s
current origination rates for similar loans adjusted to reflect the
inherent credit risk. The borrower-specific credit risk is
embedded within the quoted market prices or is implied by
considering loan performance when selecting comparables.
Short-term Borrowings and Long-term Debt
The Corpora tion issues structured liabilities that have coupons
or repayment terms linked to the performance of debt or equity
securities, interest rates, indices, currencies or commodities.
The fair values of these structured liabilities are estimated using
quantitative models for the combined derivative and debt
portions of the notes. These models incorporate observable and,
in some instances, unobservable inputs including security
prices, interest rate yield curves, option volatility , currency ,
commodity or equity rates and correlations among these inputs.
The Corporation also considers the impact of its own credit
spread in determining the discount rate used to value these
liabilities. The credit spread is determined by reference to
observable spreads in the secondary bond market.
Securities Financing Agreements
The fair values of certain reverse repurchase agreements,
repurchase agreements  and securities borrowed transactions
are determined using quantitative models, including discounted
cash flow models that require the use of multiple market inputs
including interest rates and spreads to generate continuous yield
or pricing curves, and volatility factors. The majority of market
inputs are actively quote d and can be validated through external
sources, including broke rs, market transactions and third-party
pricing services.
Deposits
The fair values of deposits are determined using quantitative
models, including discounted cash flow models that require the
use of multiple market inputs including interest rates and
spreads to generate continuous yield or pricing curves, and
volatility factors. The majority of market inputs are actively
quoted and can be validated through external sources, including
brokers, market transactions and third-party pricing services.
The Corpora tion considers the impact of its own credit spread in
the valuation of these liabilities. The credit risk is determined by
reference to observable credit spreads in the secondary cash
market.
Asset-backed Secured Financings
The fair values of asset-backed secured financings are based
on external broker bids,  where available, or are determined by
discounting estimated cash flows using interest rates
approximating the Corporation’ s current origin ation rates for
similar loans adjusted to reflect the inherent credit risk.
149 Bank of America
Recurring Fair Value
Assets and liabilities carried at fair value on a recurring basis at December 31, 2022 and 2021,  including financial instruments that
the Corporation accounts for under the fair value option, are summarized in the following tables.
December 31, 2022
 Fair Value Measurements
(Dollars in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Netting
Adjustments Assets/Liabilities
at Fair Value
Assets      
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments $ 868 $ — $ — $ — $ 868 
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased
under agreements to resell — 146,999 — — 146,999 
Trading account assets:      
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 58,894 212 — — 59,106 
Corporate securities, trading loans and other — 46,897 2,384 — 49,281 
Equity securities 77,868 35,065 145 — 113,078 
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 7,392 26,306 518 — 34,216 
Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS:
U.S. government-sponsored agency guaranteed — 28,563 34 — 28,597 
Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS — 10,312 1,518 — 11,830 
Total trading account assets 144,154 147,355 4,599 — 296,108 
Derivative assets 14,775 380,380 3,213 (349,726) 48,642 
AFS debt securities:      
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 158,102 920 — — 159,022 
Mortgage-backed securities:      
Agency — 23,442 — — 23,442 
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations — 2,221 — — 2,221 
Non-agency residential — 128 258 — 386 
Commercial — 6,407 — — 6,407 
Non-U.S. securities — 13,212 195 — 13,407 
Other taxable securities — 4,645 — — 4,645 
Tax-exempt securities — 11,207 51 — 11,258 
Total AFS debt securities 158,102 62,182 504 — 220,788 
Other debt securities carried at fair value:
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 561 — — — 561 
Non-agency residential MBS — 248 119 — 367 
Non-U.S. and other securities 3,027 5,251 — — 8,278 
Total other debt securities carried at fair value 3,588 5,499 119 — 9,206 
Loans and leases — 5,518 253 — 5,771 
Loans held-for-sale — 883 232 — 1,115 
Other assets 6,898 897 1,799 — 9,594 
Total assets $ 328,385 $ 749,713 $ 10,719 $ (349,726)$ 739,091 
Liabilities      
Interest-bearing deposits in U.S. offices $ — $ 311 $ — $ — $ 311 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase — 151,708 — — 151,708 
Trading account liabilities:     
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 13,906 181 — — 14,087 
Equity securities 36,937 4,825 — — 41,762 
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 9,636 8,228 — — 17,864 
Corporate securities and other — 6,628 58 — 6,686 
Total trading account liabilities 60,479 19,862 58 — 80,399 
Derivative liabilities 15,431 376,979 6,106 (353,700) 44,816 
Short-term borrowings — 818 14 — 832 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 7,458 2,262 32 — 9,752 
Long-term debt — 32,208 862 — 33,070 
Total liabilities $ 83,368 $ 584,148 $ 7,072 $ (353,700)$ 320,888 
Amounts represent the impact of legally enforceable master netting agreements and also cash collateral held or placed with the same counterparties.
Includes securities  with a fair value of $16.6 billion that were segregated in compliance with securities regulations or deposited with clearing organizations. This amount is included in the
parenthetical disclosure on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Trading account assets also includes certain commodities inventory of $40 million that is accounted for at the lower of cost or net
realizable value, which is the current selling price less any costs to sell.
Includes MSRs of $ 1.0 billion, which are classified as Level 3 assets.
Total recurring Level 3 assets were 0.35 percent of total consolidated assets, and total recurring Level 3 liabilities were 0.25 percent of total consolidated liabilities.(1)
(2)
(3)
 (4)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 150
December 31, 2021
Fair Value Measurements
(Dollars in millions) Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Netting
Adjustments Assets/Liabilities at
Fair Value
Assets      
Time deposits placed and other short-term investments $ 707 $ — $ — $ — $ 707 
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or purchased
under agreements to resell — 150,665 — — 150,665 
Trading account assets:      
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 44,599 803 — — 45,402 
Corporate securities, trading loans and other — 31,601 2,110 — 33,711 
Equity securities 61,425 38,383 190 — 99,998 
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 3,822 25,612 396 — 29,830 
Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS:
U.S. government-sponsored agency guaranteed — 25,645 109 — 25,754 
Mortgage trading loans, ABS and other MBS — 10,967 1,418 — 12,385 
Total trading account assets 109,846 133,011 4,223 — 247,080 
Derivative assets 34,748 310,581 3,133 (313,118) 35,344 
AFS debt securities:      
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 198,071 1,074 — — 199,145 
Mortgage-backed securities:      
Agency — 46,339 — — 46,339 
Agency-collateralized mortgage obligations — 3,380 — — 3,380 
Non-agency residential — 267 316 — 583 
Commercial — 19,604 — — 19,604 
Non-U.S. securities — 11,933 — — 11,933 
Other taxable securities — 2,690 71 — 2,761 
Tax-exempt securities — 15,381 52 — 15,433 
Total AFS debt securities 198,071 100,668 439 — 299,178 
Other debt securities carried at fair value:
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 575 — — — 575 
Non-agency residential MBS — 343 242 — 585 
Non-U.S. and other securities 2,580 5,155 — — 7,735 
Total other debt securities carried at fair value 3,155 5,498 242 — 8,895 
Loans and leases — 7,071 748 — 7,819 
Loans held-for-sale — 4,138 317 — 4,455 
Other assets 7,657 2,915 1,572 — 12,144 
Total assets $ 354,184 $ 714,547 $ 10,674 $ (313,118)$ 766,287 
Liabilities      
Interest-bearing deposits in U.S. offices $ — $ 408 $ — $ — $ 408 
Federal funds purchased and securities loaned or sold under
agreements to repurchase — 139,641 — — 139,641 
Trading account liabilities:     
U.S. Treasury and government agencies 19,826 313 — — 20,139 
Equity securities 41,744 6,491 — — 48,235 
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 10,400 13,781 — — 24,181 
Corporate securities and other — 8,124 11 — 8,135 
Total trading account liabilities 71,970 28,709 11 — 100,690 
Derivative liabilities 35,282 314,380 5,795 (317,782) 37,675 
Short-term borrowings — 4,279 — — 4,279 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 8,359 3,130 — — 11,489 
Long-term debt — 28,633 1,075 — 29,708 
Total liabilities $ 115,611 $ 519,180 $ 6,881 $ (317,782)$ 323,890 
Amounts represent the impact of legally enforceable master netting agreements and also cash collateral held or placed with the same counterparties.
Includes securities  with a fair value of $10.6 billion that were segregated in compliance with securities regulations or deposited with clearing organizations. This amount is included in the
parenthetical disclosure on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. Trading account assets also includes certain commodities inventory of $752 million that is accounted for at the lower of cost or net
realizable value, which is the current selling price less any costs to sell.
Includes MSRs of $ 818 million, which are classified as Level 3 assets.
Total recurring Level 3 assets were 0.34 percent of total consolidated assets, and total recurring Level 3 liabilities were 0.24 percent of total consolidated liabilities.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
151 Bank of America
The following tables present a reconciliation of all assets and
liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis using
significant unobservable inputs (Level 3) during 2022, 2021 and
2020, including net realized and unrealized gains (losses)
included in earnings and accumulated OCI. Transfers into Level
3 occur primarily due to decreased price observability , andtransfers out of Level 3 occur primarily due to increased price
observability . Transfers occur on a regular basis for long-term
debt instruments due to changes in the impact of unobservable
inputs on the value of the embedded derivative in relation to the
instrument as a whole.
Level 3 – Fair Value Measurements 
Balance
January 1Total
Realized/Unrealized
Gains (Losses) in
Net Income Gains
(Losses)
in OCI Gross Gross
Transfers
into
Level 3 Gross
Transfers
out of
Level 3 Balance
December 31Change in
Unrealized
Gains
(Losses) in
Net Income
Related to
Financial
Instruments
Still Held (Dollars in millions)
Purchases Sales Issuances Settlements
Year Ended December 31, 2022
Trading account assets:        
Corporate securities, trading loans and
other 2,110 (52) (2) 1,069 (384) — (606) 1,023 (774) 2,384 (78)
Equity securities 190 (3) — 45 (25) — (4) 38 (96) 145 (6)
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 396 59 16 54 (4) — (68) 75 (10) 518 56 
Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 1,527 (254) — 729 (665) — (112) 536 (209) 1,552 (152)
Total trading account assets 4,223 (250) 14 1,897 (1,078) — (790) 1,672 (1,089) 4,599 (180)
Net derivative assets (liabilities) (2,662) 551 — 319 (830) — 294 (180) (385) (2,893) 259 
AFS debt securities:           
Non-agency residential MBS 316 — (35) — (8) — (75) 73 (13) 258 — 
Non-U.S. and other taxable securities 71 10 (10) 126 — — (22) 311 (291) 195 1 
Tax-exempt securities 52 — 1 — — — (3) 1 — 51 — 
Total AFS debt securities 439 10 (44) 126 (8) — (100) 385 (304) 504 1 
Other debt securities carried at fair value –
Non-agency residential MBS 242 (19) — — — — (111) 30 (23) 119 14 
Loans and leases 748 (45) — — (154) 82 (129) — (249) 253 (21)
Loans held-for-sale 317 9 4 171 (6) — (271) 8 — 232 19 
Other assets 1,572 305 (21) 39 (35) 208 (271) 5 (3) 1,799 213 
Trading account liabilities – Corporate
securities
   and other (11) 5 — (4) — — (2) (46) — (58) 1 
Short-term borrowings — 3 — — (17) — — (3) 3 (14) 2 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities — (23) — (9) — — — — — (32) (7)
Long-term debt (1,075) (197) 82 — 14 (1) 57 (24) 282 (862) (200)
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Trading account assets:      
Corporate securities, trading loans and
other $1,359 $ (17)$ — $ 765 $(437)$ — $ (327)$1,218 $(451)$ 2,110 $ (79)
Equity securities 227 (18) — 103 (68) — — 112 (166) 190 (44)
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 354 31 (20) 18 — — (13) 26 — 396 34 
Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 1,440 (58) — 518 (721) 7 (167) 771 (263) 1,527 (91)
Total trading account assets 3,380 (62) (20) 1,404 (1,226) 7 (507) 2,127 (880) 4,223 (180)
Net derivative assets (liabilities) (3,468) 927 — 521 (653) — 293 (74) (208) (2,662) 800 
AFS debt securities:        
Non-agency residential MBS 378 (11) (111) — (98) — (45) 304 (101) 316 8 
Non-U.S. and other taxable securities 89 (4) (7) 8 (10) — (4) — (1) 71 — 
Tax-exempt securities 176 20 — — — — (2) — (142) 52 (19)
Total AFS debt securities 643 5 (118) 8 (108) — (51) 304 (244) 439 (11)
Other debt securities carried at fair value –
Non-agency residential MBS 267 1 — — (45) — (37) 101 (45) 242 10 
Loans and leases 717 62 — 59 (13) 70 (180) 46 (13) 748 65 
Loans held-for-sale 236 13 (6) 132 (1) — (79) 26 (4) 317 18 
Other assets 1,970 7 3 26 (202) 144 (383) 9 (2) 1,572 3 
Trading account liabilities – Corporate
securities
   and other (16) 6 — — — (1) — — — (11) — 
Long-term debt (1,164) (92) 13 (6) 15 (12) 98 (65) 138 (1,075) (113)
Assets (liabilities). For assets, increase (decrease) to Level 3 and for liabilities, (increase) decrease to Level 3.
Includes gains (losses) reported in earnings in the following income statement line items: Trading account assets/liabilities - predominantly market making and similar activities; Net derivative
assets (liabilities) - market making and similar activities and other income ; AFS debt securities - other income;  Other debt securities carried at fair value - other income; Loans and leases - market
making and similar activities and other income; Loans held-for-sale - other income; Other assets - market making and similar activities and other income related to MSRs; Short-term borrowings -
market making and similar activities; Accrued expenses and other liabilities - market making and similar activities and other income; Long-term debt - market making and similar activities.
Includes unrealized gains (losses) in OCI on AFS debt securities, foreign currency translation adjustments and the impact of changes in the Corporation’ s credit spreads on long-ter m debt
accounted for under the fair value option. Amounts include net unrealized gains (losses) of $ 28 million and $( 19) million related to financial instruments still held at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Net derivative assets (liabilities) include derivative assets of $ 3.2 billion and $ 3.1 billion and derivative liabilities of $ 6.1 billion and $ 5.8 billion at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Amounts represent instruments that are accounted for under the fair value option.
Issuances represent loan originations and MSRs recognized following securitizations or whole-loan sales.
Settlements primarily represent the net change in fair value of the MSR asset due to the recognition of modeled cash flows and the passage of time.(1)
(2) (3) (2)
(4)
(5,6)
(5,6)
(6,7)
(5)
(5)
(5)
(4)
(5,6)
(5,6)
(6,7)
(5)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
Bank of America 152
Level 3 – Fair Value Measurements 
(Dollars in millions)Balance
January 1Total
Realized/Unrealized
Gains (Losses) in
Net
 Income Gains
(Losses)
in OCIGrossGross
Transfers
into
Level 3Gross
Transfers
out of
Level 3Balance
December 31Change in
Unrealized
Gains
(Losses) in
Net Income
Related to
Financial
Instruments
Still Held Purchases Sales Issuances Settlements
Year Ended December 31, 2020
Trading account assets:       
Corporate securities, trading loans and
other $1,507 $ (138)$ (1)$ 430 $(242)$ 10 $ (282)$ 639 $ (564)$ 1,359 $ (102)
Equity securities 239 (43) — 78 (53) — (3) 58 (49) 227 (31)
Non-U.S. sovereign debt 482 45 (46) 76 (61) — (39) 150 (253) 354 47 
Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 1,553 (120) (3) 577 (746) 11 (96) 757 (493) 1,440 (92)
Total trading account assets 3,781 (256) (50) 1,161 (1,102) 21 (420) 1,604 (1,359) 3,380 (178)
Net derivative assets (liabilities) (2,538) (235) — 120 (646) — (112) (235) 178 (3,468) (953)
AFS debt securities:        
Non-agency residential MBS 424 (2) 3 23 (54) — (44) 158 (130) 378 (2)
Non-U.S. and other taxable securities 67 1 — 9 (5) — (1) 18 — 89 1 
Tax-exempt securities 108 (21) 3 — — — (169) 265 (10) 176 (20)
Total AFS debt securities 599 (22) 6 32 (59) — (214) 441 (140) 643 (21)
Other debt securities carried at fair value -
Non-agency residential MBS 299 26 — — (180) — (24) 190 (44) 267 3 
Loans and leases 693 (4) — 145 (76) 22 (161) 98 — 717 9 
Loans held-for-sale 375 26 (28) — (489) 691 (119) 93 (313) 236 (5)
Other assets 2,360 (288) 3 178 (4) 224 (506) 5 (2) 1,970 (374)
Trading account liabilities – Equity
securities (2) 1 — — — — — — 1 — — 
Trading account liabilities – Corporate
securities and other (15) 8 — (7) (3) — 1 — — (16) — 
Long-term debt (1,149) (46) 2 (104) — (47) 218 (52) 14 (1,164) (5)
Assets (liabilities). For assets, increase (decrease) to Level 3 and for liabilities, (increase) decrease to Level 3.
Includes gains/loss es reported in earnings in the following income statem ent line items: Trading account assets/liabilities - predominantly market making and similar activities; Net derivative assets
(liabilities) - market making and similar activities and other income; AFS debt securities - other income; Other debt securities carried at fair value - other income; Loans and leases - market making
and similar activities and other income; Loans held-for-sale - other income; Other assets - market making and similar activities and other income  related to MSRs; Long-term debt - market making
and similar activities.   
Includes unrealized losses in OCI on AFS debt securities, foreign curren cy translation adjustments and the impact of changes in the Corporation’ s credit spreads on long-term debt accounted for
under the fair value option. Amounts include net unrealized losses of $ 41 million related to financial instruments still held at December 31, 2020.
Net derivative assets (liabilities) include derivative assets of $ 2.8 billion and derivative liabilities of $ 6.2 billion.
Amounts represent instruments that are accounted for under the fair value option.
Issuances represent loan originations and MSRs recognized following securitizations or whole-loan sales.
Settlements primarily represent the net change in fair value of the MSR asset due to the recognition of modeled cash flows and the passage of time.(1)
(2)  (3) (2)
(4)
(5,6)
(5,6)
 (6,7)
(5)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
(6)
(7)
153 Bank of America
The following tables present information about significant unobservable inputs related to the Corporation’ s material categories of
Level 3 financial assets and liabilities at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Quantitative Information about Level 3 Fair V alue Measurements at December 31, 2022
(Dollars in millions) Inputs
Financial InstrumentFair
ValueValuation
TechniqueSignificant Unobservable
InputsRanges of
InputsWeighted
Average 
Loans and Securities 
Instruments backed by residential real estate assets $ 852 
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesYield 0% to 25% 10 %
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 338 Prepayment speed 0% to 29% CPR 12% CPR
Loans and leases 137 Default rate 0% to 3% CDR 1% CDR
AFS debt securities – Non-agency residential 258 Price $0 to $111 $26
Other debt securities carried at fair value – Non-agency residential 119 Loss severity 0% to 100% 24 %
Instruments backed by commercial real estate assets $ 362 
Discounted cash
flowYield 0% to 25% 10 %
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 292 Price $0 to $100 $75
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 66 
Loans held-for-sale 4 
Commercial loans, debt securities and other $ 4,348  
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesYield 5% to 43% 15 %
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 2,092  Prepayment speed 10% to 20% 15 %
Trading account assets – Non-U.S. sovereign debt 518 Default rate 3% to 4% 4 %
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 1,148  Loss severity 35% to 40% 38 %
AFS debt securities – Tax-exempt securities 51 Price $0 to $157 $75
AFS debt securities – Non-U.S. and other taxable securities 195 
Loans and leases 116 
Loans held-for-sale 228 
Other assets, primarily auction rate securities $ 779 
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesPrice $10 to $97 $94
Discount rate 11 % n/a
MSRs $ 1,020  
Discounted cash
flowWeighted-average life, fixed rate 0 to 14 years 6 years
Weighted-average life, variable rate0 to 12 years 4 years
Option-adjusted spread, fixed rate 7% to 14% 9 %
Option-adjusted spread, variable rate 9% to 15% 12 %
Structured liabilities
Long-term debt $ (862)Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparables,
Industry standard
derivative pricing Yield 22% to 43% 23 %
Equity correlation 0% to 95% 69 %
Price $0 to $119 $90
Natural gas forward price $3/MMBtu to $ 13/MMBtu $9 /MMBtu
Net derivative assets (liabilities)
Credit derivatives $ (44)
Discounted cash flow ,
Stochastic recovery
correlation modelCredit spreads 3 to 63 bps 22 bps
Upfront points 0 to 100 points  83 points
Prepayment speed 15% CPR n/a
Default rate 2% CDR n/a
Credit correlation 18% to 53% 44 %
Price $0 to $151 $63
Equity derivatives $(1,534 )Industry standard
derivative pricing Equity correlation 0% to 100% 73 %
Long-dated equity volatilities 4% to 101% 44 %
Commodity derivatives $ (291)Discounted cash flow ,
Industry standard
derivative pricing Natural gas forward price $3/MMBtu to $ 13/MMBtu $8 /MMBtu
Power forward price $9 to $123 $43
Interest rate derivatives $(1,024 )
Industry standard
derivative pricing Correlation (IR/IR) (35)% to 89% 67 %
Correlation (FX/IR) 11% to 58% 43 %
Long-dated inflation rates  0% to 39% 1 %
Long-dated inflation volatilities 0% to 5% 2 %
Interest rate volatilities 0% to 2% 1 %
Total net derivative assets (liabilities) $(2,893 )
For loans and securities, structured liabilities and net derivative assets (liabilities), the weighted average is calculated based upon the absolute fair value of the instruments.
The categories are aggregated base d upon product type which differs from financial statement classification. The following is a reconciliation to the line items in the table on page 150: Trading
account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other of $2.4 billion, Trading account assets – Non-U.S. sovereign debt of $518 million, Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans,
MBS and ABS of $1.6 billion, AFS debt securities of $504 million, Other debt securities carried at fair value - Non-agency resident ial of $119 million, Other assets, including MSRs, of $1.8 billion,
Loans and leases of $ 253 million and LHFS of $ 232 million.
Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation and Black-Scholes.
Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation, Black-Scholes and other methods that model the joint dynamics of interest, inflation and foreign exchange rates.
The weighted-average life is a product of changes in market rates of interest, prepayment rates and other model and cash flow assumptions.
CPR = Constant Prepayment Rate
CDR = Constant Default Rate
MMBtu = Million British thermal units
IR = Interest Rate
FX = Foreign Exchange
n/a = not applicable(1)
(2)
(5)
(5)
(3)
(3)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
Bank of America 154
Quantitative Information about Level 3 Fair V alue Measurements at December 31, 2021
(Dollars in millions) Inputs
Financial InstrumentFair
ValueValuation
TechniqueSignificant Unobservable
InputsRanges of
InputsWeighted
Average 
Loans and Securities 
Instruments backed by residential real estate assets $ 1,269  
Discounted cash
flow, Market
comparablesYield 0% to 25% 6 %
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 338 Prepayment speed 1% to 40% CPR 19% CPR
Loans and leases 373 Default rate 0% to 3% CDR 1% CDR
AFS debt securities - Non-agency residential 316 Price $0 to $168 $92
Other debt securities carried at fair value - Non-agency residential 242 Loss severity 0% to 43% 13 %
Instruments backed by commercial real estate assets $ 298 
Discounted cash
flowYield 0% to 25% 4 %
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 138 Price $0 to $101 $57
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 77 
AFS debt securities – Non-U.S. and other taxable securities 71 
Loans held-for-sale 12 
Commercial loans, debt securities and other $ 4,212  
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesYield  0% to 19% 10 %
Trading account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other 1,972  Prepayment speed 10% to 20% 16 %
Trading account assets – Non-U.S. sovereign debt 396 Default rate 3% to 4% 4 %
Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans, MBS and ABS 1,112  Loss severity 35% to 40% 37 %
AFS debt securities – Tax-exempt securities 52 Price  $0 to $189 $73
Loans and leases 375 Long-dated equity volatilities 45% n/a
Loans held-for-sale 305 
Other assets, primarily auction rate securities $ 754 
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparablesPrice $10 to $96 $91
Discount rate 9% n/a
MSRs $ 818 
Discounted cash
flowWeighted-average life, fixed rate 0 to 14 years 4 years
Weighted-average life, variable rate 0 to 10 years 3 years
Option-adjusted spread, fixed rate 7% to 14% 9 %
Option-adjusted spread, variable rate 9% to 15% 12 %
Structured liabilities
Long-term debt $(1,075 )
Discounted cash flow ,
Market comparables,
Industry standard
derivative pricing Yield  0% to 19% 18 %
Equity correlation  3% to 100% 80 %
Long-dated equity volatilities 5% to 78% 36 %
Price $0 to $125 $82
Natural gas forward price $2/MMBtu to $ 8/MMBtu $4/MMBtu
Net derivative assets (liabilities)
Credit derivatives $ (104)
Discounted cash flow ,
Stochastic recovery
correlation modelCredit spreads 7 to 155 bps 61 bps
Upfront points 16 to 100 points  68 points
Prepayment speed 15% CPR n/a
Default rate 2% CDR n/a
Credit correlation 20% to 60% 55 %
Price $0 to $120 $53
Equity derivatives $(1,710 )Industry standard
derivative pricing Equity correlation 3% to 100% 80 %
Long-dated equity volatilities 5% to 78% 36 %
Commodity derivatives $ (976)
Discounted cash flow ,
Industry standard
derivative pricing Natural gas forward price $2/MMBtu to $ 8/MMBtu $4/MMBtu
Correlation 65% to 85% 76 %
Power forward price $11 to $103 $32
Volatilities 41% to 69% 63 %
Interest rate derivatives $ 128 
Industry standard
derivative pricingCorrelation (IR/IR) (1)% to 90% 54 %
Correlation (FX/IR) (1)% to 58% 44 %
Long-dated inflation rates G(10)% to 11% 3 %
Long-dated inflation volatilities 0% to 2% 2 %
Interest rates volatilities 0% to 2% 1 %
Total net derivative assets (liabilities) $(2,662 )
For loans and securities, structured liabilities and net derivative assets (liabilities), the weighted average is calculated based upon the absolute fair value of the instruments.
The categories are aggregated base d upon product type which differs from financial statement classification. The following is a reconciliation to the line items in the table on page 151: Trading
account assets – Corporate securities, trading loans and other of $2.1 billion, Trading account assets – Non-U.S. sovereign debt of $396 million, Trading account assets – Mortgage trading loans,
MBS and ABS of $1.5 billion, AFS debt securities of $439 million, Other debt securities carried at fair value - Non-agency resident ial of $242 million, Other assets, including MSRs, of $1.6 billion,
Loans and leases of $ 748 million and LHFS of $ 317 million.
Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation and Black-Scholes.
Includes models such as Monte Carlo simulation, Black-Scholes and other methods that model the joint dynamics of interest, inflation and foreign exchange rates.
The weighted-average life is a product of changes in market rates of interest, prepayment rates and other model and cash flow assumptions.
CPR = Constant Prepayment Rate
CDR = Constant Default Rate
MMBtu = Million British thermal units
IR = Interest Rate
FX = Foreign Exchange
n/a = not applicable(1)
(2)
(5)
(5)
(3)
(3)
(3)
 (4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
155 Bank of America
In the previous tables, instruments backed by residential and
commercial real estate assets include RMBS, commercial MBS,
whole loans and mortgage CDOs. Commercial loans, debt
securities and other include corporate CLOs and CDOs,
commercial loans and bonds, and securities backed by non-real
estate asset s. Structured  liabilities primarily include equity-linked
notes that are accounted for under the fair value option.
The Corporation uses multiple market approaches in valuing
certain of its Level 3 financial instruments. For example, market
comparables and discounted cash flows are used together . For
a given product, such as corporate debt securities, market
comparables may be used to estimate some of the
unobservable inputs, and then these inputs are incorporated into
a discounted cash flow model. Therefore, the balances
disclosed encompass both of these techniques.
The levels of aggregation and diversity within the products
disclosed in the tables result in certain ranges of inputs being
wide and unevenly distributed across asset and liability
categories.
Uncertainty of Fair Value Measurements from
Unobservable Inputs
Loans and Securities
A significant increase in market yields, default rates, loss
severities or duration would have resulted in a significantly lower
fair value for long positions. Short positions would have been
impacted in a directionally opposite way. The impact of changes
in prepayment speeds would have resulted in differing impacts
depending on the senior ity of the instrument and, in the case of
CLOs, whether prepayments can be reinveste d. A significant
increase in price would have resulted in a significantly higher fair
value for long positions, and short positions would have been
impacted in a directionally opposite way .
Structured Liabilities and Derivatives
For credit derivatives, a significant increase in market yield,
upfront points (i.e., a single upfront payment made by aprotection buyer at inception), credit spreads, default rates or
loss severities would have resulted in a significantly lower fair
value for protection sellers and higher fair value for protection
buyers. The impact of changes in prepayment speeds would
have resulted in differing  impacts depending on the seniority of
the instrument.
Structured credit derivatives are impacted  by credit
correlation. Default correlation is a parameter that describes the
degree of dependence among credit default rates within a credit
portfolio that underlies a credit derivative instrument. The
sensitivity of this input on the fair value varies depending on the
level of subordination of the tranche. For senior tranches that
are net purchases of protection, a significant increase in default
correlation would have resulted in a significantly higher fair
value. Net short protection positions would have been impacted
in a directionally opposite way .
For equity derivatives, commodity derivatives, interest rate
derivatives and structured liabilities, a significant change in long-
dated rates and volatilities and correlation inputs (i.e., the
degree of correlation between an equity securit y and an index,
between two different commodities, between two different
interest rates, or between interest rates and foreign exchange
rates) would have resulted in a significant impact to the fair
value; however , the magnitude and direction of the impact
depend on whether the Corporation is long or short the
exposure. For structured liabilities, a significant increase in yield
or decrease  in price would have resulted in a significantly lower
fair value.
Nonrecurring Fair Value
The Corporation holds certain assets that are measured at fair
value only in certain situations (e.g., the impairm ent of an asset),
and these measurements are referred to herein as nonrecurring.
The amounts below represent assets still held as of the
reporting date for which a nonrecurring fair value adjustment
was recorded during 2022, 2021, and 2020.
Assets Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(Dollars in millions) Level 2 Level 3 Level 2 Level 3
Assets    
Loans held-for-sale $ 1,979 $ 3,079 $ 634 $ 24 
Loans and leases — 166 — 213 
Foreclosed properties — 7 — 5 
Other assets 88 165 256 2,046 
Gains (Losses)
2022 2021 2020
Assets    
Loans held-for-sale $ (387)$ (44)$ (79)
Loans and leases (48) (60) (73)
Foreclosed properties (6) (2) (6)
Other assets (91) (492) (98)
Includes $ 15 million, $ 24 million and $ 30 million of losses on loans that were written down to a collateral value of zero during 2022, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Amounts are included in other asset s on the Consolidated Balance Sheet and represent the carrying value of foreclosed properties that were written down subsequent to their initial classification
as foreclosed properties. Losses on foreclosed properties include losses recorded during the first 90 days after transfer of a loan to foreclosed properties.
Excludes $ 60 million and $ 52 million of properties acquired upon foreclosure of certain government-guaranteed loans (principally FHA-insured loans) at December 31, 2022 and 2021.(1)
(2, 3)
(1)
(1)
(2)
(3)
Bank of America 156
The table below presents information about significant unobservable inputs utilized in the Corporation's nonrecurring Level 3 fair
value measurements at December 31, 2022 and 2021.
Quantitative Information about Nonrecurring Level 3 Fair Value Measurements
Inputs
Financial InstrumentFair
ValueValuation
TechniqueSignificant Unobservable
InputsRanges of
InputsWeighted
Average 
(Dollars in millions) Year Ended December 31, 2022
Loans held-for-sale $3,079 Pricing model Implied yield 9% to 24% n/a
Loans and leases 166 Market comparablesOREO discount 10% to 66% 26 %
Costs to sell 8% to 24% 9 %
Other assets 165 Discounted cash flowDiscount rate 7 % n/a
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Loans and leases $ 213 Market comparablesOREO discount 13% to 59% 24 %
Costs to sell 8% to 26% 9 %
Other assets 1,875 Discounted cash flowDiscount rate 7% n/a
166Market comparablesEstimated appraisal value n/a n/a
The weighted average is calculated based upon the fair value of the loans.
Represents residential mortgages where the loan has been written down to the fair value of the underlying collateral.
Represents the fair value of certain impaired renewable energy investments.
Represents the fair value of certain impaired renewable energy investments and impaired assets related to the Corporation’ s real estate rationalization.
n/a = not applicable
NOTE 21 Fair V alue Option
Loans and Loan Commitments
The Corporation elects to account for certain loans and loan
commitments that exceed the Corporation’ s single-name credit
risk concentration guidelines under the fair value option. Lending
commitments are actively managed and, as appropriate, credit
risk for these lending relationships may be mitigated through the
use of credit  derivatives,  with the Corporation’ s public side credit
view and market perspectives determining the size and timing of
the hedging activity . These credit derivatives do not meet the
requirements for designation as accounting hedges and are
carried at fair value. The fair value option allows the Corporation
to carry these loans and loan commitments at fair value, which
is more consistent with management’ s view of the underlying
economics and the manner in which they are managed. In
addition, the fair value option allows the Corporation to reduce
the accounting volatility that would otherwise result from the
asymmetry created by accounting for the financial instruments at
historical cost and the credit derivatives at fair value.
Loans Held-for-sale
The Corpor ation elects to account for residential mortgage
LHFS, commercial mortgage LHFS and certain other LHFS
under the fair value option. These loans are actively managed
and monitored and, as appropriate, certain market risks of the
loans may be mitigated through the use of derivatives. The
Corporation has elected not to designate the derivatives as
qualifying accounting hedges, and therefore, they are carried atfair value. The changes in fair value of the loans are largely
offset by changes in the fair value of the derivatives. The fair
value option allows the Corporation to reduce the accounting
volatility that would otherwise result from the asymmetry created
by accounting for the financial instruments at the lower of cost or
fair value and the derivatives at fair value. The Corporation has
not elected to account for certain other LHFS under the fair
value option  primarily because these loans are floating-rate
loans that are not hedged using derivative instruments.
Loans Reported as Trading Account Assets
The Corpora tion elects to account for certain loans that are held
for the purpose of tradin g and are risk-managed  on a fair value
basis under the fair value option.
Other Assets
The Corporation elects to account for certain long-term fixed-
rate margin loans that are hedged with derivatives under the fair
value option. Election of the fair value option allows the
Corporation to reduce the accounting volatility that would
otherwise result from the asymmetry created by accounting for
the financial instruments at historical cost and the derivatives at
fair value.
Securities Financing Agreements
The Corporation elects to account for certain securities financing
agreements, including resale and repurchas e agreements,
under the fair value option. These elections include certain
agreements collateralized by the U.S. government and its
agencies, which are generally short-dated and have minimal
interest rate risk.(1)
(2)
(3)
(2)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
157 Bank of America
Long-term Deposits
The Corporation elects to account for certain long-term fixed-
rate and rate-linked deposits that are hedged with derivatives
that do not qualify for hedge accounting. Election of the fair
value option allows the Corporation to reduce the accounting
volatility that would otherwise result from the asymmetry created
by accountin g for the financial instruments at historical cost and
the derivatives at fair value. The Corporation has not elected to
carry other long-term deposits at fair value because they are not
hedged using derivatives.
Short-term Borrowings
The Corporation elects to account for certain short-term
borrowings, primarily short-term structured liabilities, under the
fair value option because this debt is risk-managed on a fair
value basis.
The Corporation also elects to account for certain asset-
backed secured financings, which are also classified in short-
term borrowings, under the fair value option. Election of the fair
value option allows the Corporation to reduce the accountingvolatility that would otherwise result from the asymmetry created
by accounting for the asset-backed secured financings at
historical cost and the corresponding mortgage LHFS securing
these financings at fair value.
Long-term Debt
The Corporation elects to account for certain long-term debt,
primarily structured liabilities, under the fair value option. This
long-term debt is either risk-managed on a fair value basis or the
related hedges do not qualify for hedge accounting.
Fair Value Option Elections
The following tables provide information about the fair value
carrying amount and the contractual principal outstanding of
assets and liabilities accounted for under the fair value option at
December 31, 2022 and 2021, and information about where
changes in the fair value of assets and liabilities accounted for
under the fair value option are included in the Consolidated
Statement of Income for 2022, 2021 and 2020.
Fair Value Option Elections
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
(Dollars in millions)Fair Value
 Carrying
 AmountContractual
 Principal
 OutstandingFair Value
Carrying
Amount Less
 Unpaid
PrincipalFair Value
Carrying
AmountContractual
 Principal
 OutstandingFair Value
Carrying
  Amount Less
 Unpaid Principal
Federal funds sold and securities borrowed or
purchased under agreements to resell $ 146,999 $ 147,158 $ (159)$ 150,665 $ 150,677 $ (12)
Loans reported as trading account assets 10,143 17,682 (7,539) 10,864 18,895 (8,031)
Trading inventory – other 20,770 n/a n/a 21,986 n/a n/a
Consumer and commercial loans 5,771 5,897 (126) 7,819 7,888 (69)
Loans held-for-sale 1,115 1,873 (758) 4,455 5,343 (888)
Other assets 620 n/a n/a 544 n/a n/a
Long-term deposits 311 381 (70) 408 401 7 
Federal funds purchased and securities
loaned or sold under agreements to
repurchase 151,708 151,885 (177) 139,641 139,682 (41)
Short-term borrowings 832 833 (1) 4,279 4,127 152 
Unfunded loan commitments 110 n/a n/a 97 n/a n/a
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 1,217 1,161 56 — — — 
Long-term debt 33,070 36,830 (3,760) 29,708 30,903 (1,195)
A signific ant portion of the loans reported as trading account assets and LHFS are distressed loans that were purchased at a deep discount to par, and the remainder are loans with a fair value
near contractual principal outstanding.
n/a = not applicable(1)
(1)
(1)
Bank of America 158
Gains (Losses) Related to Assets and Liabilities Accounted for Under the Fair Value Option
Market making
 and similar
 activitiesOther
Income Total
(Dollars in millions) 2022
Loans reported as trading account assets $ (164)$ — $ (164)
Trading inventory – other (1,159) — (1,159)
Consumer and commercial loans (58) (27) (85)
Loans held-for-sale — (304) (304)
Short-term borrowings 639 — 639 
Unfunded loan commitments — 8 8 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities 11 — 11 
Long-term debt 4,359 (46) 4,313 
Other 74 30 104 
Total $ 3,702 $ (339)$ 3,363 
2021
Loans reported as trading account assets $ 275 $ — $ 275 
Trading inventory – other (211) — (211)
Consumer and commercial loans 78 40 118 
Loans held-for-sale — 58 58 
Short-term borrowings 883 — 883 
Long-term debt (604) (41) (645)
Other 18 (23) (5)
Total $ 439 $ 34 $ 473 
2020
Loans reported as trading account assets $ 107 $ — $ 107 
Trading inventory – other 3,216 — 3,216 
Consumer and commercial loans 22 (3) 19 
Loans held-for-sale — 103 103 
Short-term borrowings (170) — (170)
Unfunded loan commitments — (65) (65)
Long-term debt (2,175) (53) (2,228)
Other 35 (22) 13 
Total $ 1,035 $ (40)$ 995 
    The gains (losses) in market making and similar activities are primarily of fset by (losses) gains on trading liabilities that hedge these assets.
    Includes the value of IRLCs on funded loans, including those sold during the period.
    The net gains (losses) in market making and similar activities relate to the embedded derivatives in structured liabilities and are typically offset by (losses) gains on derivatives and securities that
hedge these liabilities. For the cumulative impact of changes in the Corporation’ s own credit spreads and the amount recognized in accumulated OCI, see Note 14 – Accum ulated Other
Comprehensive Income (Loss) . For more information on how the Corporation’ s own credit spread is determined, see Note 20 – Fair V alue Measurements.
    Includes gains  (losses) on feder al funds sold and securities borrowe d or purchased under agreements to resell, other assets, long-term deposits and federal funds purchased and securities
loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase.
Gains (Losses) Related to Borrower-specific Credit Risk for Assets and Liabilities Accounted for Under the
Fair Value Option
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Loans reported as trading account assets $ (950)$ 128 $ (172)
Consumer and commercial loans (51) 7 (19)
Loans held-for-sale (23) 28 (105)
Unfunded loan commitments 8 (1) (65)
NOTE 22 Fair V alue of Financial Instruments
Financial instruments are classified within the fair value
hierarchy using the methodologies described in Note 20 – Fair
Value Meas urements . Certain loans, deposits, long-term debt,
unfunded lending comm itments and other finan cial instruments
are accounted for under the fair value option. For more
information, see Note 21 – Fair Value Option . The following
disclosures include financial instruments that are not carried at
fair value or only a portio n of the ending balance is carried at fair
value on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Short-term Financial Instruments
The carrying value of short-term financial instruments, including
cash and cash equivalents, certain time deposits placed and
other short-term investments, federal funds sold and purchased,
certain resale and repurchase agreements and short-termborrowings, approximate s the fair value of these instruments.
These financial instruments generally expose the Corporation to
limited credit risk and have no stated maturities or have short-
term maturities and carry interest rates that approximate market.
The Corporation accounts for certain resale and repurchase
agreements under the fair value option.
Under the fair value hierarchy , cash and cash equivalents
are classifie d as Level 1. Time deposits placed and other short-
term investments, such as U.S. government  securities and
short-term commercial paper , are classified as Level 1 or Level
2. Federal funds sold and purchased are classified as Level 2.
Resale and repurchase agreements are classified as Level 2
because they are generally short-dated and/or variable-rate
instruments collateraliz ed by U.S. governm ent or agency
securities. Short-term borrowings are classified as Level 2.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
159 Bank of America
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
The carrying values and fair values by fair value hierarchy of
certain financial instruments where only a portio n of the ending
balance was carried at fair value at Decembe r 31, 2022 and
2021 are presented in the table below .
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
Fair Value
Carrying
Value Level 2 Level 3 Total
(Dollars in millions) December 31, 2022
Financial assets
Loans $1,014,593 $ 50,194 $935,282 $985,476 
Loans held-for-
sale 6,871 3,417 3,455 6,872 
Financial
liabilities
Deposits 1,930,341 1,930,165 — 1,930,165 
Long-term debt 275,982 271,993 1,136 273,129 
Commercial
unfunded
lending
commitments 1,650 77 6,596 6,673 
December 31, 2021
Financial assets
Loans $ 946,142 $ 53,544 $919,980 $973,524 
Loans held-for-
sale 15,635 15,016 627 15,643 
Financial
liabilities
Deposits 2,064,446 2,064,438 — 2,064,438 
Long-term debt 280,117 286,802 1,288 288,090 
Commercial
unfunded
lending
commitments 1,554 97 6,384 6,481 
Includes demand deposits of $918.9  billion and $1.0 trillion with no stated maturities at
December 31, 2022 and 2021.
    The carrying value of commercial unfunded lending commitments is included in accrued
expenses and other liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheet. The Corporation does not
estimate the fair value of consum er unfunded lending commitments because, in many
instances, the Corporation can reduce or cancel these commitments by providing notice to
the borrower . For more information on commitments, see Note 12 – Commitments and
Contingencies .
NOTE 23  Business Segment Information
The Corporation reports its results of operations through the
following four business segments: Consumer Banking , Global
Wealth & Investment Management,  Global Bank ing and Global
Markets , with the remaining operations recorded in All Other .
Consumer Banking
Consumer Banking offers a diversified range of credit, banking
and investment products and services to consumers and small
businesses. Consumer Banking  product offerings include
traditional savings acco unts, money market savings accounts,
CDs and IRAs, checking accounts, and investment accounts
and products, as well as credit and debit cards, residential
mortgages and home equity loans, and direct and indirect loans
to consumers and small businesses in the U.S. Consumer
Banking  includes the impact of servicing residential mortgages
and home equity loans.
Global Wealth & Investment Management
GWIM  provides a high-touch client experience through a
network of financial advisors focused on clients with over
$250,000 in total investable assets, including tailored solutions
to meet clients’  need s through a full set of investment
management, brokerage, banking and retirement products.
GWIM  also provides comp rehensive wealth management
solutions targeted to high net worth and ultra high net worth
clients, as well as custo mized solutions to meet clients’  wealth
structuring, investment management, trust and banking needs,
including specialty asset management services.Global Banking
Global Banking  provides a wide range of lending-related
products and services, integrated working capital management
and treasury solutions, and underwriting and advisory services
through the Corporation’ s network of offices and client
relationship teams. Global Bank ing also provide s investme nt
banking products to clients. The econom ics of certain
investment banking and underwriting activiti es are shared
primarily between Global Banking and Global Markets  under an
internal revenue-sharing  arrangement. Global Banking  clients
generally include middle-market companies, commercial real
estate firms,  not-for-prof it companies, large global corporations,
financial institutions, leasing clients, and mid-sized U.S.-based
businesses requiring customized and integrated financial advice
and solutions.
Global Markets
Global Markets  offers sales and trading services and research
services to institutional clients across fixed-income, credit,
currency , commodity and equity businesses. Global Markets
provides market-making, financing, securities clearing,
settlement and custody services globally to institutional investor
clients in support of their investing and trading activities. Global
Markets  product coverage includes securities and derivative
products in both the primary and secondary markets. Global
Markets  also works with commercial and corporate clients to
provide risk management products. As a result of market-making
activities, Global Mark ets may be required to manage risk in a
broad range  of financial products. In addition, the economics of
certain investment banking and underwriting activities are
shared primarily between Global Markets and Global Banking
under an internal revenue-sharing arrangement.
All Other
All Other  primarily consists of ALM activities, liquidating
businesses and certain expenses not otherwise allocated to a
business segment. ALM activities encompass interest rate and
foreign currency risk management activities for which
substantially all of the results are allocated to the business
segments.
Basis of Presentation
The management accounting and reporting process derives
segment and business results by utilizing allocation
methodologies for revenue and expense. The net income
derived for the business es is dependent upon revenue and cost
allocations using an activity-based costing mode l, funds transfer
pricing, and other methodologies and assumptions management
believes are appropriate to reflect the results of the business.
Total revenue, net of interest expense, includes net interest
income on an FTE basis and noninterest income. The
adjustment of net interest income to an FTE basis results in a
corresponding increase in income tax expense. The segment
results also reflect certain revenue and expense  methodologies
that are utilized to determine net income. The net interest
income of the businesse s includes the results of a funds transfer
pricing process that matches assets and liabilities with similar
interest rate sensitivity and maturity characteristi cs. In segments
where the total of liabilities and equity exceed s assets, which
are generally deposit-taking segments, the Corporation allocates
assets to match liabilitie s. Net interest income of the business
segments also includes an allocation of net interest income
generated by certain of the Corporation’ s ALM activities.
The Corporation’ s ALM activities include an overall interest
rate risk management strategy that incorporates the use of(1)
(2)
(1)
(2)
(1)    
(2)
Bank of America 160
various deriv atives and cash instruments to manage fluctuations
in earnings and capital that are caused by interest rate volatility .
The Corporation’ s goal is to manage interest rate sensitivity so
that movements in interest rates do not significantly adversely
affect earnings and capital. The results of a majority of the
Corporation’ s ALM activities are allocated to the business
segments and fluctuate based on the performa nce of the ALM
activities. ALM activities include external product pricing
decisions including deposit pricing strategies, the effects of the
Corporation’ s internal funds transfer pricing process and the net
effects of other ALM activities.
Certain expenses not directly attributable to a specific
business segment are allocated to the segments. The costs of
certain centralized or shared functions are allocated based on
methodologies that reflect utilization.
Effective October 1, 2021, a business activity previouslyincluded in the Global Markets  segment is being reported as a
liquidating business in All Other, consistent with a realig nment in
performance reporting to senior management. While this activity
was not material to Global Mark ets’ results of operations and
historical results have  not been restated, this activity’ s
noninterest expense of $309 million and $473 million for the
three months ended September 30, 2021 and June 30, 2021
was elevated and would have been excluded from Global
Markets’  results of operations for those periods under the new
basis of presentation.
The table below presents net income (loss) and the
components thereto (with net interest income on an FTE basis
for the busin ess segmen ts, All Other and the total Corporatio n)
for 2022, 2021 and 2020, and total assets at December 31,
2022, 2021 and 2020 for each business segmen t, as well as All
Other .
Results of Business Segments and All
Other
At and for the year ended December 31 Total Corporation Consumer Banking
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Net interest income $ 52,900 $ 43,361 $ 43,859 $ 30,045 $ 24,929 $ 24,698 
Noninterest income 42,488 46,179 42,168 8,590 9,076 8,564 
Total revenue, net of interest expense 95,388 89,540 86,027 38,635 34,005 33,262 
Provision for credit losses 2,543 (4,594) 11,320 1,980 (1,035) 5,765 
Noninterest expense 61,438 59,731 55,213 20,077 19,290 18,882 
Income before income taxes 31,407 34,403 19,494 16,578 15,750 8,615 
Income tax expense 3,879 2,425 1,600 4,062 3,859 2,111 
Net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 $ 12,516 $ 11,891 $ 6,504 
Year-end total assets $3,051,375 $3,169,495 $1,126,453 $1,131,142  
 Global Wealth & Investment Management Global Banking
 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Net interest income $ 7,466 $ 5,664 $ 5,468 $ 12,184 $ 8,511 $ 9,013 
Noninterest income 14,282 15,084 13,116 10,045 12,364 9,974 
Total revenue, net of interest expense 21,748 20,748 18,584 22,229 20,875 18,987 
Provision for credit losses 66 (241) 357 641 (3,201) 4,897 
Noninterest expense 15,490 15,258 14,160 10,966 10,632 9,342 
Income before income taxes 6,192 5,731 4,067 10,622 13,444 4,748 
Income tax expense 1,517 1,404 996 2,815 3,630 1,282 
Net income $ 4,675 $ 4,327 $ 3,071 $ 7,807 $ 9,814 $ 3,466 
Year-end total assets $ 368,893 $ 438,275 $ 588,466 $ 638,131  
 Global Markets All Other
 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Net interest income $ 3,088 $ 4,011 $ 4,646 $ 117 $ 246 $ 34 
Noninterest income 15,050 15,244 14,119 (5,479) (5,589) (3,605)
Total revenue, net of interest expense 18,138 19,255 18,765 (5,362) (5,343) (3,571)
Provision for credit losses 28 65 251 (172) (182) 50 
Noninterest expense 12,420 13,032 11,417 2,485 1,519 1,412 
Income (loss) before income taxes 5,690 6,158 7,097 (7,675) (6,680) (5,033)
Income tax expense (benefit) 1,508 1,601 1,845 (6,023) (8,069) (4,634)
Net income (loss) $ 4,182 $ 4,557 $ 5,252 $ (1,652)$ 1,389 $ (399)
Year-end total assets $ 812,489 $ 747,794 $ 155,074 $ 214,153  
There were no material intersegment revenues. (1)
(1)
161 Bank of America
The tables below present noninterest income and the associated components for 2022, 2021 and 2020 for each business
segment, All Other and the total Corporation. For more information, see Note 2 – Net Interest Income and Noninterest Income .
Noninterest Income by Business Segment and All Other
Total Corporation Consumer BankingGlobal Wealth &
Investment Management
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Fees and commissions:
Card income
Interchange fees $ 4,096 $ 4,560 $ 3,954 $ 3,239 $ 3,597 $ 3,027 $ 20 $ 43 $ 36 
Other card income 1,987 1,658 1,702 1,930 1,575 1,646 50 42 42 
Total card income 6,083 6,218 5,656 5,169 5,172 4,673 70 85 78 
Service charges
Deposit-related fees 5,190 6,271 5,991 2,706 3,538 3,417 65 72 67 
Lending-related fees 1,215 1,233 1,150 — — — 8 — — 
Total service charges 6,405 7,504 7,141 2,706 3,538 3,417 73 72 67 
Investment and brokerage services
Asset management fees 12,152 12,729 10,708 195 188 146 11,957 12,541 10,578 
Brokerage fees 3,749 3,961 3,866 109 132 127 1,604 1,771 1,692 
Total investment and brokerage
services 15,901 16,690 14,574 304 320 273 13,561 14,312 12,270 
Investment banking fees
Underwriting income 1,970 5,077 4,698 — — — 189 388 391 
Syndication fees 1,070 1,499 861 — — — — — — 
Financial advisory services 1,783 2,311 1,621 — — — — — — 
Total investment banking fees 4,823 8,887 7,180 — — — 189 388 391 
Total fees and commissions 33,212 39,299 34,551 8,179 9,030 8,363 13,893 14,857 12,806 
Market making and similar activities 12,075 8,691 8,355 10 1 2 102 40 63 
Other income (loss) (2,799) (1,811) (738) 401 45 199 287 187 247 
Total noninterest income $42,488 $46,179 $42,168 $ 8,590 $ 9,076 $ 8,564 $14,282 $15,084 $13,116 
Global Banking Global Markets All Other 
2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020 2022 2021 2020
Fees and commissions:
Card income
Interchange fees $ 767 $ 700 $ 499 $ 66 $ 220 $ 391 $ 4 $ — $ 1 
Other card income 7 13 14 — — — — 28 — 
Total card income 774 713 513 66 220 391 4 28 1 
Service charges
Deposit-related fees 2,310 2,508 2,298 101 146 177 8 7 32 
Lending-related fees 983 1,015 940 224 218 210 — — — 
Total service charges 3,293 3,523 3,238 325 364 387 8 7 32 
Investment and brokerage services
Asset management fees — — — — — — — — (16)
Brokerage fees 42 104 74 2,002 1,979 1,973 (8) (25) — 
Total investment and brokerage
services 42 104 74 2,002 1,979 1,973 (8) (25) (16)
Investment banking fees
Underwriting income 796 2,187 2,070 1,176 2,725 2,449 (191) (223) (212)
Syndication fees 565 781 482 505 718 379 — — — 
Financial advisory services 1,643 2,139 1,458 139 173 163 1 (1) — 
Total investment banking fees 3,004 5,107 4,010 1,820 3,616 2,991 (190) (224) (212)
Total fees and commissions 7,113 9,447 7,835 4,213 6,179 5,742 (186) (214) (195)
Market making and similar activities 215 145 103 11,406 8,760 8,471 342 (255) (284)
Other income (loss) 2,717 2,772 2,036 (569) 305 (94) (5,635) (5,120) (3,126)
Total noninterest income $10,045 $12,364 $ 9,974 $15,050 $15,244 $14,119 $(5,479)$(5,589)$(3,605)
All Other  includes eliminations of intercompany transactions.(1)
(1)
Bank of America 162
Business Segment Reconciliations
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Segments’ total revenue, net of interest expense $ 100,750 $ 94,883 $ 89,598 
Adjustments :    
Asset and liability management activities (164) (4) 375 
Liquidating businesses, eliminations and other (5,198) (5,339) (3,946)
FTE basis adjustment (438) (427) (499)
Consolidated revenue, net of interest expense $ 94,950 $ 89,113 $ 85,528 
Segments’ total net income 29,180 30,589 18,293 
Adjustments, net-of-tax :   
Asset and liability management activities (122) 11 279 
Liquidating businesses, eliminations and other (1,530) 1,378 (678)
Consolidated net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 
December 31
2022 2021
Segments’ total assets $ 2,896,301 $ 2,955,342 
Adjustments :
Asset and liability management activities, including securities portfolio 1,133,375 1,363,626 
Elimination of segment asset allocations to match liabilities (1,041,793) (1,216,891)
Other 63,492 67,418 
Consolidated total assets $ 3,051,375 $ 3,169,495 
Adjustments include consolidated income, expense and asset amounts not specifically allocated to individual business segments.
NOTE 24 Parent Company Information
The following tables present the Parent Company-only financial information.
Condensed Statement of Income
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Income    
Dividends from subsidiaries:    
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries $ 22,250 $ 15,621 $ 10,352 
Interest from subsidiaries 12,420 8,362 8,825 
Other income (loss) (201) (114) (138)
Total income 34,469 23,869 19,039 
Expense    
Interest on borrowed funds from subsidiaries 236 54 136 
Other interest expense 7,041 3,383 4,119 
Noninterest expense 1,322 1,531 1,651 
Total expense 8,599 4,968 5,906 
Income before income taxes and equity in undistributed earnings of subsidiaries 25,870 18,901 13,133 
Income tax expense 683 886 649 
Income before equity in undistributed earnings of subsidiaries 25,187 18,015 12,484 
Equity in undistributed earnings (losses) of subsidiaries:    
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries 2,333 14,078 5,372 
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 8 (115) 38 
Total equity in undistributed earnings (losses) of subsidiaries 2,341 13,963 5,410 
Net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 (1)
(1)
(1)
(1)
163 Bank of America
Condensed Balance Sheet
 December 31
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021
Assets   
Cash held at bank subsidiaries $ 9,609 $ 5,011 
Securities 617 671 
Receivables from subsidiaries:
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries 222,584 217,447 
Banks and related subsidiaries 220 347 
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 978 368 
Investments in subsidiaries:
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries 301,207 316,497 
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 3,770 3,645 
Other assets 7,156 8,602 
Total assets $ 546,141 $ 552,588 
Liabilities and shareholders’ equity   
Accrued expenses and other liabilities $ 14,193 $ 17,394 
Payables to subsidiaries:
Banks and related subsidiaries 260 107 
Bank holding companies and related subsidiaries 21 3 
Nonbank companies and related subsidiaries 14,578 11,564 
Long-term debt 243,892 253,454 
Total liabilities 272,944 282,522 
Shareholders’ equity 273,197 270,066 
Total liabilities and shareholders’ equity $ 546,141 $ 552,588 
Condensed Statement of Cash Flows
(Dollars in millions) 2022 2021 2020
Operating activities    
Net income $ 27,528 $ 31,978 $ 17,894 
Reconciliation of net income (loss) to net cash provided by (used in) operating activities:    
Equity in undistributed (earnings) losses of subsidiaries (2,341) (13,963) (5,410)
Other operating activities, net (31,777) (7,144) 14,303 
Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities (6,590) 10,871 26,787 
Investing activities    
Net sales (purchases) of securities 25 (14) (4)
Net payments to subsidiaries (6,044) (10,796) (33,111)
Other investing activities, net (34) (26) (7)
Net cash used in investing activities (6,053) (10,836) (33,122)
Financing activities    
Net increase (decrease) in other advances 2,853 503 (422)
Proceeds from issuance of long-term debt 44,123 56,106 43,766 
Retirement of long-term debt (19,858) (24,544) (23,168)
Proceeds from issuance of preferred stock and warrants 4,426 2,170 2,181 
Redemption of preferred stock (654) (1,971) (1,072)
Common stock repurchased (5,073) (25,126) (7,025)
Cash dividends paid (8,576) (8,055) (7,727)
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities 17,241 (917) 6,533 
Net increase (decrease) in cash held at bank subsidiaries 4,598 (882) 198 
Cash held at bank subsidiaries at January 1 5,011 5,893 5,695 
Cash held at bank subsidiaries at December 31 $ 9,609 $ 5,011 $ 5,893 
Bank of America 164
NOTE 25 Performance by Geographical Area
The Corpo ration’ s operations are highly integrated with
operations in both U.S. and non-U.S. markets. The non-U.S.
business activities are largely conducted in Europe, the Middle
East and Africa and in Asia. The Corporation identifies its
geographic performance based on the busines s unit structure
used to manage the capital or expense deployed in the regionas applicable. This requires certain judgments related to the
allocation of revenue so that revenue can be appropriately
matched with the relate d capital or expense deployed in the
region. Certain asset, liability , income and expense amounts
have been allocated to arrive at total assets, total revenue, net
of interest expense, income before income taxes and net
income by geographic area as presented below .
(Dollars in millions)  Total Assets at
Year EndTotal Revenue,
Net of Interest
ExpenseIncome Before
Income Taxes Net Income
U.S. 2022 $ 2,631,815 $ 82,890 $ 28,135 $ 25,607 
 2021 2,789,862 78,012 31,392 27,781 
 2020 75,576 18,247 16,692 
Asia 2022 127,399 4,597 1,144 865 
 2021 117,085 4,439 988 733 
 2020 4,232 1,051 788 
Europe, Middle East and Africa 2022 262,856 6,044 1,121 689 
 2021 233,356 5,423 1,097 3,134 
 2020 4,491 (596) 264 
Latin America and the Caribbean 2022 29,305 1,419 569 367 
 2021 29,192 1,239 499 330 
 2020 1,229 293 150 
Total Non-U.S. 2022 419,560 12,060 2,834 1,921 
 2021 379,633 11,101 2,584 4,197 
 2020 9,952 748 1,202 
Total Consolidated 2022 $ 3,051,375 $ 94,950 $ 30,969 $ 27,528 
 2021 3,169,495 89,113 33,976 31,978 
 2020 85,528 18,995 17,894 
Total assets include long-lived assets, which are primarily located in the U.S.
There were no material intercompany revenues between geographic regions for any of the periods presented.
Substantially reflects the U.S. (1)  (2)
(3)
(1)
(2)
(3)
165 Bank of America
Glossary
Alt-A  Mortgage – A type of U.S. mortgage that is considered
riskier than A-paper , or “prime,” and less risky than “subprime,”
the riskies t category . Typically , Alt-A  mortgages are
characterized by borrowers with less than full documentation,
lower credit scores and higher L TVs.
Assets Under Management (AUM) – The total market value of
assets under the investment advisory and/or discretion of GWIM
which generate asset management fees based on a percentage
of the assets’  market values. AUM reflects assets that are
generally managed for institutional, high net worth and retail
clients, and are distributed through various investment products
including mutual funds, other commingled vehicles and separate
accounts.
Banking Book  – All on- and off-balance sheet financial
instruments of the Corporation except for those positions that
are held for trading purposes.
Brokerage and Other Assets  – Non-discretionary client assets
which are held in brokerage accounts or held for safekeeping.
Committed Credit Exposure  – Any funded portion of a facility
plus the unfunded portion of a facility on which the lender is
legally boun d to advance funds during a specified period under
prescribed conditions.
Credit Derivatives – Contractual agreements that provide
protection against a specified credit event on one or more
referenced obligations.
Credit Valuation Adjustment (CVA) – A portfolio adjustment
required to properly reflect the counterparty credit risk exposure
as part of the fair value of derivative instruments.
Debit Valuation Adjustment (DVA) – A portfolio adjustmen t
required to properly reflect the Corporation’ s own credit risk
exposure as part of the fair value of derivative instruments
and/or structured liabilities.
Funding Valuation Adjustment (FVA) – A portfolio adjustment
required to include funding costs on uncollatera lized derivatives
and derivati ves where the Corporation is not permitted to use
the collateral it receives.
Interest Rate Lock Commitment (IRLC)  – Commitment with a
loan applica nt in which the loan terms are guaranteed for a
designated period of time subject to credit approval.
Letter of Credit  – A document issued on behalf of a customer to
a third party promising to pay the third party upon presentation
of specified documents. A letter of credit effectively substitutes
the issuer ’s credit for that of the customer .
Loan-to-value (LTV) – A commonly used credit quality metric.
LTV is calculated as the outstanding carrying value of the loan
divided by the estimated value of the property securing the loan.Macro Products – Include currencies, interest rates and
commodities products.
Margin Receivable  – An extensio n of credit secured by eligible
securities in certain brokerage accounts.
Matched Book  – Repurchase and resale agreements or
securities borrowed and loaned transactions where the overall
asset and liability position is similar in size and/or maturity .
Generally , these are entered into to accommo date customers
where the Corporation earns the interest rate spread.
Mortgage Servicing Rights (MSR) – The right to service a
mortgage loan when the underlying loan is sold or securitized.
Servicing includes collec tions for principal, interest and escrow
payments from borrow ers and accounting for and remitting
principal and interest payments to investors.
Nonperforming Loans  and Leases  – Includes loans and
leases that have been placed on nonaccrual status, including
nonaccruing loans whose contractual terms have been
restructured in a manne r that grants a concession to a borrower
experiencing financial dif ficulties.
Prompt Corrective Action (PCA)  – A framework established by
the U.S. banking regulators requiring banks to maintain certain
levels of regulatory capital ratios, comprised of five categories of
capitalization: “well capitalized,” “adequately capitalized,”
“undercapitalized,” “significantly undercapitalized” and “critically
undercapitalized.” Insured depository institutions  that fail to meet
certain of these capital levels are subject to increasingly strict
limits on their activities , including their ability to make capital
distributions, pay management compensation, grow assets and
take other actions.
Subprime Loans  – Although a standard industry definition for
subprime loans (including subprime mortgage loans) does not
exist, the Corporation defines subprime loans as specific
product of ferings for higher risk borrowers.
Troubled Debt Restructurings (TDRs)  – Loans whose
contractual terms have been restructured in a manner that
grants a concession to a borrower experiencing financial
difficulties. Certain consumer loans for which a binding offer to
restructure has been extended are also classified as TDRs.
Value-at-Risk (VaR) – VaR is a model that simulates the value
of a portfolio under a range of hypothetical scenarios in order to
generate a distribution of potential gains and losses. VaR
represents the loss the portfolio is expected to experience with a
given confidence level based on historical data. A VaR model is
an effective tool in estimating ranges of potential gains and
losses on our trading portfolios.
Bank of America 166
Key Metrics
Active Digital Banking Users – Mobile and/or online active
users over the past 90 days.
Active Mobile Banking Users – Mobile active users over the
past 90 days.
Book Value – Ending common shareholders’  equity divided by
ending common shares outstanding.
Common Equity Ratio - Ending common shareholders’  equity
divided by ending total assets.
Deposit Spread – Annualized net interest income divided by
average deposits.
Dividend Payout Ratio  – Common dividends declared divided
by net income applicable to common shareholders.
Efficiency Ratio – Noninterest expense divided by total
revenue, net of interest expense.
Gross Interest Yield – Effective annual percentage rate divided
by average loans.Net Interest Yield – Net interest income divided by average
total interest-earning assets.
Operating Margin  – Income before income taxes divided by
total revenue, net of interest expense.
Return on Average Allocated Capital – Adjusted net income
divided by allocated capital.
Return on Average Assets  – Net income divided  by total
average assets.
Return on Average Common Shareholders ’ Equity – Net
income applicable to common shareholders divided by average
common shareholders’  equity .
Return on Average Shareholders ’ Equity  – Net income
divided by average shareholders’  equity .
Risk-adjusted Margi n – Difference  between total revenue, net
of interest expense, and net credit losses divided by average
loans.
167 Bank of America
Acronyms
ABS Asset-backed securities
AFS Available-for-sale
AI Artificial intelligence
ALM Asset and liability management
ARR Alternative reference rates
AUM Assets under management
AVM Automated valuation model
BANA Bank of America, National Association
BHC Bank holding company
BofAS BofA  Securities, Inc.
BofASE BofA  Securities Europe SA
bps Basis points
CAE Chief Audit Executive
CCAR Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review
CDO Collateralized debt obligation
CDS Credit default swap
CECL Current expected credit losses
CET1 Common equity tier 1
CFPB Consumer Financial Protection Bureau
CFTC Commodity Futures Trading Commission
CLO Collateralized loan obligation
CLTV Combined loan-to-value
CRO Chief Risk Of ficer
CVA Credit valuation adjustment
DIF Deposit Insurance Fund
DVA Debit valuation adjustment
ECL Expected credit losses
EPS Earnings per common share
ERC Enterprise Risk Committee
ESG Environmental, social and governance
EU European Union
FCA Financial Conduct Authority
FDIC Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
FDICIA Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Improvement Act of 1991
FHA Federal Housing Administration
FHLB Federal Home Loan Bank
FHLMC Freddie Mac
FICC Fixed income, currencies and commodities
FICO Fair Isaac Corporation (credit score)
FLUs Front line units
FNMA Fannie Mae
FTE Fully taxable-equivalent
FVA Funding valuation adjustment
GAAP Accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America
GDPR General Data Protection Regulation
GLS Global Liquidity SourcesGNMA Government National Mortgage Association
GRM Global Risk Management
GSE Government-sponsored enterprise
G-SIB Global systemically important bank
GWIM Global W ealth & Investment Management
HELOC Home equity line of credit
HQLA High Quality Liquid Assets
HTM Held-to-maturity
IBOR Interbank Of fered Rates
ICAAP Internal Capital Adequacy Assessment Process
IRLC Interest rate lock commitment
ISDA International Swaps and Derivatives Association,
Inc.
LCR Liquidity Coverage Ratio
LHFS Loans held-for-sale
LIBOR London Interbank Of fered Rate
LTV Loan-to-value
MBS Mortgage-backed securities
MD&A Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations
MLI Merrill L ynch International
MLPCC Merrill L ynch Professional Clearing Corp
MLPF&S Merrill L ynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
MRC Management Risk Committee
MSA Metropolitan Statistical Area
MSR Mortgage servicing right
NOL Net operating loss
NSFR Net Stable Funding Ratio
OCC Office of the Comptroller of the Currency
OCI Other comprehensive income
OREO Other real estate owned
OTC Over-the-counter
PCA Prompt Corrective Action
PPP Paycheck Protection Program
RMBS Residential mortgage-backed securities
RSU Restricted stock unit
RWA Risk-weighted assets
SBA Small Business Administration
SBLC Standby letter of credit
SCB Stress capital buf fer
SEC Securities and Exchange Commission
SLR Supplementary leverage ratio
TDR Troubled debt restructurings
TLAC Total loss-absorbing capacity
UDAAP Unfair , deceptive, or abusive acts or practices
VA U.S. Department of V eterans Affairs
VaR Value-at-Risk
VIE Variable interest entity
Bank of America 168
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with
Accountants on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure
None
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
As of the end of the period covered by this report and pursuant
to Rule 13a-15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended (Exchange Act), Bank of America’ s management,
including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
conducted an evaluation of the effectiveness and design of our
disclosure controls and procedures (as that term is defined in
Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act). Based upon that
evaluation, Bank of America’ s Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer concluded that Bank of America’ s disclosure
controls and procedures were effective, as of the end of the
period covered by this report.
Report of Management on Internal Control
Over Financial Reporting
The Report of Management on Internal Control Over Financial
Reporting is set forth on page 87 and incorporated herein by
reference. The Report of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm with respect to the Corporation’ s internal
control over financial reporting is set forth on pages 88 and 89
and incorporated herein by reference.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have been no changes in our intern al control over
financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) of the Exchange
Act) during the quarter ended December 31, 2022, that
materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect,
our internal control over financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information
Disclosure Pursuant to Section 13(r) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934
Pursuant to Section 13(r) of the Exchange Act, an issuer is
required to disclose in its annual or quarterly reports, as
applicable, whether it or any of its affiliates knowingly engaged
in certain activities, transactions or dealings relating to Iran or
with individuals or entities designated pursuant to certain
Executive Orders. Disclosure may be required even where the
activities, transactions or dealings were conducted in
compliance with applicable law. As previously disclosed in its
related quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, the Corporation
identified and reported certain activities pursu ant to Section
13(r) for the first, second and third quarters  of 2022. The
information provided pursuant to Section 13(r) of the Exchange
Act in Item 5 of the quarters ended March 31, 2022, June 30,
2022 and September 30, 2022 is hereby incorporated by
reference to such reports. Except as set forth below , as of the
date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, the Corporation is not
aware of any other activity, transaction or deali ng by any of its
affiliates during the quarter ended December 31, 2022 that
requires disclosure under Section 13(r) of the Exchange Act.
During the fourth quarte r of 2022, Bank of America, National
Association (BANA), a U.S. subsidiary of Bank of America
Corporation, processed  two authorized wire deposits totaling
$596,890 pursuant to a specific license issued on April 21, 2022,
by the U.S. Department of the Treasury’ s Office ofForeign Assets Control. The wire deposits were processed by
BANA  on behalf of a U.S. client into its accoun t at BANA  and
settled invoices owed to the U.S. client. The deposits were
unblocked funds belong ing to Jammal Trust Bank, which at the
time of the deposits was designated pursuant to Executive
Order 13224 . There was no measurable gross  revenue or net
profit to the Corporation relating to these transactions. The
Corporation may in the future engage in similar transactions for
its clients to the extent permitted by U.S. law .
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign
Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
Not applicable.
Part III
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and
Corporate Governance
Information about our Executive Officers
The name, age, position  and office, and business experience of
our current executive of ficers are:
Dean C. Athanasia (56) President, Regional Banking since
October 2021; President, Retail and Preferred & Small Business
Banking from January 2019 to October 2021 ; Co-Head --
Consumer Banking  from September 2014 to January 2019; and
Preferred and Small Business Banking Executive from April
2011 to September 2014.
Aditya Bhasin (49) Chief Technology & Information
Officer since October 2021; Chief Information Officer and Head
of Technol ogy for Consumer , Small Business, Wealth
Management and Employee Technology from October 2017 to
October 2021; CIO, Retail, Preferred & Wealth Management
Technology , and Wealth Management Operations from June
2015 to October 2017.
Darrin Stev e Boland (54) Chief Administrative Officer
since October 2021 ; President, Retail from February 2020 to
October 2021; Head of Consumer Lending from May 2017 to
February 2020; Consumer Lending Executive from May 2015 to
May 2017.
Alastair M. Borthwick (54) Chief Financial Officer  since
November 2021; President of Global Commercial Banking from
October 2012 to October 2021.
Sheri Bronstein (54) Chief Human Resources Officer
since January 2019; Global Human Resources Executive from
July 2015 to January 2019; and HR Executive for Global
Banking & Markets from March 2010 to July 2015.
James P. DeMare (53) President, Global Markets  since
September 2020; Global Co-Head of FICC Trading and
Commercial Real Estate Banking from February 2015 to
September 2020.
Paul M. Donofrio (62) Vice Chair since November 2021;
Chief Financial Officer from August 2015 to November 2021;
Strategic Finance Executive from April 2015 to August 2015; and
Head of Global Corporate Credit and Transaction Banking from
January 2012 to April 2015.
Geoffrey S. Greener (58) Chief Risk Officer  since April
2014; Head of Enterprise Capital Management from April 2011
to April 2014.
Kathleen A. Knox (59) President, The Private Bank since
November 2017; Head of Business Banking from October 2014
to November 2017; and Retail Banking & Distribution Executive
from June 2011 to October 2014.
169 Bank of America
Matthew M. Koder (51) President, Global Corporate &
Investment Banking  since Decem ber 2018; President of APAC
from March 2012 to December 2018.
Bernard A. Mensah (54) President, Internatio nal, CEO of
Merrill Lynch  Internation al (MLI), BANA  London Branch Head
since August 2020. President of UK and Central and Eastern
Europe, the Middle East, Africa, CEO of MLI, BANA  London
Branch and Co-Head of Global Fixed Income Currency and
Commodities (FICC) Trading from September 2019 to August
2020; Co-Head of Global FICC Trading from March 2015 to
September 2019.
Lauren A. Mogensen (60) Global General Counsel  since
November 2021; Head  of Global Compliance & Operational
Risk, and Reputational Risk from December 2013 to October
2021.
Brian T. Moynihan (63) Chair of the Board  since October
2014, and President, Chief Executive Officer, and member of the
Board of Directors since January 2010.
Thong M. Nguyen (64) Vice Chair , Head of Global
Strategy & Enterprise Platforms since October 2021;  Vice
Chairman from January 2019 to October 2021; Co-Head --
Consumer Banking from September 2014 to January 2019;
Retail Banking Executive from April 2014 to September 2014;
and Retail Strategy , and Operations & Digital Banking Executive
from September 2012 to April 2014.
Thomas M. Scrivener  (51) Chief Oper ations Executive
since October 2021; Head of Consumer , Small Business &
Wealth Management Operations from October 2019 to October
2021; Global Real Estate and Enterprise Initiatives Executive
from Septem ber 2018 to October 2019; Enterprise Scenario
Planning and Execution Executive from May 2016 to September
2018; Enterprise Stress Testing, Recovery & Resolution
Planning Executive from June 2014 to March 2016.
Andrew M. Sieg (55) President, Merrill Wealth
Management since January 2017; and Head of Global Wealth &
RetirementSolutions with Merrill L ynch from October 2011 to January 2017.
Bruce R. Thompson (58) Vice Chair , Head of Enterprise
Credit  since October 2021; Vice Chairman, Head of Institutional
Credit Exposure Management (from Decem ber 2020) and
Wholesale Credit Underwriting and Monitoring (from May 2021)
to October 2021; Vice Chairman, President of the EU &
Switzerland and CEO of Bank of America Europe DAC from May
2018 to December 2020; Vice Chairman of Bank of America
Corporation from March 2016 to May 2018; Managing Director
from July 2015 to March 2016; Chief Financial Officer from July
2011 to July 2015.
Information included under the following captions in the
Corporation’ s proxy statement relating to its 2023 annual
meeting of shareholders (the 2023 Proxy Statement) is
incorporated herein by reference:
●    “Proposal 1: Electing directors – Our director nominees;”
●    “Corporate governance – Additional corporate governance
information;”
● “Corporate governance – Committees and membership;” and
●    “Corporate governance – Board meetings and attendance.”
Item 11. Executive Compensation
Information included under the following captions in the 2023
Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●    “Compensation discussion and analysis;”
●    “Compensation and Human Capital Committee Report;”
●    “Executive compensation;”
●    “CEO pay ratio;”
●    “Corporate governance;” and
●    “Director compensation.”
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters
Information included under the following caption in the 2023 Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●    “Stock ownership of directors, executive of ficers, and certain beneficial owners.”
The table below presents information on equity compensation plans at December 31, 2022:
Plan Category (a) Number of Shares to
be Issued Under
Outstanding Options,
Warrants and Rights (b) Weighted-average
Exercise Price of
Outstanding Options,
Warrants and Rights (c) Number of Shares
Remaining for Future
Issuance Under Equity
Compensation Plans
(excluding securities
reflected in column (a)) 
Plans approved by shareholders 206,439,608 — 164,047,513 
Plans not approved by shareholders — — — 
Total 206,439,608 — 164,047,513 
This table does not include 522,076 vested restricted stock units and stock option gain deferrals at December 31, 2022 that were assumed by the Corporation in connection with prior acquisitions
under whose plans the awards were originally granted.
Consists of outstanding restricted stock units. Includes 3,914,068 vested restricted stock units subject to a required 12-month holding period.
Restricted stock units do not have an exercise price and are delivered without any payment or consideration.
Amount represents shares of common stock available for future issuance under the Bank of America Corporation Equity Plan.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related
Transactions, and Director Independence
Information included under the following captions in the 2023
Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●    “Related person and certain other transactions;” and
●    “Corporate governance – Director independence.”Item 14.  Principal Accounting Fees and
Services
Information included under the following caption in the 2023
Proxy Statement is incorporated herein by reference:
●    “Proposal 4: Ratifyin g the appointment of our independent
registered public accounting firm for 2023.”(1) (2) (3) (4)
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
Bank of America 170
Part IV
Bank of America Corporation and Subsidiaries
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules     
The following documents are filed as part of this report:
(1) Financial Statements:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 238)
Consolidated Statement of Income for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Balance Sheet at December 31, 2022 and 2021
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Shareholders’  Equity for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021 and 2020
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(2) Schedules:
None
(3) Index to Exhibits
With the exception of the information expressly incorporated herein by reference, the 2023 Proxy Statement shall not be deemed
filed as part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit No.Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
3.1 Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended and in effect on the date hereof 10-Q 3.1 04/29/22 1-6523
3.2 Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Corporation as in effect on the date hereof 1
4.1 Indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (for senior debt securities) between registrant (successor
to NationsBank Corporation) and BankAmerica National Trust CompanyS-3 4.1 2/1/95 33-57533
4.2 First Supplemental Indenture dated as of September 18, 1998 between registrant and U.S. Bank
Trust National Association (successor to BankAmerica National Trust Company) to the indenture
dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.3 11/18/98 1-6523
4.3 Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of May 7, 2001 between registrant, U.S. Bank
Trust National Association, as Prior Trustee, and The Bank of New York, as Successor Trustee to
the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.4 6/14/01 1-6523
4.4 Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of July 28, 2004 between registrant and The Bank of New
York to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.2 8/27/04 1-6523
4.5 Fourth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 28, 2006 between the registrant and The Bank of
New York to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)S-3 4.6 5/5/06 333-133852
4.6 Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of December 1, 2008 between registrant and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (successor to The Bank of New York) to the indenture
dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.1 12/5/08 1-6523
4.7 Sixth Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2011 between registrant and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit
4.1)10-K 4(ee) 2/25/11 1-6523
4.8 Seventh Supplemental Indenture dated as of January 13, 2017 between registrant and The Bank
of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See
Exhibit 4.1)8-K 4.1 1/13/17 1-6523
4.9 Eighth Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2017 between registrant and the Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit
4.1)10-K 4(a) 2/23/17 1-6523
4.10 Successor Trustee Agreement effective December 15, 1995 between registrant (successor to
NationsBank Corporation) and First Trust of New York, National Association, as successor trustee
to BankAmerica National Trust CompanyS-3 4.2 6/28/96 333-07229
4.11 Agreement of Appointment and Acceptance dated as of December 29, 2006 between registrant
and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.10-K 4(aaa) 2/28/07 1-6523
4.12 Form of Senior Registered Note S-3 4.12 5/1/15 333-202354
4.13 Form of Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series L S-3 4.13 5/1/15 333-202354
4.14 Form of Master Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series L S-3 4.14 5/1/15 333-202354
4.15 Form of Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series M 8-K 4.2 1/13/17 1-6523
4.16 Form of Master Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series M 8-K 4.3 1/13/17 1-6523
4.17 Indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (for subordinated debt securities) between registrant
(successor to NationsBank Corporation) and The Bank of New YorkS-3 4.5 2/1/95 33-57533
4.18 First Supplemental Indenture dated as of August 28, 1998 between registrant and The Bank of
New York to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.17)8-K 4.8 11/18/98 1-6523
171 Bank of America
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit No.Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
4.19 Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of January 25, 2007 between registrant and The Bank
of New York Trust Company, N.A. (successor to The Bank of New York) to the indenture dated as
of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.17)S-4 4.3 3/16/07 333-141361
4.20 Third Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2011 between registrant and The Bank of
New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. (formerly The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.) to
the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See Exhibit 4.17)10-K 4(ff) 2/25/11 1-6523
4.21 Fourth Supplemental Indenture dated as of February 23, 2017 between registrant and The Bank
of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A. to the indenture dated as of January 1, 1995 (See
Exhibit 4.17)10-K 4(i) 2/23/17 1-6523
4.22 Indenture dated as of June 27, 2018 (for senior debt securities) between the registrant and The
Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.S-3 4.3 6/27/18 333-224523
4.23 Form of Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series N (prior to August 2021) S-3 4.4 6/27/18 333-224523
4.24 Form of Master Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series N (prior to August 2021) S-3 4.5 6/27/18 333-224523
4.25 Form of Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series N (from August 2021) S-3 4.4 8/2/21 333-257399
4.26 Form of Master Registered Global Senior Medium-Term Note, Series N (from August 2021) S-3 4.5 8/2/21 333-257399
4.27 Indenture dated as of June 27, 2018 (for subordinated debt securities) between the registrant and
The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.S-3 4.6 6/27/18 333-224523
4.28Form of Registered Global Subordinated Medium-Term Note, Series N (prior to August 2021)S-3 4.7 6/27/18 333-224523
4.29Form of Registered Global Subordinated Medium-Term Note, Series N (from August 2021)S-3 4.7 8/2/21 333-257399
Registrant and its subsidiaries have other long-term debt agreements, but these are omitted
pursuant to Item 601(b)(4)(iii) of Regulation S-K. Copies of these agreements will be furnished to
the Commission on request
4.30 Description of the Corporation's Securities 1
10.1 Bank of America Pension Restoration Plan, as amended and restated effective January 1, 2009
(Pension Restoration Plan)2 10-K 10(c) 2/27/09 1-6523
10.2 First Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated December 18, 2009 2 10-K 10(c) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.3 Second Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated June 29, 2012 2 10-K 10(a) 2/28/13 1-6523
10.4 Third Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated March 26, 2013 2 10-K 10.4 2/19/20 1-6523
10.5 Fourth Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated August 22, 2013 2 10-K 10.5 2/19/20 1-6523
10.6 Fifth Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated December 5, 2014 2 10-K 10.6 2/19/20 1-6523
10.7 Sixth Amendment to the Pension Restoration Plan dated December 15, 2016 2 10-K 10.7 2/19/20 1-6523
10.8 NationsBank Corporation Benefit Security Trust dated as of June 27, 1990 2 10-K 10(t) 3/27/91 1-6523
10.9 First Supplement to NationsBank Corporation Benefit Security Trust dated as of
November 30, 19922 10-K 10(v) 3/24/93 1-6523
10.10 NationsBank Corporation Benefit Security Trust Trustee Removal/Appointment Agreement dated
as of December 19, 19952 10-K 10(o) 3/29/96 1-6523
10.11 Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the Bank of America 401(k)
Restoration Plan) as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 10-K 10(c) 2/25/15 1-6523
10.12 First Amendment to the Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the
Bank of America 401(k) Restoration Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 10-K 10(vv) 2/24/16 1-6523
10.13 Second Amendment to the Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the
Bank of America 401(k) Restoration Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 S-8 4(c) 11/19/19 333-234780
10.14 Third Amendment to the Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the
Bank of America 401(k) Restoration Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 10-K 10.14 2/19/20 1-6523
10.15 Fourth Amendment to the Bank of America Deferred Compensation Plan (formerly known as the
Bank of America 401(k) Restoration Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 20152 10-K 10.15 2/24/21 1-6523
10.16 Bank of America Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective
December 10, 20022 10-K 10(g) 3/3/03 1-6523
10.17 Amendment to Bank of America Executive Incentive Compensation Plan, dated January 23, 2013 2 10-K 10(d) 2/28/13 1-6523
10.18 Bank of America Director Deferral Plan, as amended and restated effective January 1, 2005 2 10-K 10(g) 2/28/07 1-6523
10.19 Bank of America Director Deferral Plan, as amended and restated effective January 1, 2019 2 10-K 10(f) 2/26/19 1-6523
10.20 Bank of America Corporation Key Employee Equity Plan (formerly known as the Key Associate
Stock Plan), as amended and restated effective May 6, 2015 (2015 KEEP)2 8-K 10.2 5/7/15 1-6523
10.21 First Amendment to the 2015 KEEP dated December 19, 2018 2 10-K10(mm) 2/26/19 1-6523
10.22 Second Amendment to the 2015 KEEP dated April 24, 2019 2 8-K 10.1 4/24/19 1-6523
Bank of America 172
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit No.Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
10.23 Bank of America Corporation Equity Plan (formerly known as the Key Employee Equity Plan), as
amended and restated effective April 20, 2021 (2021 BACEP)2 8-K 10.1 4/22/21 1-6523
10.24 Form of Cash-settled Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2016 and subsequent
grants) under the 2015 KEEP2 10-Q 10(a) 5/2/16 1-6523
10.25 Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement for Non-Employee Directors under the 2015 KEEP
and the 2021 BACEP2 10-K 10(h) 2/26/19 1-6523
10.26 Form of Time-based Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2020) under the 2015
KEEP2 10-Q 10.1 5/1/20 1-6523
10.27 Form of Performance Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2020) under the 2015
KEEP2 10-Q 10.2 5/1/20 1-6523
10.28 Form of Time-based Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2021) under the 2015
KEEP2 10-Q 10.1 4/29/21 1-6523
10.29 Form of Performance Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement (February 2021) under the 2015
KEEP2 10-Q 10.2 4/29/21 1-6523
10.30 Form of Cash-settled Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement under the 2021 BACEP 2 10-K 10.32 2/22/22 1-6523
10.31 Form of Time-Based Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement under the 2021 BACEP  2 10-K 10.33 2/22/22 1-6523
10.32 Form of Performance-Based Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement under the 2021 BACEP 2 10-K 10.34 2/22/22 1-6523
10.33 Form of Phantom Restricted Stock Units Award Agreement 2 10-K 10.35 2/22/22 1-6523
10.34 Amendment to various plans in connection with FleetBoston Financial Corporation merger dated
October 27, 20032 10-K 10(v) 3/1/04 1-6523
10.35 FleetBoston Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan effective December 31, 2004 2 10-K 10(r) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.36 FleetBoston Executive Deferred Compensation Plan No. 2 effective December 16, 2003 2 10-K 10(u) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.37 FleetBoston Executive Supplemental Plan effective December 31, 2004 2 10-K 10(v) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.38 Retirement Income Assurance Plan for Legacy Fleet, as amended and restated effective
January 1, 20092 10-K 10(p) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.39 First Amendment to the Retirement Income Assurance Plan for Legacy Fleet, as amended and
restated effective January 1, 20092 10-K 10(I) 2/28/13 1-6523
10.40 Officer's Certificate of Global Compensation, Benefits and Shared Services Executive Regarding
Wanger Divestiture2 10-K 10(c) 2/25/11 1-6523
10.41 Trust Agreement for the FleetBoston Executive Deferred Compensation Plans No. 1 and 2 dated
December 17, 19972 10-K 10(x) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.42 Trust Agreement for the FleetBoston Executive Supplemental Plan dated June 19, 1996 2 10-K 10(y) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.43 Trust Agreement for the FleetBoston Retirement Income Assurance Plan and the FleetBoston
Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan dated June 19, 19962 10-K 10(z) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.44 FleetBoston Directors Deferred Compensation and Stock Unit Plan effective January 1, 2004 2 10-K 10(aa) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.45 BankBoston Corporation and its Subsidiaries Deferred Compensation Plan dated December 24,
20012 10-K 10(cc) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.46 BankBoston Director Stock Award Plan effective July 1, 1998 2 10-K 10(hh) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.47 BankBoston Corporation Directors’ Deferred Compensation Plan effective March 1, 1988 2 10-K 10(ii) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.48 BankBoston, N.A. Directors’ Deferred Compensation Plan effective March 1, 1988 2 10-K 10(jj) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.49 Description of BankBoston Director Retirement Benefits Exchange Program 2 10-K 10(ll) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.50 Global amendment to definition of “change in control” or “change of control,” together with a list of
plans affected by such amendment2 10-K 10(oo) 3/1/05 1-6523
10.51 Employment Agreement dated October 27, 2003 between registrant and Brian T. Moynihan 2 S-4 10(d) 12/4/03 333-110924
10.52 Cancellation Agreement dated October 26, 2005 between registrant and Brian T. Moynihan 2 8-K 10.1 10/26/05 1-6523
10.53 Agreement Regarding Participation in the Fleet Boston Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan
dated October 26, 2005 between registrant and Brian T. Moynihan2 8-K 10.2 10/26/05 1-6523
10.54 Employment Letter dated May 1, 2008 between Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. and Thomas K. Montag
and Summary of Agreement with respect to Post-Employment Medical Coverage2 10-K10(bbb) 2/26/10 1-6523
10.55 Securities Purchase Agreement dated August 25, 2011 between registrant and Berkshire
Hathaway Inc. (including forms of the certificate of Designations, Warrant and Registration Rights
Agreement)8-K 1.1 8/25/11 1-6523
10.56 Amended and Restated Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement (Multiple Aircraft) dated June 26, 2018
between Bank of America, N.A. and Brian T. Moynihan2 10-Q 10 7/30/18 1-6523
173 Bank of America
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit No.Description Notes FormExhibitFiling Date File No.
10.57 Form of Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement (Multiple Aircraft) between Bank of America, N.A. and
certain executive officers of the Corporation, including certain Named Executive Officers2 10-Q 10(b) 7/29/19 1-6523
10.58 Amended Exhibit B to the Form of Aircraft Time Sharing Agreement (Multiple Aircraft) between
Bank of America, N.A. and certain executive officers of the Corporation, including certain Named
Executive Officers2 10-Q 10.1 10/28/22 1-6523
10.59 Letter Agreement dated November 9, 2021 between the Corporation and James P. DeMare 2, 3 10-Q 10.1 4/29/22 1-6523
10.60 Employment Offer Letter dated March 4, 2019 between the Corporation and Matthew M. Koder 2, 3 10-Q 10.2 4/29/22 1-6523
10.61 Letter of Understanding dated March 4, 2019 between the Corporation and Matthew M. Koder 2, 3 10-Q 10.3 4/29/22 1-6523
10.62 Appointment Letter dated December 1, 2022 between Bank of America Europe Designated
Activity Company and Paul M. Donofrio with respect to board service as Chair and Non-Executive
Director1, 2, 3
21 Direct and Indirect Subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation As of December 31, 2022 1
22 Subsidiary Issuers of Guaranteed Securities 1
23 Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP 1
24 Power of Attorney 1
31.1 Certification of the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
20021
31.2 Certification of the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
20021
32.1 Certification of the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 20024
32.2 Certification of the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted
pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 20024
99.1 Bank of America Corporation Corporate Policy Regarding Seeking Stockholder Approval of Future
Severance Agreements1
101.INSInline XBRL Instance Document 5
101.SCHInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document 1
101.CALInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document 1
101.LABInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document 1
101.PREInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document 1
101.DEFInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definitions Linkbase Document 1
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
Filed Herewith.
Exhibit is a management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement.
As permitted by Regulation S-K, Item 601(b)(10)(iv) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, certain portions of this exhibit have been redacted from the publicly filed document.
Furnished herewith. This exhibit shall not be deemed “filed” for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or otherwise subject to the liability of that Section. Such exhibit shall
not be deemed incorporated into any filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
The instance document does not appear in the interactive data file because its XBRL  tags are embedded within the inline XBRL  document.
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary
Not applicable.(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
Bank of America 174
Signatures
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registra nt has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: February 22, 2023
Bank of America Corporation
By: /s/ Brian T. Moynihan
Brian T. Moynihan
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirem ents of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signe d below by the following persons
on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Title Date
/s/ Brian T. Moynihan Chief Executive Officer, President, Chair and Director
(Principal Executive Officer)February 22, 2023
Brian T. Moynihan
   
*/s/ Alastair M. BorthwickChief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)February 22, 2023
Alastair M. Borthwick
   
*/s/ Rudolf A. Bless Chief Accounting Officer
(Principal Accounting Officer)February 22, 2023
Rudolf A. Bless
   
*/s/ Sharon L. AllenDirector February 22, 2023
Sharon L. Allen
*/s/ José E. AlmeidaDirector February 22, 2023
José E. Almeida
*/s/ Frank P. Bramble, Sr.Director February 22, 2023
Frank P. Bramble, Sr.
   
*/s/ Pierre J.P. de WeckDirector February 22, 2023
Pierre J.P. de Weck
   
*/s/ Arnold W. Donald
Director February 22, 2023
Arnold W. Donald
*/s/ Linda P. HudsonDirector February 22, 2023
Linda P. Hudson
*/s/ Monica C. LozanoDirector February 22, 2023
Monica C. Lozano
*/s/ Lionel L. Nowell IIIDirector February 22, 2023
Lionel L. Nowell III
*/s/ Denise L. RamosDirector February 22, 2023
Denise L. Ramos
175 Bank of America
Signature Title Date
*/s/ Clayton S. RoseDirector February 22, 2023
Clayton S. Rose
*/s/ Michael D. WhiteDirector February 22, 2023
Michael D. White
*/s/ Thomas D. Woods
Director February 22, 2023
Thomas D. Woods
*/s/ R. David YostDirector February 22, 2023
R. David Yost
   
*/s/ Maria T. Zuber
Director February 22, 2023
Maria T. Zuber
*By /s/ Ross E. Jeffries, Jr.  
Ross E. Jeffries, Jr.
Attorney-in-Fact
Bank of America 176
